None
As a Minnesota transplant, I've found that it is hard enough to try and find a new doctor for yourself, but trying to find a good Doctor for your pet is even harder. I went to Lake Harriet on a recommendation from a site like this and hoped that it was a good fit. I have never felt as taken care of in a doctors office as I felt my poor sick kitten was at their facility. They walked me through the entire process, and never left me wondering what was going on. I cannot recommend this place enough if you are looking for a great, safe, and clean place to take your little loved ones.
I came into Christopher Kia South Jordan looking for a great car for a great price. Laekin Rogers helped me search for the perfect car and I have never been happier. Laekin never pressured me and helped me to feel comfortable making such large purchase. I am extremely happy I chose Christopher Kia and that Laekin was working that day!
None
Very Happy with their service, Thanks ProShred!
In the process of collecting quotes from area companies to replace our out dated system we didn't feel comfortable with any one company that came to our house with all the confusing information and at time misleading. We decided to reach out to Blanton's because they serviced our old system in the past and have always been professional on each visit. Blanton's sent James to our home to go over our needs at his visit James was very professional in explaining what our home would require through the measurement of each room to get a true reading on the square footage. He took the time to sit with use and explain the several different options available to us that will meet our needs without going over the top. James is a great asset to Blanton's and set the tone for our decision making process, thank you James. A few days later a crew of three arrived at our home. Again very professional and courteous in every way and they went right to work. To Stephen, David and Wayne thanks guys you are a tremendous asset to your craft and Blanton's they did an outstanding job while in our home keeping it all professional and clean every day. We also had a visit by a follow up service technician Keith who checked the system after install and ran it through its paces to confirm all was working as it should, again very professional. We had noticed that our Thermostat was incorrect for our install and Blanton's Tonya immediately scheduled a tech to our home to outfit the correct thermostat, thank you Laxavier and Tonya for your professionalism. I would be remised if I didn't mention Lori involved with Blanton's team of pros, thank you all for your wonderful service and professions. I can only say to those who are getting a bunch of useless information from other company's and not the piece of mind when it comes to making a decision of this size please call Blanton's before you decide and you will not regret it, we haven't and are extremely satisfied. To Blanton's as an organization Thank you ALL very much the Foderaro's
Sushi Thai is my absolute favorite sushi place in the Middle Georgia area! My favorite rolls are the Bruce Lee, the Caterpillar, and the Summer Roll. The service is always exceptional and I always enjoy going there. They also have good appetizers as well like the crab angels and the spring rolls. I've never tried the Thai food, but my friends seem to love it. I would highly recommend this place to anyone!
From the time I first met Chris at Blue Moon Entertainment to our last meeting before the big day I felt he truly understood how I wanted our wedding day to go. He really listened and took what I had to say to create the exact picture in my head I had been imagining my whole life. He created the party of a lifetime and kept it going from when we said I do to the last dance. The dance floor was packed the entire night and he even got my "husband" to sing to me at our wedding. I never thought that was possible. It was truly the best day of our lives. He made our dreams come true. Everyone is still raving about how much fun the night was. A sincere thanks. I would never trust my day to anyone else. He truly understands weddings and how to make your dreams come true.
None
Our experience at Bozard Ford Lincoln with Jeff Sparks, Billy Amdt and Marcia Nelson who all waited on us and serviced my Expedition was great. We were completely satisfied and will definitely return to the dealeship and recommend it to our friends.
Dave is excellent. Knows everything there is to know about plumbing. Good attitude, friendly to work with. If it's clogged, broken or leaking, he'll fix it, as fast as possible.
Best pizza in town. We don't even live in Millwoods and we go to Woodvale Pizza and Steak.
It's all about Tuesdays and Thursdays- $1 tacos and 35 cent wings!
We needed an RV for the weekend in Corvallis and just decided to try calling some RV shops. Sharon at Southside was really helpful. The trailer was perfect, very clean and totally up to snuff. They delivered it to the sure, set it up and picked it up again. It was a great weekend and very affordable.
I've tried most of the Thai places in Utah and they have the very best Spicy Pad Ped here. Fresh, bright, strong flavor; I like it with Tofu, 3 stars. If you get the masaman, ask for thick. Great service, nice atmosphere and they are very friendly.
I have used this company at least 4 times and they have been great. They are always on time and very professional. They have the best selection of bounce houses and event equipment around. We rented the fire and ice and it was a hit I think its the biggest waterslide in Orlando. I would try them you will be satified . Tom
Wonderful dance school.
Although hard to find and not cheap, I loved my visit there. I have been looking for a place for manicures, pedicures, hair and makeup (for special occasions) for years. I found it!!!! I was going in to Kim Jew Photography to have professional head shots and action shots so I got the works. Allen did an amazing job of makeup for the photo session. It was pretty heavy and dark but came out perfectly for a natural but younger look. He also styled my hair and it looked amazing for the photo shoot. Bravo did a great job on the manicure and pedicure with natural products and no cutting of cuticles or callouses. I have had so many compliments on my french manicure that is more pearlescent than most harsh white ones. And my feet are happy and beautiful. If you don't mind paying a little more for quality, you will definitely get great services with natural products.
We cannot say enough about how great our experience was at Sonoma Grille. We went there for the first time to celebrate our 2 year wedding anniversary. Upon learning this, they presented us with a complimentary champagne toast, followed by a complimentary dessert after dinner. Our server was very helpful in helping us select a wine. We are not big wine drinkers, so she allowed us to taste 3 different wines and we found one we really liked. Our server was very knowledgeable about the menu and provided great recommendations. The food was delicious, very reasonably priced, and perfectly portioned. We will definitely go back again for special occasions!
My husband and I have dined at Randall's several times. We have not been disappointed ONCE. The food is OUT OF THIS WORLD. I highly recommend the Lobster Française...with Vanilla Creme Brulee for dessert. The staff at Randall's is friendly & professional. They are educated on all of the menu items (for those like me who have questions) and always give you a full description of the specials. On a scale from 1-10...I would have to give Randall's & the Randall's staff an easy 12. By far my favorite restaurant in Lehigh Valley.
The best hand made ice cream in White Rock. The owner has a passion for ice cream and it shows. Many different flavors available at a great price. I've never NEVER been disappointed. Only ice cream shop I go to now in White Rock. Also - the owner usually has Frank Sinatra and music like that playing, so call him "Sinatra" when you go.
The pulled pork was excellent. The fries were seasoned with salt, pepper, and rosemary; very crispy and delicious. Will plan to stop on the return.
We stayed at the hotel last weekend while attending a Lacrosse Tournament. I am VERY picky where I stay. Your Hotel was wonderful! The staff was very friendly when we arrived and the nice girl at the front desk was helpful coordinating rooms close to another party we stayed with! Plus, Breakfast was great. Plenty of variety, fresh and HOT! The linens were clean and crisp, the bathroom was spotless and the towels were all WHITE! AND the Pillows were labeled "Soft" and "Firm". My only negative comment would be the firmness of the beds. WOW.. They were a little too hard. Maybe adding a pillow-top Mattress Cover would help :) Would DEFINITELY Recommend this hotel to anyone looking to stay in that area. Plus you are literally right down the street from Pocono Raceway! Will be back next year for our Fall Lacrosse Tournament!
Best "local bar" around!!! Good prices, good food, good people, good events. There's always something going on. New beers on tap, etc. Nice balcony view. Tuesday night team trivia (8:00) is lots of fun and you can win gift certificates : ) All-around, just a great local bar.
Excellent Greek and Italian!
من أفضل المراكز المتخصصة بخدمات ذوي الإحتياجات الخاصة في عمان
I hit up Rudy's on a recommendation by the staff at the my hotel just down the road. Saying the food here is excellent is an understatement - it blew away my expectations about how BBQ should taste. The meat is tender and juicy - even the turkey! The cream corn is sinfully delicious. The decor is fun and up-beat, with a fantastic irreverent attitude that matches the energetic and engaged staff. Samples of the different options means you can make sure whatever you get is exactly what you want on the first try. My advice - this meat fills you up fast, 1/2 lb is all you need (however much your eyes are telling you to go for more).
Great place to watch the game! Server was great and the appetizers were awesome!
None
Food is pretty good and it's a friendly environment. They can accommodate if you're in a hurry.
I worked with Dr. Clader and his staff for almost two years! It was my first time seeing a dentist office "from the inside." It's rare to find a culture of excellence that is the same behind the scenes as what you see coming in through the front door and in to your appointment. The craftsmanship, quality AND integrity that go into the clinical work and the relationships is like no place else I've seen. Dr. Dan is the man! :)
Local gem. Great wine selection, friendly warm atmosphere. The food is French inspired, and also very good.
Excellent little sandwich shop! Friendly staff, great salads, and very reasonably priced
Working with Darrell Johnson was a pleasure. He has a great understanding of his products, and his friendly demeanor made my experience smooth. I would recommend him to anyone I know interested in a quality BMW.
Very friendly employees and good products!
When we first stepped in, we were not thinking about leaving with a car that day; however with the help of Paul, who was our sales consultant, he helped us to the max in getting our 2010 Jeep Patriot!! We are very delighted in getting this perfect car to start our new adventure as newlyweds in a few months! Thanks Fair Oaks!!
This place was amazing , I went here for dinner and it makes all other food look horrendous! I got the sushi deluxe and it was great! for an appetizer I got a miso soup, seaweed, iced tea (best I`ve ever had.), and six pieces of sushi with 12 other pieces of sushi that was made differently though, for dessert I had a strawberry mochi ice cream which was gone in less than five seconds, and the last part was the little mint. I would have to really recommend this restaurant to anybody. ~~~~~~ 有り難う~~~~~~
None
Dr. Garcia is an excellent doctor who cares deeply about his patients. He will take all the time YOU need to discover what the problem is, and will refer you to other professionals to get treatment and/or second opinions. I have been a patient for a number of years and was quite surprised when I realized that no one had offered a review on him. His practice has grown and as a result added a very professional (very informed and up-to-date) Physician's Assistant to his staff not long ago. He has been my doctor for as long as I have lived in the area, and for that I am grateful.
None
My wife and I were a bit sceptical about visiting another dealership but we felt welcomed the moment we stepped foot inside their brand new showroom, we got a great deal on our new Colorado and will certainly be telling our friends and family about the professional team at Gibbons, keep up the great work guys! ps thanks for the gift on delivery
They're amazing. I eat there weekly, and am about to go get lunch there! The people, if you bother to be nice to them, they are super nice. I always enjoy saying hi to everyone there, and there really is good quality food!
None
Great view, great staff and the cuban banana soup will change your life
I live right around the corner, and it is phenomenal! I have never had a bad experience. Great food, Great people, Great time(:
I've been a Keyes Lexus customer for at least 10 years and always received a loaner car, no matter what the service was. This time, I needed both the 5,000 mile service and auto armor. The service rep. booked me for the 5,000 mile service, would not offer a loaner, and then said I needed to call a different department to arrange for the auto armor. My husband was furious with this response, called the service rep. and castigated him. After that, the rep. called back and arranged for both services at the same time, and a loaner car. Things are just not as convenient at this Lexus dealer Service as they used to be, but I'm glad they are willing to fix and improve. Keep up the good work!
They are an important part of our business and financial team. They are there, not just at tax time, but throughout the year to make sure we are on the right track.
Excellent customer service and service period! I went in for a battery test and front bumper molding issue. The molding ended up being caused from damage and they still fixed it under warranty! Also gave me a discount on my oil/filter change (was my first visit, first time Mitsubishi owner). Thanks guys!
None
Loving and following them since my 1st bite in North Miami
It's Christmas Eve 2013, 3:30 am and my heat pump air handler fan quit. I waited until 7:00 am and called a competitor and left a message. No one returned my call. At 7:30 am, I called Hometown and spoke with the owner. David said he could be here in about an hour. He arrived in 45 minutes and quickly discovered the problem. In less than 30 minutes my system was running fine. The next time I have any problem with an HVAC unit, I'm calling Hometown Heating and Cooling. I really like the way the company treats its customers.
Excellent food, huge margaritas, fast & friendly service! If Mr. Texas wants it hot, use one of the assorted hot sauces provided on the table
A neighbor of mine thought that the Independent Cleaning Service they were using was trustworthy, .... until the neighbor across from them met them as they pulled into their driveway. It turns out that they witnessed the "Cleaning Person" leaving the house TWICE with bulging gym bags (bags that were empty when the cleaning person entered the house!). They tried to detain the person and told them that the police were on the way, but no -- they had to leave! Well, as you might suspect, my neighbor's house was robbed. . . Heirlooms, Jewelry, collectibles, old coins, tools - anything of value! So sad! My point is, my neighbor declined my recommendation to use Molly Maid of Leon County. I told them that the Molly Maid employees were held to the highest standard of honesty & professionalism. My neighbor thought that they were "saving" money going the "cheap way." Don't follow my neighbor's example. Call Molly Maid of Leon County!
Very satisfied. Bob is a very nice guy, and cares about his customers.
Service was fast and excellent! The Sales Representative I spoke with was able to save me 40% which comes out to be 400 dollars a year!
Had a flat tyre, he removed the needle and fitted a new tube for a completely reasonable price. Nice work!
Very helpful, efficient and made getting my car serviced a breeze.
I have been working with Language Direct since last year, as a freelance translator. As far as my experience with Language Direct is concerned, it is one of my most favorites translation job outsourcing companies. Their professional ethics and relation with the vendors and commitment to the value based business practices are commendable. I am totally satisfied with the company for its timely payment and flexibility of the deadline offered to me upon my request while executing some projects, on some occasion. In short, Language Direct is a reliable and trustworthy company providing translation and interpretation services in UK. I always look forward to the mails with new projects from Language Direct.
Fadia quickly and perfectly tailored my daughter's choir dress. When my daughter tried the dress on after alterations, her face lit up because of how well it fit. Fadia is friendly, professional, and talented. We would not hesitate to return or to recommend her to others.
None
None
I had a great salad! Nice, casual dining experience; best place in London!
Excellent food and service.
The thing I like most about Lifestyle Homes is their ability to build my clients a home that feels custom for an affordable price. Because Lifestyle offers such a wide array of choices in cabinetry, flooring, counter tops, exterior siding styles and colors, tile, door and trim style etc.... my clients can have a home that reflects their taste at the standard price quoted on the floor plan they choose. Lifestyle delivers a home that is unique to the client -even on a stock floor plan - without charging upgrades on every finish. I appreciate that!
If you want honesty, see Nancy
Jason's is always a great place to go especially if you have kids. The price is in line with what I'd spend at McD's for me and 2 kids for junk. The food is fresh and the desert (frozen yogurt) is included. Sandwiches are always stacked. Salad bar is unique and awesome. Food is great for the healthy eater...problem is i just eat to health of a portion when there. Note that baked lays are available substitute for those who don't want the standard chips or a bowl of fruit. Only thing i did not like was the BBQ...but this is NC you don't got to Jason's for BBQ!!!:)
The place to go for breakfast tacos in London. Either here or their stand at the Artisan's market in Western Fair on Saturdays. Seek them out. You won't be sorry.
None
Jackie Z Style Co is an amazing place to shop! The quality is top notch and the selection for men and women is unique and one of a kind. The best part is if you don't have time to shop they are personal shoppers too. I highly recommend Jackie Z Style Co!!
None
We had a couple of friends who have recommended Gwen to us and we couldn't be more pleased with her work. She is super friendly and personable. She knows how to get kids attention in pictures, something we have had issues with other photographers. We loved that she worked in a variety of locations and thought Mt. Margret was so representative of the Colorado look we were looking for in our family shots. Very easy to work with, professional and affordable. I would highly recommend!
Great place for lunch...
Fav place
Best fried rice I've ever had! Love the sesame chicken as well. Quick take out!
Best experience I've ever had getting a car registered. It was quick and painless and because they focus on inspections not repairs they're not going to fail your vehicle just so they can sell you something.
We have lived in the SW valley for 13 years, and have been looking for a good, fair mechanic for about as long. My search has ended. Phil is personable, knowledgeable, and runs a business like it should be run. A clean shop tells me a lot. I had brake issues, every time I stepped on the brakes it was "brake and shake". I knew it was unsafe and did not want my teenagers driving it. Phil and his team got the job done on time and on budget. I love working with a "Mom and Pop" business.
Fantastic food for some late night laughs and fun with friends :)
Christopher Optical has provided both great products and service for our family. So far have bought two Miraflex frames and a number of lens, my 3 year old likes to scratch his lens apparently, over the past two years.
Josh at PDXinspections knocked it out of the park. I wanted to move fast on a used car and needed someone who could look at it ASAP. After filling out the work order form at midnight I heard back from him early the next morning. He was amenable to meeting me near work and had already started inspecting the car before I even got there. After some conversation and looking over the car together he spent about an hour and got the inspection report back to me right away. The price was superlative, the friendliness level was super high, and the inspection was so thorough that I could tell he had gone over the whole car with a fine toothed comb. Highly recommended for a quick turn-around, low price, high quality inspection. Thanks PDXinspection, you made my day.
None
Ein Restaurant in Ehrenfeld aus dem man immer zufrieden rausgeht. Im Sommer lädt der Biergarten im hinteren Teil ein, im Winter der Innenraum mit Strandkorb und Naturfilmen via Beamer! Das Essen hier ist immer vorzüglich, die wechselnde Speisekarte alle 2-3 Monate neu. Die Mädels im Service sind immer freundlich und sehr zuvorkommend. Bezahlen tut man immer vorne an der Bar am Eingang. Durchschnittlicher Preis für eine Person: 25-30 €.
I've trusted Amazon Jungle for over 25 years for their expert advice on small animals, birds and fish. Every creature I've purchased from them has been top quality. They're just good people who care about the animals they sell, and the people that buy them. I recommend them all the time.
Very quick and proffesional service.
Reliable repairs, great warranty, trustworthy customer service. I feel confident using Gages Lake Auto again and recommending them to others. Courtesy cars are a huge bonus as well!
This last summer, this restaurant came under new management and is phenomenal. The service was welcoming and friendly, and the food was fantastic! The fries are cut fresh daily and the burgers are delectable. The menu has some creative options, and it is also vegetarian friendly! We are new to Ashland, and this is already one of our favorite eateries in the city.
My hairdresser was out of town and I could not wait. Coco do my hair and was very good. Will go back. It is closer for me. like the atmosphere .
looking forward to Cheetahs being introduced.
I was very pleased to secure a great deal and bring home my new 2013 Escape SE! Renee Weeks and Chris Boan treated me royally. They really demonstrated that they were interested in fitting me with a vehicle that was right for MY needs. With the "Wear and Tear" program, I felt comfortable commiting to a leased vehicle which had always disappointed me with other dealerships. Service also, with this dealership has always been outstanding, so this makes my second new car at Szott a double win! Continue to care about the best interest of your customers as you have, and you'll keep my business and anyone I can refer to you.
None
Took my '12 Passat in for a routine maintenance appointment. I missed the appointment by an hour and when I showed up I was treated as if I had been there ahead of time. No negative behavior for my oversight. Tim was prompt, smiled and had a positive demeanor all throughout my visit. Thanks Tim
When I was in the market for a car, I initially dismissed Nissan thinking it was out of my price range. But after looking at other dealerships and brands, I decided to check Hudson Nissan's website because I remembered their lifetime warranty. Lo and behold, a barely used Nissan Rogue caught my eye. I dropped into the dealership, and Rico helped me out the rest of the way. You would think buying a car on December 31st would make the salesperson pushy, but Rico was just as cool as a cucumber, was very patient, and answered every single question I had.
I go there all the time and I love it
None
We love Thai Basil...even our kids love it. They love the potsitckers (actually enough for 2 to share) and the edamame. We love eveything else. We've been there 4 times now and not run in to anything we don't like, although the pad thai is especially good. Great choice, not all thai which is nice. Highly recommend it!
None
We drive 30 minutes, past several vet offices, to get to MRAH. The entire staff is AMAZING. They have taken such good care of us… we'll never go anywhere else in Nashville.
Good service
None
None
Immer wieder gerne! Super Location direkt am Wasser, leckere Mahlzeiten und Snacks und freundlicher und gut aussehender Service ;) Und dann auch noch das beste Bier südlich der Elbe!
good
It's hard to sum up in words how utterly impressed I was with The Diamond Vault of Troy. It made one of the most nerve-racking experiences of my life feel incredibly simple. From the moment I walked in I felt comfortable and relaxed. Randy is an outstanding jeweler and insanely nice and easy to work with. He helped me design my (now) fiancé's ring. He proved that there is nothing he can't do. He is going to give you exactly the kind of ring you want for the right price. The ring itself was flawless. I couldn't have asked for a better diamond than the FireMark. My fiancé was adamant about having a ring that sparkles, but the dilemma was that she also loves the princess cut. The FireMark is the best of both worlds. It was one of the sparkliest rocks I have ever laid eyes on. When Randy showed me two diamonds, one princess and one FireMark, side by side on a brown desk, with poor lighting, and the diamonds were the same size, clarity, and color, in was clear to me which one was the winner. The FireMark blew the princess cut away. I couldn't believe how in less-than optimal viewing conditions, how much the FireMark shinned. It was truly impressive. When I gave my fiancé her ring she was speechless, and then instantly started to cry. She was so incredibly happy with her ring, she couldn't believe it. The first thing she did was remark on how much her diamond sparkled. Friends and family couldn't believe it either. They have never seen a princess cut shine like that before. As funny as it is, my fiancé keeps getting honked at while driving because she sits at a green lights (not realizing it switched from Red to Green) just staring at her ring. It was 100% worth the price just to see that look on her face every time she looks at her ring. I would HIGHLY recommend purchasing a ring from the Diamond Vault of Troy, and ask for Randy. He truly is one of the best and will bend over backwards to make sure that your engagement ring is as special as you think it should be. I love my fiancé with all my heart and wanted to get her the perfect symbol of my love to her, and Randy made that possible.
Amazing little Ma & Pa, literally. Very consistent, have been going for years, my home away from home, I always get the 42 YUMMY! Don't believe any negative review on this place, must be their competition.
Okay, I know this is only viewable by me and Google employees. Why did this get set to private?
Jim has been nothing but professional and completely reliable. He has taken alot of stress and worried off me. I'm extremely happy Jim over all my accounting.
None
Beautiful produce and meat. The box goods are a little pricy. Everyone is friendly and very helpful
Alla vamos!!!
Excellent food and service, reasonably priced! Ate there on a Friday night - they are open Fridays! Suggest a reservation as we were there early but it was filling up when we left. Check their website for a current menu!
I am an event manager and I did a dealers meet their. Not me but all my 70 guests were extremely happy and satisfied.
None
Love it!
tables are crowded together, and you will probably see many of the same execs who arrived on the same plane as you ... what do you expect for one of the better restaurants in amsterdam. they still have not gotten rid of the sigarettes yet
They were great! They did a great job and showed up when they said they would. I would highly recommend them!
Shockingly wonderful! I can't believe I've never been here before now! They are so nice & very accommodating. The salon itself is very clean and well laid out with all new machines. I will definitely be going back every time I need a mani/pedi/anything.
None
Excellent service, great food and cheap beer. A great find whilst trying to find somewhere warm during Prague Christmas!
Pete Papa George playing the guitar and stiff drinks. What's not to love?
A wonderful buffet with very nice people.
None
Visited based on other recommendation on here. Highly recommend! Lovely fresh authentic curries! Great value for money. A starter, poppadom and chutney, 2 mains and rice plus beers for under £45.
This is one of my favorite places to eat, I have had 5-6 things off the menu and all of them have blown my taste buds away. I really love the specials they have with cards games, and cant wait to see what they do with hockey season.
None
Lassan két hónapja járunk a nyelviskolába, nagyon jó a csoportunk és a tanárunkkal is maximálisan elégedettek vagyunk. Azt vettem észre, hogy magabiztosabb az angol tudásom, meg merek szólalni, ha külföldivel találkozom. Köszönet Nektek:-)
We have been seeing Dr. Carmichael and the other vets at Lake City Animal Hospital since April 2003. We continue to use them with our current pets. They are extremely professional and polite and we have encountered nothing but the best service. Last year when we lost our oldest dog, the staff was more accommodating, caring, and helpful than I would have ever expected and more so than I have heard from friends' vets. The constant communication regarding test results and labwork was exemplary. Just like human doctors, they are not miracle workers, but they do everything they can to care for our pets. Honestly, I feel the vets and staff at Lake City Animal Hospital offer better care and service than most general practitioners these days!
Finally!! Been looking for a place like this. It's nice and clean. The food is great. Reminds me of all the Gyro places back in Chicago. Love it!
My oldest two kids have been going for years and they really enjoy it. They are both working hard towards earning black belts.
Fast repair service on our broken garage door spring. Chris was great ... a very pleasant and professional experience with Chris and with the company. Thank you guys!
I highly recommend Matt Tate. He is knowledgeable and kind.
We hired nyc interior design to redesign our apartment on park ave. Erika was absolutely wonderful to work with and has fantastic taste. We were able to get some of our vintage furniture, which were tired of looking at but didn't want to sell, restored to work in the design and she found other pieces which matched perfectly. We have recommended her to several colleagues and will absolutely recommend her again.
Great location, convenient. Staff is great, friendly. They offer orders by text message as well for easy pickup.
It's always a nice experiance at your office. I went through two years of invisalign with great success. Two of my three kids are done with their braces and have beautiful smiles. My third child is just starting. The staff is considerate and Dr. Becker makes us feel comfortable and well cared for.
Seamless is the best way to describe both the buying process at The Granite Guy and their final product. At The Granite Guy showroom, you can select your granite slab. That is right, you are not looking at a 12" by 12" sample, but the entire slab. The price includes everything, including the kitchen sink and removal of your old counter top. You can upgrade the sink and pay for them to connect the plumbing, but that is it. The Granite Guy makes buying so easy. The installers are craftsmen, who really care about their work. They proudly told me they have the best seams in the business. And I believe them. The guy, who installed our tile backsplash (from another company) and who installs a lot of tile in kitchens with new granite counter tops, had trouble finding the seam. So did two friends who came to see our new kitchen. If you do not know where to look, our counter top is seamless.
I had a really good time staying at The Allt. Anne and Seamus were very welcoming and helpful; the room was comfy and the location convenient. Top stuff.
I've been going to Mammoth Comics for almost 10 years, I love the place, the environment is great, very welcoming, whoever is running the counter is always a joy to talk to and sound interested and happy to answer any questions you may have about a book. I highly recommend Mammoth Comics, you really won't find better stock or friendlier service anywhere else and that's a fact! As for the guy claiming that the owner is a crook and that crooks run the place, it sounds like he has never even been to Mammoth Comics.
Was very impressed from the time I walked in, to when I drove my car off the lot. All questions were answered. Was given the keys and told to take my time test driving. Love my Ford Focus, it is all ready my favorite car I've had in 30 years.
After being pushed around by Ancira, and told I couldn't get the car I wanted, I decided to give IPAC a call. I was greeted by Larry, one of the most friendly, reasonable salesmen I've ever dealt with. He was very professional and listened to my concerns and understood what I was looking for and what I wanted to spend. He knew that the information I gave him was solid and what I could and could not afford. He did not push anything on me just showed me what I was interested in. Larry did not act as a car salesman, but a consumer and helped me find what I wanted, and I walked out of the dealership with a 2011 Dodge Charger, EXACTLY what I wanted. HE EVEN DROVE WITH ME to the dealership that had my trade-in to MAKE SURE they didn't try to pull something over on me and made sure they gave me the keys to my old car. This really went above and beyond his spirit to serve me, and it was good knowing I had someone who had my back the whole time. I will be back to see Larry, and I will recommend anyone who is looking to buy a car to go see him. He is honest,upfront, and was a pleasure to deal with.
About a week ago I traveled to Carrollton, Georgia to visit Scott Evans Nissan to inquire about a trade-in and see what kind of inventory they have there. I traveled from Peachtree City to Carrollton due to Scott Evans having the ability to match me with my wants and needs when making a seamless transition between automobiles. Once I arrived to the lot I was immediately impressed with the overall presentation (cleanliness, organization, as well as employees) of the facility. I met with an associate named Lauren Mandler, she was extremely knowledgeable about what has on her lot that fit my price range and even had a folder with potential vehicle fits. She basically built a profile for me before I arrived, which made for a productive afternoon instead of me kicking tires and reading window stickers. Lauren was extremely accommodating working with me and my credit issues, helping put things into perspective before such a major purchase. While Lauren was running back and forth addressing my questions I couldn’t help but notice how friendly the rest of the sales team at Scott Evans was. Members of the team came up and introduced themselves making me feel welcome. After a couple of test-drives later we successfully narrowed down what car best fit me and my financial abilities. Toward the end of our visit Lauren gave plenty of information about the vehicle we settled on and I will be returning as soon as possible considering I don’t suspect the car will be on the lot very long. All in all, I’m impressed to say the least with Scott Evans and his employees. I have tried Union City, Jonesboro, and Newnan before settling on Scott Evans Nissan in Carrollton and will be returning for all of my future vehicle needs. (9.8 out of 10)
This is the best place to get a haircut! Ask for Olga, she is the manager and has been cutting my hair for years. I never go to anyone else. She is very courteous and professional.
This software is the most important tool in my graduate's research and the experience has been positive.
Love it! Its as good as it feels.
Midwest weight control is the reason this I lost 65 lbs. The staff was very genuine and they really held me accountable. Sometimes all you really need is a push in the right direction to change your life, and that is exactly what they provided me with. I started my program with them in September 2011 at 255 lbs and here I am in June at 185. I am 20 years old and attending college. Money was a huge factor for me. They did a great job of understanding that and helping me do the best that I could with a limited budget. They also gave me the knowledge to continue on my own now that my program has ended. Before starting with Midwest weight control I would try to do some research and do it myself. I failed every time I tried and was sick of struggeling. They helped me to stay on track and they really gave me the confidence to keep going. Now at 185 I went from a size 40 waist size to a 35 and I have more energy. I know that this has affected many areas of my life including school. As a freshman in college I had a 2.5 GPA and didnt work very hard. Now as after my sophomore year I have a 3.8 GPA. Changing your diet and work ethic can affect many different areas of your life, but it takes work. Anyone can change their life but it helps to have some help along the way. My sincerest thanks to the people at Midwest Weight Control for helping me change my life around. You guys rock.
I have never had a better car buying experience. I was in need of a new vehicle and needed it fast. Within a couple of hours of my arrival I was driving off the lot with exactly what I wanted. Cheryl made the whole process very easy and even exciting. She answered all the questions I had and made sure I knew what was going on every step of the way. After making this purchase I see no need to go anywhere else. Going to a different dealer would simply be settling for less.
None
None
Today I went there because I got a flat tire. Also I had a squeaky noise with brake. The Valero was the closet one from my home, just 3 minutes drive. They asked $22 for tire check and $22 for brake check. At that point, I was a little reluctant, because I heard there were some places that brakes check was free. He said checking costs $22 and if some part needed to be replaced, it would cost more. Anyway, I let them fix my car. 3 hours later, the manager called me that the work was done. They took out a nail from my tire (not sure how I got it) and cleaned the brakes without charging me more. Fortunately my brakes didn't need new part. =) Now my car is working fine. I'm satisfying with their work and will recommend to my friend.
Great food great staff
Excelente lugar para comer con la familia o para hacer negocio.
Does a great job in treatments of his patients
None
Candra and jose rock. they are so helpful, they have great customer service and they make you feel like family. Best experience with both of them. ive been there for over 2 years and not once have I had a bad experience. i would go in to pay my bill just to see them because of my great experience. highly recommended them over anything else. thanks guys
Has yet to let me down. Even did a catering for me and was awesome.
None
Locked myself out of the RV. Called Good Sam and they sent AnyTime LockSmith. Daniel called as I was getting off the phone with Good Sam and arrived shortly after. Got the door open quickly for us and was very courteous. Would call them first for any new service. Absolutely recommend!
Long wait but worth it. Great place, very accommodating people. We ate outside and they did a good job of keeping up with our needs. We had little ones with us,[], so it was challenging at times. Very happy and will return.
My boyfriend LOVES Mexican food and every time we are at the JC he has to eat here, it’s not a choice for me, but I don’t mind I love the burritos the enchiladas and the tamales. He on the other hand always get the same grande polo burrito, he just can’t get enough of it.
I am 100% pleased with my roof repair done by Alpine Roofing! Miguel and Ben showed up promplty...both gentlemen represented Alpine to the highest standard of professionalism...Very courteous and worked dilligently on my roof until complete. I appreciate companies and employees that take pride in their work. I will be recommending to anyone I know! Thank you Alpine....
Gentilezza e cortesia massima,frequento il negozio Etruria di Barbuti dall'età di 15 anni quando iniziai con l'elettronica (ora ne ho 41),molto forniti e prezzi molto buoni,a volte c'e da fare una fila di massimo 5 minuti,ma è ripagata dalla professionalità del personale..alcuni componenti specifici per riparazioni radio/tv/audio non li hanno,ma danno sempre un consiglio dove trovarli,veramente ottimo negozio!
The cashier was friendly and the manager was very helpful.
Raj helped me out with a ring repair, did it quickly and was very reasonably priced. Great jewelry store with wonderful service!
Fabulous service and great results! Our carpets have never looked better! We have high quality carpet but it is more than 10 years old ... there were a few bad stains in the basement, probably from spilled soda. And I was convinced the stairs would never look good again. Honestly, when I arrived home, it looked like all of the carpets were brand new, even on the stairs. Amazing! I would highly recommend Oliva Cleaning!
Best Gujarati (Indian) food ever. I cannot stress more on how delicious the food is. True delight for all the senses. Highly recommended.
A brilliant shop - I have bought both of my electric guitars from Mansons - always a great level of service and mega knowledgable/helpful highly recomend
Debbie and Sarah are both AWESOME. I have been working with Security Title for years. It has been fantastic to partner with a company that can handle all of my title needs for my busy real estate business. They have a convenient office location in Fort Myers with a great professional office staff. Sarah is wonderful and goes above and beyond whenever i need anything. Thank you for all of your hard work and professionalism that you have given over the past few years.
I have taken 2 different units to Nanotech and received prompt courteous service and the price is always as quoted. This last time it was a 3rd Gen ipod touch that no one else would touch. Even Apple. Repaired as quoted in good time, less than it would have been to send to apple and 100 bucks less out of my pocket. Awesome. Keep up the good work. I highly recommend! As Arnie would say, I"ll be back!
For a first time car buyer this was a great place to go and do so. I love my new honda fit. Dion Blackburn was very helpful and answered all my questions that I had about getting a new car. Great atmosphere and a great staff especially Dion Blackburn.
very good tasting burger without the "heavy" feeling after eating it. The breaded fries were really good. The ice cream was very good too, as it seemed like it was just made. I would recommend to anyone who enjoys a good burger and fries meal.
I was very impressed with Forrest at recent wedding! He is super profession and the music selection was perfect for the event and the crowd! So fun! I would use him for my wedding!
Bearing in mind it's a fast food place, it can't be beat. Good veggie options, you know, if you're into that.
James came out promptly to see an extremely heavy metal oil tank that needed removing. We arranged a date for collection. On the arranged day James and his son arrived on time to remove the tank. Despite its weight the tank was loaded onto the truck and taken away as required. James communicated well throughout the job, arrived in a large clean truck and did exactly what he said he would do. I can highly recommend this company.
Excellent and swift service. Very handsome supervisor as well.
Best Italian food I've had since I was in Italy, great service and wonderful decor
Utilized the marketing services of Tauranga company Flame Communications last year and they've provided me with a significant increase in brand presence, which has helped grow my business locally and nationally. Highly recommended marketing and advertising company!
Excellent. Always awesome food and music. Would LOVE to see some deep fried pickles on the menu. I'm a regular and I go often, I highly recommend this place to anyone who wants a hangout that is low-key, relaxing, with delicious food!
It is so good there; everything, especially the margaritas.
I've spent a few nights here. And if I need a place to stay in Newcastle, I won't even look elsewhere. Staff are super friendly, the restaurant serves world class food, and they even have a small bar/nightclub on the property (Thirsty Thursday is the best night). As a previous rater said, it's geared towards the working man. But don't hold that against them. They also have a pond where you can feed the fish and turtles. Reasonable prices, clean rooms and wireless internet. What more does a person really need?
None
harry's fish and chip shop is going from strength to strength his fish makes the fish quay shops fillets look like minnows, as for chips it depends how you like them, I personally think they should be soft and slightly greasy, if you like them crisp on the outside I think you should stay home and make your own.
None
None
I met The Web Guys in 2010. Our existing Website was terrible to say the least. They took the time to explain to us how the Web works and what they could do for us. I did not realize how bad it was until The Web Guys built a new site for us. Immediately our business exploded! Today we have more customers than we can handle, from all over the world! They are always there to take our call, weather it be for questions, changes, or updates. Their service is second to none! The response is real time, not hours or days, like some other Companies. If you are thinking about a new website, and you have "The Web Guys" build it for you, it will be one of the best business decisions you ever made!
We were in Vancouver for vacation. My wife forgot bring her sunglasses and one of our friends suggested Rumi Optical in downtown Vancouver. The owner seemed very well-informed and very experienced with optics, he gave us very good deal. He was very kind with a nice attitude. I didn't need to buy for myself, but since I liked the way that he treated us, and then I decided to buy another one for mine too. We both were very happy from our shopping and the money that we spent because both sunglasses were original brands, with reasonable prices and very good quality. Bruce from Ontario
The best :))
None
one of my favourite places to eat.
New bongaigaon railway workshop & stockyard
None
I chose to get a pizza to-go on the recommendation of a customer of mine. He said that this place had the best pizza ever. I arrived at the end of the night, you could tell that they were getting ready to clean up from an earlier rush. The pizza was made quickly, although I was one of few people there at the moment, and the service was friendly. I cannot claim that this was the best pizza I have ever had. I'm sorry, just being honest; however, it was the best thin-crust pizza that I've ever had. The dough was wasn't so crispy that it shattered but stiff enough to hold its shape. It didn't taste like flour or a saltine cracker either. It was perfect. The sauce was full of flavor and there was plenty of cheese. They didn't skimp on toppings either. So the food was a total 5 stars for me. The atmosphere seemed nice too. A few tv's up to watch a game, video games for the kids, pool tables for the billiard junkies and a good selection of drinks for those interested in taking the edge off of the evening. I wish there was one in my neighborhood, but there's not. So if you live nearby, go grab a slice then have another for me.
I've always been skeptical of detailing services before bringing my horrific mess of a car to these guys. Not only did they debunk my skepticism but they made my car look better than the day I bought it. Hands down the best detail both my wife and I have ever seen. They also went out of their way to meet up with us after hours to pick up our car in order to better accommodate our schedule. I cant recommend them more...oh and the price was great too!
None
Good overall. Love it. By the nederlands border, Only a 15 km. U can ride it bycycle
Always has stock shelves and the staff is friendly & helpful
Matt did some head shots for me and did a great job. He's fun to work with, got me to relax and smile, and took lots and lots of shots before we settled on the right ones. He was quick to turnaround the file photos and the product was great. I highly recommend him.
I have been to The Fort' several times. The people were friendly and helpful every time. I have gotten some great deals on hats there and they are very good at shaping and sizing hats for you on the spot. I have never had a problem with rudeness though I am well mannered myself I usually get that in return. Great store and massive selection of western wear!
Awesome Service Provide by Ideal Celebrations recently we had good deal thanks for Sai Teja
The staff here takes excellent care of me and my family. They do not treat you like a customer. They treat you like family!
Coming from a gym I hated prior to joining Anytime Fitness I never went to the gym that I was paying $50.00 a month for. I find myself going every other day if not everday to anytime because its convient hours, location, and tanning. I am absolutly in love. .
This is a great barber shop. Oscar cut my hair and it looks perfect. He's a good guy too.
This is the best deal for a no frills gym in the area. No personal trainers hassling people, no sales pitches, just a great place to workout. It's never too crowded and all of the staff and patrons are friendly.
I purchased a Groupon for Essential Aesthetics a long time ago and fell in love with Eli. She is honest, professional and takes her job very seriously. She is always keeping up with the latest treatments and or ways to help ease the signs of aging. Her office is lovely and so are the people who work there. I love that you can request an appointment online and Mary will get back to you promptly. I HIGHLY recommend Essential Aesthetics to anyone interested in improving their appearance and self-esteem.
always satisfying and fresh :)
I just can't say enough about my business dealings with Bruce at Japan Auto Parts. He is a man of the highest integrity. He has stood behind his product above and beyond. His customer service is the best I have ever come across. Bruce always made me feel like he took a personal interest in my situation, and that I wasn't just a number or an inconvenience, and believe you me, my situation was definitely a frustrating one for all involved. I can say with absolute conviction you will be hard pressed to find anyone who is more honest, has better customer service, or stands behind their product more than Bruce at Japan Auto Parts. Not only that, but he is an absolute gentleman, and a pleasure to do business with. I would rate my experience as a 12 out of 10! With Many Thanks and Appreciation for all you've done. Sincerely, Kimberly Dyck
Always the best
me
Excellent customer service and sales experience. Love the couch and glass table and chairs we purchased.
What a find! Fantastic service: quick, thorough, great price . . . and complete with a clean car inside & out upon pickup. If your car needs repair, come here first!
Ben did a great job for us and was very helpful in showing us ways to make full use of our photos and tour. Thanks Ben!
Wonderful people to work with. They are very knowledgeable and have fair prices. Had a new set of tires put on our Odyssey, and had them fix an issue on my truck. Quick and good.
The Shapiro family was very attentive to our needs as we prepared to be married later in the year. My wife loves her ring and I would recommend them to anyone in search of a special item for a special occasion.
These 2 people are idiots and most likely the most impatient people in the world. You know they do hire new high school kids quite frequently, do you really think they are going to just start the job and do it perfect and get it to you right when you want it. If you really drive 3 miles away to another jimmy johns you really have issues. i live 3 blocks away from this location and i received my delivery within 10 minutes.
A few months ago I backed my brand new Prius into a low brick planter box. (Hey, it was dark, I had not ever used the backup camera, and I m a senior--what can I say!) Needless to say, I wasn t a happy camper. But I took my car into Anderson's and you can't even tell that anything happened. Not only did they do a great job, they were polite and friendly, did not up the estimate, repaired the car quickly, and drove me home and picked me up again when it was done. I would definitely recommend Anderson's for any body repair work that you might need.
None
I get my parts from your parts Dept. and I love dealing with Gillis he always knows all his parts and is very helpful he takes time to make every customer feel like they are the most important. I will continue to buy parts from you Thanks for the great service !!!!!!!!
I have been a client of Elizabeth since she set up Dental Matters in Adelaide. I prefer to travel the 30 minutes down South Road to receive her service than to settle for anyone else. The facility is conveniently located close to central Adelaide, the rooms are quiet and calming ( not that there is anything to worry about!) and all the staff are friendly and helpful. Cannot recommend highly enough!
None
One of my favourite places. Super friendly staff, and great food, so great.
This was my first experience with Cool Air Mechanical. They were prompt and incredibly efficient in both scheduling and working. The technicians answered all questions and gave us great pointers concerning the replacement parts we had installed.
Dr. Elzik is a fantastic Doctor, he understands and has an open mind yet he is not one of these Pain Clinics that are just in it for the money. My experience with Dr. Elzik is that he gets to the root of what is causing the pain and prescribing a whole program not just drugs to treat it. Marlene is fantastic to work with as well.
Top quality accommodation with a very friendly Family run business.Excellent breakfast & fantastic value for money.
I love this outwardly unassuming but truly beautiful studio, and only wish it were located closer to home and/or work! I've had fantastic experiences with every visit, especially the hour-long hot class on Sundays, which always serves to reset and recharge me for the week ahead. :) I'm grateful for Yoga Harmony's professional yet personable instructors and lovely facility, enriching my practice and therefore my life!
Great shore restaurant. Good food and accommodating.
Great place to stay and having fun.
None
Love love love their pork chops cooked with the cabbage and their fried chicken! We stop there every time we make a trip goung that direction. It's part of the plan!
I always have great service at Mercedes of Jackson. Pamela is an excellent service adviser. Keep up the good work!
Melhor Picanha na Chapa que já comi. Atendimento nota 1000.
A wonderful place!
I was in London last weekend, during my trip my camera broke. After checking the nearest store to our Hotel, my partner and I visited Currys in High Street Kensington. The service I received was second to none, I was welcomed by a lovely gentleman who directed me to the customer service desk. Steve the assistant asked me if I had replacement insurance cover for my 'existing broken camera' which I was unsure of. He went out of his way to check this. He very kindly advised this was all in place, furthermore took time to show me the camera that would be most suitable. I left the store with a brand new camera and copy certificate of insurance (which is effective for another 2 years.) A very very happy customer, thanks to a great team. Linda Fox
I ABSOLUTELY love this office!! They are very precise, accurate, caring, knowledgeable and gentle. I have had nothing but good experiences here and we all know how scary going to the dentist can be......from the front office staff to the hygienist's, to the assistants and to the doctors...everyone is kind, caring and compassionate. I would not take my family any where else and I HIGHLY recommend this office to anyone! Thank you to my all my different hygienists, doctor assistants and a special shout out to Dr. Skip Jeranko for your hard work and the amazing work you did on my smile :) All of the doctors here, Dr. Skip Jeranko, Dr. Jeffrey Stang, Dr. Hadley Thurmon and Dr. Anthony Lere are AMAZING and really know what their doing!!!!
I love this place! as soon as i came the workers came and sat next to us and made us feel at home. their full of humor and their customer service is excellent. their hookah is the best ive had yet and ive been to just about every local hookah bar and its nother compare to theirs. definitly stop by and make sure u have ur id..they card EVERYONE :)
It is a good engineering college.
I have been coming into Verbena Salon for some time now and love this place. They have very educated and professional women that work there like Shandra that cuts my hair and I have not had one complaint. I am a guy that is very picky with how my hair is cut and have nothing but great things to say about this place. The price isnt too bad either for a great hair cut and the scalp massages definitely make it worth it. If you are struggling to find a hair stylist you can count on, go to Verbena and you wont be disappointed.
I bought a great car at a great price from Brown Daub Kia! I got an awesome interest rate which helped me save a lot of money. The staff was also very friendly and more than helpful. Overall, they did a great job and I would recommend it to any of my friends.
Awesome venue for events.hope masters games 2014 are there.
None
Absolutely the best orthodontic team around! Dr. Enoch and his entire staff are professional, extremely helpful, fun and knowledgeable. My daughter loves going to the office and the appointments are always on time. Dr. Enoch does not recommend any procedures that are not necessary and I never feel pressured or rushed. From the first appointment where the entire process and timeline was discussed to the most recent appointment, our experiences have been nothing but positive. I would recommend the Enoch team to anyone!
Called ahead and I was told it would be about 20 minutes- it was lunchtime so I didn't think it was reasonable to expect 10 minutes.. So I drove there and was done in about 15 minutes.. including a light bulb exchange because one of the bulbs in my brake light was out (only charged $3.50 or so to replace). Very nice and courteous and will definitely go back again.
Great experience overall. Love my 2011 Chevy Malibu! John Faulk was very helpful and accommodating when deciding on which car would be best for me. I will definitely be recommending Lynch Chevrolet-Cadillac of Auburn to friends and family. Very pleased with my purchase and enjoyed doing business with y'all.
My experience was awesome. I dealt with Jay Heyman. He was very knowledgeable and helpful. I will return there for my next car.
Hoy volví a ir al mandarin y estuvo buenisimo !! Tiene un buffet variado y no solo hay comida china sino tambien, peruana, sushi, italiana, postres, ensaladas, y mas cosas que no pude probar todos. Muy bueno
None
My aunt and i went into Studio 28 on Saturday night, 8.11.12, with intentions of getting our tattoos (my 4th and my aunts 3rd). we already knew what we wanted but were skeptic on where we would begetting them done. we wanted a nice clean place with the right attitudes. When we got to Studio 28, TJ greeted us and was very helpful. He talked with us until the artist was ready to take us on. Paul, our artist, "An Englishman in New York" was amazing! He did such a great job with our tats and both my aunt and i are very impressed with his work. Not only did he provide excellent service but he was really nice too. Paul's work is hanging up on the walls and shows his true artistic ability. We are very pleased with Paul's ink skills! The shop was very clean and their equipment was very sterile, my aunt is a nurse, so i feel very comfortable when she does! Great place and i can't wait for my next tat. i will definitely be going to Studio 28 to see Paul. Cheers!
Kaffee ist leider zu kalt serviert worden, aber der Kuchen war hervorragend.
None
I cannot say enough good things about this small little Bistro in Louisville, Colorado. The food is delicious, and at this point, I consider myself a regular. Open for breakfast and lunch, I normally get breakfast regardless of the time. The crab benedict is out of this world, with another favorite being the simple egg sandwich. If I'm in the mood for lunch, one cannot go wrong with the chicken sandwich and fries! Recently, they began testing the water for dinner service, now on Thursday and Friday nights. I've been three times for dinner, which is tapas style, small plates, and Bistro 4 has yet to disappoint! The dinner menu changes weekly, so be sure to get on their email list - or be adventurous and just show up! Always fun! The dinner vibe has a more "hipster" feel, and the cocktails are unique and stylish! If you visit in the Fall or Winter, try the homemade eggnog! WOW! Overall, the food is fantastic, the service spot on and whether you're a local or visiting, Bistro 4 is one to add to your list. J~
I love Vino Artino! I brought my mom here as a birthday gift, and we had a great time and created some great artwork! I would definitely come here again.
I've been to Evoo twice for brunch and had an amazing experience! The ambiance is modern, chic, and confortable.The food is incredible and you can taste the high quality. The chef said they buy their food from a local farm. I had pulled pork on french toast (pain doré) which I got both times since it was so good! The cute Irish chef came out and delivered our meal which made a personal touch and lasting impression. The last time I went to Evoo I was on a date. I had to choose where to brunch. Since I was so impressed my first visit, I picked Evoo. My date was impressed with me and amazed how I found such a cute place everyone doesn't know about yet. We had a great time. I highly recommend going!
My twin brother and I were very pleased with Len Gabbay and the whole team. We were treated respectfully and kindly. Our suit progressed speedily and professionally, and we were not pressured to do anything we didn't want to do. I whole-heartedly recommend this firm for anyone who is looking for highly professional experience, without the schmarmy-ness that too-often accompanies injury and wrongful death lawsuits.
We value the way the staff interacts with our child, particularly with regard to keeping them engaged and learning.
Strongly recommend! Love their pictures, especially those of animals!
I dread going to the dentist more than anything in the world. But if I have to go to the dentist, I want it to be Thanksgiving Point Dental. The staff was helpful and friendly. They let me watch TV while they worked on my teeth. And my dentist was super nice.
Excelente!
I'm excited for this opportunity to help make this business grow and hopefully grow a customer base of friendly faces! Stop in and see us !
so I live FARRRRR from SLC, but every time I visit I CANNOT go without eating delicious noodle soup from here. its a tiny store but it makes up lack of size by all the trinkets and food options it has. simply wonderful :-D
We love Caruso's. In fact we are going their tonight to celebrate my daughter's 21st birthday, 11/12/13. The outside garden setting for dining is simply wonderful. It feels like you are in Italy. The food is good and reasonably priced. The staff is really friendly.
We came in just to look for a car and ended up walking out with a Mercendes Benz C300. The facility itself was very open and clean. As soon as we sat down, we were welcomed by staff that walked by us. Your really do not get this much attention with many dealerships. Our salesman Sammy really walked us through each step, answering any questions and concerns we had on the way. He had pride in being apart of the Mercedes Benz family and knew so much about each vehicle. This was beneficial to us because we were able to find the car to suit all of our needs very quickly. He even knew more than my husband that has dealt with cars all his life. Once we found the car him and his manager Tim were able to really work with us with pricing. Sammy then took his time with my husband teaching him all about the car and its features. We were out with our new car by the next day ( because we had insure the vehicle). They went above and beyond our expectations, my husband and I are very happy to be apart of the Mercedes Benz Family. If you are looking for a top of the line luxury vehicle, look no further! God Bless.
I recently had the Dinner Diva cook dinner for 5 of my best friends. It was so much fun and of course, the good was amazing! Mary showed up at our house and brought in all of her kitchen goodies. Then she got busy cooking! She made us an awesome appetizer and sangria. Then for dinner, she made us braised short ribs, polenta and grilled veggies. It was all amazing but the dessert was other worldly. Chocolate souffle cakes. It's so much fun to hire Mary to come and cook dinner for a special occasion, but she can also cook for your family so you have healthy dinners all week long. She has a fabulous set of recipes she can pull from and is an awesome chef. thanks Mary!
I loved this place, it gave me new life, a new personality.
None
None
Wedding planning can be the most stressful thing for a person to do. Fortunately, with Simple Pleasures Travel, our honeymoon to Hawaii was not one of those things! From the very first time that Lisa and I met with Laura, she was so knowledgable about the traveling experience and very much on top of things when it came to setting up our package. Laura was extremely helpful in keeping my wife and I appraised of the activities in Hawaii and the pricing and booking of hotels and flights. When we actually got to Hawaii, all we had to do was sit back and relax! Laura was even instrumental in making sure that we had what we needed for our wedding night in Austin. Laura's an awesome planner; we've already referred her to some friends of ours to plan their vacation, and we'll definitely be recommending her to everyone we know! Thank you so much Laura!
Harry Clark answered my call after TWO RINGS! I explained the situation a family member was having and he arranged to meet me within 30 minutes of my call. He met me at a very convenient location near my home and we were able to "take care of business" in just a few minutes. I was impressed both with his demeanor and his appearance. He was polite and businesslike throughout the meeting and he did EVERYTHING he promised to do. One thing he said that really hit home was "I care about people. I want to help people." And he does, trust me!
Nice and friendly. Gary was quick.
None
As a man, I had never been very comfortable walking into a jewelry store. I felt embarrassed about my lack of knowledge, and II felt like they were trying to get deeper into my wallet than I was prepared for. That all changed when I walked into Nettles Fine Jewelry. Clay and his friendly and knowledgeable staff always take the time to help me find that special gift and come in under budget. Recently we had our sixth wedding anniversary, and my wife requested a large formal style bangle. I headed off to Nettles of course, and about 3 associates helped me dig through their inventory until we finally found a special order bracelet that fit the bill. Needless to say, my wife was thrilled. I love how I can make my wife smile on a regular basis with jewelry that doesn’t break the bank but appears to be very expensive. I just need to make sure I always hide the receipts!
love this vet!!! all of my animals go here and they absolutely love dr rickett and the staff i wouldnt take my dogs anywhere else!!
I have been coming to Pangea 25 years now. I know the owners, Arnaldo and Stephen over 30 years now. They are amazing, warm and the service is out of this world. When I come to Pangea its like going to family for dinner because you know its going to be a great evening with outstanding food and good company. The decor with the beautiful art work surrounding the restaurant makes the feel of the room, intimate and inviting. My favorite appetizer is goat cheese and beet salad, seared Salmon for dinner is one of my favorite. The menu changes with the season which is a great touch. my favorite dessert used to be tiramisu but haven't had it for a while since it has not been on the menu and hoping to see it again soon. Everything about Pangea is wonderful along with the special events that they support. New Years eve is a wonderful treat at Pangea. If you have never spent it here, you should try it. These guys have been in the restaurant business over 30 years and know how to do it right. If I lived in the East Village i would go broke eating out every day at Pangea. Since I live on the Upper West Side, its a nice treat to come to the East Village Neighborhood for a nice evening out for dinner , brunch or for a get together with friends for drinks and appetizer. The price is right, so ease on down to the East Village and enjoy eats at Pangea, you will enjoy it.
Top software development company in Suceava
Grabbed a to go order yesterday and met the nicest people ever. Great menu, great service. Try them out!
Great family resteraunt good vibe
10 star in my opinion. You have to pay big bucks to be treated like an old friend. The staff in the hall always smiles and speaks. Just an incredible place, breakfast free actually worth eating. Most free breakfasts in hotels under $200 are just not good. We usually go out to eat, not in Lawrenceville, GA. Since finding the Country Inn, we just don't think of staying on some other hotels in the community. We have stayed in 3 others and I will assure you that they do not meet C Inn standards. NOW, the real test, as you know all mid-range and lower-end hotels have an individual air-conditioner which bangs and blows super cold or nothing or ????. Not the new units in Country Inn. I hate to stay in hotels that have these air cond., but CI has installed new that don't have you up and down every hour or so. I was in St. Thomas Marriott several years ago and the unit was so bad, I finally called and had them change the unit. It has never failed in the past. I made this comment sometime back after a stay in Country Inn and when we arrived this past week the new units had been installed. This is not the Four Seasons, but I cannot find a hotel under $250 that I think is better than Lawrenceville, GA Country Inn and Suites. You have to go to a Four Seasons to find people this well trained. Thanks Lawrenceville Country Inn for making our stay pleasant and safe. Delano Hill Mount Olive, NC
Dr Devine and his team are astounding. Our Family has been under various chiropractors for over 20 years - and Dr. D and team are far and away the best! The adjustments we receive are exactly what is need. Dr. Devine has a team that listen to what we are experiencing and they track down and correct the cause! I've never experienced feeling rushed or harassed - so rare in any doctors office. So while I may have to wait a bit - I know my care will be about what I need because they listen. If you want to have a chiropractor team that will help you in how YOU want to heal - then you have found them! From deep adjustments to light gentle touch. And the Graston .. Amazing! See - told you they were divine!
I can't say enough good things about Rosen Honda. Everyone there is very friendly and helpful and does not give the car sales feel. I worked with David Krochmal and he made everything so easy. This is my first lease and he took the time to explain all the different options available. He has even helped with service over the course of the lease. I will definitely go back to Rosen Honda and David; and recommend anyone I come across looking for a car to go there.
I love Clark Fox and this firm. Clark has been a great accountant for me for many years.
Semplicemente il miglior gelato artigianale di Bologna.Punto. Sono un grande appassionato di gelati e reputo questo un punto di riferimento per tutti gli altri.
Technicians were very helpful. They were on time. Answered all of my questions. Cleared up any misunderstandings. They showed me how to operate the alarm system and walked me through how it worked. Great company!
My experience in the Verizon Store on Rengstorff in Mt. View yesterday was outstanding. You know, we all expect to walk in and get immediate service and then get help for as long as it takes to solve our issue... well, these guys did a good job of making me feel connected and served, even while I waited. It's a real balance for 5 staff members to make 12 people feel like they're all being taken care of at once! Chris, the manager got involved to assist the sales rep with some of my more intense issues. I'd recommend this store if you need professional service and attention to detail.
Ben's Auto Repair is one of the best places in the Metroplex to get your car fixed. They are very professional and took wonderful care of my car. If you are looking for professional, quality work and competitive prices this is the place to go. I highly recommend Ben's Auto Repair.
None
I've had the privilege of working with LaunchPad Studios on several projects over the past 3 years and it was been a great experience! They bring professionalism and creativity together to create a great product. I love the comfortable feel of the environment as well as the confidence that the end result will be the best possible sound. With each album I record with them the quality and engineering just gets better and better! If you're thinking of doing a single, an EP, or a full length album, these guys are great and they'll bust their butts to make it happen for you.
un lugar trankilo para divertirsr . cn mi kerido amigo Mauricio
Nice lake with lots of land to rest
This is a gem of an import food store. Their specialty is Middle Eastern items. I have been a customer since about 2004 & every time I go back it seems to have expanded. This store is absolutely, truly authentic. The chicken biryani from the kitchen is unsurpassed. The selection of imported teas & coffee is extensive. The spice aisle (my favorite) overwhelms. My wife loves the huge selection of lentils, garbanzo, fava, olives, etc. All imported. I love pomegranate juice & they carry the true, unfiltered, non-sugar-added juice. Not the hyper filtered, sugar laden crap produced domestically. The butcher section has to be seen to be believed. To sum up in one word: AUTHENTIC.
Great service, as always. They are very conscientious about sticking to their estimates and letting you know if they discover problems. The loaner car is a much-appreciated benefit. Everyone on Nick Sparrow's team does a great job.
Excellent Food! Excellent service! El Jeffes is our favorite Pahrump restaurant.
None
I've known Dr. VanOsdale for a couple of years now and he's a great chiropractor. He has the most advanced equipment available to the profession and is getting great results for a lot of people in Lubbock right now. Lubbock's lucky to have him and Boston Chiropractic.
Great family oriented Spanish Church.
Have been doing business with this location since late 2010 it's been a real pleasure! Never have I had a concern NOT get addressed properly, the staff here is incredible and very professional. They address issues and concerns with top priority and make sure you fully satisfied with the end results. I recommend this place to absolutely anyone who is looking for a storage unit! Give them a call today! Let them take care of your extra goods!! I promise you wont regret it!!!
None
I like it not to many people here no meat heads people are nice
None
Great care for client's level of comfort to treatments.
I had a wonderful experience here. The manager, Bill, was incredibly generous to me and gave me a deal that I couldn't believe. I would recommend this place to anyone. If for some reason, you are dissappointed, ask to speak to Bill. He's very kind and ver helpful.
None
We get our two part carbonless forms done with these guys. They have been very nice to work with and do quick work.
I have nothing but good things to say about Community First. Very polite and helpful. And they care more about you then the money.
好吃喔~
I have been to Sunrise Dental of Arlington quite a few times now and I have had one of the most positive medical experiences of my life. The staff is fantastic and friendly, from the front desk to all of the hygenists to the good dentist himself. They are very willing to work with their patience financially with very reasonable payment plans. I had not had any kind of dental work for years prior to seeing this phenomanol team and had quite a few issues. I was treated with the utmost respect and understanding. I would seriously recommend this place to anyone.
Helped me when none of the greedy corrupt banks would. I am now 100% debt free and loving life! Thanks!!
None
Great beef stew, cant beat it on a cold day like we have been getting.
I love this place so much that I got a membership so I can come whenever I want to enjoy the services, and I get a massage once a month. Helps keep the stress off. Very clean, service is always friendly and I've been going for over a year.
I have been a patient of Dr Drew's for years. I did not believe in the benefits of chiropractic before I started treatment with Back to Health. I am a believer now. Personally, I have never felt better, no longer get migraines, sleep better, I could go on and on. Dr Czerminski is truly gifted and stays up to date on treatments and education. I have referred many friends and co-workers to him over the years and everyone has been happy with their treatment and results. Recommend Doc to anyone!
Genesis is cute!!! :)
I bought two fish over a year ago there and they are still alive!:D I would love to go back and get a turtle because just yesterday I had to put my hamster down due to cancer so I would like a turtle!:)
We stayed here on the second day of our coastline vacation and we LOVED it!!! Clean and beautiful room!!!! Shower was outstanding and the bed comfy and wonderful!!! The salt water taffy was yummy.....and we will definitely be back for another visit !!! Thank You Beach Inn !!!!!
None
TLAC provided splendid service for our recent print job; even going far to ensure our document was laid out accurately, working directly with our designer, and going beyond expectations to ensure that our product was delivered on time! Andrew & team are a pleasure to work with, even through my persisting phone calls. And I look forward to the next time I get to work with TLAC!
There are two things in life that most people dread - going to the dentist and taxes. Well I can honestly say that Pete from P&G Accounting has "almost" removed my fear of taxes. He's been doing our taxes now for 4 years and is amazing. He's professional, efficient, knowledgeable and timely. Before going to Pete, we'd put off doing our taxes as long as possible, now we schedule the appointment knowing that we are in good hands and that we will get the best outcome possible. We feel very confident with the service that he provides and always recommend him to others. Pete is the ultimate "TAX GUY".
Yummiest food in Cambridge. Pitchers of craft brews and outdoor seating. The place to be year round to meet entrepreneurs
Excellent hotel. I've stayed here many times and the standard and service is top notch. They dug me out of a hole this week when I got to the airport and realised I had left my passport at the hotel. They delivered it to me in time to catch the plane. How many other hotels would do that?
Best Italian Ice Cream Gelato out side Italy .food and coffee is excellent. try the chicken salad sandwich or Paninis.
Great place. very nice people and absolutely friendly!
Fantastic - Outstanding! Recently, I had to be in New England for several weeks leaving my family in Galveston. As luck would have it, while I was gone, my wife’s car broke down and had to be repaired. It was a great relief knowing that Miguel Arabia (Dr. Detail) would take care of the car at great speed and very reasonably. Hats Off to a qualified, honest mechanic and his shop. I can recommend Dr. Detail without reservation to everyone needing a car detail or for automotive repairs. Marshall Monroe, Chef, Stacey’s Creative Cuisine.
Great experience banking with Bank United.
None
W0W Those other reviews have got to be JOKES!!! Seriously the scariest place I have ever been in!! Nothing like Bush Gardens or Six Flags. They recommended my lil bro not to go in. THEY WERE RIGHT. My best friend lost her shoe! The guy who took our money was creepy but looked like Johnny Depp. Super hot lol. Please don't listen to these other reviews. Check it out for your SELF!
Love this place.
Great food! A little on the pricey side, but definitely worth it. Friendly staff and a great atmosphere.
I manage my own refurbishment company who carry out work within the London area. I stumbled upon CleenCo by chance, I was working on a refurbishment project in Notting Hill and had a deadline for when my project had to be finished, spring cleaned ready for my clients for when they returned from holiday. I was let down by a cleaning company i regularly used, i searched for a local clean company when I found CleenCo and they worked hard to accommodate my deadline and worked round the clock with a professional clean, the house looked spotless when my clients returned and was more than happy. From that day I have always used CleenCo, i find them reliable, honest and hard working, they always carry out the job to a professional high standard and will go the extra mile to accommodate my needs and deadlines. I would highly recommend them and would like to thank them for the hard work they have put into my jobs so far. GD Plastering Services
A friend referred me to Becca, and I cannot thank her enough! In just a year, I've trusted Becca to do pretty much everything to my hair - cut, highlight, all over color, keratin treatment, bangs (!) - and I've never been happier about the way it looks. She's incredibly talented and has the sweetest personality. I always look forward to going in to see her, which is important when you have super thick hair like mine that takes hours to highlight, cut, and style! I wholeheartedly recommend Becca and Philip Michael Salon!
None
Love the food there.
Happy place to eat a wide variety of food choices. Seconds worth the price.
Amazingly, there is still a doctor who sees patients at the time of their appointment! Dr Tanen has been my Endocrinologist for several years now - and he was a blessed relief from the old one who was consistently late, had the bedside manner of a charging rhino and dictated notes during his time with me. Dr. Tanen, in contrast, is calm and methodical. He appears to hear what I say to him and responds appropriately. He calls me personally with my lab results a few days after they are drawn - even on weekends - and he is willing to prescribe Armour Thyroid which I find necessary. The office is clean. The staff are nice but busy, and they draw labs in house. He has been a godsend to me, and I will continue to drive 40 minutes to see him as long as he will keep letting me in the door.
None
Michael and Cindy Baumer and their team are a fabulous organization. Their commpassion and organization made such a devistating process much easier to deal with. I would recommend their firm to anyone!!!
None
Our toilet has been dripping for years; then it started wasting water at an alarming rate. When the plumber from Roto-Rooter Winnipeg came, he replaced the mechanism inside the tank, and our troubles were over. Thank you!
Great driver, acted as a mini tour guide. It was like a limo with a taxi paint job. I would highly recommend this as a choice for transportation in the northern Michigan region.
Best store ever! A kids paradise! They have all candy new and old, along with homemade truffles, marshmallows, and chocolates! If I could go there every day I would! And they are at the Iowa State Fair under the grandstand! The best part is the staff, they are all nice, easy to work with, and so friendly! They have every candy you could think of plus more! If you have any occasion, holiday, or just want some candy go to Beaverdale confections!
None
Outstanding food, outstanding service, the best eating experience my wife and I have had on the island.
I went in pretty skeptical but I am now a believer. I will be scheduling regular massages. Kristy (please forgive me if i spelled it wrong) was absolutely amazing. I have been in constant pain for the past nine months. Today I am totally pain free. Thank you so much............you are awesome.
This place is superb! My favorite spot in Berlin to just sit down for hours with my laptop and get inspired while drinking great coffee. I have tried the salads, the sandwiches, the quiches and the (oh-so-good) cakes: always delicious. The place makes you feel at home and the guys working here are lovely. Must-try place in Berlin
Far more than just a haircut. The staff is fantastic, their devotion to their craft goes far above and beyond the relatively low pricing. Go here, you will not be disappointed.
Dr Pullen was very thorough and listened to my questions. I didn't have to wait at all. Would highly recommend to anyone.
photo by: brwa awat
My husband and I are senior citizens....and I mean SENIOR! Throughout the years we have gone to several dentists in Omaha and Atlanta. We both agree......we have always dreaded going to the dentist until we found Dr. Ashley! Believe it or not, we look forward to our appointments with her and her marvelous staff.....they are like family! Dr. Ash truly cares about her patients and it shows. We would trust her with our lives!
I've been living at The Overlook at Lakemont for about 8 months now, and its been a great experience. I moved here because of a new job and had to find a new place to live within a week. I got really lucky in finding The Overlook at Lakemont because they had exactly what I needed at a price that was very reasonable (considering it's Bellevue). The main office knew I was in a time crunch and worked extra hard to move me and my roommate in before I started my new job. Stephanie at the main office was incredibly helpful and continues to be very helpful 8 months later whenever my roommate and I need anything. The Overlook at Lakemont has a lot of perks too. One being the location; it's in a heavily wooded and secluded area that is awesome in the summer. It also has 2 outdoor pools (1 is remodeled), a hot tub, a small gym, and many trails around that you can run on. I'd also consider the main office a plus since they are very friendly, which I haven't experienced with previous apartments. As for the apartments themselves, they are great. Most of them are remodeled, with granite counter-tops and other small changes. Having a washer and dryer in each apartment is super nice as well. I've been reading other reviews saying that the walls are too thin and that you can hear everything from the neighbors around you. My guess is that these people haven't lived in an apartment before because this is normal. Just hope you get good neighbors is all you can do. Overall, I highly recommend The Overlook at Lakemont.
Brian Scott did a wonderful job with my new Hyundai! I’ll definitely come back for my next vehicle purchase!
None
Bernard Azrikam installed a new central air system in my home. He is very professional, reliable and honest. Price was fair. He explained to me in detail about the machine, costs and future services. I highly recommend this company. Ernesto Escalante
I have been working with Tom for about 3 years now. The truth about websites is that they are something that needs constant refreshing in order to stay relevant and perform optimally. Tom has become an invaluable resource for our business in this capacity. I simply don't have the time to learn the technical side of our website, but as it drives a good portion of our business these days, it's crucial that I have someone who is confident and capable of handling that end of things. Tom takes care of anything I need in a timely and thorough manner, without any headache on my end, allowing me to stay focused on the things which I do best. Further, he is always on the forefront of the technology, and reaches out to me whenever it's time to make an update. It's one less thing to worry about. I know I'm in good hands with Tom, and I recommend him to anyone who asks for a resource in the areas of website development, SEO, and/or social media.
Nautical Home Lending LLC recently closed a purchase transaction loan with a client of ours. The listing real estate broker was Brian Mullen at Options 153 here in Plymouth, MA. As a licensed mortgage broker we prefer to do business with real estate partners that are intelligent, caring, and focus on what is in our client's best interests. Brian Mullen and his team keep the transaction smooth and comfortable for both our client and the seller. Options 153 met all of our expectations and we now have a very happy first home buyer and new Plymouth resident. Thanks again for all your hard work! Sal Arlia, Principal Nautical Home Lending LLC.
Thank you to Doctor Ram and staff for the friendly and professional treatment my son and I received when we went for our medicals for immigration purposes. My son has an abject phobia about needles and I was terrified that he would not allow the doctor to draw blood or give him his vaccinations. It took immense patience (he was there a couple of hours) but the job was done and we are overjoyed. I'm very grateful for the ease with which the examination is conducted. No fuss, no stress and you're out of there. Thanks again.
Hondas are still the best and Jeff Wyler Honda understands service. This is the 2nd Honda I have bought from them and I wouldn't drive anything else. They always take good care of you and treat you like a person instead of a number. They don't just sell you a car; they are always interested in having you come back. You can't find that anywhere anymore!
We switched over to Zeigler a few years ago after being dissappointed by other dealers. The service experience at Zeigler this week-end with our Jeep was once againg extremely satisfying. They have a very nice facility and definitely customer friendly. We were greeted by their service manager, Paul Dicaro who wrote up the service ticket and then followed up by other service writers such as Andy and Anthony with advice on the ststus of our repairs. Andy was particularly helpful with clear and understandable descriptions of what needed to be done and the estimated time to complete. They are a very friendly and courteous group and the work was done efficiently and professionaly and the vehicle ready on time (actually a little ahead of the forecast). We will continue to use this dealer in the future and give them an excellent rating and reccomendation!
The best restaurant in East Sussex.
Cornflake French toast was awesome! Fast in and out service.
Good food and atmosphere. There's a little upstairs outdoor balcony that is nice in the summer. Beers are a bit expensive, but not much different than everywhere else.
I had a great experience to purchase a CRV Honda 45 days ago for my daughter who now studies her master degree in CA. from Mr. Tain at Anderson Honda. Since I contacted Mr. Tain 4 months ago from New York, he has been so helpful to my daughter and me. Mr. Tain was knowledgeabe and treated us with all respect. Even now he still assists my daught who got her first car in her life. I highly recommend who likes to buy a car contacts with Mr. Tain at Anderson Honda.
Always fresh
None
Me mojepara llegar a qui pero valio la pena
I just had my Chris King hub serviced by Bala at Cycevolution and converted front and rear to thru axles, so pretty much brand new. Saw the tool with my own eyes. They roll even smoother and quieter. I also had my bike completely redone with new parts and boy what a difference especially in the mechanics of the bike. Everything feels better than when I first got my bike. If I can't work on it, Cyclevolution is the only one touching my babies. Highly recommended, great service, a one on one experience.
I got matching tattoos with my grandpa here and the service was excellent. The owner was there and he made my grandpa and I feel very comfortable and welcomed. My session lasted about 3 hours and when it was done I absolutely loved my new tattoo, so did my grandfather. I would recommend this place to anyone looking to get a tattoo or piercing. The staff is very friendly and they make you feel at home. Thanks wyld chyld!
The hot lobster roll and blonde rock are the best! Fun atmosphere!.
Wonderful atmosphere and friendly service!
This store is just great! I’ve been to Germany 2 years ago and this shop saved my life. Staff there is very nice and helpful. They have a lot of very interesting things to see and buy. The owner speaks English very well. Had a great time in Germany and this shop part of it. They order stuff on request too so anything you need, you'll get it! And hey! Dont forget to ask the owner there if you can throw and kick some beer crates around! :P He just might let you!
Very happy. Stopped in thinking I needed a brake job on the front brakes. I informed Jeff, the person that I talked to, that I had read the unfavorable reviews online and was skeptical. He assured me they wouldn't do any work unnecessarily and without my permission. After inspecting my brakes, he informed me that I did not need brakes at all. The front brakes were at 50% and the back at 85%. If they were truly dishonest, they would have just charged me for the brake job and did them anyway. I think it's great that they were honest and I'll be going back in 20k miles to have them check again.
Southwest Exteriors is the best home improvement company I've ever worked with. In addition to listening carefully to the customer, responding to needs, providing expertise and great products with no pressure, and having a competitive cost, Southwest Exteriors' workmanship and positive attitude are amazing! I highly recommend them and would utilize their great services again.
Place to shop n relax
Love it! Friday B4 6pm happy hour $2.00 Japanese beer
I had the absolute best experience with the customer service associate at the Public Storage facility in Randallstown. Though I am an infrequent user of our storage unit, each time I visit I am made to feel like a member of a family. Erica is always bright and bubbly with a smile to match her tone. She is helpful and resourceful. You are lucky to have her, beware I am an Office Manager always in search of people like Erica! Kudos, Erica, you ROCK! Carolyn Victorian, Office Manager Baltimore Suburban Health
The tacos Francine, oh my God the tacos! I haven't had 'em like that since I lived in San Diego! You'll probably drive by the first time, but it's DEFINITELY worth making a u-turn!
Quaint, inexpensive, no frills, but great Mexican food. Try the Horchata drink you won't be disappointed.
Absolutely the best! A gazillion coffee spots hereabouts, but Jaffe and I swear by the Lofty Bean. Never a dull moment with the awesome and outlandish staff. A nothing but the best and organic everything! We try to NEVER begin a roadtrip without a pit stop at the "Bean" before getting underway. HIGHLY recommended!
A rockin' experience DOES deserve a rockin' review! I have loved every experience I've had at Wing Eyecare, the staff at the Western Hills location is always accommodating and they have made every effort to make my experiences great! Best eye care around!! THANK YOU WING!!! I wouldn't trust my eyes to anyone else.
None
Great food and service. I'm becoming a regular. Very friendly staff.
This place is awesome!
đây là một trung tâm gia sư uy tín mình đã thử qua và kết quả rất tốt
Having just returned from a fab day out to probably the best Zoo I have visited, I feel compelled to comment, not something I usually do! However, overall very clean and well managed, themes are fantastic and above all (and most important) the animals are very well looked after yet accessible and visible (my 4 yr old daughter had loads to see). Only two things to feedback on.. Firstly the aviaries (Parrots) area is unkempt and overgrown, I appreciate its important to get as close to natural environment but you can't actually see anything for over/under growth, secondly the poor old lonely elephant should go into retirement now, at 43 she looks like she needs a rest from public view. Money well spent..
None
LOVE THIS STORE SO SO SO MUCH!!! Such exquisite pieces!
Great mom & pop burger!
We had a really awesome time with Vantage Yacht Club going up and down different branches of the Chicago River. The captain was fun and accommodating and it's a night that we're still talking about more than a year later. I would highly recommend renting one of these boats AND hiring a captain. Worth every penny.
We spilled drain cleaner on our fancy marble vanity top and it burned a wide area making it rough and dull. Atlas Marble was recommended by a friend and we contacted them to see if they could repair the damage. It would have cost us a couple of thousand dollars to replace the stone. They asked for pictures, which we sent via email. They said they could repair it, and we made an appointment. The technician/craftsman arrived on time and started work. He prepared the area, put down floor covering and wore booties on his feet. It took the morning to do the work. The vanity top is like new; actually better than new. We couldn't be more pleased and would highly recommend Atlas Marble & Stone.
Jestem zadowolony z zakupu.Przede wszystkim miła i konkretna obsługa.Czarno na białym.Uczciwie.Polecam.
They always have the best food. Best French onion soup And reasonable prices too. Great atmosphere, even for meetings.
Our server Crystal provided excellent service. Outback continues to deliver as expected...thanks
None
We love this dental office. The kids are excited to go to the dentist every six months! They love the staff, and they always come out smiling and excited to keep up their dental hygiene - even after fillings! I always feel that they have the best interests of my children at heart, and that is great. We have always seen Dr. Richter, and we love him. This last visit was with Dr. Swan and we liked him as well. I would definitely recommend this practice to friends (and I have.)
None
I always enjoy visiting this magical little coffee shop. Usually I have a flat white; sometimes a cortado; and I love the pastries and the breakfast sandwich.
Amazing plumbing services ! Thank you for excellent service your company provided in fixing our leaky faucet knob. However, even with challenges, you were able to take care of our problem in a timely manner. Thanks for blessing us with this amazing payment plan!
Michael Pierleoni was great; he made our leasing experience easy and delightful. He was very professional and attentive, ensuring that all of our questions were answered and that we were comfortable with our purchase. We will be recommending Michael to our friends and family for future car purchasing needs.
None
The food was really well-seasoned. The staff was friendly and courteous. The cobbler was the best!!!!!
It's awesome
In a word... awesome.
I've been going to Just A Hair Off Salon for years. Kristi does a fabulous job on my hair. The prices are reasonable, she's quick and I know my hair will always look fabulous when I leave.
None
The buying experience at Don Hewlett Chevrolet Buick in Georgetown with Lee Dickie was the most pleasant one I have ever had while buying a vehicle. Lee was courteous and was not pushy at all. The price was fair and he was more than willing to work with us to get the best deal we could for our needs.
Super friendly and super willing to help! Great service for novice brewers and masters alike.
it was very lively i felt as if in another world it was fun the bar staff is amazing kind and diverse very out going and great smiles the food was great it had a phantasmal flavor i cant say the bathrooms were pristine but i can totally see mad dogs is a well running establishment great job ladies by the lake food critic
Mechanics there were knowledgeable and took time to explain my engine problem. Rates were reasonable and my car works great!
18 months ago Audio Express installed a factory Sat receiver in my Mazda (They were recommended by the Mazda dealership.) It recently stopped working. Audio Express gave me an appointment (yes an appointment!) to check it out. They had to take the car apart to get to the sat module and determined that the module itself had gone bad. At my request they took the module out of the car. They buttoned it all back up and told me to come back when I had a new module. NO CHARGE!! That is twice they have now taken my car apart with no damage or sign of any kind. I'm definitely a repeat customer.
Got my wheels painted beautifully just great people!!
Awesome Indian themed cooking lesson. I thought I made a pretty good rogan josh before i was wrong but i def can now. Also making naan breads from scratch was much easier than i expected. Chef was knowledgeable and friendly and gave me great recipe alternatives to make the whole dinner dairy free. Thoroughly enjoyed it and am already trying to decide which course to do next. Sushi looks seriously good!
Bought a used car here... they were very accommodating despite my young age. Dean LaFleur is on the ball and knows how to talk to his customers, so I had no problems at all buying from him. Aside from one little hang up I would rate this place as 100% awesome.
The food here is amazing. I've had several different menu items and its all delicious. The prices are reasonable and the service was great. Would definitely recommend to anybody who is looking for good food without going broke in the process.
Colorworks provided an outstanding service when I needed a school brochure finished and printed quickly. The designer Angela produces innovative and stylish artwork and the print team went out of their way to get everything finished on time. The end result was a sharp and professional looking product that impressed everyone who saw it. Many thanks Colorworks, I wouldn't hesitate to recommend you or use your services again.
I have been going to buy all my jewelry from Dan and his Dad for over 10 years. They listen to what you want and their custom designs are unique. My daughter had her engagement and wedding ring made their too. All work is done in house so you don't have to worry about anything happening to your jewels on repairs too. I wouldn't go anywhere else
Best of faculties of Bu-Ali Sina University!
Mangstabs...ajibbb...:)
We had our HVAC system stolen. A&B responded quicker than any other provider. Both the owners and the crews are professional and trustworthy. The installation and repairs were quick and clean. They had us back in great shape within a week and made a bad situation relatively painless. Excellent experience. I highly recommend this provider!
None
Good seafood prices
Six if it's went for dinner and we're a little worried that the 2am closing tone suggested it mainly targeted an after-pub clientele. We we're extremely pleased with all our dishes - especially the fish curry. Naan wasn't on the late night menu but we requested it and they were surprisingly excellent too. Highly recommended.
Excellent experience. Quick. Easy. In and out. Went in to check out a car. Next day I left with it. Great dealership. People are kind and mean business!
Great selection, great prices, and the staff is energetic and helpful. Can't ask for much more than that.
Lincoln Country Club has a poker room that is excellent! Me and my friends play there on a regular basis, we always have a great time!
Thanks to Eco Press and Anabelle's expert seo services, my business has remained afloat and at the forefront of searches. If not for Eco Press I would surely be out of business.
Wow! What a massage! I have been a lot of other places but I have never had a massage like this. The therapist asked me what was wrong and then helped me with my problem. She was very in tune with what was going on with my body. The massage was amazing and she also gave me some stretches after so I could work on my problem at home! Everybody was so nice and the office was so comfortable. Thank you so much for helping me. I am now a massage life member and I will see you all soon! I think I am going to try the hot stones on my next massage!
I've been shopping at Landwerlen for more than 20 years. The owners are very knowledgeable and helpful. If they don't have it, they can most likely order any type of hardware or leather working tool that you might need.
I had called around to a few places to have the wheel bearing replaced on my Honda. This place had the best price and the owner personally spoke with me on the phone and made me feel very comfortable. I asked him to also see if other things need to be done like the spark plugs or transmission fluid. Him and his mechanic personally picked up the vehicle from my workplace. They called me a few hours later and showed me pictures of the wheel bearing via text message and replaced it. They informed me that the vehicle did not need transmission fluid replaced until the care was at 110,000 miles and spark plugs could wait until then as well. I think that is very honest of them to not oversell me on doing other work. They dropped my car off at my work place a few hours later and had the car washed. They even brought me the old wheel bearing to show me what was wrong with it. I am not sure about the other reviews on here, but they may be local competitors who are posting negative reviews. I will be going here for all me future auto needs.
Nice but exspensive.
I've been a patient at this office since before Dr. Lopez took over. I'll admit I was nervous; who isn't nervous when a "new" doctor takes over your care?! I was instantly at ease with Dr. Lopez’s friendly personality and thorough care. I love, love, LOVE Dr. Lopez and his entire staff! I recommend him (them) to anyone looking for a dentist. They are an attentive, knowledgeable, and cheery bunch, and I look forward to every visit.
I've been going to the Bikesmith for years now. I have always been very happy with the quality of service, the genuine and friendly staff, and the great communication about what my bike needs. The owner, Jon, and his staff clearly love bikes and have a great can-do attitude about even the most challenging request. It doesn't hurt that they have experience fabricating custom bicycles from scratch. If you care about your bike, this shop is where you should take it.
We use My Second Home Pet Resort for our Golden Retriever, George complete grooming!!! He always comes home looking and of course smelling great. Everyone is so nice and they are always very accommodating.
When I first walked in I was almost overwhelmed by how many pieces their were inside, and I had walked to all the shops on Capitol Hill in search of the right piece. Not only are their a ton of options but everything is quality. Ive been to literally every public smoke shop in the greater Seattle area and hands down this is my favorite. Needless to say I found what I was looking for and even better, it was at a great price. Some of the things offered at SC&T are almost ridiculously cheaper then other places, which is so cool because they aren't some knock of pieces. My Maverick disk perc has become my favorite piece now and basically stole it when compared to literally any other shop. I will be going back many times in the future for sure.
None
Love the Doc and love his clinic. Great staff that love my critters as much as I do.
Proper quality and portions and friendly staff :)
Excellent place to see movies in Colorado Springs.
None
Went for a meal with my wife with no real expectations but walked (well, waddled) away very happy. The restaurant was lovely inside and the service was excellent. The real star, however, was the food which was absolutely delicious. I had focaccia and a delicious meat ravioli where the pasta melted in my mouth. Only downside was that it was bitterly cold outside and the draft from the entrance to the restaurant opening and closing was pretty off-putting.
This is the first time that we've used a Dogs Love Running and we will use them in the future without hesitation. I cannot say enough good things about this company. Don't be thrown off by the name, they also care for cats if you need them to. Our cat, Ziggy, is very low maintenance. He's a big guy and as long as he has his food and some TLC, he's happy. Heidi, the owner, came to meet us for an initial appointment to get the lay of the land and to meet our furry baby. She review his history and was a pleasure to talk to. She obviously takes pride in what she does and wants to make sure her customers are comfortable with her team taking care of their home and furry family while they're away. Patricia was the person who actually came to check in on Ziggy. She said Ziggy was very happy to see her (she's right, probably because she was his meal ticket). The best part was when we got home, there was a card on the counter with a report for the week. It had visit dates and notes about his attitude, health, and room for any concerns she may have had. The back had a great note from Patricia. Many of the other companies we checked into before going with DLR were either very expensive (way too expensive for a low-maintenance cat) or had too many rules and things they weren't willing to budge on. Heidi was very flexible and was able to meet our requests without a problem, and her pricing is very reasonable. We trusted her and Patricia with our home and with Ziggy's care. We will use them again in the future and recommend them to anyone looking for pet-sitting/exercise services anytime.
nice clg
I am pretty happy with your services Teeth Implants, Teeth Whitening and Botox in Carmel Valley San Diego. As people do prefer good hospitality what I have got from your clinic. Thanks Dr. Lori Ann Safar.
Kent was such a great help getting our insurance needs met! I would recommend him to anyone. Prices were great and even helped us switch our other policies over!
I have received nothing but amazing service from the folks at Goldstream Cycle. When I approached them to help me achieve and prepare for a very special ride that I will be taking part in June of 2013 there wasn't a hesitation. The owner personally made sure that not only did I get the proper bike, but was well fitted to suit my needs. I am not a cyclist by any means. But the guys and gal have shown me nothing but support and encouragement and have not steered me wrong on everything I need. Neither did it hurt the pocket book either. I highly recommend this store for all cycling needs!
Everything is great here. The staff is helpful and the rooms are spacious and modern....Love the mini fridge.
Try the whole farm well done
My wife and I were married just this July at the Views and it was a fantastic experience. From the initial planning meetings with Bruce to ironing out the last minute details the week preceding the event, everything was taken care of. The location is beautiful and thankfully the weather cooperated. We had a relatively small number of guests, about 75, but they were able to partition off the main room to just the right size. The food was fantastic and, even though we had to go around for pictures and to greet our guests, Bruce and the staff made sure that we had plenty. All night our guests were raving about how well put together the event was and how everything moved so smoothly. We couldn't be happier our experience at the venue.
This place is improving. They appear to have hired new staff, and they're very friendly, courteous and try very hard to get everything right. The food was fresh, crisp and delicious. Good Job!!!
Been my home for over a decade now, still love it!
Excellent Food, Excellent Service, Excellent Atmosphere.
None
Best Pizza place in Sacramento
I got my wisdom teeth removed last week which was pending from 6 years. Teeth was in inclined position coz of which doctor need to cut open and do the extraction. Whole procedure was very smooth and didn't had any pain during and after extraction. Post extraction medication/treatment was good. I would suggest Venu's Dental for any kind of dental treatments.
Beauty invokes every wall in the Sterling Business Center. We are delighted to operate the Lavish, LLC corporate offices out of this ultra-modern location. Thank you Mr. Zaibak.
if your new to board games and need a recommendation or looking for an obscure new release Rainy day games can help you find what you need. One of the best stores in the area.
I have been a customer and purchased many new appliances- washers, dryers, stove, dishwasher, and refrigerator through the years. Have also used their repair dept. This is a wonderful service-oriented company.
The entire team at LK Events is a pleasure to work with. The dedication to their clients, the creativity they bring to the table, and their impeccable sense of style is beyond compare. Lauren and Nicole are the most organized ladies I know, and I highly recommend LK Events to anyone craving a chic event with the best talents in Chicago.
One of the best childcare and daycare facilities in Safety Harbor for personalized care limited to a small number of infants and toddlers
None
Great service and a lovely relaxing experience.. This place replaced Christina's - new lighting, music and ambiance. I heartily recommend. They have an express pedicure over lunch - what could be better?
None
Absolutely fantastic bar, restaurant and overall place. From looking after your kids on Saturday and Sunday Mornings to Giant Jenga and beers outdoors the Southern Cross is awesome.
I have never had a better experience at a dealership. After doing quite a bit of price comparison research, no other dealership in the area came close to the price we paid for our vehicle...and no haggling was involved, due to Thomas' lowest price guarantee (their employees are not paid on commission). George was absolutely fantastic, and made the entire process very enjoyable and easy. We will most certainly be making Thomas our dealership for any future vehicle purchases!
Mirage Limousines was a great group, my driver Tim was early and very good at communicating with me throughout the night. The limo was clean inside and out. I only wish we had more time to drive around. One nice thing about this company is that if your car is over booked, or the people before you took longer than expected, you get a limo, but one of a "higher" level.
Tôi và các bạn của nhóm đã tham gia chương trình tour Mộc Châu 2 ngày vào cuối tuần. Thật thú vị với chuyến đi do công ty Vietnam Typical Tours tổ chức. Hướng dẫn viên nhiệt tình chu đáo, chuyên nghiệp và hướng dẫn cho chúng tôi tất cả các thông tin về chương trình tour Mộc Châu. Tôi rất hài lòng sau chuyến thăm quan của mình. Xin cảm ơn ban tổ chức và cảm ơn bạn Thanh ( hướng dẫn viên) rất nhiều. Chúng tôi sẽ dùng dịch vụ của công ty trong thời gian tới. Trân trọng !
None
Love this place!
Took someone here with complex symptoms Oct 2012. I was *amazed* how quickly we got in -- literally walked from check-in into a room, and I was encouraged to stay the entire time. Quality of care and "bedside manner" both excellent. And unlike an earlier commenter, I found that the doctor was willing to dialogue with us about what tests we didn't need to do if we wanted to save money.
I like the ice and the shop and mostly the season passes
Професионализъм, бързина и добро обслужване! Препоръчвам!
Seriously, the best spot for a treat period. I am a big fan of treating myself, and Pulp gives me the best organic yogurt so I feel guilt-free and it doesn't hurt my wallet. Yum. Nom nom.
Great drinks, even better times.
Staff are excellent and the food is always great. We've been using the symphony for years. We've tried others but always come back to the symphony. Food has never been anything less than excellent
Very personal (kind) and professional doctor, whom I can finally trust. I have been to many other dentists who only wanted to take more x-rays and more root canals for which insurance companies would not cover and so on. Dr. Ostrofsky was different; he took my problems as if he takes care of his friend's.
Always a great experience. Easy to get an appointment, easy in and easy out. Dr. Naik is clearly explains what she will be doing and does a great job.
Friendly staff, fresh ingredients, and the best deep dish crust in town. I can't believe I've only just discovered this place, and I won't be getting pizza anywhere else from now on.
The naga lamb or chicken is to die for!
A trusted taxi service you can simply admire for their punctuality and friendliness. I personally recommend Shreeji Taxi for their great services in a reasonable price for your requirements.
豬排好厚實，口感相當地棒，雖然單價略微偏高了些，但物有所值…真的好久沒吃過這麼正點的炸豬排蓋飯了(勝つ丼)。^___^
So big IT store, and various goods.
None
Great service. Will recommend to others!
None
La Clínica Euroden es muy profesional. Ya me la habían recomendado. Tienen unos dentistas muy profesionales y yo que soy de tenerle miedo al dentista me hicieron sentir como en casa.
Reviewed by Ainslie Watson-Gillis (Melbourne): I have no hesitation in recommending Maternity Revolution! Lisa was more than helpful, emailing me to keep me in the loop regarding my order. She was always professional, prompt and helpful in answering any questions I had. I spoke to Lisa on the phone as I was unsure about sizing and I found her to be warm & friendly, completely understanding of my needs, and honest about what Maternity Revolution could provide. I can't speak highly enough of their great service.
I've never had a wait when I have walked into this store. People are friendly and work hard to resolve my issue or find a piece of equipment I need.
Traveling on vacation down the coast and stopped for breakfast. What a lucky find! Excellent food and HUGE portions. You definitely get your moneys worth here.
I drive past this place every day. One thing that has always caught my eye was their stock. Each and every vehicle they have looks brand new and show room quality. I have shopped around at a few local places prior to coming to Mid-Towne Auto and I must say the sales team was terrific and professional. They were extremely knowledge in the vehicles and were honest ( a rare thing to see in sales members). They didn't pressure you into a decision and done everything in their power to get you the best deal. I am very pleased I took the time to stop in and purchase my truck at Mid-Town Auto. Stop in and see for yourself, you'll be impressed too.
Had to get an ignition switch for my Mercedes and I needed it quick. These guys were able to get it within a few hours and at a great price. I highly recommend!
Unbelievable experience. I had no idea what I wanted to do or what I wanted to get. I had stellar customer service from start to finish. Todd Eifert was amazing. I could not have done this without him. He made the process easy and fun. I will never go anywhere else and I have already told all my friends to go see him at Crest Honda. Thank you again. I am in love with my 2013 Honda Civic!
None
None
Having never purchased a car long distance, I came in to this situation extremely skeptical. I was buying a very expensive car and trading my car, not having seen the new car. I am a very cautious buyer, so thought something could be wrong with the car or that the dealership wouldn't do what they said. Nothing could be further from the truth. In fact, we drove almost 1,200 miles to check it out first-hand and everything was as Trent represented it to be. I would very highly recommmend this dealership and Trent. When I get ready to buy my next car, they will certainly be in the running for my business--even being 4 states away. Definitely worth the drive. Beyond that, their follow up after the sale has been superb. Any and every issue I've brought to their attention they've remedied to my satisfaction. You can't go wrong here!
Went on a date with my wife here. It was perfect. We had a Groupon, which made it an excellent deal. There were lockers to put our phones and wallets. 18 holes of glow in the dark fun. We had so much fun we stayed after to play in the arcade. Had some tokens jam, and had it fixed instantly, plus a free play for our trouble. Service was perfect. Will go again.
Top lads paid me CASH instantly and collected my scrap car within the hour.
Economical, good sized room, awesome food, good bathroom, great location
Wow...love Fresh and Easy here and when I travel. I can't BELIEVE some noodge put this places as moderately expensive, its dirty cheap and good quality. Friendly staff, great coupons and bonuses when you check in with Foursquare.
Over the last 7 years Mr. Naso has represented our firm in several legal issues. Michael is a very well versed attorney when it comes to business law. In fact in our first case Mr. Naso was able to recover $75,000 that was basically stolen from my business partner and myself during a start up business venture. Although it took several meetings with the defendant and his attorneys Mr. Naso was able to recover our money. Additionally Naso has also provide us with expert legal council in the area of Commercial Real Estate transactions. Mr. Naso is an honest and ethical attorney whom comes highly recommended.
We went knowing we might not get in. But we lucked out both times :o) The service was very efficient. It's a small place but hopping. I am not a fan of the "dutch" pancakes, but that is a personal choice. They remind me of crepes and I don't like crepes. However, their "american" pancakes were amazing. And their savory pancakes hit the spot for my husband. They even give you a cute wooden shoe key chain when you pay your bill. I would go back to Amsterdam just for their pancakes :o)
Camp Akela is the best! I had a blast here as a kid, and so I came back and became Staff. We run Camp Akela for Cub Scouts on the weekends and during weekdays we run programs for non-scouting groups. Honestly, this is the best job in the world.
i love excel! i love all the trainers and the Pilates component since i've been working out there i've dropped a full size and 1/2 and 20 something lbs! everyone is so awesome and kind. i love how intimate the gym is. excel is la jolla best kept secret!
Very fast. And friendly. Do job seriously. I love it
Excellent establishment. Great quality food, service was superb and great selection of food, drinks and wine !!!!!
The food is amazing. The servers remember you if you eat there frequently. They are nice and are always on top of things.
excellent food full of flavour, staff were attentive but not pestering, best for miles arround
Limoncello is one of my favorite places to bring clients out to for lunch. The food is always above expectation and the service second to none. Keep up the good work. Mikey Perri AAA Hellenic Marble
Goooood
I believe this was the most stress free purchase of an automobile I have ever had. Knowing the price up front kept from having to play the game of running back to the sales manager several times to barter a sale price. I knew which car I wanted, the whole process took less than 45 minutes.
None
fabriquant belge de chaussures de securité
None
It's encouraging to know someone has a passion for small business as I do. Building business and lives!
Had my first experience with them a few months ago. The brakes went out on my car and they were awesome enough to let me stand in there and watch exactly what they were doing when they were working on it. Good work and reasonable prices. Will go here again
None
A large & friendly crew made me feel very confident. They seemed very organized and were having fun getting ready. I was excited waiting while they made final wind tests and assembled the craft. Once I climbed on and we began to gently and slowly lift off the ground I felt very calm and the whole experience was beautiful and quiet. It's hard to describe exactly the amazing time I had. Our pilot, Capt. Bruce, was friendly and answered our questions and he seemed to be completely happy doing what he was doing. I recommend this company and beautiful experience. Cross this off your bucket list! I'm hooked and would definitely go again.
Very nice mountain!
I don't understand why there are any bad reviews of this car wash... maybe they got it mixed up with another one. Anyway, it is excellent. Great customer service and just such a friendly staff. I went to just get a wash and then decided on getting a car detail. We had dog hair all over our car.... They were able to inexpensively clean all of it out. Our Subaru Outback looks brand new again. They are very "detail" oriented and work with you to make sure everything gets super clean.
Always delicious and great service
I agree with Ashlee. I am very nervous going to any dentist. Recently I experienced a terrible tooth ache. When I met Dr Weston I was so relieved as he has the best bed side manners I have ever experienced with a dentist or specialist. He explained every step of the process to fix my tooth. I felt nothing but confidence being in his hands. During the procedure he was gentle and I felt very little discomfort. I was able to swallow whenever I needed too, he is very understanding and compassionate of my nervousness. I still have to go back again for the final work but I'm not worried as I know he will look after me. Thank you Dr Weston and all the wonderful girls that work with you. I will be recommending your practice to all my friends.
Fab food and wine with friendly staff - what else would you want :)
None
this record store is what i picture heaven looking like.huge selection, fantastic place for both essential albums and rare finds at fair prices. very knowledgeable and friendly staff. a must for any music lover. only drawback is no public restroom, so just like those family roadtrips, make sure you take care of it before you leave home, because it'll be awhile before you get the chance again.
The food is great, a vast variety and the chiefs specials, wow. The staff is prompt and courteous. So much fun even the obnoxious people don't bother you. Great.
Our family traveled to Playa for Thanksgiving vacation this year (2012). One of the items we had on our list was a dive on Friday morning of our trip. Having obtained my OWD earlier this year I wanted to dive in this area. All of my training dives were in the Raleigh area so this vacation dive was to be a first on a lot of fronts. First ocean dive, first dive off a boat, first deep dive. As might be expected I had a little apprehension about the dive. I signed up at our hotel who connected us with Phantom Divers. From our initial conversations they calmed all my fears. Carlos Estrabeau "Charlie" was fantastic. Positive beyond belief, he walked us through all the details and got us setup in no time. The boat ride out to the site was great but nothing compared to the first dive. It was incredible! Floating along the reef was a great experience. During the time between our first and second dive, Charlie took is to a beach where we experienced a cenote a couple of feet from the shore. Second dive was incredible as well. The big surprise of the day however was the 50+ pictures that Charlie took during the dive. I now have wonderful pictures of my first major dive. These guys are great!
None
None
None
Brought in my Samsung Galaxy S2 and Dr. Rob quoted me $65 to fix the charger port. I returned in an hour to discover the price was lowered to $35 because he was able to utilize a used part rather than a new one....Incredible service. I recommend Rob the Phone Doctor to EVERYONE
Good food, friendly staff. Recommend.
I was introduced to Evolve Movement and Pilates a year and a half ago. I have done private lessons (Alyssa Light is amazing), semi-private lessons, and group classes. I have in return introduced a number of new clients, because I truly believe that they are one of the best studios in town. The studio is always sparkling clean, the instructors are friendly and helpful. And I love that I have learned how to use the equipment, doing things I never thought I would be able to do!
Ottimo
Recomenda-se. O serviço é muito bom, havendo um pessoal muito prestável e amável. O preço é muito equilibrado. A zona é no centro da cidade, podendo ir-se a pé até à baixa da cidade, pode-se optar por um quarto com vistas de rio o que é muito agradável.
Dom is extremely knowledgeable about his business.
I bought a Lexus IS 250 and it was an amazing car. The team there are like family. Naj was very professional and helpful. Thank you very much for your help. Hopefully i will be able to return the favor back oen day. :)
None
Loved Pliney the Elder! GABF
Fantastic place full of Magic brings me back to my childhood wonder. Only drawback for me is 1: Then entrance fee is very high but worth it for the magic wish they would average it out yearly fee is affordable but they make it up in the daily so people visiting from afar pick up the bulk of fees. 2: Is brought on by events in the world today. Having to deal with security moving between parks is a pain I wish they would have a closed system where you could move freely without having to go through security each time you wander between parks. Even with these drawbacks the most magical place on earth a place everyone should visit at least once. As for me visited 2 weeks ago and ready to go back.
Excellent sized portions, very tasty. Only problem was takeaway box leaked slightly, could be improved if lined with a single sheet of paper.
My daughter has been attending Phx Prep Preschool for 3 years. I am very pleased with the teachers, Center, and Ms. Margot. I couldn't be happier!!! The teachers are very loving and really do educate the children in a fun way. I get compliments all the time from family and friend saying how smart my daughter is! The Center is always getting something new or upgraded. Not a week goes by that I don't notice wonderful new changes. Ms. Margot is always in the office to greet me in the morning and tell me how my daughter's day was in the evening. The only sad thing is they don't have a Kindergarten.
Great customer service from top to bottom. Will never go back to Howe Ave store.
I have been to several Post Net locations in the area, but this location is by far the best. Ron & Irene are always quick to help me with my small business needs
I believe it's more or less impossible to buy a man's shirt in Northampton for less than $100. Some reviewers here seem to be confused. Thorne's Marketplace isn't Sears or JC Penny where every day is a super sale and you bring coupons. Here's something that's true. I have nice dress shirts I've bought here and other places in Northampton 15 years ago. On one shirt I actually had a tailor reverse the collar and am still wearing it. I generally buy my wife's Christmas presents here because I'm after something really special and nice. If you're after commodity stuff or "hauls" look elsewhere. Thornes is expensive, it's unique, it's expensive, it's exclusive. This means people are excluded. If you're ready to own fewer, nicer things this may be for you.
None
They are such a great range of doctors and they have such friendly staff that I no longer go to any other doctors. I have been going here since 2010 and have gone through now 2 pregnancy's with them and they are the most amazing doctors I have ever gone through. They are great for the big things and for the little things and help out in any ways they possibly can.
None
This is what i actually learned when i was having wonderful holidays in U.C.T. A Psychometric tests which were described as follows, Psychometric tests are not like a regular tests as the answers cannot be learned off by heart. They are essentially timed aptitude tests. So what the employers want to know is what your natural ability is at a certain subject. While many employers assume the test cannot be practiced in advance of an interview, the truth is, it can. Given the strict tight time limitations for taking psychometric tests, if you did not practice beforehand, you will likely gain a very average score. What it boils down to is that even people who are very good at verbal reasoning or numeracy will do badly unless they have practiced their timing. Through practicing psychometric tests online, you can also gain an understanding of what the real test may look like and how it will operate – giving you a little boost of confidence when taking the real test! So what do you do in order to prepare for a psychometric test? • Take practice tests online which are timed. Keep practicing until you get a score you are happy with. • Buy books with practice psychometric tests and advice on how to take them. These are usually written by people who create the tests themselves, so they know what they are talking about. • Practice your skim and scan reading skills. This is especially important for verbal reasoning tests. You have to read and answer questions based on large pieces of text extremely quickly.
I read this last review and that is what first got me to call Charlie's Auto Center. I have to say that it was nothing but the truth. I am very mechanically inclined myself and its very hard to win my trust when it comes to a mechanic. I was having problems with my Porsche Cayenne and the dealership was going to charge me over $1500 in parts. So I found Charlie on Google read the review and gave him a shot. I described the problem to him over the phone since I knew a little about what was going on, he instantly sent a tow-truck over to my house and ordered parts right away. By the time my car arrived at his location he had the replacement part in his hands. I arrived a few hours later in amazement that he was so on point and he kept a spotless garage. He talked me through the problem that I was having and gave me options. Telling me that he was going to try to fit what was broken with the new part that he had ordered. He also told me if all his efforts were unsuccessful we would have to buy a full driveshaft. So I was really glad to see that he was on my side, that is really truly important when it comes to a mechanic. Really happy at this point that I chose Charlie, even though my problem was far from over I was very reassured that the problem was in great hands. I got a call back from Charlie and he told me that he was unable to fix the part due to me driving on it too long after the issue accrued. Which was something he told me right off the bat so it was no surprise. He then told me looked into getting me parts from another German parts seller and it would be a few hundred dollars cheaper but same quality and same warentee. I was so glad that he was looking out for me.. Again more options, great guy! And looking out for his customer. My Cayenne is now fixed I also had him do a oil change, he told me he looked over the whole car to make sure everything looked good. I will be a continued customer for life, from just this one experience I know I have found my shop to go. I am very happy with the communication and the superior service that I experienced. I used to be a dealership only guy... Not anymore! Charlie's Auto Center is where I will be taking my wife's car, my Porsche and all my project cars. What else can I say, I am really glad I have found a quality mechanic I can trust! Thank You Charlie!!
None
Paramount is the best project I have ever...Great Location, Excellent environment..No more pollution.
My team and I have had the pleasure of working with Matt and his clients many times over a period of many years. I can tell you without hesitation that Matt does a superb job representing his clients. Matt has a very unique skill set which is highly valuable to each and every one of his Real Estate Brokers and personal clientele. He has created a work environment and team of real estate professionals that exemplifies his work ethic and integrity.
None
This is one of our absolute favorite restaurants, we go about once/week. The food is affordable and delicious. I get an extra order of injera with my meal and always have enough left over for lunch the next day. The spicing of the food is way better than the other Ethiopian restaurant in town, and the service is friendly.
None
Floyd Glass & Window is a fantastic locally owned company. We've used them on several single window replacements in the past. They offer outstanding, speedy, affordable service on their window replacements. Not only do they offer great window and windshields, they are artists when it comes to buidling showerdoors, shelving and custom mirriors out of glass. I definitely refer Floyd to anyone with glass needs!
None
Love this place. Have been going here forever and it just keeps getting better. Service, food, smiling faces.
Their doughnuts are amazing! Not many other bakeries can match Hinkley's warm custard doughnuts. Yum!
Great place to purchase a bike.
Best veggie burger in town! Kids liked the kids meals and everyone loved the fries. Good malts and excellent service.
Fantastic!
Fair
None
None
Ricos platos de excelente servicio y privilegiada espacialidad. Recomendable para almuerzos y reuniones de negocios ;)
Awesone resturant, delicioso comida
Excellent
Excellent food, excellent service and best waitress I ever had! Loved it! I recommend this place for fine premium dinning to be with family and Friend...
My friend recommended a day out on the North Fork as a great date with my new girlfriend (now my wife!). We weren't much into wineries (had to drive back to BK) so this place was perfect for a stop over between the beach and dinner on the water. We picked some lavender but were more into walking around the fields, taking pictures and chilling on the porch of the farm stand chatting with other visitors. I got stung by a bee and the farmer/owner was really helpful and actually gave me some lavender oil to put on the sting (who knew?). My car still smells like lavender,my girlfriend loves showing off her pictures from the lavender farm, and beyond my bee sting I'm still getting props for one of the best dates ever...
This a great place for the whole family. These folks are a class act!
None
None
These guys are very professional. They always provide excellent service. So far I've only used Lon and Josh, but I'm looking forward to seeing the other barbers as well.
Ware has been amazing since I started working with them a few years back. The techs are all really nice and friendly and I know that they're honest businessmen.
good food good taste
None
My experience with Virgo has been a great one! Very professional,has brought me new business and the location is also great. Certainly recommend them if you are looking to do business in the NY area. Thanks
Such good food. I love this place. Takes a bit longer to wait in the drive thru for some real food. Good stuff!
Dr. Rob is one of the best chiropractors I have seen. He is very gentle and does not do much as far as manipulating the spine; however, he uses alternative techniques that eliminate the pain I have experienced from previous adjustments. Some chiropractors do the same type of adjustment every time you have an appointment and Dr. Rob is different. He listens to you to find out where you are experiencing pain or discomfort and addresses those issues accordingly. Since moving to Charlotee, I was concerned that I would not find another chiropractor like mine in Atlanta, but Dr. Rob exceeded my expectations as far as chiropractic care.
My family and I went on this trip on our visit to Naples and we LOVED it! Such an amazing experience. Anyone would enjoy it! The manatees rolled over for us and came right up to the boat! I've always wanted to go on a manatee tour, so I obviously enjoyed it, but my uncle was not looking forward to this trip, and I think he ended up having just as much fun as me! We had Captain Andrew Jr as our tour guide and I have to say he had a lot of interesting facts about the manatee's, that even I didn't know (and that's coming from a girl who has loved these animals since birth!). He was very entertaining and a great guide. I would go it again in a heartbeat!
I have used CSRA Advertising Specialties for years with every business I have been involved in. Top notch customer service. Everything I have ordered comes to me looking better than I expected and arrives sooner than anticipated. On top of that, the pricing cannot be beaten!
This was my first eye test in 20 years! I avoid seeing health practitioners as much as I can as I often find them sullen and uninformative and often not particularly of benefit. This was completely different. Susan (?) the optician was extremely competent in what she did but also, what makes the difference is she took time to explain clearly every aspect of what she was doing and why and even when there was need to refer me to a doctor for a particular issue she clearly explained what it was for and what would happen. So often we are told what to do without being told why and treated more like 'widgets' going through a process. Susan treated me kindly and considerately and as an individual and with full information on what would happen with my glasses and my referral to a doctor, and her colleagues were equally as friendly in their approach to customers! Excellent service. Highly recommend them. They also responded to my appointment request 24 hours faster than the nearby Specsavers.
This place has great breakfast food. And don't forget to buy a cookie on your way out. They have the best homemade style cookies!
Muy buena gente. Amables y atentos. Además mucha variedad. (Si no tienen te lo piden).
Very nice little place. Though I am a bit biased when it comes to hand crafted brews.Kernville is a nice place to be anyway. Until the tourist season hits.
RO# 11516 The Staff at Herbers Autobody in Leduc, AB are very friendly and courteous. They arranged for my rental car and did everything hasel free. They were fast and efficient in repairing my vehical as well. Thanks Herbers
Food is awesome. For a tiny place the taste is big.
Absolutely love this facility. I've left my dog for just the day or for a whole week - each time, she comes back exhausted and happy as could be. Thank you, Camp Bow Wow!
Strategically located in the heart of the city and only a stone’s throw from the customs and immigration checkpoint, Johor Bahru City Square stands out as a central landmark in JB. With its more than 200 retailers, it offers a host of fashion, entertainment and restaurants. All catered to wow the senses and satisfy the needs. Rush in when the doors open at 10am for breakfast, then head out and start your shopping adventure of clothes, shoes, bags, trinklets, toiletries, electronic toys. Everything the heart desires. Unique to Johor Bahru City Square is the Inner City, an eclectic mix of smallish fashion and accessory shops plus restaurants housed in a tight, quaint setting. Always a firm favorite of the “NOW” generation. After many hours of shopping, rest the feet in one of the numerous restaurants and cafes or indulge in a soothing foot massage, then go on to treat the rest of the body at a salon.
I've used this location to rent trucks for several years. All of my experiences have been most helpful.
None
I took my 2003 Honda Accord to Great Falls Exxon for a check engine light and inspection. They were very knowledgable about the car and my options. They even suggested a few very cheap options but also told me the pros and cons to each approach. In the end, I chose the best repair option, not the cheapest and they got everything fixed up the same day! Included a catalytic converter, (2) oxygen sensors and a vTec switch. Car is running amazing and I feel very well taken care of.
Great service, place looks great, i love the pizza here. I have not tried anything else, but pizza is excellent!
None
This is a great restaurant with caring staff and amazing food. We had not been in about a year as we live in another city and they remembered us and the wine we drank. I cannot recommend this restaurant enough for a romantic night out!
Mmm Mmmm Mmmmmm!!~ Need I say more...¿? Try their chicken & bacon pizza....BoMb!!! And GREAT service too. Nice friendly people
Amazing service, one of the first Marina's in San Diego sports fishing history.
Jason was a great help he helped me through my problem with ease and patience. I would highly recommend him if you need computer help.
I recently purchased a 2012 Mazda 3 Skyactiv sedan for my college-age daughter. The Mazda rep that I dealt with, Mike Sharma, was knowledgeable and professional in every way. Transaction went flawlessly. No hard sale and my terms were met in every respect. I recommend both the vehicle and the buying experience with Mike Sharma. Time spent with the Financing Manager was the briefest that I've ever encountered. Based upon my recent experience with this transaction I heartily recommend Courtesy Imports! Dante Amato, AIA
None
Always great service! Love it!
Fantastic store, very knowledgeable staff who loves to educate. They really care about your tank, and NOT the $$$. RECOMMENDED!!!
Awesome food
None
I sustained a pretty bad back injury back in college that I thought I would never recover from. About 7 years later, because I still remained quite active, it got worse to the point where I was considering surgery. I went to a doctor who was recognized for handling professional sports injuries as well as performed surgery. While there seemed to be one very good therapist there, I never seemed to get treatment from her considering our work schedules conflicted. Almost $1,500 later, I felt very little improvement, but decided to talk with the doctor about getting better treatment. He referred me to Synergy Rehab, which is quite a drive for me from where I live. At this point, I just wanted to feel better... Two visits with Anurag and Tappan were worth at least 6 visits. Their practice is very honest and it is apparent that their goal is to use the therapy "Muscle Energy" to get you feeling better as quickly as they can, but with long term results and without overcharging you. They are too humble to advertise, so I figured I would do it for them. If you have back problems and want to get the best results and avoid surgery, give them a call and schedule an appointment. I wish I could have years ago...
None
Nice food, nice management!
Love going down at Easter to get lunch and candy for the family! They have the very BEST chocolate and banana malts!!!! I would recommend everyone to go visit Crown Candy for a bite to eat.
Fast and friendly service! Their hand car was service is exceptional, they did an excellent job of getting the swirls and scratches out of my cars paint job. I highly recommend this garage for parking and car washing!
Dr. Lee is a very outstanding and fun dentist, very professional, down to earth & jessica the office manager goes out of her way to work with you. The office as a whole has very good customer teamwork. hygenist great, megan goes out of her way to make sure you know the best way to make sure the best way to take care of your tooth health. Thank you to all. I have been a longtime patient.
Five star all the way. Awesome prices, great knowledge, super service. Family run and they make you feel like family. Great selection. You will be happy you went there first.
Awesome store. Great Customer Service, fantastic selections on hot bars and awesome location!
I got the best service from this store like no other
None
Fast service and clean also really good food and healthy. :-)
None
Hello friends. 123ContactForm is one of the best plataforms that i know. Easy to work and have all that we need. Congratulations
We've taken our dog to Urban Vet Care numerous times and have always been really pleased with how quick, clean, and professional they are. They even call us the following day to see our how dog is doing, regardless of what we brought her in for. We've tried other places nearby but after using Urban Vet Care a few times now, we have no plans of leaving.
I gotta Say i love how fast these Guys Fixed my iPhone afteri dropped it on the concrete Hard as can be. I would send all my friends to get their iPhone repair in waco to Mobile Computer Repair, me and my Son both appreciate the repair and now we can play our video games together again.
I never would have tried this place just from looking at it from the outside but it was recommended so I went. So glad I did! The customer service is amazing, the waitstaff are so friendly and helpful but aren't pushy. The food is fresh and delicious, I especially love their tacos and tamales, very authentic tasty! If you've never eaten it is a must try. Definitely my favorite Mexican place in the area, and I am huge Mexican food snob :-)
None
Beautiful place
I got my custom molded headphone covers from Hearing Station, and I love them. They are an absolute dream to wear. Ellen was very gentle and I received my order quickly. Thank you so much!
Great food!
These guys were great! They did a complete bathroom remodel and it looks fantastic. They always showed up when they were supposed to and all the workers were very nice and professional. They even cleaned up very thoroughly at the end of each day. They were always available to answer any questions I had and everything was done for the agreed upon price. Even when a few things were not exactly as I had imagined, they fixed or replaced them to my liking for no additional cost. I now have a beautiful new bathroom! Would definitely recommend them to others and reuse them for any other projects in my home.
None
The best office ever!
Awesome I've actually been here unlike the other twats.
Excellent campsite, very reasonably priced. Facilities were fantastic, new shower/toilet blocks. Very near a little pub (about a 5 min walk). Would recommend to anyone. Lots of pitches and it has a little shop to but the essentials.
Top of the line if your looking for an agent who is professional, attentive, and places your needs above all. Currently have policies with and will continue to use Kristine and her agency for all my clients needs. Thank you for making my experience worth telling others about. Thomas Brown - Vancouver WA
Called these guys and they offered me a car in no time! Just wanna say Drivo is the best rent a car company in NJ!
A2A limo offered me 4 hours deal for my graduation party and I will be using them if i ever need limo again. They were the only company that had cheapest rates.
I have been going to Dr.Sabharwal with my dog Taz for years now and cant say enough good things about him. He helped Taz walk again! Dr.Sabharwal explained everything on how Taz would go through a ACL surgery and how the recovery would go and made me feel confident that my little guy was going to be fine. Now he runs the yard like a pup again thanks to Dr.Sabharwal.
Nice place! Excellent beer!
I have been to many dealerships across Nashville and BY FAR the best service I received was at Crest Honda. From what I've heard, the service at Crest Honda is always exceptional and straightforward, but the sales rep that I lucked into was absolutely a joy to work with. His name was Ben Puryear, so ask for him when you call Crest or stop by to look at cars. He is genuine and honest, and he did not at all try to reason me out of what I came in there looking for (a hatchback manual in a particular shade of blue/gray, which as it turns out is kind of hard to find). Shopping for a car with someone you trust will make a WORLD of difference when you're like me and don't have prior experience in car buying and/or someone with experience to accompany you to the dealership.
If anyone is looking for extra storage in the area, this is the place to go. Hands down.,
Very friendly and nice place. The staff takes the extra step everyday !
We are now finishing up our second year at Lerner school with both a preschooler as well as a first-grader attending. The school is fantastic, nurturing, everything we could ask for. My wife is Israeli and she absolutely loves the Hebrew and Judaic studies curriculum. Our children are thriving and maturing thanks to this wonderful school. We can't imagine what the negative reviewer has experience or whether she/he is truly legitimate, as I have not witnessed such issues as mentioned in that review. I would like to counteract those remarks. The school treats its non-Jewish employees and family members with respect. One piece of evidence is that the long-time head of school is non-Jewish. It is further noteworthy that I am a non-Jewish spouse with a Catholic background. I always felt fully accepted and was not treated in any way differently from other parents. The Lerner school has welcomed my children, my wife and myself with open arms.
I will have to agree with all the parents that love Seal North Pinellas! My son is 2 years old and had private lessons prior to going to Seal. He has been in Seal since March and I have recommend them to several other parents who also have now joined Seal. Everyone is super nice and very well trained. My son cried a lot in the beginning, (more for show) then anything, but even with the tears, Ms. Lindsey was getting him to actually "swim" and be able to know to get the wall if he fell in the water. He now loves going and looks forward to his classes. They are busy because they are seasonal, but while you there everyone from the front desk to the instructors in the pool are very professional and friendly.
Excelente, justo lo que necesitábamos cerca de todo y con ambiente de barrio.
None
Fab - perfect holiday location!
Nice place to visit, wouldn`t want to live there.
Хаха
My FAVORITE restaurant in Buffalo. Had many memorable family moments here, my brother used to live right next door! The food, service and decor are excellent, and they have the best wings in the world, hands down.
I was so sad to see all the negative reviews from a handful of frustrated people. I write as a non-pregnant woman not attempting to get pregnant, only visiting for standard annuals. But both doctors I've had have been very sweet ladies, and (unlike at my last gyn) no one tries to push blood work on you if there's nothing wrong. Only need to have a pap done once every 3rd annual. I've never had any of the weird over-billing issues people have complained about---I had $0 copay when I was on my parents' insurance and $0 copay now on my own insurance. And to top it all off, they gave me a frosted sugar cookie. There's a reason they're such a large practice- they know what they're doing.
I have been a repeat and well satisfied customer at Dobbs Howdershell service center for over 18 years**the service facility is clean, organized and has all the latest modern equipment to diagnose complex service repairs**the technicians are well trained and familiar with American manufactured and Import cars**service technicians pictures and their area of job expertise is posted inside the customer waiting area** I have never had to return my vehicle to the shop to have the same service issues resolved. Repair work is generally scheduled and performed in a timely manner**the management staff is always courteous and professional. My Kia Optima has been pampered and well cared for at this service facility.
Probably the best car buying experience that I have ever had. Al Singh was extremely professional, courtesy, patient and sincere. I will definitely refer my friends to this dealership. No wonder Lindsay Volkswagen has been voted number #1!
I am so thrilled with the service and results from Albany Laser Spa. I had my doubts, but its amazing how fast the results are. I used to wax, but that is temporary and painful. Their laser is almost pain free and permanent!! I only wish I started this years ago...thanks, Albany Laser Spa!!!
None
Pathfinders was instrumental in putting me in front of the kind of company I was looking to join. They have great partnerships with some of the best companies in Atlanta - Danielle, my recruiter at Pathfinders, listened to what I was looking for, gave me great advice at how to achieve it, and within just a couple weeks, I had interviewed and accepted an offer with one of the top companies in the Oil and Energy industry. I couldn't be happier with my career path and wouldn't be here without Danielle and Pathfinders. Thank you!
I'm so sick and tired of being taken advantage of for a service. I cringe more waiting to hear a quote on a car repair than I do waiting to hear back from my doctor. After going to multiple places (5 including my car dealer) and being quoted upwards of $1500 for a muffler job I took my car into these guys and had my muffler done for around $500 bucks. I've been there 3 times now and have never felt like I was being taken advantage of. These guys are speedy/friendly/helpful and most of all HONEST. Do yourself a favor and stop in. They have a K-Cup station, a nice size T.V, comfy seats, and their bathroom is (no joke) cleaner than mine.
Awsm coffee...
Rosemary is amazing! There is no one else I would trust my two dogs with since both of them have significant behavioral issues and only an extremely experienced and savvy individual can handle these two. In Rosemary I have found the perfect person! Rosemary is a partner in Annie and Lily's ongoing training working with the dogs on a daily basis through their walks incorporating training techniques that Annie and Lily respond to. She knows and understands dogs completely and I am absolutely comfortable and assured when they are in her care. Rosemary is also an advocate for my dogs letting me know of any changes in their health, well-being or habits that may be an early signal to a potential problem which is invaluable. She has even researched a recent health problem that impacted Annie and was able to identify the cause before the vet did! It is obvious that Annie and Lily adore Rosemary and display their love for her everytime they see her. I cannot tell you how much it means to me that Rosemary cares for and about Annie and Lily and I cannot recomment Rosemary and K9 Nirvana Pet Care highly enough! If you want the best for your pet call this service!
On the 18th of June 2012, my wife and I had to go to Hutchinson for some personal matters. And, as we were en route to leave for home (which is roughly 80 miles or so from Hutchinson), I caught a glimpse of a place I had never seen before in all my visits (and even previous residence) to the town. It was a little hole in the wall store in Hutchinson's antique store district on East Main Street, known as Toy Depot. To be honest, I really didn't know what to expect and actually considered passing it up because too often have I been left disappointed by stores that say they are toy stores and are full of things to educate children, which I don't necessarily find anything wrong. But, as a toy collector myself, the last thing I want to add (and, really never add) is Dora the Explorer, Thomas the Tank Engine, or Bob the Builder. That said, I gave Toy Depot a look and from the second I walked in, I was taken back in time to my childhood during the late 70s and throughout the 80s. Granted, I didn't see Transformers, but I did see all sorts of toys I had once played with. Money, unfortunately, didn't permit any purchases to be made sadly, but I was very pleased not only with their selection but the prices were equally awesome. When next I get a chance to go back to Hutchinson, Toy Depot will definitely be one of my stops and this time, I'll make sure to have a little extra cash to spend.
Fantastic Night Out !!! Great venue. Staff are full of fun !!! Fantastic laugh & great night out, if you're looking for somewhere to go for a works night out - Would highly recommend Shangai Shuffle in Glasgow. Also recommend booking early to reserve the dates you're looking for as this place fills up very, very fast !!! Enjoy :)
Todd was great! He called before coming, said he was on the way and if it was alright that he was a little early. He showed up and explained everything he was doing, how the furnace and air conditioner worked. I also asked him how he likes working for Perfect Home Services and he went on to explain how great of a company it was, how much they cared about the employees and the great training they continuously provide as well as motivation speakers. I will be using them without hesitation from now on. Very happy with the service. Thanks Todd!
I've had a great experience using Aria. Who have been my core supplier since I started the business in 2005. As an IT repair repair technician, I've found their site easy to re-order parts. Having tried other suppliers, I have always come back to Aria due to reliability of delivery and consistency in their quality. On the rare occasions I had issues, they dealt with it promptly.
Go on a Thursday awsome cheap steaks and the apple & pear cider on tap is to die for.
Our experience with Mike at Good Car Company was fantastic. We purchased 3 cars from Mike within the last 3 years due to having teenagers. He was polite, friendly, and did not pressure us whatsoever. We were able to take the cars to our mechanic for a quick look at the cars, and no potential problems existed. All of the cars have had minimal repairs (and I mean minimal). We have gone back to Mike because of these 3 purchases, and will continue to go. Hands down, best experience we've had and we've been purchasing cars for 20 years.
Big Bazar is Superb ANd even Better than Junction ... I just love Shopping there
Beautiful setup here! They have nice relaxing leather couches everywhere and a fireplace that is huge, awesome in the winter time, and a patio out back with nice tables & chairs. Free wifi too. Probably the only coffee shop in town I would go to anytime and everytime
There are sales and then there are sales experiences. If you are looking for just another transaction then go to Craig's List, Ebay or any one of a number of dealerships. If you are looking to both purchase a bike, understand all its capabilities and feel very confident in your selection when you ride away from the dealership - then please go see my man Kelly at Harley-Davidson of Tampa, FL on Dale Mabry Highway. Being a bike novice Kelly walked me through every feature offered on a score of different bikes (not just Harley-Davidsons). He took a great deal of time to make sure I was comfortable in selecting the exact bike that was both best for me and for the exact product I was shopping for. I just haven't seen this kind of service at other dealerships (both cars and bikes). I really believe Kelly might have passed up other sales opportunities to educate me on my potential purchase. Being obsessed with mechanical details was not a problem at this dealership. Kelly walked me back into the garage area of the dealership so that I could see everything about the engine and power transfer systems of the particular model bike that I was interested in (the "Fat Bob"). I asked all my questions and they were answered completely and professionally. I cannot say enough about the sales experience of this dealership. If you are looking for a bike or just have general questions about motorcycle ownership, please go talk to the good folks at Tampa Harley-Davidson and specifically ask for Kelly.
Shopping bom, mas para ir no Cinema, pois tudo é bastante caro.
Amazing newest Sacramento area In&OUT. Clean, awesome and fun folks there. Great FRESH food as ALWAYS. The drive through is 100% covered so no getting wet in rainy season!
Authentic, wholesome, exotic and very tasty! This little gem of a eat-in or take away Thai cuisine is a very refreshing change from the routine "fusion cuisine" you don't expect to find a hidden away lunch or dinner eatery. Great food, great variety, great prices and very friendly staff. And of course, all the food is freshly made with a little hint of family recipe I was told, no additives / no preservatives / gluten-free. Long live independent businesses! Hint: if unsure what to order, ask for a recommendation! Also, try the home-made ginger sauce. Yum!
Modern Dads Headquarters
best italian on the UES. great wine, big menu, awesome staff
I didnt have this experience yet... :c I was watching rtl4 and some dude rik got all the things wrong but also so right and everybody was laughing when he made fun of himself :3 it was nice to watch, very very nice to see people laugh :| sadly Im still on my own....... And then my mom turned on national geographic and I suddenly realise, I was a copycat... sorry peoples :C I just dont know how to accept love.... so now I just hold my breath 30seconds while resting and then let the air slowly blow out of my lungs, it helps me relax :) also the green stuff, plants etc NATURE are helping me :) and they will Always be hhelping me I think en uhhh wtf Plantage Kerklaan 38-40 1018CZ Amsterdam??? wat is dat????
Excellent service and great food! Everything was perfect! We'll definitely be back.
I travel all the world and this is by far one of the best burritos I've ever had!! Get the Muchaco!! And wash it down with a Spicy Margarita.
I went to take a test drive of the Outlander Sport, they had the car I was looking for and worked hard to get to a price I could live with. I dealt with Luke, Rob, and finally Andy. They were not pushy and explained the facts from their side and listened to my point of view. We reached a deal quickly and I think the entire process was done under 2 hours. I did not think it was possible to complete the transaction in such a short time but they made it happen. the dealership is small and motivated. I would recommend to friends and family.
My experience at BMW with Ty Vilhauer was the best car buying experience I have ever had. He was very friendly and informative. I couldn't be happier with my new car and it would not have been possible without Ty.
My wife and I decided to meet some other friends up at Combat Houston. Most of us had never played before and we were very nervous about playing. The staff is absolutely amazing!! Made us feel comfortable and right at home!! The field was amazing and fun. Don't know too many places that I would stay and play at for 3 1/2 hours but Combat Houston is the place!! We played for 3 1/2 hours and can't wait to go back again!! If you love paintball, then this place is a must! If you have never played before but you're looking for a new and exciting way to burn some calories, the this place is a must!! Just a small warning for the people who have never played before, once you play at Combat Houston, you will be hooked!!
None
I run a real estate team in McKinney, Texas, and on 3 recent occasions, I have referred Stratum Foundation Repair to do an assessment for clients of mine. They took immediate action in contacting the homeowners to arrange for the appointment. One property did not actually need a foundation repair, but the other 2 did. So far, one installation has been complete and they did it within just a few days of providing the report and proposal. Everyone was thrilled with the experience, start to finish, from the initial contact through to the replacing dirt, grass, landscaping, etc. to a point where the yard looked immacuate afterwards! I look forward to seeing the next job done soon, and I will be more than happy and confident in referring Stratum to any future client.
Thank you for assisting in making our trip to Greece truly exceptional. They say Greece is the land of the Gods but it takes someone who knows the country to truly show the best of Greece. Your ability to at every stage find the right solution for all our questions and desired destinations was truly exceptional. Thoroughly appreciated your professionalism and most of all your knowledge. We will definitely use your services in the short future!!!
By far the BEST plumbing company you will find in New Braunfels! Boice Plumbing does a majority of the plumbing work for rental properties that we manage and we couldn't be happier to work with such a dependable and honest company. I would highly recommend them to anyone that I know! Amber Resource One Property Management
Najlepszy lekarz stomatolog w Krakowie który potrafi spokojnie i jasno wyjaśnić sprawy oraz podejść całościowo do problemu, np. nie leczy brudnych zębów, tzn. najpierw piasek, skaling potem omówienie co potrzeba leczyć i jakimi metodami można to zrobić. Jestem zachwycony, takiego lekarza szukałem od dawna!!! Oprócz tego nie trzeba pamiętać o wizytach, bo asystent sam dzwoni wcześniej i przypomina. Polecam :)
None
I would definitely recommend everyone to take their vehicle to Joel Auto Repair & Transmission. I recently took my car in to get an oil change, new radiator, and new thermostat and will be using them again to fix my catalytic converter. They offer the lowest prices and do exceptional and fast work. Everyone is friendly, courteous, and extremely helpful and knowledgeable. They are honest and fair. I normally don't take the time to write reviews on places but considering how difficult is to find a good and honest auto repair shop I had to share. I will definitely be using Joel Auto Repair & Transmission for all of my auto repair needs in the future.
There is a full bar and reclining leather seats if you haven't gone to this theater recently go and enjoy the amazing upgrades!
Friendly staff, immaculately clean dining area and kitchen. Things were quiet when I showed up, but I was helped immediately by the staff and my meal was cooked fresh as I waited. I ordered chicken with sauteed vegetables, hummus and salad for $10. Chicken and vegetables were great, hummus was good, side salad was good too but nothing out of the ordinary. They get bonus points for freshness, everything was cooked as I waited by an older woman who looked like a greek mom who had been cooking for years! The only thing that was unusual was there were french fries included in the vegetables, and I don't recall if french fries - or potatoes - were on the list of ingredients. Overall I will definitely go back. The friendly service, clean restaurant, and cooked to order food were all worth a return trip. Next time I need to get some of their fantastic looking baclava!
Komplek Departemen Pertanian
He was courteous and polite. Took the time to get to know me and I felt very welcomed. The office is cozy and as a whole the atmosphere was very welcoming. The most important thing though is that his work is phenomenal!
Please disregard my ratings - I haven't been there but I had to enter something to post this question. We've reserved a beachfront bungalow at Baan Phu Lae for next month but I have a question based on some reviews on TripAdvisor. They were all from a few years about and they reported problems with bad bathroom plumbing and smells. Several also mentioned that there was no hot water in the beachfront bungalows. Can someone who stayed there recently comment on these problems? Did you have any of those problems? Overall it seems like there's been a huge turnaround after 2010 and since then the reviews have all been great. Any comments?
Went to get my brakes and oil changed, and they did a great job , I love how my brakes work now. They are very professional. Would recommend to everyone.
Great Shushi! Great Service.
None
I'm not the same person since I started here a couple years ago. Having been more of a scientist agnostic most of my life, I came for help after what some would call an "awakening," chocked full of sudden psychic experiences, with all its initial bliss, confusion & fear. With the myriad valuable survival tools I've learned from Miwa & Mary, my 3 most integral personal basic concepts I've carried away are: A). I'm not crazy (for seeing things that others don't) B). “We are not human beings having a spiritual experience. We are spiritual beings having a human experience.”― Pierre Teilhard de Chardin (even though I've read this in everything from Dr. Wayne Dyer to O Magazine... having a direct experience with this concept changes one's perceptions beyond literary logic) C). I've grown exponentially, as an artist, a psychic & as a human being. I'm learning to set free old habits of questioning myself, my own intuition & the presence of endless helping hands in the universe... and discovering the raw truth of our innermost being: L❤VE! I can't say enough about this psychic kindergarten-to-graduate school. It's a safe sandbox of play & healing with teachers who hold your hand, guide you straight through your own obstacles, eyes wide open, and show you how to see your own gifts more clearly :)
Let me start by saying I am Indian by origin, but American born. My mom cooked Indian food every day of my childhood. I have been to at least thirty Indian restaurants around Boston and this is my favorite. Nice atmosphere, great food, good value, incredible service, and just lovely people working there! My son is about to turn one in a couple months so we haven't been going out to eat that much. If we do get a chance, this is at the top of our list. If you don't have time to eat there, this a great place to order food to go!
Great place for honing animal photography skills with some areas having low fences and space for animals to jump around. Definitely worth a look if you're in the area.
Very friendly and honest staff. Good service.
A wonderful zoo to spend a day at, TONS of great new displays.
My first truck was set up with equipment purchased at Baldwin and the truck I drive now was all done at Baldwin. I would highly recommend them. The staff is friendly and knowledgable and they don't mind answering silly questions from girls that know what they want but don't know how to make it that way. Thanks for all the help and hard work put into my truck!
Love this place! Great teachers, classes, atmosphere, and such a wide variety of people that attend class from young to old. I have been a "regular" for several years now, and truly look forward to each class - - especially the 60minute session with Chris, Yolanda, David, Heatherly, and Tommy. Each instructor has their own style (same poses but different approaches to challenging the students, which makes each class unique). I started attending classes more often following a shoulder injury, and my - what a difference in gaining back my range of motion through regular practice! The deep breathing exercises, heat, poses, class rhythm, and humor with some of the instructors, make the experience calming, humbling, exhausting, stress relieving - and keeps me sane and in shape!
A bit dubious at first but totally loved the experience. Couldn't believe how close we were to the penguins or how beautiful the setting is. The trails and guides excellent. I recommend you take the latest tour you can--ours was 5:45 pm. Lots of penguins about and they are so cute. Your fee helps protect them.
I proud to be a Poddarite......
we took our navy graduate and his family. We had excellent, friendly service and the food was delicious. We highly recommend this restaurant.
I have been to Estes Park Massage 3 times now and I have had a wonderful experience each time. From the moment you enter until you leave it is warm, friendly, and gracious. I highly recommend going on your next trip to Estes Park.
I've been around the block when it comes to walking into places where you know people are going to try and sell you things you don't need and make the price somehow skyrocket beyond what is expected. This is one of the very few times where I did NOT experience that. I walked in, was asked what I was looking for, was helped expediently and professionally, and was treated like a person rather than a walking wallet. Incredibly affordable, and more than friendly, I am very happy with the service and my purchase. Thank you so much for all the help and the personal attention. Highly recommended for any kind of bed purchase.
Great food and service
To car owners of Scott Clark Honda, I recommend Kelsey Pasley to get some answers about conjoining the Bluetooth device to your car. I was very confused when I read through the manual by myself, but when I called Scott Clark Honda, Kelsey Pasley answered the telephone and ran me through step-by-step and helped me figure out how to hook them up together. She was considerate and very accommodating to my Bluetooth needs. Don't hesitate to make a call and ask for Kelsey, because you wont be disappointed! Also, when you stop by to pay your bill, or any other financial needs, look for Erin Hewitt because she is also a wonderful employee that I recommend! She was so sweet and helpful! She explained everything about the bill paying process and I was very pleased to hear such a admirable attitude even though it was such a busy day when I came in!
None
Great place to do business with. They're all about costumer service. When I came in to buy a new professional Bach trumpet we set down and came up with a configuration that best suited me and then they got Bach to ship them one of the same bore and bell size for me to try out before I placed the order for a custom one. The great service continued after my purchase even. I came in and asked what was the best thing to polish the horn was and they gave me a almost $10 polishing cloth. Didn't want any payment for it. This is by far the best music store in Macon, in both quality of service and goods.
Have been bring my three young boys aged 5-7 to Dr. Fini for about a year now and she is excellent. I highly recommend her to take great care of your child's dental health!
Pleasant experience. Check it out!
None
None
None
None
Favorite place to go. Great food and people!
Great housing society with lovely people.
RAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTSRAJVEER VEER JI DI ESCORT + ESCORTSESCORT + ESCORTS
What a fantastic venue. We were picked up from our cabin and shown to a table upstairs by the window. Nice view. The starter was on our table in under 5 minutes and cooked beautifully. Salt n pepper calamari that melted in our mouths. My main was massive. Chicken breast with creamy mash and creamy mushroom sauce with steamed carrots and beans. Just perfect. All the staff were incredibly kind and helpful. Highly recommended.
I purchased a 2010 Macbook Air from my company last year which came with Apple Care thru August 2014. Fast-forward to last month...my Air screen started to go out and it was determined that the logic board was the issue. Needless to say, they changed it twice and it did not remedy the problem. Disgusted, I went into the store and demanded the manager and explained the issue. The manager was great (Brandon Slay). He acknowledged they replaced everything on the Air and gave me a new one on the spot...I know people give these guys a hard time and bad rating; however, they are doing their full due diligence before they can issue a new computer...I really appreciate the personal care received by the whole Apple team...kudos
Found this spot when looking for puppy training in August 2011...and it's such a great place that I'm still training there over a year later! I've now got to dogs training in agility. I've participated in puppy, intermediate/basic, advanced/Great Dog!, tricks, Canine Good Citizen testing, competitive obedience, and agility training. I've worked with almost all of the trainers, and they're all fabulous. I'm here a few times a week & it's absolutely the highlight of the week. These folks know what they're talking about & are very genuine in their desire to help you accomplish whatever goals you may have for training your dog(s). The new facility in Frisco is AMAZING! There's also a fabulous selection of quality food, treats, toys and training supplies in the retail area. I highly recommend What A Great Dog!
The feeling of unabashed abandonment when you see the tiny chapel and empty hotel marking the folly of dreaming too big is worth any distance of travel.
Exceptional service- knowledgeable staff and made it completely worry free.
Friendly - Helpful AAA+++
Enjoy the atmosphere always a good place to grab drinks with friends.
Great resort. Kids have a great time swimming & it's a very attractive relaxing atmosphere.
Took my boys to finish their certification there. We all dove together and these guys were THE BEST!! We will be going back again and again and again. Fantastic isn't enough to describe them all.
Excellent Portuguese restaurant. Reasonable prices for Luxembourg and very good service. Try the Porcelet.
Great buying experience thanks to James Thomas. One of the best salesmen I've come across. Give the man a raise! Sold me a great car at a great price.
I am a father of 3 and Husband of One. I am very meticulous when it comes to choosing a doctor and the one we loved before this one did not work with the insurance i have. My other Doctor referred me to this one and I could have not expected a better service. From Pam at the Office to Dr. Darvish. Prompt, Professional and definitely family oriented and that meant everything for me. I will recommend him to any friend or family member.
I needed a VISA for China in a short timeframe and Just Passports (Erik!) pulled it off in less than a week. He even met me outside of business hours to ensure that he could deliver what I needed. He took the time to ensure that all my forms were completely accurate and to avoid rejection from the consulate. It was a great experience and I'll be using Just Passports again for my kids passports and any upcoming needs.
This is one of the most organized and well ran stores in town. They always have something from the moment you walk into the store. The customer service is top and I'm very appreciative of when the lines was long of course, because of the holiday season, they're quick to get help to move things along with out a stress. 5 STARS
Solar Energy USA did a fantastic job of quoting me different options that were in line with my budget and delivered outstanding customer service. I plan to use them for all my future needs.
I simply love this place! I have gone for years and recommended them to so many friends and family, all of which are just as elated to have found him as we are! Wonderful on all levels! Thanks for making the "dentist" such a worry and stress free experience!
Vom Ambiente über das Service bis zum Essen hat wirklich alles gepasst! Kann ich nur weiterempfehlen! Top!
I can't say enough good things about this place. I bought my first acoustic guitar there last week and I will be going back to purchase an electric very soon. They have excellent customer service. They answered all of my questions (no matter how stupid). They also have a great selection and their price on my guitar beat any other place I could find (online or at Guitar Center).
I really love this place. It is a little more expensive than other places i have eaten at... but the food is soooooo good.. Highly recommend the Kikoman, Phoenix, Copper River, and Geisha rolls. I have eaten sushi all over the country as I travel A LOT. This is one of my favorite spots.
Mark has helped my daughter with anxiety issues where other people were unable to. He is very personable and has been an amazing support.
ecoOne Spa products. Couldn't be easier.
La perfezione fatta in pizza...
Awesome South Indian authentic restaurant..
None
Great selection of bison burgers and tasted great! The service was also quick and responsive.
AWESOME!!!!!! They removed my previous tint job which over a 2.5 yr period darkened so much it became illegal and wouldn't pass inspection. They replaced it, it looks incredible, and it's legal!!! I recommend them to anyone they are very professional!
Excellent place for casual dining with a full service experience! Awesome how you can pick exactly what you would like in your meal. You can even customize how it's presented with mushu rolls or lettuce wraps or even soup. Parking is definitely a bit difficult but there are a few lots around that are free after 5 and garages on campus that you can easily walk from.
A lovely friendly pub with excellent food and real ale's.
None
Hands down my favorite sushi spot in town. Everything is so fresh and wonderfully plated. Some of the creative rolls are really spectacular and the traditional sashimi is always perfect. The attention to detail and quality here are top notch!
Absolutely awesome! Price and service were perfect! Thanks !
Great food with quite a selection. I highly recommend this place to anybody.
The first time I went to Cortello I immediately felt comfortable. I have always felt that when I walked into a salon everyone stared at you and never smiled! Not here! Everyone was super nice, smiled and made me feel like a person versus an alien. Not only is their customer service amazing, but everyone there does amazing hair. I cannot tell you how many compliments that I get. It is a little pricey for me, but it is worth every dollar for the amount of time they spend cutting my hair and really getting to know what I want. I have gone to Kayla, Lee and Tracy and can highly recommend all three of them!
Every time I have been there it was great.
Loved it
"Raspberry Grandmother", a really nice place with good food and lovely decor. Walk down one floor to get to the restaurant.
I love this studio. Practically next door to my apartment, it's convenient, everyone is friendly, and the prices are so affordable--especially for grad students like me. Clarissa's Saturday afternoon class is great. The studio does a lot for the community as well, and that is evident in their approach to yoga.
None
Dr. Ryoo is nice and doesn't try to sell me extra stuff. Answered all my questions, gave me options and took care of what I requested. Staff was nice also. Good experience.
Although my review is not about locksmith services it is more about Jose and his friendliness and passion for his business. He is a pro, great to work with (I'm a website guy) and always seems to care what his customers care. You can really see it in his online efforts to engage with people. That is a good quality. And I would know since I work with lots of clients. Thanks Jose and stay who you are!
Of the three or four practices we have used since moving to Atlanta in 2006, our experience with Ark Animal Hospital has been easily the best. If you are in the Midtown, West Side area, and looking for a vet service, especially one with 24-hour service. Very friendly, and straight up about costs and recommendations.
None
None
I would highly recommend using Reliable for any HVAC issues. I have an older home that was too hot upstairs during the summers and too cold downstairs. I had 3 other HVAC companies give me their solutions and they were all different. Finally, I called Dan Jape at Reliable and he put me in touch with one of his solution and design guys, Michael Cole. Michael was fabulous! He immediately came up with solution, explained exactly what he wanted to do, drew up a design and had a detailed estimate to me that day. The estimate was extremely reseasonable so I scheduled my service for the next week. My service guys were Dustin and Milo who were both outstanding. They spent all day and most of the evening at my house making sure the work was completed by the end of the day. Most importantly, for me, they were extremely clean and always wore booties when coming inside. When they left you couldn't tell they were even there. I am thrilled with the outcome. I finally have cold air pumping upstairs! Thank you Reliable!
None
Excellent food! Steak was grilled to perfection, bone-in steak was definitely worth the extra cost. Very knowledgeable staff, great recommendations for food and wine. Two managers stopped by and made sure the food was good. A typical price for a special night.
None
My family and I have been frequenting La Orient in Esher High Street for close on 10 years. In that time the standard has never faltered: Consistently great food, excellent relaxed ambiance and superb service by management and team who have all been there since I can remember. Love the place. Possibly the best restaurant in the whole of South West London. (And heavens have I wasted money at some places!). We've booked for tomorrow night - can't wait.
THIS IS THE BEST PLACE TO GET YOUR HAIR AND SKIN ATTENDED TO. THEY HAVE A WIDE RANGE OF HAIR AND SKIN SERVICES AVAILABLE WITH GREAT SPECIALS GOING ON WEEKLY. GIVE THEM A CALL TODAY!!!
Kimballs is the spot to be at when in wilpo best wings, and love the bartenders, some of my best time in college happen right there in kimballs
Love this storage place really take care of their people's love them
Papikondalu Package was just awesome!! I recommend!
The Doctor and staff are very courteous and friendly. Very easy to schedule an appointment and no waiting time at all once you get there. The Doctor always explains the issues I am having very clearly and my level of trust in the Dr. decisions is very high. Dr. Javan always answers my questions and spend the appropriate time to take care of all my dental needs. Also the office area is very clean and very comfortable. Excellent location!
My experience was fine. I went to NeNe, she knew natural hair very well, after I washed my hair I didn't have any heat damage. She gave me a cut and she took her time and did a great job. I was very impressed with her. She was very gentle with my hair and she didn't pull. I would recommend NeNe to anyone because she was awesome! :)
Ryan is easy to work with in setting up an appointment and is very knowledgeable about the cars and maintenance of them. He freely answers any questions you have about what parts he uses and tells you why he uses them. It is because they provide better value and longer service. The shop is very clean and in watching him work on cars you can see he cares about what he is doing. If any fluids are involved he cleans up any spilled onto the car. He noticed that I used a zip tie to replace one of the plastic rivets BMW used and offered to replace it for free. This shop is out of my way but because of the value and level of service he provides I will be using him again for my service needs.
Great staff and great pizza. It's nice to have one in Chesterfield since it's so close!
Вкусные салаты и десерты
Thank you so much for the fast computer repair. My graphic card didn't work and I was very worried about my PC, but Brad fixed everything within a few hours. Also he cleaned and diagnosed it without extra charge. Efficient and friendly service!
I have had a number of used motors serviced by B&M over the past decade or two. If the motor is on a boat it is necessary to be careful about being able to get it out of their way once it is done. However, my motors have always performed well upon completion or, in one case, the work was redone at no cost. I bring motors for service from some distance because of the excellence of their work. Most maintenance and repairs are within my own skill range. However, if a few years go by without problems on a specific motor I bring it to B&M simply because Fred is a great mechanic and will find problems before they trouble me. The marine shop is good sized and has most of what I need for boating and trailering at reasonable prices. What isn't immediately available can usually be ordered and available within a day or two. They will also ship to my house. These folks know what they are doing and do it well.
I recently bought a 2012 Accord EX-L from Joyce Koons and I must say its been the best car buying experience I had ever had. Dexter Straker (Sales person) and Peter Stohlman (Sales Manager) made it very easy on me and it was completely hassle free. I was very impressed with how very accommodating they were when closing the deal. I couldn't help referring Joyce Koons to my friends and colleagues at work. One of my coworkers immediately bought a similar car on the very next day I had closed the deal on mine. I look forward to working with Joyce Koons in the future for my servicing needs --- Suneel Marthi
None
Been going to Gunpowder Garage for 20+ years and have always had great experiences. Prices are competitive and I always trust Jimmy to make the repairs necessary. He'll look over a potential used car or truck purchase and give an expert opinion. Courteous, skilled, experienced with competitive prices - the perfect auto/truck repair place.
Evan Watson was EXCELLENT! He is easy to reach and returns calls promptly. He showed great care for my case, and listened to me. These may seem like simple things, but when you feel like you've been taken advantage of by the law, and nobody cares about what you have to say, it means a lot. He used his knowledge of the law and expertise to confidently request a dismissal and it was granted. He is charismatic and charming, but most of all professional. I could not have been represented by anyone better. Thank you Evan Watson!
Membership will give you free admission to OMSI and many other science museums.
Вот нормальная контора, ездили по делам в Днепр, быстро через них нашли квартиру.
Love it here, best place in carson city. Old School Charm, new games, great beer and I won money tonight. thats a winner for me
Trasladado a Gran Via 751A 1°2a Barcelona
Small "Mom & Pop" type pharmacy. I was new to the area and decided to try these guys out when a Big Name pharmacy up the street was out of my medication. I have to pay for my prescriptions out of pocket so I am always concerned with price. This place turned out to have a lower price on my medicine than anywhere I've ever filled it! (Although they do accept all regular insurance that any big pharmacies accept, I did ask that.) And they filled it on the spot and had me out the door in less than 10 minutes! There's not much else to the store besides the pharmacy, just a few shelves of basic over-the -counter meds, but I will continue to fill my prescriptions here. There's nothing high tech or fancy here (I don't think they even store their data on a computer), but it seems like a good, old-fashioned family business of the type that are quickly becoming extinct. I would highly recommend using this pharmacy.
I hear they buy golf... clubs... at mike's golf....shop
Sachy su mojou vasnou a este som nenarazil na lepsie a krajsie spracovane sachy ako od tejto firmy. Vrelo odporucam, nesmie chybat v zbierke praveho sachistu. Dakujem.
Exciting place!
un très gros merci a Me Gosselin qui a pris le temps de répondre a toute mes question et qui a très bien représenter mon conjoint!!! il a un très grand potentiel!!! vous etes chanceux de l'avoir dans votre équipe!!!!
None
Given the circumstances of this job, I am more secure than ever in my high regard of yoru company. Thank you for walking through the journey with me. I appreciate your integrity.
None
masjid yang indah
This is a nice store 5 plus and the food is great check it out !
None
Vynikající obsluha, která se k vám chová s "japonskou" úctou, výborná nabídka, chutná jídla a přiměřená cena. Asi nejlepší sushi restaurace, kde jsem zatím byl.
None
None
Amazing food, 100% raw and vegan!
None
I absolutely would recommend this establishment to anyone! Great service, excellent quality of work and the owner / mgmt are extremely helpful very easy to work with!!
In Schenna und Meranerraum eines der besten Hotels. Super Küche und Service
Dan Goodson and Best Choice Inspections were highly recommended to us by our realtor, and I cannot be more pleased with our decision to use them for our first home inspection! I appreciate Dan and the time he spent with us as he pointed out areas of concern and gave his recommendations.
None
Very simple walk-through with Kaci and quick payment set-up. Everything was explained succinctly and I was out within 20 minutes. Storage facility equipped with cameras and I feel this is a reliable location for my storage needs. Thanks Kaci!
None
I love this florist. I have been going here for years and have always had great customer service and beautiful flowers. I highly recommend.
Today was a good day took my truck in for service it was making a noise and they took me right in and I waited for about an hour and they found the problem. I was done in about 3 hours and it was covered by warranty. This made it a good day. I didnt mention but I had taken it to another place and they were unable to find the issue so I am glad I took a chance on the dealership.
Ambiance et service sympa, plats et tarifs à la hauteur, vous pouvez y aller sans hésiter
The employees at Pet Resorts always take excellent care of my little dog. When I go somewhere that I can't take my dog with me, then I always use Pet Resorts. They always follow what ever instructions that I leave for his care. He never comes home stinky or dirty. The facility is clean and never smells bad. I also like the fact that I can make my reservation on-line or by phone.
None
Frank did an excellent job for us. I wasn't sure what the extent of my service contract was and he researched it for me. He found a couple of issues and made appropriate recommendations for solutions with potential financing options. He was very courteous and polite, even when our dogs insisted on bothering him while he was trying to work.
In October of 2012, I purchased my very first vehicle. After researching the best possible option for myself and my budget, I landed on a Nissan. I found the staff at Dave's Jackson Nissan to be friendly, accommodating, and very helpful. The salesman I worked with, Andy Nastally, was wonderful in assisting me with my choice without being overly pushy. He helped me through the process and made buying my first car a great experience. I highly recommend this dealership.
Fabulous. Fantastic fresh sushi and incredible saki....what more could you ask for? Service...excellent.
Michael and the team at Colorado Mortgage are fantastic! I have been selling real estate in the Denver metro area for 20 + years an I think they have some of the best service I have seen in all my years. They revived a deal that another lender couldn't get done for 6 months. If you want honesty, integrity and a team that delivers top notch service, I recommend giving them a call!
Excellent web marketing company in Perth. Maxpapa web marketing Agency have brought us on the front page of Google and therefore increase the amount of leads we are getting every week. Since we did not have a big budget to start, Max has provided a good package within our budget and provide us with ongoing SEO coaching, now the website is creating a great turnover and we have asked Maxpapa team to look after the entire web marketing for us. They are worth hiring..HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
Buena comida y un buen ambiente
None
Looking for the BEST tattoo artists....WELL you found your place! No need to search anymore! The studio is clean and relaxing. You are greeted by a tattoo artist that are skilled at their profession. Do you have ideas or just know what you want....they will help put together a piece of art that will BLOW YOUR MIND. I have done my searches on Google...but will go no further. I have 2 half sleeves and working on my back piece as we speak. This will be the best choice...these pieces of art stay with you for your life time...and I love it when people ask where i got it done. I am proud to say OTHERSIDE INK!
Brilliant coaching for all levels especially if you're new to cycling, nervous or apprehensive. Thank you very much for such a positive experience.
Love this place!
I really good selection of great food, a good atmosphere and great service my family and I will be definitely back to eat again.
Mark Davis and The whole staff at Aspen Dental provided us with wonderful service. Informative and professional at every turn. Everything you could want in a dental office.
All I know is DUNK CITY!!!!
While driving down to Manhattan from Boston, we randomly pulled off an exit in search of food for lunch. My friend who is familar with this route said unless there was a billboard stating there would be some place to eat, then we shouldnt pull off the expressway. I decided to test my luck and saw what looked like an old victorian house just off the exit. We walked in and were blown away by the place. From the waiter who treated us like we were royalty to the food that was fit for a 5 Star Resort. Everything we ordered was top notch and I'm sure this is the best kept secret just outside the city.
Kim is great with children. She took care of my daughter for over 2 1/2 years . Very caring .
Patrick was a stellar combination of professional and personable help. We walked away having purchased a fabulous vehicle for our family's needs. We went to a LOT of dealerships the day we were helped by Patrick, but, his service, information and willingness to get us what we needed and wanted was above and beyond what we encountered at other dealerships. We drove off very satisfied.
My wife and I go here alot. We love the Sushi and Sam, Diane and the crew are the best. For a special experience, sit at the Sushi bar, tell Sam what you like and let him surprise you. It's the finest, freshest and best presented Sushi around. ...finish with an Uni shooter.
As a first time guest, I was quite impressed with Dermatology PA. I got in and out, and felt that Dr. Ide completed a very thorough exam . He explained himself well, and I left feeling a lot more confident about my skin. This is a doctor who listens to you talk, and gives you time to explain your concerns. The receptionist was also very helpful. I couldn't have asked for a better experience. I will be going back!
None
High-end diner at low-end prices. If you're in a hurry you may be frustrated by the food prep time, but it's a nice setting with a varied menu. A short, easy drive from NJ Turnpike. It gets my 5 stars because it's unusually good for a highway-side diner.
None
Ordered wings as an appetizer. If your a fan of ranch you will LOVE their ranch. The wings were fresh and hot with a lot of flavor. Ordered the full rack of baby back, literally best ribs ever. Meat just fell off. Also ordered the Haystack Cheese Burger. Awesome. All in all a great experience. Great service, hot awesome food, good locale. You won't be disappointed.
Very professional service in Kenya Safari... Thank you very much Inside Africa Travels
I love this place. My sisters and I are regulars at this store for exchanging and buying. Yes I've heard back reviews about this place before (from my in-laws) but every experience I've had with them has been great. They actually tell you if your clothing or items are stained and have the option of washing them again at home and returning to exchange them later. I've done this twice now. Most stains will go away with a good wash or wipe down anyway. Every time I exchange something and go back the next day my items have already sold. I will continue to exchange my son's clothes and old toys and such with them.
Friendly staff and quick exam and cleaning. No B.S. here. In and then out!! Love it! All 3 of my children were seen and we were out of there within 30 minutes.
South Bay Wellness is an amazing, warm, welcoming center. They have the best holistic services on Long Island. I did Physical Therapy and MFR services there and since then I feel like a new person. My knee injury is healing so well. I also look to them for my holiday gifts for both Christmas and Valentines Day this year. They have some great all natural beauty products , the face serum is the best, leaves my skin so soft and smooth! Love this place. Alyson and Danielle the owners are such passionate, professional, and knowledgeable professionals. I would recommend South Bay to everyone in Suffolk County looking for help, or even just a relaxing spa day!
Café Lindvang has existed since 1940 and serves classic danish dishes. The massive Frikadeller dish brought tears of joy to my eyes and great pleasure for my taste buds. If you want classic danish food this is the place.
None
Very nice people and easy to deal with. They just expanded and double their space. It looks great.
None
None
Delicious food! No wait at 6pm on a Friday was a plus. Just the right amount of breading on scallops, filling in crab cakes and batter on shrimp tempura. Left feeling full and my mouth is watering just thinking about the spicey tartar sauce! Service was good. Table could have been wiped cleaner before we were seated.
Dr. Sadakah is the Best! and his staff is awesome all get five (5) Stars***** from me
Kaz is my favorite sushi restaurant in DC. I've been going there for years, and the quality is always consistently excellent. Some of my favorite special dishes include the scallop ceviche, soy braised sea bass, and the eel roll with pickled jalepenos. The classic sushi, such as the salmon, tuna, and eel nigiri, is also very good.
Cheryl does a great job with our dog Maggie and she always is happy when we get there to pick her up!
None
"Wow – this is the right way to do storage! Their people come to my house and handle everything for me. I have a typical tiny San Francisco condo so I used them to store some excess household items. There are very few self storage facilities in SOMA where I live and so I'm happy that I don't have to drive halfway across town to store.
Excelente atención! Lugar acogedor.
Habe noch nie zuvor eine Beratung bekommen, nach der ich mich so sicher gefühlt habe. 100% Verlass auf die Kompetenz der entsprechenden Kollegin (mit Humor) - wenn alle anderen Mitarbeiter - wie ich vermute - auch nur ähnlich gut sind kann man hier nichts falsch machen. Auf jeden Fall immer wieder gerne und nur zu empfehlen.
In the real estate business, insurance is essential. It is often a piece of the puzzle that clients leave until close to the end and Dexter has time and time again been my Hero. Dexter takes a different approach from other insurance agents I've worked with. Rather than just slapping together a standard quote and coverage, he gets to know the house, my clients and their goals. If ever I have a question about a home, if it will qualify or what the premium will be, I can just give him a quick call and he'll get me what I need. He has even driven out to homes on a field visit just to make sure it won't have any issues when the inspector comes by. Dexter is also very diligent in staying on top of his files. If I put him in touch with a client, I don't have to double check that they've been taken care of - it is a guarantee. I also work with many investors and a lot of the properties being sold today wouldn't work for a standard policy due to their condition. Dexter has an extensive network of policies and providers to find insurance for any property I've taken him.
I've known Tina for a while & I know her designs are lovely and her customer service is outstanding. Her shop serves the community in so many ways, and is always giving. I personally think that any flower shop that gives back & is an excellent florist should always be at the top of everyone's list as favorite florist!
Have visited duk now twice & both times the food,service & atmosphere where outstanding. Would highly recommended & look forward to visiting you again soon.
I have an RV that came equipped with a Kenwood in dash DVD, Nav, bluetooth, ipod, FM unit. It stopped working. The folks at Santa Fe auto sound, worked with me to obtain proof of purchase from the RV manufacturer for warranty purposes. They then took the unit out of the vehicle, sent it off to Kenwood for the warranty repair. When the unit was shipped back they promptly called me and had the unit back in and working great. They then took the time to show me some of the cool features on this unit that I would have never noticed. Very happy with the work and taking the time to help me solve my problem. Their charges for all of this work were very fair.
Great service! Highly recommended (Y) It was save my time and don't waste my money ! Got first client within a single day !
When I left New York City in 1989, I thought I was leaving the world's best pizza behind. Now, a few years later, I've got it in my own back yard! It's all in the name - Crust! The crust is thin, light, crispy and delicious from the center out to the edge. The toppings are fresh and taste that way. The dining room is great for the whole family (it is so nice to have a place to bring the kids and let them act like kids). Service is friendly and professional. This is how pizza should be - fresh and handmade. Try it once and you'll never go back to those big chains. I'll see you there for the Monday night special!
Dirt Doctors started cleaning for us when our twins were born and they have been fabulous about working around the baby's changing schedules. The staff are friendly and Erika has always responded professionally to concerns and questions.
I couldn't imagine having holes drilled through my teeth being any more pleasant than at Complete Dental. They always do a fantastic job at making me feel as comfortable as possible. Always a pleasure.
Absolutely the best pizza hands down and from what i've heard everything else on the menu is just as good. ..
Sagar Bandhu is a reliable Bhajan Singer from Lajpat Nagar, New Delhi, manifested with qualities, and self composing music.
Awesome Food. Think of The Bomber for your next caterer!!
Great
From the initial greeting, to the selection of service, every person and functioning part of this team was fantastic. If I lived in the Worcester area these would be my guys. I have visited many dealers and this one has set it self apart with the its friendliness and outstanding service.
None
Fierce.
Very fair prices! I passed both my theory and practical tests first time. Excellent tuition! Lessons were flexible around my studies and work commitments! I would recommend this driving school to anyone!
great. cant complain
The guys at IS are just plain amazing. Michael has worked with my family a couple of times now and his friendly personality surpasses "good customer service". When you work with this company you can tell you are working with people who genuinely care about what they are doing. They are passionate and knowledgable when it comes to the technical aspects of photography, but also care and understand a great deal about people. Having worked with many photographers on a professional as well as personal level, I have learned to recognize those that have a true artistic vision and those that just have a nice camera and photoshop skills. IS Photographic is the total package, no matter what your photography needs may be.
This is the way to travel. No more taxi's for me. highly recommended!!
I came in looking for two vehicles and had two for trade. Nick was able to get me into two used vehicles right around our desired payments. He was very thoughtful and helpful! We had a great buying experience.
My point of contact was Mr Osim Sheik (Pune). Extremely professional, well mannered and helping nature. He stood as a point person in ensuring that I face no hurdles in the process of renting a property he was in-charge of. Everything was taken care of in the utmost precision and due care. I'm extremely happy to have worked with him and in-process learned that HRR are a pioneer in Indian realty sector specially related to servicing the clients. I wish him and HRR all the very best.
Very professional and good customer support
Great location and a really stunning office. You'll feel comfortable and in good hands here!
I have used LBX for help with installing residential lighting and have been very happy with the service, product, and price. I actually first used LBX about 5 years ago and just went back in there recently as I needed some modifications to my lights. I walked in and did not expect the owner of LBX to remember me since so much time had passed. Not only did he remember my name, he remember the actual layout of my home and the lighting design that was installed. I was pretty impressed and a great example that LBX cares about each of its customers and will not forget you after the sale is closed.
My first time visiting this Hotel was for the Certified Praise Fest Featuring Vickie Winans. I really enjoyed myself there and would love to be able to shoot my music video there.
Spettacolo puro
Love this salon -- have been going here since 2006 and wouldn't dream of going anywhere else for salon services. Great service, reasonable prices, and a local business.
Windsor Hills is a great apartment complex for Blacksburg and is very affordable; I ended up living in a pretty good 2BR/1BA apartment for about 2 years. I equate Windsor Hills to be Foxridge without the parties, i.e. the apartment layouts are exactly like Foxridge, but the community is a LOT quieter since it's mostly grad students and young professionals. On top of this, the staff was amazing and I never had a problem with maintenance responding to my requests. All in all, this is a great place to live in Blacksburg at and affordable price.
Our local fish shop and the best in town by far!
I have been coming to this restaurant for years. There is no other Thai restaurant in this city, which even comes close to the authenticity of the food they serve. The Yam Nua is ridiculous!!! On Friday afternoons during buffet, you will be lucky to find a parking space, or a seat. The staff are very attentive, and the cooks don't mess around when it comes to heat. You want the real deal, eat here...you want "white people Thai"...go elsewhere. I guarantee you'll crave this place on a regular basis once you give it a try.
Everyone at Dan's Car Wash is friendly and knows exactly what they are doing. My car came back better than expected. They go above and beyond with service, and personaly go through the car with you at the end to make sure they met your expectations. I do not live close but I won't go anywhere else for car detail work!
The owner, and driver, of Vancity Towing answered my call (didn't get his name). My truck had broken down and I needed to get it to my mechanic. Prompt, professional and friendly service. Great price. Recommended.
My kids LOVE going to Cedar View Pediatric Dentistry. They love choosing the flavor of fluoride and watching movies that are on the ceiling. I wish there was a pediatric dentistry like this around when I was a kid.
Bn
My wife and I were in Pigeon Forge for our anniversary, and right before making it in to our hotel we broke down. They showed up pretty quick, specially considering the heavy traffic at the time. The driver was friendly the whole way back to the shop, and so were the people at the office. They helped the wait go by much faster, by talking and being friendly. Considering they had to drive 3 hours to find our replacement part on Saturday, the bill was even pretty reasonable, and they even have rental cars if you still need to get around while they fix you up. They were also strait forward and honest about what they were doing on our vehicle, and didn't try to get us parts/service we didn't need. If we ever have car trouble in Pigeon Forge again, we know where to go. I wish more shops were like this!
Great place with low prices
We love Chipotle.
Great customer service. Went here to open a storage unit for work yesterday, they were super friendly, and made sure to go over everything I needed to know. I had my dog with me, and they were not only ok with her being there (Service dog, but she didn't have her cred's with her) but were super sweet with her and let her check the unit out with me. I appreciated that a ton. Edwin (Manager) and Cathy were super informative, and I am glad I chose this location to store our things.
I have been going to see Dr, Roy Elturk for about a year after having an experience at another dentist office that left my husband and I rather fearful. I have not been disappointed with the change. His staff is very friendly and helpful. The office is very clean and the environment itself is very comfortable. My hygienist today Jessica was very friendly and gentle and the treatment coordinator Gayle is quite helpful. All the work that Roy has done in my mouth is beautiful and you really can't see that any has been done at all. The other side that was done elsewhere,this is not the case. They are also very good with children and are willing to go the extra mile to make sure your child is comfortable and will allow you in the room with them if they are at all fearful. Bottom line, I would recommend them to anyone who is looking for a good dentist or has had a negative experience elsewhere.
I took my BMW Z4 in for repair. I received great customer service. The work was done in a timely fashion and the price was reasonable. I will using them from now on.
One of my favorite places. The portions are generous and the food is delicious. The specials are also creative and quite tasty. On sunny days its nice to sit on the outside patio by the lake.
None
It was my first visit to Elden Family Dental seeing Doctor Meer today. As much as I have had problem with my teeth over years (ever since I was 15 ) I must say, that I am MUCH picky on my dentist. I just moved to Reston and sure was very nervous to see new dentist, but I found Dr. Meer exceptionally professional, kind and caring. He valued his patient, explained the problem, took his time way over the limit to care for my not so well teeth and gum. In my opinion Dr. Meer is a young professional dentist who kindly took time to take care of his patient well. I already have decided to take my daughter back to his office and recommended him to my family and friends. Thank you Dr. Meer ! Job WELL done !
If you like real Cajun food you have got to try this place. It is small but always clean. The friendliest staff and they do serve beer.
Fresh salsa made table side is awesome. Quality food at a reasonable price!
Nice pla
Best Vegetarian Hotel In Perumbavoor. Don't have words to say. Eat all you want and Enjoy.
Wonderful very professional work on 11-28-12. Also, truly great work on 1-29-13. Had wonderful work accomplished on 3-8-2013. Marvelous experience...Thank you so very much! Had Fine work done on 2-4-13. Super Experience. Appreciate so much the kindness of all the people of Creekside Dentistry.
FYI a reservation is required on weekends.
SO IF YOU WANT A NICE ATMOSPHERE GO TO DOS MACHOS. TORRES HAS THE BEST TASTING MEXACAN IN TOWN!!
We've been a happy customer for over 5 years now. We always get products on time and the team at Cartridges Direct has always been helpful. In particular, we appreciate the printer and cartridge recommendations we get from time to time. They've always pointed us in the right direction no matter what our requirements are and have helped us get cost-effective printing solutions. The only place I will ever buy printer cartridges from again. Good job guys, keep up the good work.
Love it. Have seen Kaskade and The Crystal Method perform live there. The staff is top notch and the music is always great. The best nightclub in Dallas period.
Rico :)
i am very impressed with A1 Heathrow Cars Professional and Nice Sevice !
I called Michael from another city needing a poster printed within hours of when I would be presenting it in Washington, and he personally delivered it to the conference center so that I didn't even have to pick it up on my arrival. I own him much more than he charged!
The most amazing customer service I've ever had! The guy actually came right out as soon as I pulled in and greeted me. Awesome stuff!
If like me you like films and not movies this is the place. There are always a good choice of the offbeat independent film from mid afternoon to late in the evening. And the Theater is walking distance (a few blocks) from some of the best live music venues in the city. If you are local or just in town for a visit go see a File at The Sunshine Cinema
Great food, reasonable prices, substantial amounts of food cooked just the way you like it. Nice family atmosphere. I can't think of a better place to run to regularly if you are a big fan of good Chinese food. John
Our Miele canister stopped working, of coarse at the worst possible time. We had family over and needed to get the house cleaned. With no appointment, i dropped by this store . I met the manager Alex, and he understood our situation and offered to loan us a vacuum while he fixed ours. That was very nice of him, fortunately we could wait til the next day. This is a great place to have in Ventura. Very small town feel with great service.
A very good and usually clean elementary school. The school will be better because it is currently being renovated. I think it will have good potential in the future for teachers and students.
Fresh, hand made, from scratch ice cream. Tasty Mexican foods.
On a street overrun with Italian-American restaurants, Lorca is refreshing addition to the Bedford St. scene. The coffee is of extremely high-quality and meticulously prepared with care. Order a sack of churros! They are made fresh to order – served crispy and hot. Need a place to chill and relax after work? This is it.
Dr. Beaber and his staff are adept at providing a relaxed atmosphere. They are all very friendly and perpetually happy. Dr. Beaber also has a military background which provided him with a wealth of experience treating patients with a variety of special needs. I highly recommend them!
When we came from Calif to Chicago, (I know people think I'm crazy) in Sept we needed help and we met with Kimberly Evetts. She was very professional, responsive and supportive. She ultimately found our current place and we are very happy with the results. Kimberly is wonderful to work with and I would utilize her service again should we change locations.
The staff was great and very friendly. I am very happy storing business merchandise at this location and I look forward to many years of working with them.
I recently purchased a new Toyota RAV4 from Pedersen Toyota in Fort Collins Colorado. I had taken my Corolla in for service and while waiting I couldn't but notice the new re-designed 2013 RAV4 vehicles. My current vehicle was leased and I had a few months remaining and really wasn't in the market for a new vehicle. Robert Langius one of the Sales and Leasing consultants was able to help me and offered to see if I could turn in my leased Corolla early and get into a new RAV4. Turns out that I was able to and I am the new proud owner of a beautiful RAV4. Robert was helpful and made the process really easy. I would recommend working with him and Pedersen Toyota to anyone looking for a hassle-free experience. Their dealership has been in business for over 42 years and is owned by the Pedersen Family. Colleen Fitzgerald - Jackson, Wyoming
None
Been a customer for 4 years - staff is knowledgable, caring, understanding and hard working! Their knowledge of foreign and domestic vehicles is superb and recommend them to everyone. Special thanks to Ken, Carl, Bob, Mike, and Maurice! If you need your vehicle serviced look nowhere else!
Food is fantastic and is HUGE! I can almost never finish the gigantic burritos and salads, but are always good for lunch or dinner the next day. The chips are made to order and are the best I've ever had and the guacamole and cheese dip are top-notch! The staff is usually busy, but are always prompt and courteous and get your food out to you quickly. I can't think of a better place to go for Mexican Cuisine and usually go more than once a week!
Awesome!! If we want pizza we will drive the distance for their pizza and house salad with feta cheese. Never had a bad experience nor do we think it is over priced. Love it.
I've eaten here several times for lunch. The taste and presentation is fantastic. Always a pleasurable experience.
None
Gandhi samadhi photo Pradeep Tekankar
Best Chinese food I have had yet in Ann Arbor. Pleasant food, service, and location.
I have been a patient for only about 3 months but after seeing the great work Dr. Vadecha did on my little brother and sister and some family friends, I knew this is where I wanted to get my braces. The staff are very friendly and courteous. They have exceeded all of my expectations! Thanks to everyone at Lakewood Orthodontics for excellent service. Keep it up!
Pretty, pretty cool, man!
I love Green Ride! The staff is helpful. The drivers are professional and friendly. I feel safe traveling with them. I also love that they give me additional options to support green efforts when I purchase my ride. Thanks for being great stewards!
Test
The best slash mango drink
None
None
I live near by and let me tell u its the best specially on this hot summer days Jamba juice its Wats best. ...
A lot of Students of Dawood College of Engineering and Technology and NED university lived here 33 years ago.
Always friendly staff and great service.
Best fish and chips ever!!
Dont spend any Money in the BIG BOX stores. Show your independents !!!! Service is great. shot cliinic is Excellent!!! SUPPORT THIS LOCAL Business !!!
Good Place & Food !
man you're a grumpy dude last reviewer.. get over it, to some people the extra options are helpful(i.e. "actually I really do want some water.." I have been to this location several times and the service has always been superb. don't listen to grumpy face.
Recommended for all Hindus to visit this place at least once in life. It is also true that not every one gets this opportunity.
Sehr netter Service, schnell und zügig, gute Küche!
Jared Pela kept an eye out for a vehicle I was looking for, and once he let me know, he made the transaction as smooth as possible. He was very professional and genuinely concerned about my needs. Thanks to Brian Boyd for being friendly and creative in finding ways for me to finance! I'd say they make a really good team. The car business is a tough business, but they made it look easy by being so knowledgeable. Thanks, Guys.
Really good chefs, waitresses ,food and surroundings in nicest alp town
None
Thorough and quick service. Friendly demeanor. Very satisfied. Neat waiting area.
I have been a client of Beverly Hills Dr. TATTOFF for over a year. The staff is always very friendly and professional. They are great at accommodating me with appointments and are always on time. I have a stubborn tattoo that is being removed, but the process is going well.
I hired Mr. Handyman of Lincoln Park to install and repair merchandising fixtures on multiple occasions. Their service was fast and the repairs/installs were always completed on time. I would use them again for any future projects in the area.
None
Mr. Damon Shorterage and the Germain Mazda staff were kind, intelligent, and honest with their approach. They provided me information to help me make my decision and they did not "over sell" the sale. I felt I was provided an excellent car at a great price and I am very happy with the decision I made. The Germain Mazda staff assured me that I would be taken care of, in a very fair way, should anything happen within the realm of the warranty and explained what those situations might look like. They answered my questions honestly and thoroughly. I highly recommend the Germain dealerships and particularly recommend Germain Mazda. I look forward to our continued relationship and am now a proud driver of a Mazda6 from Germain Mazda in Columbus, OH.
None
Sharif M. and his apprentice installed a new hot water tank this evening. They where very polite and professional. He also answered all my questions and took care of a few minor problems I had. If I ever have a plumbing problem I would not hesitate to call him again. Job well done and thankyou
I personally have known Mr. Knight for many years. I am writing to say if you want an attorney that is honest and will treat you right, go Knight. Mr Knight will give you A+ quality service everytime.
None
We recently took our Honda van to O'Brien for a factory recall. We were able to get our van in within one day of calling. The service was done within the hour. They are always reliable and the service is done quickly. They do a fantastic job there!
I have been with Ferman for 6 years and on my second car all for one reason...Dennis Daley
Parts department was so fast on getting me a part for my truck. I called mid morning and part was ready for pickup at noon
The Best of the best
Grand!!!!!!
Paris is a true professional, I recently had some work on a 3/4 sleeve done before I moved across the country to LA. It was my second visit to him and I would not go anywhere else in Charlotte. He has such a talent. He did freehand work on my side and on my sleeve. I promised him that I would not let anyone else out here finish what he has started. I will be flying back around the holidays to get the sleeve finished up. That is the level of respect I have for his artwork and skill. Do yourself a favor and if you want the best tattoo artist in town go check him out. Side note: I have been tattooed by artist all across the state of NC and various parts of the country and have never been more pleased with a tattoo.
I stopped in after a "hard" day in the heat. The iced late' was to die for. The waitress, Katelyn was pleasant, attentive, and efficient. Made an out of town visitor feel welcome and important. On a subsequent visit, while Katelyn wasn't there, those who were followed suit. It is the must visit coffee house in New Braunfels. They have made a regular out of me. See you there!
Very clean. Great breakfast. Awesome value.
This map point is not correct.
Hands down best coffee in town. Having been a coffee roaster I can appreciate what they do. I am quite discerning in my cup o' joe and these guys do it justice. Dig it.
None
I purchased my first car with Bankston Ford just recently. I am very happy with the purchase and every one I dealt with along the way. The staff is very helpful in all aspects of the word.! Thank you Bankston Ford!
Uma das poucas igrejas adventistas com endereço no maps... se vc sabe de outras, me avise.
Best little school I have ever seen.
None
It was great food n service
Cody's Appliance Repair had excellent service and provided quality work. We always appreciate when people are on time too! Thank you for all of your help when we were in need of assistance quickly.
New owners and everything's good again. Good food, reasonable prices and friendly. Keep it up!
Best car buying experience ever!!! Eddie Daye made purchasing my new 2013 300S an absolute joy! I told Eddie what I was looking for and the price I was hoping to get and he made it happen. I was driving an hour (from Mooresville) to purchase the vehicle so Eddie had all of my paperwork ready before I arrived and I was in and out of the Dealership in record time. I would recommend Eddie Daye and North Point to anyone in the market for a car and I will absolutely use them for my next car purchase.
Why aren't ALL doctors like this guy? Like the other reviewer, I have no insurance but to make matters worse, I have no job. Just a small pension. I put off going to a doctor for six months after some kind of object got embedded in my eye causing blurred vision. "No money, Too expensive" was my excuse. I finally broke down and went. In the chair in 10 minutes, 10 minutes later the object had been removed and I'm out a lousy $170. They had to repeat that to me a couple of times. I fired a cardiologist because he charged me $560 for 30 seconds of his time. This guy was poking around in my eye for five minutes and only charged me $170. I almost can't wait for something else to fly into my eye so I can go back and see this guy and NOT get ripped off. You got a vision problem and don't go see these guys, you are nuts.
Kirby Hoskinson is the best sales person ever. He always gives you what you're looking for and has the best attitude. We have been shopping with Valmark since 2011 and bought 4 vehicles from them.
Fratelli Restaurant Sorrento Perth for lunch and had a warm frozen chicken. It was one of the best chicken flavors I have ever had. The Green Tea was excellent and the service was great too. What makes this small corner of West Coast Drive Sorrento, Perth so great, the staff.
Amei... Jardim incrível, atendimento maravilhoso... a localização é ótima, nao precisa de carro, fica 2 quadras da Brodway e da praia... o café da manhã é incrível. .. servido na varanda do quarto e podiamos repetir a vontade... tinha até repelente no quarto... Certamente é um lugar para ficar na memória!
we were going to visit our married son in Durango colorado last summer and thought we would surprise him while we were there with a box of Polish goodies from Piast. We had it sent and it was GREAT. We all enjoyed it a lot.! Lorraine Grochowski Kiefer
None
Babs should rename her business BA.B.E Photography. As in Badass Babs Evangelista! Babs is a great choice for your wedding or portrait photographer. She should be charging more than she does. My wife and I would still be happy even if we had paid double. Babs and her crew were easy to work with. They got along with all our wedding guests and brushed aside the crazy ones without breaking a sweat. We have so many great wedding pictures it's hard to choose which ones to put in the album! Thanks, Babs!
I had my heating and a/c units replaced by CP heating & AC. It's a small company, you deal directly with the owner Doug. I found him very responsive. The work was done promptly and all my concerns satisfied. He is cost conscious and does not gold plate his bids. I would use him again for any future HVAC work I might need.
Stayed in one of the cabins. Very clean and comfy!
Awesome restaurant. Very cool little features such as the rising guitar too.
Kwiatkowski Plumbing has done a number of jobs for myself and my office .I have always been very pleased with the workmanship and quick response.
Incredibly helpful
vlnyyyy
I come from NY & Everytime I come to Nashville, I stop at This place.Nicole
The House of Blues just started using Fastsigns about a year ago. They have created signs and logos for us that include our trademark burning heart symbol to signs for our marquee for Carlos Santana. They have always met the time line needed for each project and take a job on for us as if they own it. The staff is knowledgable in all facets of advertisment and sign making. Miriam has been a great help with all of the pieces we have purchased. The only bad thing is that I didnt start using Fastsigns/75 a long time ago. I recommend that you take your next project, be it big or small to them and you will see what they can do.
None
We are glad we found you - by luck! - because NOW we have mechanics here we trust! (We're pretty new to STL). Thanks so much for your wonderful service and explaining what was needed. We will be back! We had a bad experience with another place (hint: it rhymes with robb's) and didn't know who we could trust... I'm from a small town, so I am used to knowing people who will fix stuff or help me, and knowing who I can trust to do good work... I was scared that being here, in the city, I wouldn't find that kind of place or people again. But my husband and I found you, and now we aren't worried about that any more. Anytime someone tells me that they are having car problems, need an inspection, or want to get a car checked out before buying, I'm going to tell them about Henry's!
None
Love the service not sure about the old management but my appointment is always on time. Jane is sooooo professional and patient. Love you guys and gals.
First time visitor went in for a recall part on my Liberty with 200k miles and they found a lot of work needed done. Ended up getting a new Compass for less money than fixing my Liberty as far as first year payments. Very nice staff and very clean facility. Thanks Chapman!
None
None
Work always finished on time. No surprises. If problems detected, I am advised as to the urgency and cost. Charges reasonable. Go Monica Street!
Honest, dependable, courteous, knowledgable! We've been taking our cars to Redwine for a long time and have always been pleased with their service. Without a doubt, they are the best auto mechanics in the Memphis area!
None
Very professional, knowledgeable service. Her consultations consider all possible options. If going to a dentist can be a positive experience, this is it! Plus, I never have had to wait and the office staff are incredibly organized and friendly.
The best place...
Excellent job help me get my car to pass emissions...
top best very goods company packers and movers Delhi
Michael runs a tight ship. They were competitively priced and his crew were on-time, communicated well and were respectful and courteous. Highly recommended.
Karl McWilton is highly professional with a genuine interest for our needs. He helped us to find exactly what we were looking for, and we could not be happier with our new home. Karl answered all of our questions right away with the highest degree of patience and always a personal sincerity. It is with delight that I give him my highest recommendation.
Dr. Adi did my fillings, did not feel the shot, pain free, looks and feels great. He is awesome! will diffidently recommend to family & friends .
I recently went to Rick Hendrick Chevrolet in Buford, GA and I was really pleased with the service. The staff was knowledgeable and answered all of my questions and were extremely patient. I was originally contacted by Andre Henry. I was already considering getting rid of my car and was searching for a great used car that was affordable. He was very personable and I could tell that we was not just trying to take my money. Overall I've had a great experience with them thus far and I'm looking forward to finding my next dream car!
None
Mike and I have been coming to this bar since we moved just north of downtown Osseo in 1997. It's friendly, open, entertaining plus the wait staff is tops. The food is very good and the burgers are outstanding. Stop by on the weekend for breakfast and have a bloody marry which we think is one of the best in town. I can hardly wait for St. Patrick's day every year because their corn beef and cabbage menu item is out of this world! Down home folk that own the place who know how to have a good time and are involved with the community. So pop on by and check the place out and see for yourself.
Bryan was great. He was friendly, helpful, and did an excellent job quickly and efficiently (minor plumbing issue). I would absolutely recommend this service to anyone! A day later, Dustin came out to fix a couple of electrical issues. Again, prompt and friendly service right from the beginning. He did a great job. The prices are amazing, and they really try to get everything done as quickly as possible to save the client as much money as possible. Absolutely will be using these guys for all of my home repair needs!! Tammy
This is a great comedy club, wonderful headliners as well as the local guys and gals opening! So funny, you can laugh your head off, then eat some great food. It's always a treat to visit the Skull!
I have only good words for Reyes Financial Architecture. They are truly dependable people. I let them become part of my business by letting them do the tax filing for me. No hassle on my part and work is done efficiently even if sometimes it's on the eleventh hour. This company has never fail me. A million thanks really!
No questions asked best experience I've had. So clean and all the staff is very friendly and welcoming.
doktorlar yardımcı ve kaliteli
fahrt bloß hin da aber zackisch #totaufmland
Truly great beer and great service:)
Mike and his guys have been working on our cars for almost 10 years. He has always given us great service and we love the free loaner car program. I just bought a new car and brought it in for a new vehicle inspection which gave me great peace of mind. He's just sad that my new car is so awesome that he won't be getting as much of my business. I would happily recommend Integrity Auto Repair to any of my friends and I will only have my new Subaru serviced by Mike and Brian and the Integrity Auto team. My kids love the free beverages and snacks in the waiting room too! Always a fair price too. -Alexa Hackett
Jeanette’s has an amazing selection of gowns and accessories. The stylists are knowledgeable and so courteous. Weddings are a stress filled time, so it was a pleasure to work with people that understand and do their very best to relieve some of that anxiety and stress. i shopped Jeanette’s on a referral from a friend, while i was visiting family in Virginia, after telling her my horror stories when shopping at home and not finding anything suitable. It was the best dress shopping i have ever done! Thank you ladies!!!
None
Love it! Good quality affordable homemade Italian food very fresh! Check out lunch specials!
great work on nails they take ease in doing your nails and eye brows
I just had a great time, class was very informative and had fun learning. It's a little nerve racking handling a firearm but this group of instructors really put you at ease and geniunely care that you leave there with a better understanding and a better sense on how to handle a firearm. I would recommend this class highly. I was so excited when I left I forgot to say Thank you to the instructors so Thank you!!
My husband and I are regulars or have been for the past few months after finding Ichiban. Since they have a little bit of everything, we both enjoy the General Tso's chicken, sushi & sushimi and I'm "gaga" over the Crab rangoon. I can't wait for my next trip back.
3!
I highly recommend this gym to everyone.I am so happy my friend recommended them to me.
Where the best team in the land and all the world play. No diving or cheating, if you are into that follow the signs to Stretford.
kool place
Amazing. Looking for fresh and delicious churrasco or baby back ribs, this is the place to go. I highly recommend it. Great location and the service was really special. God job guys! See you soon. I will be back ;-)
I love Dr. Heather Fox. She is a very capable, and concerned practitioner who is always looking out for your best interest. She does all her own work, including hygiene, and is always available for an emergency. With the most delicate touch in town, you won't even feel a pinch. Highly recommended.
Joey and everyone at All Dry are fabulous! It is comforting to know that whenever any of my insurance customers have a water and/or fire emergency, All Dry's crew will be there instantly to help clean up the mess and, most importantly, help calm the homeowner. "When it's all wet, we call All Dry"!
Dry Canyon Forge had a booth at Winterfest in Bend, and my son Vito (10yrs) got the chance to make a hook in the 4pm workshop with Hunter. It was awesome. Not just that in a little over a half hour Hunter walked Vito and another kid through the process, and he got to walk away giddy with the delight of creating something from steel and fire; but the way he worked with them, his patience, focus and the pure quality of his teaching made it a joy to watch - and this from his Mom- who has been teaching art for 25 years! She watched with me and was truly impressed, and this from a tough critic. I'm a Builder, and find their work beautifully crafted and thoughtful. These guys are great.
My family and I stayed the night on Saturday, Feb 23rd and everything was great. We intended on checking out the next morning and skiing Burke before heading to Jay Peak for the week however when we woke up our 6yr old was sick and was not getting out of bed. Thankfully the extended our checkout time so that she could stay in bed and rest while I took my other daughter to ski for the day as we had pre-purchased our tickets. This place is great and we will be back!
Nice
Helpful service and ended up getting a mattress I love. Thank you.
Pizza is wonderful! Price is awesome! Much better quality than (Pizza! Pizza!)! Staff is always friendly and most times I get my pizza within 10 min of ordering!
Antelope Tennis. Great facility for the community! Seven courts.
I switched over to Dr. T a couple of years ago and he is awesome. They are great about calling to make sure you get the appointments you need and usually have lots of different time options. The staff is great too. They are all very friendly and make a point to get to know you, going beyond the normal caregiver. I would definitely recommend them.
None
My wife and I stayed here the first time this summer and found it to be a very nice motel. The room was clean, large and had a great view out our second story window of the wheat plains and mountains. Everything about our stay was great and we will plan on staying here again when traveling through Montana.
Good "every day" Mexican food. Salsa is very good. Ask for all their salsas.
Awesome friendly honest service
Sandra is great to work with. She was very courteous and answered all my questions. The storage units looked new and the whole place was clean. I will be using this Public Storage when I do my move in January. Thanks for all your help Chip
this hotel is convenient and reasonable. We stayed before a cruise and got free parking while on the cruise, a huge saving, plus transport to and from he pier. Nice expanded breakfast, and great customer service.
i just finish ABC bartending... i have learn alot i didnt even know about liquior and bartending. i thought u just had to put the drinks together and thats it... but i learn background about liquior.. im hapy i went here
Excellent museum in St. Petersburg. Besides the great paintings, the architecture of the building, the unique landscaping and the unique spiral staircase make this a place everyone should go!
I have had a good experience with All Seasons, and someone has always been there when I needed them. I feel my things are safe and well protected enough. Storage in general is great for decluttering the home, and the price is not too burdensome for how much can fit in a small unit.
None
I'm a big fan of this place. Their Pretzels are wonderful and freshly made. The Drink menu at this particular Mellow Mushroom is great, and the pizza is fantastic. I can't wait for the next outing here to be quite honest. I would highly recommend it!
Dean Riggott worked as a photographer at Agri News and Successful Business newspapers that I edited at the Post-Bulletin Company. Dean started as a freelance photographer, then became our staff photographer for the two business newspapers and then later joined the company's daily staff at the Rochester Post-Bulletin. He eventually published numerous photo books and started his own photography business. Dean has the eye of a photographer. Dean is an outstanding photographer and has my highest recommendation.
My favorite restaurant in town.amazing food
So unpretensious looking. Doesnt look like much on the outside. The place has been there forever. There is a reason for that, old school donuts that are just great.
My experience at the Apple store was amazing! I was there for the launch of the Iphone 5 and they're so many people there. It was madness but the employees there kept it professional and they took care of me even when I was having problems with Sprint. They also explained to me all the details of the iphone 5 and the customer service was amazing!!!! Such a beautiful store design and its defiantly one of my favorite stores in NYC.
Really nice people. Just been to buy some bits and bobs plus a small quad copter. They couldn't have been more helpful and accommodating. Will definitely pay them another visit next time that I am in town.
They supplied the best lunches to us for our semi-annual staff meeting this week. The food was phenomenal! Fresh, fresh, fresh! Excellent service with setup and cleanup, too.
None
None
Seriously, who cries over a dog's hair cut? It might be time to get a hobby or two. I have taken my Shih Tzu there since the store opened and have never been disappointed. They always get us in, even when I call last minute, and she always looks adorable when I pick her up.
We've had our sub zero fridge for several years now and it worked as planned but last week the freezer was just no getting cold enough anymore. And I noticed a break in the sealant tray. Made an appointment for these guys to come out. It did take a couple of hours but they got us fixed up properly. These sub z's can get expensive but wasn't too expensive.
I like very mutch spicy broast
None
Oh my....Where do I begin! First off, I thank God for directing me to Dogdeland! Mr. Randall Stansell was by far, the best salesperson I've dealt with up to date! The professionalism, courtesy and friendliness were well beyond the standard! And as a U.S. military Soldier that I am, the respect was even greater; but I'm sure Mr. Stansell treats all his cutomers that way! It was too easy and quick dealing with Dodgeland. I went there, told him (Mr. Stansell) what I was looking for, and the first words from him was "Which color do you want?" Lol. And now I have "Polar Bear!" (2013 Bright-White Dodge Durango); that's what I named the vehicle. ;-). Thank you so much, Dodgeland and Mr. Stansell for your help on finding and getting a new vehicle to suit not only me, but my family as well. God Bless, less stress!
Love this place!!!
Really great Fish and Chips! On Sundays the restaurant is open until 17:00 and the take away is open until 18:00.
Great variety of authentic italian pizzas!! Delicious!
I've leased 3 cars from Sterling Honda, in 2008. 2012, and 2013. In both 2012 and 2013, Parry Lively helped me - both times, he was wonderful, but in 2013, he was a godsend. I was rear-ended last month on the Gardiner, totaling my 2012 Civic (that car saved my life). I called Parry a few days later, and he was extraordinarily helpful in getting me back into a car. Here are just a few of the many things Parry did for me: he picked me up at home and drove me to Sterling on two occasions; he explained in detail all of the upgrades from the 2012 to 2013 model, including the (now very important to me!) safety upgrades; he worked hard to get me what I believe is an excellent deal on the new car; he expedited matters by speaking with my insurance company and getting my car released to me as quickly as possible; and he has offered continued help with any questions I have about the car and its systems. In short, Parry was kind, helpful, and did more than anyone could have expected to transition me to my new car. I absolutely recommend Sterling Honda (which has been good to me over the past 5 years), and Parry in particular, if you're on the market for a Honda.
None
Love this place!!
Book arrived within the 3 days as promised! Great service.
None
Best in hertford. Must
We love it! Great Wings.
Going to see The Spokane Youth Symphony is an opportunity to see the very best that our local youth have to offer. Ticket prices are a bargain and the music is top notch. If you have a young person who plays an instrument this is a wonderful way for them to grow and learn and get an experience that is not available in any local schools that I know of.
This is the best place for wings. Great atmosphere and great service
A very beautiful hotel that I've ever since here in london.I'm addict of staying in the hotels cause this the way i comfort myself.I highly recommend this hotel.The services was good.Facilities are thumbs up! The quality of this hotel is awesome.
None
Hand and Stone is a great spa - they are very fairly priced and they have great customer service, which goes a long way to me! The first time I went, my masseuse was running a little late (only about 10 minutes) and the manager immediately upgraded me to have aroma therapy during my session for free. I love when places aren't afraid to throw a little something extra to ensure your experience is wonderful. Great place to go for a massage!
The best martial arts school...hands down! They offer a variety of programs for kids and adults. The instructors are experienced, knowledgeable and great at relating to students. My oldest son has been attending classes at Denda Academy for 6 years and his confidence in himself and his athletic ability continue to grow. We also have 2 other children attending and they love it! Master Dutson/Denda Academy is the cream of the crop in regards to martial arts schools!
None
Exelent
Awesome value and service. Had the combination fajitas and was able to get three tasty tacos for under 10 bucks. Wife had the guiso which was flavorful and tender. Great choice for lunch.
Very friendly and helpful people, vibrant colors on always fresh flowers. Price is phenomenal.
None
I went here from pre school to 8th grade and it was great
None
I loved my experience here. It was completely relaxing. After when I had questions, the technician answered all of them with great knowledge and helped me find the right moisturizer for my skin. I can't wait to go back!
Ковка в Киеве для Мебельмикс- это не только орегинально, красиво и дешево, но и как в моем случае полезно. Моя жена обажает кованные изделия, у меня с ней был серьезный конфликт и его помог разрешить Торшериз этого салона, который был сделан для меня под заказ. Все было выполнено на высшем уровне. Списибо, ребят!!!
I love this church. They make me feel welcome and have a great kids program. Their pastors take turns teaching. There 's no all powerful pastor telling you to follow him.
I regularly go to this Kwik Kar for all my repairs and service. The staff is friendly and fast. The cost is about the same as other repair centers, bu the customer service and speed are far better. I started going to Kwik Kar for only oil changes and inspections, but over the past 3 years they have done several repairs for me and I have been happy with all of them.
Very thorough in his work, quick, and competitively priced. We had a small mishap due to one of our kids touching the concrete and he was very good to call us back same day walk us through what to do. I definitely recommend them. Thanks curb man!
Great beer, but the food is way over priced.
Great place for lunch or dinner. Can't get enough of it!
I had the pleasure of tasting a friend's birthday cake made by Karen, and it was the best ever. It was light and fluffy, not too sweet, and was an incredible work of art. It seemed a shame to have to cut it. A feast for the eyes as well as the palate. Now I know where to go when I need a cake.
None
I love this place they do a full service job and in a timely manner for a decent price.
Its fucken good....
None
I watch "Dog The Bounty Hunter" show all the time. The Chapman family is great!! Baby Lyssa definitely rocks my world!! Sincerely speaking of course. I love you all!
I was confused about the star ratings when people were writing great reviews, then I saw that it must have been an eror! Thank goodness because I love this place! :)
The beer is hands down some if the best I've ever had. The food is beyond comfort, a really chill place to hang.
To echo what one reviewer already stated - - this place is truly one of Ottawa's hidden treasures. Exceptional food and beverages at more than reasonable prices. Love the atmosphere as well. Staff were efficient and really friendly. An easy 5 stars for me.
The barista told me about the Google Places going inside the establishment back in April, so it was good to finally see this come to life. the coffee here is incredible my espresso is amazing the artwork is great and I would definitely visit this place again. As a native, the pieces here is all very authentic and this place makes a great art gallery for artwork that came from my tribe.
I just bought my 20120 GTI Autobahn from Amir Dizdarevic. My parents also just bought a 2013 Eos as well and they love the car! My experience at Jennings with Amir was incredible, they really know how to treat their customers. Listen, they have free coffee! Amir did an amazing job of walking me through all the features of the car and explaining why the car was a IIHS Top Safety pick. VW's are amazing cars though and the test drive is what sold me. I didn't even need a sales person to sell me a car but the entire experience was complimented perfectly by Amir and his unbelievable passion for Volkswagen automobiles!
I'd just like to say a big thanks to the team at Crate Hire, I've used them before for photography shoots when I transport my equipment on location. They drop the crates off at your location and then pick up when your done nice and easy, thanks guys. Wayne.
This was the most wonderful experience I could've had selling my car. I have had that car for 5 1/2 years; it was my first car. I would not have been comfortable parting with her to anyone who was less kind, HONEST, understanding, and approachable. Peter made the whole process enjoyable and gave the other car salvage people I've dealt with a serious run for their money; not only was I offered more money here and a year later than I asked previously, for an 11 year old car, but I was only told one price and explained why that price was what it was. He was straightforward, and truly the only person I would ever recommend bringing your used car to. Thanks Peter. :)
Heute morgen (Samstag) wollte ich um 08:15 nur eine neue Autobatterie kaufen und selber einbauen. Zum Preis von 94,00 Euro habe ich die Batterie inkl. fachmännischen Einbau bekommen. Unangemeldet und mal eben zwischendurch. Nach 30 Minuten war ich wieder draußen und meine Hände waren nicht schmutzig weil ich die Batterie nicht selber einbauen musste. Sehr netter und hilfsbereiter Service. Ein echter FOH.
I have always had good experiences with Allen Edwin Homes. Great attention to the details of my client's needs. Communication with my clients and me is always good. Allen Edwin Homes is always a pleasure for me to work with and the main thing is that I always have happy clients!
I have trained at a variety of Brazilian jiu-jitsu academies over the last twelve years, and Gracie Barra Springfield compares favorably to them all. The head instructor, Marcos, is not only a great teacher, but is also kind, generous, and passionate about what he does. This school is as well-suited to the serious practitioner who wants to train, hard, every day as it is to the hobbyist who is just looking to keep fit in a fun, friendly environment.
Great shop to get some custom work. If you can think of it Turk can draw it and, more importantly, tattoo it. This guy is the tattoo getters tattoo artist. He knows how to make the experience a great one and walk out with some killer art. He know getting a tattoo is not the most comfy of experiences, so he gets some quality done in a timely manner. I came to him with a concept and he came up with a few drawings. We hybrided 2 together went from there. I even had him change a few things to get it perfect. He was more than willing to accommodate and make it truly a one of a kind piece of art on my canvas (me). Did the tattoo exactly as I wanted it. Could not be happier!
I have been going to Kelley for approximately 12 years. She is amazing and does an awesome job with nails, hair, eyebrows anything you need. She is very personable and her new salon is very professional but relaxed and a great place to spend an hour or so getting pampered. I have referred quite a few people to her over the years and they all have been quite pleased. I highly recommend her or any of her colleagues. Keep up the great work!!!! Also, I see nothing wrong with taking coffee somewhere they are providing you with a service. It's like an extra tip for a job well done.
Love this store only place I will go for gaming stufc
Sexy Eddie is the best, he hooked me up with the best price on my tinted windows, and i am glad i came to pasadena sound!!!!!! their the best i suggest you guys all come down and get hooked up :)
My 11-year-old daughter and I went Friday night and we both thought the hamburgers were terrific - not too big, not too small, just the right size. They were hand-shaped - in our lingo "homemade" and tasted like a real grilled hamburger you'd enjoy at a really nice barbeque. Very good meat, not greasy at all. We sat at the counter and enjoyed the milk shake samples passed to us by a friendly employee. In fact, all the staff was great to us. We are going back tonight.
My husband and i have been eating regularly at the Post Deng Cafe since it was the Post Mao Cafe a little further up the street. It's a truly wonderful place, and the food is glorious. In particular, the shredded fillet steak, crossback lamb ribs, and triple-cooked pork hock have me writhing in my seat with pleasure every time we order one of them for dinner. (Can't have more than one of the three on the table without a large group, though, it's a LOT of food.) If you just look at the surface, they don't look very professional, but they clearly care about what they're doing, and go out of their way to make you feel comfortable, much more towards friendly than formal. It's truly the only place i've ever been able to truly relax while eating out. They've taken excellent care of us every time we've been there, and we'll be regulars there as long as they exist, hopefully for many delicious years to come.
Great fries. Great ice cream. Taylor Freeze is Americana in its truest form.
Best sushi in town!
None
Kind people, excellent quality produce. I will surely go back!
None
Been here a few times and seen the food improve quite a lot ..it's great food and great service plus a tasty breakfast menu
My stay at La Sacrista was the icing on the cake of my trip to Spain. Not only were last minute reservations available, but the room was reasonably priced for its location; in easy walking distance to the beach, bus station and the ferry. The staff were very accommodating; even the owners of the La Sacristia were more than happy to assist us with our travel needs. Everyone was very friendly and helpful; they helped arrange our tour to Morocco, provided us with our dining needs or recommendations to local restaurants. I was absolutely blown away when on my day of departure, the front desk was momentarily unmanned and one of the owners - seeming like another guest, sitting at a table in the sunshine enjoying his cappuccino and the paper - simply rose from his seat to call me a cab. He was oh so helpful, wonderfully friendly, and I had no idea until well into the conversation he was one of the three who had invested his past, present and future into the success of the hotel; and a Mid-Atlantic US original!! I enjoyed our conversation up until the moment our cab arrived, and I certainly recommend Posada La Sacristia to any future traveler.
Overall absolutely amazing.especially loved the heated pool :)
The pancakes are absolutely amazing, topped with vanilla ice cream, they were my wife's favorite. The Loco Moco is pretty fantastic. The portions were huge, you cannot leave there hungry unless you are ridiculously finicky. My wife and I had our honeymoon on the North Shore, Papa Ole's made our memories a little more fun.
Excellent service – Fred Thornton is excellent and all the rest of their crew. He replaces my defected part without any question. Love their service.
pycha
I have had many family members' cars repaired by this location of Dykstra's Auto numerous times, and each time has been just as great as the last. The staff is courteous and helpful beyond expectations. Their prices are fair and they really go the extra mile to make sure you're satisfied. The work has been great as well, and they seem to be very thorough. It's also worth noting that many of my co-workers frequently have their vehicles repaired by the same location and have nothing but great things to say as well.
Looking for an Electrician in Rowlett, I had contacted several Electrical Contractors for quotes. Some of them never even got back to me. Troy at Affiliated Electric gave me the most reasonable pricing and same day service. I highly recommend them to anyone who is looking to get some electrical work done.
After some time trying to figure out how to pull a water tube thru a water dispenser hole on a newer fridge I was fixing, I stopped over at Robbinsdale Ace to ask the staff for a suggestion. The manager was most helpful matching up the tube diameter and a long screw. Using the $0.15 screw as a lever, I was able to pull the factory water tube into the required position. Thank you!
None
Fantastic new menu Trio of porks a must have! More than worth the price on the menu. I highly recomend this restraunt
I was looking for a dentist in Sarasota fro an emergency and found Dr. Gilleland's office information on the internet. I knew he was good as soon as I called and the staff answer the phone and help me. What a great experience! I love the doctor and their staff. Always very attentive and making sure I was in no pain or discomfort at all. Dr. Gilleland is a great dentist. I recommend his office to anyone.
This is the only hot and sour soup that makes my wife happy so you bet it gets 5 stars. I have loved everything I have tried on the menu.
Recently went in to get a used car with low income (which proves difficult for obvious reasons) and these guys were able to get me financed on an 08 Sentra. Rob Plume and John Hayes were both a lot of help: they were very kind, prompt, and took the time to show me around the lot and help me to feel comfortable. Love my car! Thanks, guys!
I had bright pink streaks put into my hair here and I've never gotten so many compliments on my hair before! I'll be back there for sure in the future!!
We enjoyed a wonderful anniversary weekend at Slice o Paradise. The cabin was immaculate, the accommodations exactly as represented. Just wish we could have stayed longer. Will definitely revisit!
Favorite home town restaurant
Mark Bullerman and the rest of the folks at Anderson Ford North made the purchase of our 2011 Ford Escape effortless! Mark answered all our questions and made sure our experience was trouble free. Thanks Mark! We'll be back!!!
I visited Peter Marcus for a cut and blow wave, my hair is long and needed tidying up. The employees were all very friendly and attentive. The cut was stylish and tidy, and the blow wave made my hair look luscious and shiny. I left the salon feeling beautiful and refreshed. I would highly recomend Peter Marcus.
Todd has it all figured out! The service he offers is unlike anything I have ever experienced. He was very knowledgeable about the vehicle we purchased and, unlike some dealerships, he was able to answer all of the questions we had. I have recommended Todd to two people since our purchase about two weeks ago and I will continue to recommend Todd to anyone I know who is looking for a vehicle. And I will definitely be doing business with him again.
I love you guys more than Starbucks! Everything about this place is amazing, the food, the service, the atmosphere, everything.
Superb store
I am stuck with you guys just like I have been stuck with my doctor for the past 20years.Good job always!
Very clean and the newest beds. Pay once to be a member for life with great discounts on prices and products.
What an outstanding good old made in the USA company!! Ray s> elkhart ind
None
None
I just had my spicy salmon roll and it was so good. Fresh fish.
Dee Lincoln's is one of the best restaurants in Dallas! It has a great vibe and the food here is just the best! Where else can you get sushi pizza and a fantastic steak? Great date place or get together with friends...
I really like the straight truth being preached here so far, we have been attending regulatly for about 3 months and is good to find a good-doctrine based church now days, where the warning about the dangers of present times are mentioned and not an easy feel-good, non-offensive void prosperity message. They are proactive in helping the needy and benevolence but above all we need to have a strong message about that people don't have to go hell, that God's option is available while we are here and that repentance is needed. Great job, we need to hear the truth with love and that's what we hear here.
As a gold member, it was very fast and easy to pick up and return the car at SFO airport. Best experience ever!
Cool Stuff :)
None
Great Store! And the person in the computer department was not awful at all to me!! I understood every word he said and he gave a lot of great information not just once but every time I have called wich is at least twice a week!!
My favorite sushi place of all time. The owners are so sweet and the food is incredible specially the sushi it's always made fresh and large portions unlike other sushi places that gives you small baby sushi. Yes sometimes it takes time to get your food but that's because they slammed with orders and try to do their best.
None
Cat's Corner is one of Montreal greatest gems. It is an incredibly friendly, judgement-free environment where everyone is open to meeting new people, making new friends, and just wants to dance and have fun. I strongly recommend trying out the Friday night Downtown Stomp; I guarantee you'll leave the place brimming from ear-to-ear and will be hooked! I first walked in as an incredibly self-conscious, two-left-footed hot mess and just a few short weeks later not only made lots of new friends but could actually swing!
Clarissa is so sweet and down to earth. She puts so much thought and time into her work, and really enjoys what she does. Having a photographer who loves what he or she does really makes a difference... Clarissa showed up to our session with great ideas and was able to bring out our personalities without making our photos look phony. My fiancé is super camera shy- he freezes and tenses up in front of cameras. Clarissa was able to bring out his natural "modeling" abilities! :) We cannot thank Vantage Media enough for our beautiful engagement photos!
Kirk and his team came through in every way! I need a job done quickly (residential) and Kirk came out the same day, did a thorough walk through with me, and gave a very fair estimate. His team was out a couple days later and knocked the job out quickly, but professionally. I didn't need to follow after them to make sure they were doing the right areas- everyone was on top of it. I was very pleased that Kirk came out after it was all done and inspected everything and did a final walk through with me. To top it off, Kirk is a super pleasant guy- a pleasure to work with!
The Elite Group, is a very professional home inspection company, thank you for all the client reminders, and making me look good. Great Job Guys.
We have eaten here twice now, both times ordering different things and have been amazed at the quality of most of the food on both occasions. The only gripe we had were the sweet and sour chicken balls on the 2nd order were a bit too wet inside although the batter itself was delicious. We will definitely order from here again.
Simply awesome
Awesome places. The best thing Erie has to offer. Life guards however need to relax. I'm all for safety but come on, whats wrong with playing with a ball !!
Skills on Toast provided a very prompt and professional service. The website they designed was perfect for our needs and I would happily recommend them and use their services again.
Ed here at master muffler is amazing. He is very honest and took time to walk me through the repairs needed on my car. He even took time to walk me through the shop and educate me on how to get the most miles out of my aging car. He is very honest and has the customer in mind. I have never been so impressed with an auto mechanic. I would recommend this master muffler to any of my friends.
I've been a customer and friend of Gonzalo's for over 24 years. The food is as good today as it was the first time I tried it. Mr. G always has a smile on his face, and a special place in his heart for the kids. If you have never tried his food, then I'm telling you it's the best. There is no other Mexican restaurant in town. Make Gonzalo's your favorite too.
I trained at Mushin from spring of 2008 until December of 2013. In that time and since my move out of state, I have had the opportunity to train with others around the world and nowhere else has even approached the atmosphere of professionalism, knowledge and family that I found inside those walls. More than just a place to learn to punch, kick, throw and submit, Mushin instills a sense of history, purpose and camaraderie that few other gyms could ever hope to achieve.
My wife and I had the pleasure of staying here. It was fantastic! My wife is lactose intolerant and Bonnie (the owner) did her best to prepare a breakfast according to her eating habits. The room had some flaws, however, it was nothing to compared to the food and service received. All couples had to sit next to each other, and introduce in the morning during breakfast. It was so much fun. We plan to return, and our favorite part was there there were no children allowed in the rooms. It was a beautifully quiet stay!
This restaurant was fantastic! The wait staff was attentive, nice and helpful in describing the beers and food........and the food was phenomenal! We had a pineapple special with pork, chicken, steak, onions and cheese, and it was crazy good! That along with a combination dinner, and we were so stuffed we rolled across the street to our hotel! Highly recommend this restaurant. :) Very reasonable and easy going atmosphere.
Looking for a special present for my wife and David helped me with the perfect choice. She was ecstatic. He nailed it. I will definitely be back
Working at BodyWell has let me see first-hand the positive impact that care at BodyWell can have on an individual's life. People come to BodyWell with a wide range of problems, such as migraines, injuries, anxiety, back pain - even just to check on the health of their spine and nervous system. Since my first day working at BodyWell, I've been amazed at the change in people after just a short period of care - they're happier, have more energy, and have a better understanding of how their body functions and how to achieve the best of health. I've also experienced care first-hand at BodyWell. I've suffered with severe back pain for as long as I can remember, and have seen many doctors, physiotherapists and chiropractors, and not been given a clear answer as to what caused the pain or a long-term solution. After having my digital x-rays taken and explained to me at BodyWell, I was actually able to understand what was causing the pain. Now, having regular adjustments at BodyWell, I can feel such a difference in myself: my pain has massively decreased and I am able to do my job with a lot more ease and energy!
Love chick fil a! I love what they stand for as well. Just because our country and government supports LGBT doesn't mean every company has to! Were all entitled to our opinions and this company is one of the few that will stand up for it's values. In a time where people who choose not to support immorality are the minority it's nice to have this restaurant to go to and know our money is not supporting values we don't believe in.
Wow, we had dived the Swan in Busselton and had pretty low expectations about the Lena, but Kim really opened our eyes up to the amazing ecosystem developing on the Lena. Two dives at the price they offered was by far the best value diving experience we have had yet! I can recommend to anyone seeking a dive tour run by divers for divers!
I always enjoying going to Goodman Dental. Dr. Goodman and his staff are always friendly and do an excellent job. I have found them to be the best Dental office in the Phoenix Metro Area.
I rate this a 5 because of the commitment to get me into the car of my choice and make the numbers work. Jason was fair. I am waiting for my ordered car to be delivered and am excited about my new car!
Steve & Linda's obvious flair for good food, stylish interior design, recipe creativity and the skill to make delicious hot & cold drinks is clearly evident. Blend is an inviting, bright, clean and friendly place to work, meet friends or to simply enjoy a moment alone whilst enjoying one of the many treats on their varied daily menus. You can kick back in one of their comfy upholstered retro chairs with a great cuppa (bliss!), take the children to enjoy the great roomy space at the back of the cafe or visit with family or friends for a delicious lunch. If you're in the area, and even if you're not, this is one place worth going out of your way to visit - it's an absolute joy!
Long lines at security, but they moved along quickly.
Fantastic meal. I had a bourbon barrel stout with the corned beef sandwich. The waitress was very friendly and the atmosphere is great. Definitely stop in if you're in the area.
Ok - I had a clog removed then I needed a water heater. The old one just was not keeping up. I got Sacramento Water Heater to take a look. A high cost job into a low cost Thermostat replacement! They could have lied to me and told me the thermo couple can not be replaced but they made it happen. Great people.
Love the sushi here and very reasonably priced!
Free WiFi. Seriously this is a delicious Italian Bakerey that is open 7 days a week. It's nice to have something like this by Tanque Verde and Catalina Hiway. The baked goods are tastey and you get get coffee or a soda and sit for a while. It is comfortably furnished and emaculate.
My car was recently hit and it smashed up the whole passenger side. I took it to Collision Clinic and you can't even tell anything happened! I had a rental for a week and now my car looks brand new. Thank you for taking great care of me and my car!
My office
Utrolig hyggelig og smuk beliggenhed og super søde medarbejdere. Maden var i top! Service var i top! Alt i alt en KANON god oplevelse! kan stærkt anbefales!
"Monster" 'Dub' Energy Drinks!
I love this place! Not only do they have a large selection of beer, more then i could ever imagine, but their extremely informed staff helped me to make my selections based on beers i told them i enjoyed. This is my favorite place to buy alcohol, and i will continue to come back again and again!
i had a wonderful experience at classic chariots. kay did everything in her power to get me approve. and i got myself a 2010 crystler sebring .
None
Excellent Service. I had Highlander clean a couple of wood decks and they did a perfect job at a GREAT Price! Thanks!
I can not thank Gordon enough for the work he did in representing me and my case. He walked me through every detail, making me feel comfortable and reassured along every step of this process. I have the highest faith and trust in him. I would recommend Gordon with very high compliments.
None
None
Terry Lynn was very friendly, informative about the products, as well as Helpful to my needs and my Mom when we came to Ada's to look for several new items. Her bubbly personality and knowledge makes it very enjoyable to shop at Ada's.
None
O sorvete doo normando e uma delícia todo mundo gosta eles estão de parabéns
My experience with Honda of Tenafly was outstanding. Herbie Rosario knew what I wanted, had the car waiting for me to buy with all my request, and gave me all the options I had in order to attain my new Honda Accord. Because of Honda of Tenafly having a great relationship with USAA (military members) I choose this dealership and they most certainly lived up to their name and outstanding customer service. There was no hassle or stress during my process, just honest straight foward progress from my dealer Herbie Rosario. I recommend anyone and everyone to come here to buy their Honda especially military service memebers. They truly take care of you as if you were family and I will forever be loyal to them because of that. Thank You Honda of Tenafly and Thank You Herbie Rosario! LT Castro
I love this target. The Starbucks inside is a bonus!
None
Delicious food good service..and dont forget to enjoy here sweets gulab jamun n basundi
This is the nicest sports bar I've ever been to. Excellent food. Excellent service. Amazing lunch or dinner atmosphere. And even though it's a classy, quality establishment, the people who go here are still sports fans, and it's a great place to watch any game. Huge TVs on every wall. Great food. 5 stars.
i only went to this school for a term this year:( miss it
None
This is the best pub in the area. Amazing staff and Arbor ales make a great pint. Atmosphere varies massively depending on whats happening but is always fun even when quiet and has the best parties when busy.
Very nice
Black & Hue have done family photos for us several times. All I can say is "incredible"! The do amazing work, very responsive, professional, creative, and thoughtful. They truly are the very best photographers we have ever used. Highly recommend!
None
None
Food was very good. I had a six ounce sirloin and broccoli. The order was taken promptly. The food arrived reasonably soon with plenty of chips, salsa and beer in the meantime. Service was attentive without anyone hovering. It was very good. The decor is nothing special, just standard Chili's but it was fine.
The food has improved over the time it's been open. The brunch was excellent the other weekend! I also have a weakness for their clam chowder. The staff are all great, the regulars are fun, and it's an easy going atmosphere. Trivia on Tuesdays, Karaoke on Thursdays.
This is police station.
None
Fantastic beers, the brew master always hits styles dead on. Excellent soft pretzels, other food is good as well. Monday nights are not to be missed, great team trivia competition every week. Have been here many, many times. Looking forward to the new location.:
.
None
love them - super sweet, great massage and very clean
Excellent facilities and superb customer service. They mischarged me for a monthly pass when I only got a day pass, and when I called, they had the charge voided immediately and also sent me a gift certificate to apologize! That is the kind of behavior I like to see in a company. Highly recommend!
Живу не далеко от А. Сабурова. Заходил на днях в этот магазинчик. Отличный выбор, на любой вкус и цвет. Хотя мне редко приходилось страдать такими вопросами, как там: "какие зубные щетки покупать", или "какая зубная паста мне подходит", пока живу с родителями, мне не приходиться об этом думать. У нас в ванной постоянно стоит зубная паста Colgate. И знаете, проблем с зубами у нас ни у кого нет. p.s. (нас в семье пятеро). Так что можете последовать моему примеру или продолжайте свои эксперименты;-)
I loved. It has nice decor, and the workers are wonderful. The food was DELECIOUS. The fries were the best part!
They have an awesome shop with an open air showroom that is hip but not pretentious. Feels like a spot you want to hang out in for a few hours. I came in with one of their Rambler packs that I had bought at a dealer. It had a bit of missed stitching on one of the zippers, and Morgan, the awesome guy helping me, immediately offered to replace it with a brand new bag. No receipt, no questions. They even let me pay the difference to trade up to the limited edition version of the bag, which I had been kicking myself for not buying in the first place. The bag is amazing, the service was excellent, and I walked out convinced that Mission Workshop is one of the best brands out there.
Ian was super nice and great at piercing my navel. I got a cute ring and an amazing experience. LOVE the place and so going back!
Owners are very friendly. The food quality is very good and consistent. The menu is mostly Japanese but they have a couple pages dedicated to Korean food. I prefer Korean food and my favorite is dolsot bibam bap.
Friendly staff and owner. Great service and awesome hot pizza.
Went to the shop to have some exhaust work done on my car price was good staff knowledgeable problem with car was fixed quick and car runs better then when i got it will recommend to others
One of our favorites. Go once or twice a month. Service always good. Food excellent. Love the house salad with house dressing. Light eaters may want to spilt a plate, portions generous.
None
Convenient, Close, Clean, Competent, Courteous. The five "C"s of excellence. Frank, Norm, and all the guys are the best.
The guys explained everything well to us and showed the before and after pictures. It was nice to see the difference. They were very mindful :)
Loved it
Carson at the Studio is so amazing! I go in with a photo, and she cuts it to what I want, and what looks good with my face. I always walk out feeling beautiful, and confident. She also is very good about saying that if I'm unsure about the hair cut later that I can always call her, and get pointers on how to style it. I will always keep going to her, even when she moves to the new location!
Having being displaced due to flooding in my neighborhood I was tired, overwhelmed, and almost in a state of shock. This was my third storage facility. Ms. Karen was kind, professional, and most of all- helpful. Karen is so knowledgeable. I described the amount of things we were able to save and she suggested the size unit we'd need. She was happy to show me the unit. Service has been great from the moment I walked through the door until now. And the price was best of the three!
Stayed there a few years ago with a friend of mine for her B-Day. Definitely cozy. The owners/staff were very accomodating. Great stay!! The food though—AMAZING BREAKFASTS!!
None
Service was good and the food was excellent.
Charlotte Arrangements recently helped my company throw an amazing party. We basically set up a beach in downtown Charlotte. Pretty impossible, but Charlotte Arrangements did it promptly and exactly the way we wanted it. Two thumbs up for this hard working establishment.
None
All the vets and staff have been amazing outstanding, kind, compassionate and friendly, not to mention affordable. I really cannot say enough good things about these vets
Over Spring Break I wanted to purchase my favorite vehicle a HONDA ACCORD. I went to Proctor Honda, and my husband and I were greeted by Harold the sales representative. Harold was GREAT! He worked extremely hard to ensure I could drive off the lot in the Honda I wanted. I promised Harold that if he took care of me I would return in 4 years to buy another Honda from him. My plan is to return in 4 years because of the friendly, kind, patient service I received from Harold. I love my new Honda Sport!!
None
A great hotel of pleasant desing and incredibly nice staff. It's great to both be their guests and work with them! I hope that someday I will be able to spend some time there again.
None
Bất động sản CafeLand. Địa chỉ tốt dành cho các nhà đầu tư và mô giới bất động sản. Kênh Mua bán nhà đất cho người có nhu cầu bán và mua.
None
All the professors of this classes are actually retired persons and are senior citizens of Akola. They have very high level of experience above 40+ years and the coaching is very excellent. These classes completely prepare the students of XI and XII std for higher education like engineering college, medical college, IIT-JEE and BITs of India.
Called then yesterday for a plumbing problem was given a time frame. When they knew the person wasn't going to make it on time, they called and let us know, which was very nice. Eric was very courteous, explained the problem and what he was doing. Great customer service I've had for a while, would recommend any day. Was able to get our issue resolved with his persistence.
I great record store in a place where you can't find a lot of records store. Was able to buy a record there for a present that is great. It is a nice store with 2 levels of records, posters, and equipment. everything is priced reasonably.
None
Pete and Karen are honest, knowledgeable and go above and beyond to provide exceptional service for their customers. I won't be going anywhere else for service on my car.
I've gone several times and love the adult ballroom dancing lessons with Mrs Kari & Michael. Great teachers, usually a fun crowd and always learning something new
I love Brick 3! Try the Loaded Baked Potato Pizza or the Chicken Parm Sandwich... hooray for being fat :)
I needed several stumps removed in my front yard and I called VA Contracting. I received a free estimate the very next day and the job was fairly priced. They were able to do the job quickly without any hassles. All the employees were very polite and professional. I would definitely use them again. I highly recommend VA Contracting if you are in need of any type of tree service.
Love this facility, staff is very friendly, we have a dog who is very nervous around other people & animals, and they do their best to make him more comfortable when we come in for classes, the trainer for obedience & agility is wonderful, we have learned so much about our dogs. Will definitely recommend this facility to others. Dan & Mallory have done a great job!!!
Great hole-in-the-wall mexican diner. My favorites are the cesena and flank tacos
Dr. Hudgens is ahead of the curve when it comes to patient care. I have met with many dermatologists in the past and I can say with certainty that Dr. Hudgens is by far the most knowledgeable and caring Dermatologist that I have met. Most Dr's in this field have a "dismissive" attitude, whereas Dr. Hudgens has a patient centered approach to her practice which sets her apart from others.
I injured my knee skiing and after 7 months, it was still causing me some pain when I bent it far back and tried to rotate it around. Dr Luce performed ART on it--6 sessions--and I had complete mobility and NO MORE PAIN! Thank you, Dr Luce!
I underwent Coolsculpting and I love the results. I am 50ish, post menopausal and have accumulated fat in areas where it will not decrease with eating healthy, running, weight lifting and various other exercise. At this point, I have had four procedures in two separate sessions with the help of Lisa who guided me through the pre-treatments, treatments and post-treatments. She prepared me well for what would occur afterward. I experienced tenderness, a little swelling, no bruising and some cramping, but was given a prescription that helped elminate most of those issues. I also wore the compression garment religiously and felt less of the after effects because of that. Four months after Coolsculpting my upper and lower abdomen - I am thrilled with the results. I nearly have a flat abdomen. I admit that I cheated at the gym due to work/other commitments and eating all the wrong things during stressful times, but still obtained fantastic results. I recently returned for a second session, having my lower abdomen (a second time) and my love handles Coolsculpted. It was a brreeze. No swelling, brusing and very little tenderness. I am excited see the changes I undergo in the next few months. I also attended an open house at BWS and purchased the best mineral makeup I've ever used. And, I won a gift certficate for a Coolsculpting. So, I highly recommend that you visit the open houses at the spa...meet the staff...take advantage of all the wonderful services they offer during that event...and enjoy the results you'll achieve like me.
Great summer concert venue!
I joined a bootcamp class in April of 2013 and I have been hooked since then! As an avid runner, I blindly thought this was the best form of exercise for my body. I was able to keep weight off, however I could never seem to achieve the results I wanted with certain parts of my body. After just a few weeks, I began to notice new muscles, better tone and improved physical fitness. Nine months later I am in the best shape of my life. Aside from the results, I love this gym for several other reasons. The staff/trainers are incredible. Each one provides a unique and different method of training and motivation. Muscle confusion is key to results and these guys/girls know how to get it done! Additionally, I love my gym mates! Everyone who I've trained with has become a friend. Though everyone comes from different walks of life, we support and encourage each other like family. I haven't experienced this level of comradery and I wouldn't trade it for anything! Bottom line: Motivation. Support. Results.
Ci sono stato sia per acquistare esca sempre di qualità, ho comprato anche una bolognese Shimano ad un ottimo prezzo rispetto gli altri negozi di reggio.
Great place to meet and enjoy good food and drinks. Happy hour specials are awesome.
Ken Gorin and the staff at The Collection are a group of amazing, customer oriented and dedicated people. Not only does the quality of their inventory surpass all expectations, but their dedication to the community and strong sense of philanthropy makes them a stand out company!
Punctual, professional, reasonably priced...easy web booking, too. WINNING!
Exellent hotel very good service, friendly ppl and alot of facilities... The only down side is that it's a bit far from downtown and the marina but u can very easily get a taxi or a rental
None
Samara dead sea privet department
None
Great service and great prices. I'll be going back again.
Great selection of fresh, local seafood, meat, and more. Superb service. Very good value. Bonus: oyster shucking lesson. An essential part of the Isle of Skye experience.
David's Auto Works has been doing my work for 3-4 years. They do excellent work, are dependable and pick up my car at my business. I never had any complaints and they are very reasonable some times not even charging me for small maintenance jobs. Keep up the great work!
A tiny oasis, located deep within the old town and in walking distance of most major tourist attractions. The staff are what set this Riad apart! Always on hand to help, from guiding you deep into the Medina, to providing refreshments and tailored breakfasts on the cosy terrace.
Alllie
None
Love living here! My dog is welcome and the dog park is a great way to meet your neighbors! I also love hanging out at the two pools during the summer!
Our Big Ben - large shepherd/lab mix - lost a back foot to cancer, and we didn't want to see his quality of life diminished. My husband found OrthoPets online and recommended that our vet surgeon help us fit Bennie for the prosthetic. The vet loved it and videotaped him using it to show it to other families. Bennie was able to continue his long walks, and we were glad to have him able to use all four of his legs. The videotaping and casting system worked well in fitting him - even from Atlanta - and we really liked working with the staff at OrthoPets. If you are looking to extend the quality of your pet's life with a prosthetic, we suggest you contact this company. They're terrific!
Excellent value - best price in town by a long shot (at least, out of the four or so shops we got a quote from). Timely service - job was done the next day. Looks good - you wouldn't be able tell my wife ran the new car into a fence anymore :-) Thanks, Maaco!
thank you tiger paints for providing me the best paints for my company.
None
Maravilloso
I moved down to Baton Rouge, LA from Alexandria, VA for a job. During my final round of interviews, my future boss took me around several apartments in the area. I visited The Reserve, its sister community The Enclave, and Millenium Towne Center around the corner on Jefferson. Ultimately, I chose The Reserve because even though the appliances were not "upgraded" as they were in The Enclave (they're still brand new, though!), the rent was about $100/month cheaper. I absolutely love this community, and would recommend it to anyone. It's a gated community that requires a remote to open the gates to drive or walk in, there is obvious security presence in public areas during the day (they have even stopped me to ask for my resident's pass, which was comforting), and from 8 PM to midnight, there's an on-duty police officer patrolling. I have never felt unsafe within the gates at night. My experience with the leasing office employees has also been fantastic - Caley is absolutely the best. The other residents are also very friendly, a lot of families and young couples. On a Friday night, sometimes you'll hear music, but there are never loud, raucous parties, it seems. The pool area is always pristine, and the fitness center, though small, always has machines free for use. I haven't had any issues with apartment appliances yet, but the a/c works great, and the kitchen is superb. At some point, I may upgrade to the apartment with 1 BR and a Study, but I would love to continue to call The Reserve home.
Fantastic food, very reasonable prices and a great family atmosphere. I definitely recommend this to everyone in the west kendall / hammocks area!
None
Best attraction for all age person. I love india.
Have always gotten great service AND RELIABLE service from Jim! Additionally, he is a kind man and very willing to work with you. You cannot go wrong with Jim Baker's Auto Service!
Very helpful and usually pretty quick to get you what you need.
I've used Rollin Sound probably 3 times now. They have always been quick and efficient. There prices are great as well as the service. Thanks Guys!
Excellent staff
What a very helpful and nice person. Hi Jack, I want to thank you so much for all of your help today. I felt so lost and confused. You are a very patient & knowledgeable person. I appreciate the great ideas & information to help me try to sort out my maps problem. I can't thank you enough for the time you took to explain these things to me. -DianaRae
The food is excellent!
My daughter and I went to visit for the first time recently to see the Still Life exhibit. While the art is magnificent, the building itself is just amazing! Located in the middle of The Domain, it was nice to just find seat under a tree and eat our lunch. Loved it.
Dr Jensen is amazing, he's been in chiropractic for 33 years. I've been to a lot of chiropractors and i think he's up there with the best. And the staff is wonderful ( Lisa).
Most enjoyable! Great food, even while under recent construction. Definitely coming back for more!
Super yummy, crab Rangoon soooooooo good! They have chili and plum sauce. Most Chinese places do not carry plum sauce. Went on my Birthday and they gave me a small piece of cake and a cream puff. I'll be a customer when I'm in the neighborhood! And the staff are nothing short of courteous and sincerely nice. Highly recommend. Plus- they deliver!
Great, friendly and professional service. Really like the website, easy to use and navigate around. My order came really quickly thanks to the next day delivery, and it was at a good price too! Really happy and have recommended to my friends. Thanks!
None
E' la mia lavanderia di fiducia da 2 anni da quando ho portato a lavare il mio abito da sposa in pizzo, i miei capi sono sempre perfetti grazie all'esperienza della titolare la Signora Maria. Ottimo anche il servizio di pulizia dei capi in pelle!
Nannette is the real deal and not just another geek, check out her work and see for yourself, you will find the quality you want and more!
my wife loves this place!!
Best range of international and local beer that I have seen in Melbourne. Beer nerds will love this place.
Bought my first bike here. Wasn't sure what KIND of bike I wanted...I was in-between road/mountain/hybrid because I wanted to get around town, but also go on trails, but also wanted to ride fast. I decided with a road bike, planning to get a MTB in the future. They let me test ride the bike in Down Pouring Rain, which made the experience thrilling. The guys made me (A woman) feel very comfortable. They did suggest that I wait and order a taller frame to fit me better, but I was a bit impatient and wanted to ride right away. They didn't push their advice on me, but now I know, as a consumer and avid rider, that they know what they are doing. I should have waited a few more days to buy the right size, but now I have the lesson learned. They fit the smaller frame to me and suited me up in awesome gear, which has lasted 3 years, with regular use. My bike (JAMIS SATELLITE) is now with a smaller woman, but still in Tip-Top shape as she is now doing many tri-s.
Went there today, absolutely great experience. Fabio, Michael & Carlos were all extremely friendly and helpful. I've gone to other dealerships, especially places that sell Ducatis, and so often they're very snooty. That couldn't have been less the case here, and 100% honest, me and my friend came in looking a little trashy. But it was great. If these guys have a bike you're interested in this is the place I recommend you go, even if it's a bit of a drive out of your way.
Classiest place on Earth. I can't image being treated better or having a better night. The food is amazing and the lightning is the most appropriate for finishing the perfect dining atmosphere the restaurant offers.
I purchased a 2014 Chevy Cruze LT. My salesperson, Armando Raygoza was extremely helpful facilitating my purchase. When I began my search for a new car, I did not think I was able to drive off in a new car, due to credit issues. Armando diligently found me all possible rebates and worked with your awesome finance team to help me get into a much needed new car. I will definitely keep using Puente Hills Chevy for my future car buying needs. Thanks for a positive experience!
Brandon M. did a superb job today for me and my wife (Jill McDaniel) installing a new toilet in our master bathroom. He was right on time and was extremely professional. He took care to explain what he was doing and answer questions we had. Brandon was very efficient and courteous and his work was of high quality. He has done other work for us in the past and we've always been very satisfied. We will ask for Brandon whenever we have a plumbing need in the future.He is a real asset to Woodfin and we would recommend him to any customer.
None
Must try red dal..
I just recently leased a Volkswagon GLI from Maquire. I had an extremely pleasant buying experience with my sales consultant Kirk Barker. I was not forced into any car or group of cars that were out of my price range and or did not fit the criteria that I was looking for. Kirk did a tremendous job of narrowing down the various features and requirements that I was looking for in a vehicle and helped me to locate a selection of three different cars that may suit all of my needs. After I selected the perfect car, it was apparent that Kirk was not focused on getting the most money for his dealership, but rather doing his best to help me the customer. Overall the experience was great and me and my girlfriend will continue to do business with Kirk and the Maquire dealership in the future.
Awesome customer service and excellent sushi. Be sure to ask about the secret menu item, onion rings. They are the best in Detroit!
My family and I have been enjoying this place for years. It is a perfect example of an old-style neighborhood business where the owner and staff are very friendly, appreciate your business, and keep you coming back with consistently good food, good service and a pleasant atmosphere. An all around good value. Their Hot and Sour soup (a personal barometer of Chinese restaurants) is among the best I've had. Kitchen will gladly accommodate requests like 'Extra-Spicy' and similar. The popular lunch buffet is small but much fresher than most. Only drawback is no liquor license. If you feel like a drink with dinner, this isn't the place.
We had our wedding at Spring Lake in October 2012 and we loved everything about the venue. Working with Renty was AMAZING, as she was very hands-on and ready to answer all of my many questions. It was almost a 2 hour drive from my house and I only visited the venue twice before the wedding, so I relied on Renty a lot to help me visualize the space, as I was doing all of the planning myself. She did not disappoint and I always felt like her suggestions and guidance were spot-on! I used almost all of her preferred vendors and they were all professional and the quality of their services was top of the line. I felt like their prices were incredible and every penny I spent was well worth it. My photographers (from out of town) LOVED the site and they shoot weddings all over the country, which is a testament to how truly unique and beautiful Spring Lake is. It is the perfect location if you're looking for southern, vintage, elegance, charm. Everyone who attended our wedding couldn't believe how gorgeous the place is--it's like a hidden gem!!! I recommend this venue to anyone and everyone who is considering it! Even if it is far from you, IT IS WORTH THE DRIVE. There is nothing I would change about our wedding at Spring Lake.
Excellent Singapore Noodles and Grilled Marinated Pork bun!
None
I re-certified myself for my Massage Therapy license. So, this was the third time taking this style of class. Not looking forward to the repeat material I went in thinking this was going to be super boring. Well, in fact the class was the best one I've taken so far! The instructor was a paramedic and explained right away how the next two hours would be. We watched all the videos, pausing between each session to answer questions and clarify anything that was needed. There were only 6 of us in the class which made practicing on the dummies very efficient. Our instructor made sure each of us were practicing properly, adjusting hand placements and explaining how to use your body weight to give CPR. I would highly recommend Saving Chicago CPR to anyone looking to become certified in CPR.
I am going to sound like I work for these guys (promise, I don't) but this place is freaking phenomenal! I have never had better BBQ. The service was great, and the owner, Jabo, paid a visit to our table and gave us a history lesson on BBQ. It's a little hole in the wall which is how you know it's good. I can't say enough good things about Jabo's. Unless you hate good food, you'll love Jabo's!
Fun
Good price for great beer and German pub food. Nice old beer hall decor
Our technician was very professional and checked in regularly throughout the process—letting us know exactly what he was seeing. I would hire them again.
I have bought several items from this awesome store. Great customer service and excellent prices bring me back again and again.
This Duane Reade is one of the Best locations in the City. It is always well lit and the staff has been more than helpful. I always find what I'm looking for and am grateful for the services the store provides.
Great fresh produce and meats at a fair price.
Have eaten a lot of shrimp & oysters in my lifetime but this is by far the BEST. I will go out of my way to stop by here.
Great work and attention to detail really helps them stand out from the crowd. I see their work all around town and it is top notch.
Been going here since a was a little girl, Love love love it! Best cheese chips ever!!!
I was a doubtful customer but when I got two calls immediately after a mail out I was sold! I love the ease of use of this program and how effective it is. Highly recommend!
uk country radio Listeners club awards will be having their 7th september . I won last year but could not attend but this years will be there. Looking forward to my stay at this great Hotel.and attending the awards.and singing my songs. I will give the trophy to the new winner or keep it again for another year if I win again. wayne Jacobs uk country radio Listeners club award winner 2012
I purchased a 2012 Jeep Patriot Saturady and I coudl not have been more pleased with the process. Velko was a great salesman and I would and will reccomend him to everyone I know. He was patient, knowledgeable, had a great personality, all around great guy and easy to talk about my needs with. He clearly wanted to make sure I purchasing something I was happy with. I am looking forward to a long car relationship with him and the dealership. Bob was also great to talk to during the process for the cars protection plan and again no hard sell, Brandon made finance like getting a ice cream cone. It was quick, fast, easy, everything was explained. It was after hours but he did not seem to be phased by that. It was a shear pleasure doing business with these men and the dealership. As I waiting to go see Brandon other reps where conversing and we talked cars, weather, many issues. I just can not say enough. It was a great way to spend my Saturday afternoon.
Nice
Customer service very nice thanks Emily bread good and thick thanks
nice place with friendly staff,if you need info's just ask them.
None
None
Thanks for the GREAT "first clean" I was impressed with the attention to detail. the "Sunbursts" on the couch were over the top! I appreciate your Cleaning. Thanks!.
Unos de los lugares mas agradables para comer y socializar!
2nd time we've used J & P to move in 15 months. We love their work and have and will continue to recommend them to friends, co-workers and family on their short or long haul moves. Both different crews/staff were personable, friendly, hard working and made sure to protect our items and old and new place from damage. These guys are good!
As a native San Antonian, my out of town friends always ask me for a place that locals love. I always tell them to go here. It's so old school, old "san antone" (which nobody calls it any more), you'll swear your Abuelita is in the back making those fresh, yummy corn tortillias. Saturday is tortilla soup day - need I say more? (hope that's still true, I've not been in a while...)
While all the food has been very good on all of our visits, I recommend the lobster ravioli. Glad to have you in our neighborhood!
I confidently refer clients to FarFromBoring and consistently see successful results. The company's staff has tons of experience and the service is top-notch. They do an excellent job of suggesting cool products that fall within budget and create maximum impact. It's reassuring to work with a company that does such a good job of keeping clients in the loop throughout each stage of the production process - so there's no unfortunate surprises. FarFromBoring makes the marketing team look smart on every project!
I have been to the shop several times for manicures and pedicures. They do a really nice job. Overall, a good experience. I would recommend it.
Kindly send me quote for curtain cleaning and also a bag of laundries for dry cleaning.
Julie was awesome very relaxing and enjoyable!!
Dope haircuts and real barbers.
Mag's has to be the best place to get together with a few friends and just talk. It has a very original feel to it that I just love. The atmosphere in the shop is wonderful! I wish I could go there every day.
I LOVE Fuller & Son's Hardware, especially this location on Cantrell (altho they are all great!). I walked in, was greeted promptly, told them what I was needing and they walked me to the aisle, helped me find what I needed and I was in & out in under 5 minutes with exactly what I needed to fix my issue. THANKS, Fuller & Son!
Cortesia, gentilezza e disponibilità.
I work at the salon and it's a great place to get your hair and nails done. The stylists are very friendly and have 15+ years of experience. Come see us today for your new style and nail service.
My last trip in Srinagar, J&K is mind-blowing and memorable because Grand Mumtaz hotel and resorts group provide excellent fast and luxury services and facilities specially foods according my need. And also provide all travel arrangements. So tanks Grand Mumtaz Team.
6-3-13 My name is Will and I ended up purchasing a nearly new 2012 Jeep Rubicon Unlimited from Crown this past Friday. I located the Jeep via Autotrader and drove up to Dublin OH from Hopkinsville KY. Their price on the Jeep was better than anything I could find within 500 miles of my zip code. The BEST part of my experience outside of purchasing the Jeep itself was the salesperson that helped me. Kathy Moyer was / is the best car salesperson that I have met, and I have purchased many cars both individually and through my company over the past 15 years. From the minute I arrived, she had thoroughly investigated the Jeep that I was buying and was prepared to show me every feature of the vehicle. If you are looking for a Jeep in particular, Kathy is your girl. She has actually owned her own Jeep building shop in the past and drives a Jeep Wrangler herself. Honesty is #1 for me, and there is a perception in the car sales industry that there are many crooked people out there, and I believe in many cases rightfully so. Not with Kathy!!! Kathy prepared my paperwork at the price we had negotiated over the phone. She didn't try to "up-sell me or haggle over the price". She also handled everything for me before sending me to the finance manager for final paperwork. I honestly can't say enough good about her. I have written very few reviews of businesses or individuals in my life, but in this case I feel like it is the least I can do. THANK YOU Kathy and thank you Crown for a GREAT experience. Will
Place sucks but heals... doctors are excellent...
We choose The Tremont House because it was a Wyndham Grand Hotel. I would definitely recommend this hotel to all my family and friends. Upon arrive were greeted by the hotel valet staff that assisted us with our luggage. The staff at the front desk was extremely helpful with the check in process. The room was very spacious with high ceilings; the room décor was very pleasant. I would overall rate this hotel experience as one of my best. The staff at The Tremont House were outstanding and the property was well maintained. The Tremont House was a perfect ending after our seven day cruise on Carnival Magic. 2/16/2014
Well kept up clean very well maintained worked out very well for us it has everything you need microwave refrigerator hair blower TV coffee
Dr. Rauch and the entire staff at Rauch Chiropractic are wonderful! They are concerned about each patient's individual needs. They are so personable and professional. I leave there feeling positive about my health - physical and mental! I highly recommend Rauch Chiropractic.
Salesman Steve Lin did a commendable job of showing various cars to satisfy my requests for different models/colors. Salesman also did a great job of providing information covering car features and answering questions posed. Finally, Mr. Lin also displayed a patient and positive attitude before, during and after the car buying experience.
Fantastic Experience, Clean storage space, great prices! Damita was fantastic start to finish, making sure that I got the best of the best!
As a frequent visitor to public storage, I find Shoshana (manager) to be very accommodating and very helpful when problems may arise. I enjoy doing business with her.
Just left Josh's for lunch and I was probably the best I ever had. The place is quaint and cute. The brunch menu was not only delicious but very affordable to the tune of 3 courses for $13. We have spent a lot more money for food that wasn't as good. If we didn't have to take the almost 2 hour drive home we would have stayed for bottomless Mimosas. Worth coming back for!
While Red Square's instantly recognizable rooftop "Askew" clock and a statue of Vladimir Lenin imported from Moscow are perhaps its most obvious features, few rental apartments in the East Village can match Red Square's for spaciousness, graciousness or location.
Estava procurando um endereço proximo quando me deparei com o Nome d Tendall Grill errado aqui no google. O Nome do Restaurante é Tendall Grill e não Safari como aparece quando procuramos por este endereço aqui no sistema do Google Maps. Tendall Grill é a melhor churrascaria aqui da região com certeza. Parabéns pela atendimento pela qualidade das carnes servidas.
My experience at Curry Honda was perfect. The sales associates were wonderful. They all greeted me as soon as I walked in the door, but it wasn't overbearing. They were extremely nice and helpful. The car dealer and general sales manager that I went through to trade in my car for a new Honda made the experience extremely painless. They explained everything to me as it happened and were very patient with me. I recommend this dealership to anyone buying or trading in a car!
I love sales mantra crm. It solves all my problem I face in the business.
Unitech Ltd
Mình đã từng học ở đây, các anh chị vui vẻ nhiệt tình dễ thuơng, xinh xắn :D
None
Great food! Excellent service! Will be back many times!
We've been coming here for 10 years! Great Chicken Souvlakis! Fast and friendly service.
Disfruté el comer, la atención, los detalles, el lugar. ¡Me encantó!
I had been visualizing myself in a new Altima for months so I already knew what trim I wanted. I used a certificate from TrueCar which led me to MJ Nissan. Tiffany reached out to me in the evening and we went back/forth on the phone all day after the exact trim I wanted was located at another dealership. Tiffany came & picked me up from my home about 5 miles from the dealership and was extremely friendly and responsive. Travis sold me the car, moving me very quickly through the paperwork process and onto Ken, both of whom were friendly, funny & professional. This was very important to me, because I'm not very patient, and Travis/Ken got me and out in an hour. The SL has a LOT of options and Travis took the time to show me how to start the car, use the navigation and all of the features before I left. Travis also scheduled my first service appointment before I left dealership. On a side note, it was my birthday a few days after my purchase and Travis was kind enough to send me a congratulatory text message. The team is very professional, friendly and although I won't be in the market for a new car soon, I will highly recommend others to this dealership.
Josh and the 'No Dead End' team are part of our team at Trailer Superstore. They are always looking our for our best interest, best service, best ideas. Excited for our new website and future plans with this company.
Sean really knows how to make amazing photos! He is reliable, honest, and prompt. I highly recommend using him for any special event!
This is a great store :P
I take both my schnauzers to Diva Dogs,They are Friendly, Clean & Affordable! Highly recommend!
wonderful food xxx
I purchased a pre-owned 2010 TL from Sarun Pho, last Friday and I was very pleased with the entire purchasing process. She accommodated my schedule very well and kept in communication in the method which I preferred. Sarun made the entire process very easy for me, no pressure, and always very professional. I wish my previous car purchasing experience was the same. I highly recommend working with Sarun if you are thinking about purchasing a vehicle. Additional thanks: Steve Hahn in Finance (One of the few good guys), and Miguel Jimenez. -Miguel
We have been a returning customer for a couple of years now and we have entrusted their skills in locating not only the best family oriented areas but the closest to our vacation activities. My family and I are very pleased with their business and would refer anyone without a doubt to book their vacation home with them. Their easy and reliable booking site is a great tool that gives you a head start on your happy vacation days! They're great and their agents are attentive and helpful even with the most demanding customers.
None
he staff here are awesome! My son and his girlfriend were staying here while in Oslo. It was my son's birthday and I wanted to surprise him with a gift basket which was a bit of a challenge being that I was home in the United States! Ronny Wilhem, who is the front office manager, went to a nearby shop and purchased chocolate and made a wonderful 'gift' for me. It was a wonderful surprise! You can't possibly receive better 'care' and customer service than this! Ronny, you are such an asset to the Hotel Bondeheimen! Our son and his gf loved staying at this hotel! Fabulous accommodations, warm & friendly staff and right in the middle of so much to see and do!
realy nice place with good food and good customer service !
None
This place is superb. They have a great collection of wines, amari, liquors and spirits. The guys at the desk are not just shopkeepers, they are alcohol experts, who can suggest you in the wine selection process, and overall they are really nice and talkative. Oh, and Columbia University discount applies (still, without it, bottles are not so expensive).
Great sales team, great customer service and the finished product was beautiful. We could not be happier. I would highly recommend this company.
Called with a paperwork problem that involved searching for records of repair and they couldn't have been more accommodating, courteous or professional. You guys are FANTASTIC!! Thanks for the help and for going the extra mile.
Great idea - they make the pizza fresh and you cook it at home. One step above Papa Johns!
I've really got to hand it to the team at Ourisman Chantilly Kia. Due to my past, I never expected to be able to own a newer used car, let alone a brand new car. I had specific needs for equipment that I need to carry and after a few possibilities my salesperson, Patrick Garland, narrowed it down and found me a perfect vehicle. Not only was Patrick knowledgeable, he was not pushy in any way. With the help of Emmad, I was able to get great financing and I can proudly say that I am an owner of a brand new 2013 Kia Forte Hatchback!!! Thanks you to everyone at Ourisman Chantilly Kia!
Sehr ausführliches, vertauenserweckendes und kompetentes Erstgespräch betreffend meiner Möglichkeiten direkt telefonisch bei der Terminvergabe. Hier merkt man dass man es mit einer Person zu tun hat, welche auf seinem Gebiet (IT) ein Profi ist! Auf jeden Fall empfehlenswert.
Exceeded My Expectations! The end of last year, I needed help remodeling the new location for my business prior to our move in date. I contacted Mr. Handyman, and Mike met me at my convenience to assess the project and provide me a quote. Two days later, I called to schedule the job, and within the week, the project was complete. His technician was professional, polite and knowledgeable. In fact, he left the project site cleaner than he found it. I would definitely use Mr. Handyman again and would have no problem recommending them to any of my family, friends or professional contacts.
None
None
I came in over Christmas with my two sons and my dad. Shannon met us at the counter and talked us through selecting a pistol to rent and shoot. She answered all of the boys' questions on the gun, and they were quite confident when we started shooting. Before we left we ended up ordering one of our own! I have been back several times since and always look for Shannon to help me. It gets busy in there sometimes, but the quality and professionalism of the staff is worth it. Thanks again Shannon!
Mentro Tech Business Solutions is one of the leading web solution company in Delhi NCR Mentro tech business solutions offers best range of price for website design, Seo, Smo and many more. I suggest all you need Seo and website design can contact Mentro Tech Business solutions .
We just purchased our 2013 Chevrolet Silverado from Rudy Rangel at James Wood. Rudy was so helpful and courteous from the very start. He showed us trucks in each price bracket we might want to look in and didn't try to sway us one way or another. He was patient while we tried to decide which one might be best for us. We relocated from Missouri to Texas last year and this was our first car buying experience in the state of TX and we are so glad we chose James Wood!!!! This was by far the best experience we have EVER had purchasing a new vehicle. It was easy and went smoothly from the very beginning. We will definitely be back to see Rudy should we need a vehicle in the future!
Work
Long time ago I had a volkswagen
awesome..
None
None
This was our first experience with Barnes Plumbing and Heating, but we really wanted to find someone local in Castle Rock. We called in the morning for a broken furnace on a really cold day. They were out right when they said they would be, fixed the furnace, and charged a very fair price. No trip charge, we just paid for the work done and parts needed. We were very pleased with the professionalism of the technician, and had an overall great experience. Definitely would call them again.
Danny, is and has always been for my 8 years in Pottstown, provided the best service along with the personality which you will not find at a WaWa or major big wide spread multiple branch mart or mini grosser store. He gives and always has given a welcoming smile and when not too busy, "great conversation". I just wanted to commend him and those who make Brunish's Grocery, " The incredible hometown more then but still reserved to what some call Mom and Pop stores. Thank you Danny and I will be there not long from now for one of your well known Hot Sausages. You make the kids from the school happy with the location of your store. Thanks again Danny. Joe Sexton
This (Monday) morning, Fred from Callahan's came to service our Electrolux clothes washer. This is a high-end washer, and he knew everything about it. Our issue was the lack of water pressure pushing on the fabric softener dispenser tray, plus the yucky issue of black gunk (which he said was mold) which had coated some of the parts in the tray. So he replaced some little part and then advised us how to clean out the mold and accumulated junk - (hint: this is something that should be done monthly): wash it with a bleach vinegar mix, scrub with a toothbrush, high pressure hosing etc. I had already used a straight bleach rinsing solution, and told Fred a trick he had not heard about - run the dispenser tray through the dishwasher (no heat added). In the end, the dispenser is clean, and my wife is happy. That's the important moral of the story. Fred was friendly, knew his stuff, and very helpful.
To Whom It May Concern: Our family has been under the car of Dr. James Donovan since 1985. He has provided stellar medical care and advice. DR D. has performed bunion surgeries on both of my feet. In my position I stand up to eight hours per day. Prior to the surgeries the pain was unbearable, since the surgeries I have been completely pain and scar free. In addition to being an outstanding podiatrist Dr. D is attentive, caring, a great listener and has a calming effect. I would strongly recommend others to take advantage of DR. Donovan’s medical services Thank you doctor Donovan Cindy Coplan
Is Part Of Alain Pharmacy GroupGreat service
This is place is amazing. The portions are great. The staff is friendly. I come here once or twice a month and I am now friends with one of the owners. I highly recommend it.
This place is a NON-SMOKING establishment now. There is not a cat either. They DO serve food... though they are not a restaurant. You won't find a better place to shoot pool than here. The equipment is in great condition, the room is pretty big and has a clean 'contemporary' style unlike other stereotypical 'hole in the wall' places. Their drafts are cheap and its only $10bux to shoot during the day. You don't have to be a 'pool player' to have a good time there either.
I have been so impressed with the service and care that I have received at Salama Chiropractic Center! The staff is so warm and friendly and make me feel welcome each time I walk through the door. I totally look forward to my weekly visits. :) Dr. Salama is fabulous! He has corrected so many of my lower back problems and now I am able to move and finally find relief! I can not thank him enough! He has shown me several exercises and stretches that I can do at home to continue to improve my condition. It is obvious that he has true compassion for his patients and enjoys what he does. I am so satisfied and completely trust the Salama Chiropractic team, that my whole family now sees Dr. Salama and I would highly recommend Salama Chiropractic to everyone else!
Southbridge Dentistry is my preferred Dentist in Littleton CO. They provide the best oral care services in town and their staff is friendly and professional.
Very much help full , also knows Bengali language. Very near to Vishnu ghat.
None
I really appreciate the staff @ Marine Hills Dentistry and Dr Hahn. From the moment you walk in you feel important. Everyone is very friendly and the work done is excellent. I have gotten so many compliments on my teeth since having them done over a year ago. I am not good at keeping up on my dentist visits due to bad experiences in the past but they all make me feel comfortable here. I would recommend Dr Hahn & his staff to anyone.
Súper
I have been going to Aspen for the past 4 years and they have always treated me with kindness, respect and honesty. Most recently, I took my truck in for a repair of the power steering belt which had failed. They stated that one of the bolts from a timing belt service they had completed months before had been sheered off. Even though they could not immediately pinpoint how or why the bolt was sheered, they took immediate responsibility for the failure of the bolt and fixed my vehicle for FREE, including re-tapping the bolt and installing a new harmonizer! Absolutely incredible! They could have easily taken advantage of the situation and I would have been none-the-wiser. Instead, they now have a customer for life and someone who will sing their praises to everyone who will listen! Thank you Aspen Automotive!
Joshua Frank and Frankly Focused did an amazing job capturing my daughter's unique personality for her high school senior pictures. Joshua found the perfect outdoor location and chose the ideal time of day for the shoot to maximize the beautiful natural lighting. My daughter is naturally shy but Joshua and his assistant quickly made her feel at ease and relaxed. It wasn't long into the shoot that we all could see her smile widen and brighten as she truly began to enjoy the process! Her photos turned out amazing! I'm scheduled with Joshua next month to take photos with my kids, this time at a unique indoor location....can't wait! I highly recommend Frankly Focused for all your professional photography needs!
My wife and I moved from Washington, DC to Ann Arbor. With only two weekend visits the Toth Team helped us find a great house in a tight market. They were extremely responsive throughout and made the process quite easy, even setting up a long-distance closing so that we didn't have to fly in just to sign documents. Overall it was excellent service from the whole team.
Sinds ik klant ben van MacHelp is er op computergebied een wereld voor me open gegaan. Niet alleen omdat we enthousiast zijn over 'Apple', maar ook om de uitstekende service. De medewerkers van MacHelp denken mee, geven deskundig advies en dat meestal zonder wachttijd!! Ik loop geregeld de winkel in de Geerstraat even binnen: om nieuwe dingen te zien, een praatje te maken en bijna altijd weer te vertrekken met een handige tip. En als ik ergens even niet uit kom, bel ik en worden mijn computerinstellingen op afstand aangepast. AndUrs (training coaching en advies), Jan Jutstra
Bought my second bike from Victor Devine dealership today. A new CBR600F is simply fantastic. The service was brilliant, everyone was very helpful and made my day. The service department are top notch - installed all extras perfectly. Fitted new tyres for free as a gift. Every time I brought my old CBR125R for service or with any problem, the issues were resolved the same day. The longest I had to weight in the past was 3 days, when some part had to be delivered. Victor Devine dealership provide top class work. This is opinion from first hands, not "a friends' friend said in his wee blog". Will certainly come back and recommend to my friends.
None
Mark provides a very impressive sales experience. He listens to what you want and helps you understand what you will and won't like about the vehicles he sells. I test drove vehicles at 8 dealers and he was, by far, the most helpful. Vehicles have become so complicated that sales people really need to listen to what you are looking for to know what parts of the vehicle they need to direct you to. I test drove an MDX at another dealer and felt it was a sloppy drive. Then I found out it has an adjustable suspension (though Mark) and figured out I loved it. I'm super happy with the car, and with Mark's help I know how the functions work that are meaningful to me.
None
hier ist die bestes in der welt
I have three dogs. They are taking great care of all my babies. They have performed surgeries, I utilize the herbal remedies as well as their traditional medicine services. I love having one vet that can do traditional and alternative medicine. To include acupuncture and chiropractic services. Yeah! I have referred several friends to them. Very Good! Rochelle
I appreciate the commitment and hard work which they place on my teeth. The deep cleaning was well done and my mouth feels much better. Rossana Alfonso listens to your concerns and needs and focus on it to make it better. A great place to go and I would recommend New Image Dentistry to my friends and family.
The best coffee in Saxmundham. There's always a friendly welcome and it's an Aladdin's cave of artisan foods.
None
We went to FCER on Saturday night with our 2 year old running a fever and possible ear infection expecting to be there for several hours. However, to our surprise we walked into an empty waiting room. We were taken to a room within five minuets & was seen by a Doctor within 15 minuets. The staff was very attentive and sensitive to our 2 year olds needs. It was fast, friendly and efficient we will definitely use FCER again if the need arises.
As a software engineer I can spend up to 10 hours a day in from of the computer. This obviously isn’t good for my upper back and neck… I always commit to trying to sit properly but to be honest this doesn’t last long. I get very tight in the neck and shoulders, to the point where I can be pain. I’ve been to see Anna a number of times to help loosen the area, which has been very effective. She has also given me some simple stretches to do at my desk, which I try to do as and when I remember. I now see Anna once a month for a maintenance treatment – well worth it!
I've been going to Dr. Barkley for a year and am very pleased with the dental services I have received. The staff is always welcoming and inviting. They also make me as comfortable as possible during dental procedures. The services from Dr. Barkley and his staff are thorough and efficient. I would highly recommend this office for all of your dental needs.
None
Dr. Eshom and his staff are the most professional dentist staff I've used to date. From my first visit, I've felt very welcomed and very comfortable. I recommend this dentist to anyone wanting to change their smile for the better!
Phenomenal burger!
Buongiorno..... E' Passato quasi un anno da quando siamo con Network Service e sinceramente ne sono estremamente felice , ma soprattutto SODDISFATTO. Offrono i migliori servizi del Web, ma soprattutto sono molto professionali e pazienti.....Un ringraziamento speciale lo dedico a Lucia, Lara, e Massimo. Grazie ancora Sergio
Preferred Insurance provides my commercial liability insurance; I could not recommend them more highly. The variety of services available and the honest, straight-forward insurance consultations I have received have been very beneficial for my business.
I go to this school at the moment great school 100% GREAT !!!
the best service provider in faridabad about hospital beds, cpap,bi-pap, wheelchair, oxygen cylinders, etc. i have met before thanks a lot of amit manocha for giving his services.
These guys are amazing! The front end of my car was smashed and a lot needed to be repaired. They got my car back on the road extraodanarily fast so that I could make it back to school in time to move in and start my first day of classes. These guys went above and beyond and were my auto angels. Thank You Thank You Thank You.
Good facilities with affordable price................
Fast service, no problems. Will recommend. Very helpfull.
None
On a recent Sunday afternoon, I decided to take the advice of a fried and try, what she described as the best pizza in the New Center / Midtown / Downtown Detroit area. I had been by this establishment on numerous occasions but never actually going in. I had always thought of it as a "burger and a beer joint". However, to my delight, it was much more than that. The atmosphere was relaxed and laid back, while the staff was very cordial and accommodating. After scanning the menu for ten minutes or so (took me a while to decide due to the multiple selections that tempted my taste buds), I decided on the Maui Wowie Pizza. I loved the fact that it was freshly made, small enough for one person and yet large enough to be split by two. Now I'm not one to embellish the merits of food...especially when it comes to pizza, but THIS pie was by far the BEST Hawaiian pizza that I had ever eaten, and I have eaten many. It chad just the right amount of toppings, with a flavorful crust and the fresh basil gave it a little extra surprise than would normally come on a Hawaiian style pizza. I highly recommend giving this place a try. I will definitely be making this place one of my haunts! The Maui Wowie will be by standard selection, but I look forward to the Bronx Bomber and the BBQ Chicken as well! Oh, and on a side note, I've heard that the beer here isn't too shabby either...lol
My fiance has always been interested in Martial Arts and when he mentioned possibly wanting to take classes here, I immediately responded with, "I'd love to take the classes with you!" Then I thought about what I had just committed to and became EXTREMELY nervous. I stressed about starting for the entire week (I mean REALLY stressed) and then the day finally came for our first class. Upon arriving, we were greeted warmly by EVERYONE and not one person made us feel unwelcome. The class went so well and by the end, all of my nerves had disappeared and I was very very excited about coming to the next class. Any person here that you are communicating with, whether it is an instructor or a new friend, is extremely helpful and they all want you to succeed without feeling any pressure or judgement. What better atmosphere could you ask for? I have only been training here for 4.5 weeks, however this program has given me a new outlook on a lot of things and most importantly, it's so much fun! My fiance and I are finding ourselves much more interested in practicing techniques at home rather than wedding planning. Not complaining though :) I would and DO recommend training here to my friends and everyone else! I guess it's also important to point out that what are you are learning during classes is very useful and can be applied to our every day. Whether it's life lessons, a physical self-defense technique, or learning how to fall without injuring yourself, everything here is taught in a way that can be understood with modern-day scenarios.
Took my car there to get the bumper replaced after a fender bender and they did a great job. They worked with the insurance company to ensure I didn't have to worry about additional costs. As an added bonus when I picked up the car, they cleaned the inside and out! Highly recommend!
Closesy shop to FSGA that sells Swedish snus. Hopefully they get more than just General soon!
I was recommended by my friends and i must say that this is one of the rare aircon company in Singapore that is certainly honest. I request for a chemical overhaul which will cost me $150 per unit but they told me that i don't need to pay so much because my aircon are still very clean and they did general aircon servicing for me and i paid only $35 each unit x 3 = $140. Very honest and professional. I will certainly recommend Singapore Aircon Services to anyone!
Great desserts! I love the red velvet cake. The service was good and so is the food.
Currently closed due to fire.
Having grown up in Arizona and California, I know what authentic Mexican food tastes like. This is authentic Mexican food. I've lived in Hawaii for nearly a year, have visited most of the islands, and this is possibly the best Mexican food that I've had in the state. Lucy's even gives a lot of the authentic places back in Arizona and California a run for their money. I had the carnitas plate and my girlfriend had the bean burrito plate. We were both very satisfied, and we ended up having enough food for 2 more meals each (a total of 6 meals for purchasing 2; the portion sizes are huge). The carnitas were perfectly crispy, not the soggy, greasy mess that you get at a lot of "authentic" places. The tortillas were delicious and tasted/felt freshly made. The guacamole was awesome and clearly homemade (we saw them making some while we were ordering). The food is AMAZING. The price is AMAZING. The portions are ENORMOUS. The servers are AWESOME. If you're in Hilo, you should try eating here.
EXCELENTE YA FUIMOS MILES DE VECES CON AMIGO Y LA VERDAD CADA VEZ MEJOR
Great, fresh-tasting sandwiches and a really great atmosphere!
Wir waren vollauf zufrieden mit dem Hotel. Die Zimmer sind modern und zugleich wohnlich eingerichtet, alles ist in einem Top-Zustand und wir wurden äußerst freundlich empfangen.
Amazing beer in an incredible location. Currently, Tacoma Brewery Company holds Tap Night three days a week: Thursday, Friday and Saturday nights. Typically, they have over 10, count them, ten different hand crafted beers that were made on location. For the beer aficionado, this is your place!
I found Rooter-Man through the yellow pages in my local phone book and I'm so happy I did. The representative was here well within the time promised, he accessed the problem and solution within minutes, explained all the pro's and con's, the procedure and price up-front. David was professional, truly a gentlemen and I felt complete comfort and relief that he was able to address and fix our problem. At the conclusion of the work he made sure that everything was in working order and even went a step further to peek in the septic tank. He also introduced me to a product they sell which will help in making sure this same problem doesn't happen again. AND...to top it off, the company even gives you a 'sweet' parting gift. I would recommend Rooter-Man and David R. any day of the week. Thank you.
None
None
Very nice place, Great mood, Great food, great music, utterly expensive.
別の病院で中断してた虫歯治療の再開だったのですが、状態に合わせて処置をしてくださりました。また、将来を見据えた診断説明を丁寧にして下さりこれからどうしていけばよいか意識付けをすることができました。ありがとうございました。デジタル診断書も凄いです。プロ精神に色々感動しました。
James does my hair and is awesome! I tried stylists all over town looking for the one who could do my hair just right and James is that person! He does such a great job that now my mom and sisters and me all go to him. He helps me make my hair the way I want it to look and I get lots of compliments. You won't be disappointed!
I've been coming here for years, and the place is absolutely awesome! It really is a hidden gem
Thanks to Kerstin Stevens in the spa! The magical hand peel and facial were fantastic! Wish I had taken before and after pictures, the difference is remarkable! She is always so upbeat -- as well as being on top of the latest in skin care! Thanks for the superb job of keeping my skin in good shape!
Best auto body shop in New England -- hands down! How many people do you know feel comfortable taking their car in to get fixed? I was one of those people who hated it and always had a bad experience in which I felt like they were trying to take advantage of me. At Rego's -- they have always treated me, my friends and family like their own family! It's always such a smooth, pleasant experience taking my car in to get fixed. They set you up with a rental car that comes to the garage, eliminating an extra step to a rental company (unless you have one you'd like to go to) and, thanks to their perfectionist attitude with their clients (like I am with my own clients) -- they always give me my car back looking 111% better than how it looked before the damage was even done! Part of me almost looks forward to needing auto body work on my car because my car always comes out looking better and because it's like visiting family :-) Thank you, Rego's, for such excellent service! You are all amazing!
I've live here for 8 years. Property Management & staff are awesome. Affordable & mostly quiet property.
I had an accident in one of the storms a few weeks ago. It wasnt much but it did dent my side panel on the front of my car. I called Brad and he had a tech out that same day. The repair was fast! Thank You.
None
It was 9:51 pm today when I entered the subway restaurant at 811 S. Mason. The guy at the counter told me they were closed even though the large sign at the door displayed Open. I left. Then I drove past this subway on Grandpark and wanted to try my luck even though the time was now 9:57 pm. To my surprise, the counter lady agreed to make a sandwich when I mentioned that there wa s still a minute left. Eddy, her helper promptly made the sandwich for me and I was in and out in less than 3 minutes. This is called ultimate customer service. Very pleased with them both. Employees like them need to be a acknowledged. I told them I will leave a feedback and here it is.
I have seen firsthand the work that this company does and can attest to their professionalism and quality. From the foundation to the roof, they do it right!
My wife and I recently sold our home and purchased another thanks to Steve Hopkins. We have referred Steve to our friends over the years, and when it was time, we asked him to list OUR home. He helped us select a competitive price, gave us valued advice on staging it, managed a very effective marketing campaign. We were able to attract an all cash buyer for close to the asking price. Once we had the cash, Steve helped us find suitable temporary housing so we could wait to pounce on a short sale opportunity, which we were able to do. During the long short sale process, he kept us posted regularly and kept our spirits up as we waited. Finally, we closed on our current home, and we are thrilled with the home, the entire process, and with Steve. Throughout the many month process, Steve was always responsive, understanding, patient with us, and never tired of showing us homes. We always felt so CONFIDENT with Steve. He paid attention to every detail. He even took me to the city planning office for the home I purchased to understand the future possibilities for the meadow adjacent to our new home. He is amazing.
Great customer service. Everyone there was very helpful and informative. I have been to several vape shops and this by far was the best. Hey guys try the Hootersx2. You won't be disappointed!!! MJ
Sam was great helped with all our question and got us signed up quickly and showed us to our unit. Thanks Sam
This place is so awesome! Service is great and the food is amazing! It was such a pleasant surprise right there on Roosevelt! Gluten free menu is extensive and delicious. Love. This. Place.
I purchased a new Nissan in '10 and it was the most pleasant auto buying experience I have had in my life. I have purchased many autos in the 45 plus years that I have been driving. So I decided to return to Hoselton to purchase my 2013 Nissan Altima. I hoped that the previous experience was not a once in a lifetime experience. Well, it was not! This experience exceeded my expectations. My sales consultant, Nick Cooper, was a pleasure to work with. He made my most recent auto buying experience quite enjoyable. The Hoselton Nissan staff really go out of their way to serve their customers! I got a fair price for my trade and an excellent price on my new Nissan. Hoselton really has the auto buying experience nailed! I would recommend Hoselton Nissan to anyone in the market for a new or preowned vehicle. I know that I will return to Hoselton for all my future automobile needs.
I just leased a 2013 S60 from AutoNation Volvo Irvine. Ghaleb Abdallah was my sales consultant and I'm very happy with the service I received. From the moment he approached me I could tell he was working for me. I told him what I was interested in and we were off on the test drive. Shortly after we went over package options and I told him what I was willing to pay. It was getting late in the day so he said I could go home and he would call me the next day. I got a phone call the next day from Roy who is one of the managers and after a couple obligatory negotiations back and forth we came to a price that worked for both sides. I went down to sign the paperwork and unfortunately they had to do a dealer trade for the car that I want from LA and with traffic being what it is there was a huge delay in the delivery of the car. Ghaleb apologized and offered to deliver the car himself with the paperwork to my home in San Clemente later that night. That is what I call customer service and as someone who leases a new car every year and half (and I have two) Ghaleb and his team are a group that I would definitely bring my business back to.
The employees here are true animal lovers. I would take my dogs her to stay any time.
Loistavaa maukasta ruokaa ja palvelukin ammattitaitoista ja mutkatonta. Suosittelen :)
Hamid Shirazi took care of my needs and helped me get the car I wanted!
This place needs to improve its customer service particularly in the communication area and coordinations between its employees. There are many other storage and moving supplies places around where one gets much better service with a smile ..
Stengt pga oppussing i kort periode, men gratis kaffe var satt ut allikevel:-)
These guys are good. They are young and energetic, they know the rules to the online marketing. They don't cut corners, they play by the Google rules. I recommend Dave and Vic they will do you right on your internet presence. They have helped my plumbing business grow on the internet. Thanks. Jeff P
" DR QUINN AND HIS OFFICE STAFF WERE VERY PROFESSIONAL, HELPFUL, CONSIDERATE, AND THOROUGH. I GOT THE ORTHO CARE I NEEDED - AND NOW MY MOUTH FEELS BETTER - WITH MY ISSUED ADDRESSES: TEETH STRAIGHTENED WITH RETAINERS, CLENCHING ADDRESSED WITH MOUTH GUARD, AND A ORTHO TEAM ESTABLISHED (AT MY AGE) SO I CAN CHECK BACK IN WHEN NEEDED. I HAD NOT BEEN TO ORTHO APPT SINCE MY TEENS - SO HARD TO COME BACK - BUT THIS TEAM MADE IT VERY WORTHWHILE, TOOK CARE OF ALL THE PAPERWORK, AND MADE SURE I WAS HAPPY. THANK YOU "
A very well established school
Great bakery, friendly service, very reasonable prices, Always look foreword to seeing Marie.
beim ersten telefonischen Kontakt habe ich eine gute Beratung erhalten. Auch die weitere Vorgehensweise ist sehr professionell. Sehr kompetent, flexibel und sehr zuverlässig.
None
I've been going to Image Nail Spa for a few months now. I only went there a couple of times under the previous owners. There has recently been a change in ownership and the new owner, Timmy Nguyen, is awesome! He really looks out for his customers. He wants his customers to enjoy their visit and relax. They even serve beverages while you get a pedicure (soft drinks and wine). They keep the salon very clean and take great efforts to sterilize the tools, etc. I highly recommend going there!
They were very professional and friendly. I will definitely go back here again :)
I absolutely love this program! After researching and visiting several other Karate Schools, we were certain that this was the best school for our 5-year old son. Mr. Rockhold is very skilled with kids, and he immediately captured our son's attention. He is extremely patient, while still holding each child accountable for practicing t...he correct technique/moves. The program was different than the others in that I did not have to sign a long-term contract. I also like that we can choose from several class options, and can change the day each week if need be. This will become more important in the fall when our son resumes his busy baseball schedule. I would highly recommend this school for any level of karate enthusiast.
A nice, friendly place to get a great hair cut. The best part is the price!
This place also can make large orders of their fried chicken, which are perfect for parties. So stop by for some delicious artery clogging chicken! Awesome dishes and awesome chinese service!
Their detail department did a great job cleaning the interior and exterior of my car. The service department also went the extra mile in fixing my license plate frame during my last service. It's nice they also have Express Lube so you don't need an appointment.
I've stayed here many times. It's a basic Motel 6 setup with affordable clean rooms and friendly staff. I usually reserve a room online with a promo code to get a 10% discount before I arrive. This location is two doors down from Hopworks Urban Brewery for good inexpensive food and there's much local nightlife/entertainment of the kind Portland is known for up and down SE Powell! In the AM there is free coffee in the office, but I recommend driving the mile up the way to Stumptown's on SE Division.
I'm a lefty living in Melbourne and I wanted to buy a Gretsch G5191 TA model. Nothing anywhere to be found in Melbourne, so I did some be-Googling....which is how I found The Guitar Lounge. First, I rang Robert to have some questions answered about the guitar I was looking at it. It was clear from the get-go that this bloke knows his guitars. He answered all my questions, particularly in relation to sound difference between Gretsch models, and between semi-hollows v solid body etc.. I explained to him what feel and sound I was after, and he suggested some suitable options. Most importantly, he didn't try to sell me something I didn't want/need. It was clear that he was more concerned that I got the right guitar for me, rather than the right guitar for his budgets :) Being Melbourne based, I was initially quite hesitant to buy from an interstate shop without testing the axe. After speaking with Rob for 10 mins, I was at ease and went ahead and ordered. He made it clear that if I didn't like the axe when I received it, money back no questions. The guitar had to be ordered in from o/s and Rob kept me fully updated with the ETA....calling me and e-mailing me several times during the course. The axe arrived when he said it would :) , and now that I have it in my hands, all I can say is WOW. It is everything he said it was, does everything he said it could and just sounds delicious!. Interstaters, do not hesitate to purchase from this cat!!! Seldom have I experienced this exceptional level of customer service and care from anyone in the guitar/music industry. It's clear to me that Rob is truly passionate about his trade. ***** Highly Recommended ***** PS: I'm yet to find anywhere else in Aus with as good pricing, either!
quality job every time we love the work they do for us and you will also so try them for all of your land care needs.
Great everything...tganks kris tv.
Find great local gifts!
None
Very good place, excellent food and nice people working there. Worth every penny.
The park and sites were very clean and well taken care of. We came in late they had our information and site marked for us. Great access to the beach. Will go back and stay again.
You guys have wonderful service and fresh flowers. I recommend everyone to go to Flower Shop in Lantana Fl. (Bonostro Design) they will never fail you!
John was a pleasure to work with! We 've just moved into our new home one month ago and have had time to reflect on our experiences of purchasing a home. We appreciated the time John took to keep on top of all the crazy details and negotiations that come with buying a property from a bank. He really made the whole process smooth for us. Thank you John!
Buying a trailer here was extremely easy. The cost was reasonable, the transaction was very smooth. We had a trailer in 20 mins. Highly recommended. Also, when I called Saturday morning, the phone was answered promptly and information was given which was exactly what was said in person when we got there. They are also open until 3pm on Saturday. This helps working folks who have a full time job M - F. Most of the competitors in the area either A. didn't answer their phone B. didn't call back or C. Close on Saturday at Noon. I would definitely do business with Jerry again.
Great food, nice atmosphere, great customer service.
This is a great place to relieve stress and put yourself in a good frame of mind. I have been a member for 4 months and look forward to each class - I knew nothing about Dahn Yoga before signing up with my wife - I make it as often as I can but at least twice a week. Recommended - good teachers.
My wedding was held at the Semple Mansion just this passed Friday, 9/20/13, and let me just say....WOW! My husband & I could not have been more pleased! The space is absolutely breathtaking and all of our guests were blown away by its beauty and could not stop complimenting us on our choice of venue. Katherine, the in house coordinator, was a pleasure to work with and was always willing to help with anything needed! The Grand Foyer, where we held the ceremony, is beautifully decorated with crystal chandeliers that hang from the ceiling that add such a magnificent detail to the room. The dark woodwork is simply beautiful and gives the space a warm & rich look and feel that is absolutely stunning! The newly added Library room across from the Copper Lounge bar is a great place for guests to relax and mingle during social hour as well as just being a unique space for guests to enjoy the ambiance. Our day went by without any mishaps and was an absolute dream come true. If we had to do it all over again, my husband & I know we would choose Semple Mansion as our venue every time!
Excellent food, excellent service. I'm a regular customer now.
The Redemption Camp of The Redeemed Christian Church Of God.
None
This has to be my favourite restaurant in the Chelmsford area. I have now become a regular and tried most things on the menu. The set meal is what I tend to go for....only £15.95 for two courses which is absoilutely excellent value in my opinion. I think it is even cheaper at lunchtime but I usually visit in the evening. Today I had braised steak which was melt in the mouth served with creamy mash and I couldn't resist the lemon tart....so good I will eat it again later in the week if they've still got it on the menu.
I am in Korea. I sent flowers to my mom for her birthday. It was definitely last minute, but they somehow managed to do it. Unfortunately they got there when she wasn't there, but they went between the times I asked. She had just stepped out. She loved them, and sent me a picture. I will keep doing flower deliveries with them!
These guys Rock!! Tiny little place, it's geared more for pickup than for eating in, there's only four tables and one is just for two. The other half of the place is taken up by a pool table. It's a great little place though and the pizza is good!
Customer has not adressed any of these issues with shop managment,if any of these really exist.All repair work at this facility is warrantied by the facility and backed by AAA. Niether company has been imformed of any problem with this persons repairs. I would suggest if this really is a ligitimate problem that this person call Mikes Auto Body and Repair and speak to the owner John Gannon. I know he will be more than willing to listen to the situation and resolve any and all issues.
Town Crier Coming Soon! Opening February 2013!
this place changed my life felipe and sofia amarante give off great energy and provide a stress free environment for anyone who wants to learn jiu jitsu
I took my son here as a diversion from all of his studies. Makeda has a warm, stylish decor. Pleasant, helpful waiter. The food was exceptional. My son loved it. Thanks for keeping the standards high.
My 1996 subaru needed a bit of tlc for the front bumper and fog lights. When I brought it in, everyone at DMI from the receptionist to the mechanics were extremely helpful and welcoming. They kept me up to date on the repairs, and it was rapidly fixed despite having to deal with insurance procedures. If you have any need for body work, and want both a competent and friendly place to do it, I would definitely recommend DMI
If you don't like all the games and want a straight forward deal go to Low Book. I've been happy with my car and the service I have got at Low Book!
We bought a diagnostic ultrasound system from a company in UK. The system was well packed and delivered in time. Unfortunately we had a transport damage because the package dropped down. Phil and Kate were a really big help and helped us with the insurance company. Finally everything was solved and I really want to say thank you for all you have done. It was a great pleasure working with you and we will be happy working with Pack & Send soon.
Super! Bon bouffe, bonne ambiance!!
I have worked with Jamie at Sync3 for the past year and their service is excellent. I have now retained Sync3 to provide monthly maintenance and monitoring of my office computer systems and network, and to maintain our website. They are great to work with and always response and available when needed. They also set up my new offices with all new Ethernet lines in the walls in each office and new patch panel tied into the telephone room of the building floor. Also complete set up of our computers and network at our new office. Great work, and great follow up. I highly recommend Jamie and Sync3.
None
None
Wonderful
The staff is truly amazing.. n Dr Salomon
Good pricing, not a lot of assholes, and great service. Damn good for flint.
We love this church! Come visit.
Great time
Beyond exceptional food, fantastic service and lovely spot. Boudin stuffed rabbit and hanger steak with wild mushroom and bone marrow demi glaze. Amazing.
Excellent skylight repair and done quickly at a very reasonable cost. One of the other two(2) contractors I called for an estimate finally called back to schedule an appointment after Century had already estimated, and finished the repair! Outstanding quick service!! Contractor also went out of his way to fix some additional problems on the roof-- namely some nails that were poking their ugly head through the last roofing replacement. This was also done without additional charge. I highly recommend Century Roofing for such repairs.
Nice little shop! Totally worth checking out.
Hello,last year i had visited your store for my friend's wedding shopping.We found lots of varieties which were useful for all our functions, & ended up buying plenty of products for the bride and myself. i appreciated your service and collection was spectacular.
Unfotunately when we went it was too misty but neverthless it was very beautiful. Probably one of the best castles that I have been to. The scenery is just amazing. Absolutely loved it.
Best Ice cream place around. When ever i go south i stop here on hot days.
Accurate quotes, very reliable services. Best value for my money.
One of the most knowledgable Bridal Stores that my wife and i went to.The Tuxedo that was booked for me was actually surprisingly luxurious in fit and feel.. I am ecstatic with their quality and service. I would absolutely recommend this store to anyone!
None
Gr8 place for a weekend.
None
Een zeer aangename plek om te verblijven. Mooie wijnen, goed eten en vooral veel mogelijk. Wanneer je met de gastheer overlegt is een "menu suprise" een fantastische suggestie.
Excellent tattoo shop with top notch artists. Pooch did my half sleeve and the guy is amazing. One of the best out there.
My Work Site..I just Love this Plant...
We had the best car shopping experience ever and when I tell my friends, they are so envious. First, they were very patient with me. I was really indecisive between getting the CRV or Pilot. They let me take my time, test drive the cars again and again, and run through many payment options. I decided on the Pilot. Jeremey was the one we worked with and he was so helpful with giving a summary of the important things to know in the manual and sitting in the vehicle and showing my me and my son how to operate all of the important and good-to-know features before we left the lot. I did use my Costco membership and had no hassles at all. The quotes they gave me on the phone were the same as when I came in. It saved me a lot of time (long drive there) and effort by getting the pricing upfront. 100% satisfied here. The Pilot is wonderful! Thanks, Jeremey & crew
None
took the tour and it was superb. It made my trip to LA.
None
None
New Paramount always strives to help with any concerns. Help us help you. We have photographed 1000's of great customers and always strive to do our best. We work hard and always offer a 100% guarantee. Just give us a call and we will help.
The pieces we rented from A la Crate were the biggest hit of our wedding. Everyone was asking where we got them and was complimenting the arrangements. The owners had great suggestions and help us craft the perfect look for our day. They were so professional and easy to work with. I would recommend A la Crate to anyone who wants a unique feel for their wedding or event.
Future Ford of Sacramento is very excellent place to buy a vehicle. Owner and employees are very helpful. I met Mr. Raj Karthikeyan over there. He is very nice person.He explains merits and demerits of each car without any bias. Even though I told him that I am here just to inquire about cars, he did not mind and explained properly. I am planing to visit there store soon to buy a car. This is a good place to give a try.. Believe me you will get amazing deals.
Knowledgeable about the products they sell and easy to deal with.
None
Master Cooper is excellent with my daughter. I highly recommend classes here.
Multiplex ambience and very reasonable pricing. World class infrastructure.
Westside plumbers were very efficient and courteous and fixed our broken shower in about 30 mins without mess or fuss - what more can you ask for. Thank you.
I love Dr. Bedoya and her staff <3. I got my braces as an adult and I have loved the work that she is doing. I Iove to smile now and they are not even off yet! My youngest daughter just got her braces put on and we are both excited about seeing the finished job. Thank you Dr. Smiles. You are the ONLY orthodontic we refer people to. That says a lot since my other 3 kids have had braces to by other orthodontics here in town.
Advanced Appliance Repair was amazing. He was in and out within 20 minutes. Had the part to repair our stove with him and the price was reasonable! I highly recommend them!
Best taco de tripa!
We had our son's 13th birthday party at Xtreme Challenge in Thornton a few weeks ago, and my kids (and his 15 friends) are still talking about what an amazing time they had there. We have heard, "that was the best birthday party EVER" more times than we can count! The Xtreme instructors were a lot of fun, but also committed to keeping the party safe, which was very important to me. We have already booked parties for our younger son's party and our older daughter's party—that's how much fun we had!
Had a very good experience here.. Room is very nice and clean. For being a pet room, there are no odors or stains on the floor. Front desk clerk was very helpful on the phone prior to arrival, and accommodating when we arrived. Room Service was fast, had hot food, and was delicious. No problems with our pets staying here and let us park our fifth wheel out front. Pool and hot tub were enjoyable and had towels available. Bathrooms very clean throughout hotel.. Shower pressure was perfect and overall this was just an amazing hotel and stay!
None
This is the best auto repair shop I have ever used. They are honest, trustworthy and they are proud of their work. The prices are very reasonable! My Grandpa told me that a good auto mechanic is one of the most important people to know. I am proud to say I have found my home at Brakes Zone! I will recommend them to everyone that I know! Thanks again for another GREAT job.
Dr. Wallace and his entire team are excellent. He is constantly improving his practice by learning and acquiring the newest technology, his staff is talented and extremely friendly. I have been to many dentists in my life and Dr. Wallace is by far the best. And for those of you who are scared about going to the dentist he is extremely gentle and explains exactly what he is doing so you know what to expect and there are no surprises. I can give him 5 stars without any reservation.
Forca Dragao.
Had a great experience. My wife and I stayed here for a night. Great breakfast, very nice, spacious room. And close to Starbucks :), stores, restaurants, and much more.
Stephanie is the best!! The only Hygienist I've ever been to who doesn't have me walking away in pain. LOVE her!
Quality school.
Linda....my name is Jill and I am the owner of Serenity. I was suprised to hear your negative feedback. At Serenity, we have very talented stylists who all do an amazing job. I looked in our clients list and there is no Linda Trafice in our database. Anyhow I see your a world traveler being to London, Missouri & Raleigh all in the past month. I see that you have had bad experiences in all these locations. If your are in the area again I would be more than happy to cut your hair myself for free. As far as the price, we charge $35 for a wash, cut & style which is very competitive for our area.
Great food and a wonderful selection.
I, like most pet owners, would do just about anything for my furbaby. When I take my pet to Ingersoll Animal Hospital, I have every bit of confidence that their caring staff of office personnel, techs, and veterinarians care as much about Stella as I do. The vets take time with her, thoroughly explain everything they are doing, address any concerns I may have, and provide practical tips for follow-up care. I appreciate their expertise in animal care and humble nature as people who love animals as much as I do. I would recommend Ingersoll Animal Hospital to anyone who seeks affordable, thorough, and genuine care for their pets. They make me feel like Stella and I are their number one priority each time we go in. Hands down the best animal care facility in the Des Moines metro!
Had an excellent stay at property #5644, Kenison's Baywatch. It's a great property, convenient to everything we were interested in seeing and doing, and just the right size for the family (even my Mom's overly-jumpy Yorkie liked it!). The sunsets were beautiful, and the hot tub was a welcome amenity. Keyless entry and the membership in the Village Club for the week were very welcome (I went to swim laps in the pool almost every day), and the sound access was very nice as well. Only complaint... we must have found a dozen little caterpillars inside the house during our stay, but that's something to be expected this time of year (And I'll confess to leaving the doors open sometimes), but a quick vacuum took care of that problem (and this house has a small hand-held in the laundry!). Places to recommend... Josephine's for Italian (in Kitty Hawk - it's small, but the food is excellent) and Pamlico Jack's (great food and wonderful views of the sound). I'd also recommend a dolphin tour (we used Kitty Hawk Kites), and of course, visit the lighthouses in the area. We'll be using Resort Realty next year!
Professional service, good installation and reasonable price. Would not hesitate to use again.
Loved this place - here on business - spacious, warm, comfortable bed. The breakfast was lovely and eggs perfect!! Would definitely stay again.
ხოტევის მთავარანგელოზის ეკლესია — XVII საუკუნეის ეკლესია ამბროლაურის მუნიციპალიტეტის სოფელ ხოტევში. ეკლესია მოქმედია და მიეკუთვნება ნიკორწმინდის ეპარქიას. Khotevi Archangel Church — XVII centuries church Which belongs to ambrulauri District vil. khotevi. The church is valid and belongs to the Diocese of Nikortsminda.
I have been playing Minecraft since Alpha 1.1.0, and I just went on playing it for 3 years, and now after a break, I am getting back into it!
Was the best meal that i've had in years!!!
None
I used the Law Office of Simon Goldenberg to file for Bankruptcy this year and would highly recommend them to anyone. They helped me discharge $30,000 in credit card debt and the process couldn't have been easier. They were very diligent in answering all of my correspondence and made a stressful situation very manageable for myself. Feel like the weight of the world was lifted off of my shoulders!!!
Outside: the hotel exterior doesn't look very nice. Parking is easy. The hotel surroundings look nice. some mountains, forests and right in front of the hotel is a lake. (NOT to swim!) Rooms: We stayed in room 47, 44 and 43 which looked very nice. Room 47 and I believe 44 have a very nice view of the mountains and lake with a nice terrace. Both the room and bathroom were very clean. The interior appears to be updated quite recently. Don't know how the other rooms are. Restaurant: the food was good. When we mentioned that we were not able to attend breakfast on Sunday (which starts at 08:00!) the women behind the reception created a bag for the 3 of us with bread, fruit, drinks that we could take with us (no charge). These bags were all in our rooms when we returned from dinner. This is the kind of service that makes a hotel special. I would return. Room Tip: Not sure if all rooms have been updated. The rooms with a balcony looked very nice.
Treated by Stavros Pehlivanidas and Danish Chand like my tech savvy sons. They helped me file claims (3), ouch, over 3 months and never made me feel like a stupid senior. I was even convinced to upgrade to the Iphone 5. My, I am cool. Both these young men are not only competent, but they also have great people skills. I love to go in this store...Okay, Stavros, I'll try not to have to. xo
Не раз у них заказываю печать на дисках и обложки. Да и много другой мелочи цены всегда хорошие
None
Coyote Ugly Saturday Night Party!
I had the seasoned and smoked ribs with coleslaw and barbecue beans all I can say is awesomeness!!!!
Nice place to stay.
My favorite is the Phad Thai, it is hard for me to try anything else when I go there!
Georgie's Consignment Shop, love the ladies, always helpful, smiling, and very professional! The best consignment shop, great clothes, easy to find, and always lots to choice from! Well worth the trip from Jenison to Ada, MI. Love the way they make me look! Susan Anderson
None
Is the best.
I always visit Vinos Finos whenever I'm in Raleigh. The food is great, but the wine is the best! The service has always been second-to-none whether it's busy or quiet. I still remember that first time, holding-off in anticipation, because I knew it was going to be good; and that first taste - yum! Now I just go there and relax, and try not to regret having to leave because I know I'll be back.
Not only do they make the best sandwiches around (Try the Numan IV- with sriracha) but they also offer a great environment for casual or work meetings. WIFI included and a must stop if you are in Rogers!
お店の什器をお願いしました。とても熱心で親切、丁寧な仕事でした。
ES HERMOSO ESTE LUGAR, PERFECTO PARA IR EN FAMILIA
I grew up in Cedarville, Ill. I have not been back since I joined the miltary and went off to war back in 1970. One fond memory as a boy was hanging out at the Mobile station with the mechanics. It was much like Mayberry, everyone new everyone and folks were just plain nice.
میدان هوایی بگرام به نظر من بسیار یک میدان هوایی خوب است در سطح افغانستان اما متاسفانه که در این زمانه در دست این انسان های وحشی صفت افتیده است خداوند بر حال تمام مسلمان ها رحم نموده و ما را از زیر سلطه این گرک هایی که به شکل انسان در آورده شده اند نجان بدهد آمین ثم آمین...........
Chris did a fantastic job repairing the dime size chip/crack in my windshield. Fit me in between customers, took about 20 min and only cost $40. Lets hope I don't get another one, but if I do, I'm going here again.
I used to order from them almost everyday and the service as well as the employees are excellent. Really clean and professional. They are kind and helpful!
By far, our favorite breakfast spot in Ogunquit. And Leanne, the owner, is the best!
Awesome service , great people! Carl Morris did an OUTSTANDING JOB! song that we got what we needed in a family vehicle.
Deborah's Place is a warm wonderful "Home" for Women. Staff are encouraging, positive, up-beat. May God continue to bless Deborah's Place and truly, sincerely hope they branch out because so many people need them!
Max has always been treated with kindness and efficiency. The staff is courteous and helpful while answering my questions. I would recommend the clinic to anyone.
The chain of hotels that is connected with Universal Journeys are mostly well known hotels that provide very good facilities that sooth the customers. They have contact of most of the best hotels in and around Rajasthan. Universal Journeys will also make the custom made plans and bookings, for the customers on request.
15th Anniversary Celebration
My mom had a great experience and got a great deal. Many thanks to the manager and Jeffrey.
Terrific, fast service!
Fabulous School. Best Montessori School in the DC area. They are a wonderful school that helps children become more independent while still being kids. My son is 5 and is doing 2nd grade math. I Love Norbeck Montessori. I wish they continued beyond Kindergarten.
This place is bomb, I live near the place and I go every chance I get!
None
None
I bought a 2014 Highlander from Mark Dennis this week. It was a pleasant experience. Its about the 4th or 5th Toyota that we've bought from Bill Penney.
Great Pho at a fair price. Friendly staff and clean inside make this a great lunch stop when it is cold outside to warm up with some awesome Pho.
I stayed here on Sunday 7th October 2012 and was very impressed. The staff and service at the hotel was excellent and the room (a skyline room on the 17th floor - the view / balcony is great) was perfect. Particular thanks to the front of house staff who were very helpful in finding the sights and sounds in and around Midtown. Great hotel well recommended - I work in the travel industry and will recommend this to anyone wanting a nice hotel in a great location.
My cat was suffering terribly with flea allergies. After being treated by Dr. Nina, she is doing so much better. I couldn't be happier with the care she received.
Supplied wedding bouquet and button holes. Amazing and delivered all the way to Preston for us.
I have used three Atlanta area Toyota dealers and by a huge margin Nalley Toyota outshines them all in the service department. Cherie was very thorough and the service tech explained what he was observing under my car. Just a great experience and they washed and vacuumed my car without asking! Highly recommend them!
Clean, dry, perfect temperature -- and a very friendly and helpful staff. I feel my belongings are very secure and I can access the space easily. I have had many storage spaces in my day, and this one has been the best experience by far -- no competition!
Leuk sfeervol restaurant. Lekker gegeten, goed bereid. Vriendelijk personeel welke op je op juiste manier als gast behandelen.
Perfect 9-Hole course right outside city limits and even accessible from the subway.
We have been going here for years. Always getting wonderful friendly service and the perfect menu of a range of food choices. Large plates and small bites to go with a wide selection of interesting and delicious wines. Their flights of wine are quite interesting and come on a small card identifying what you are drinking. We stopped in for a light meal and were once again amazed and how good the food was. A warm spinach salad with delicious bacon and a perfectly cooked egg. Crustinis with garlic and heirloom tomatoes and goat cheese. Tomatillo and avocado soup was so tasty and perfectly spiced. Don't judge this restaurant by one persons bad experience. We have been over a dozen times and it never disappoints. Tonight they were at the top of their game.
Excellent school
The food at North China is what keeps us coming back, aside from it's neighborhood convenience! After moving to Dayton, we tried several of the recommended Chinese restaurants with this making our top two of Chinese, along with CJ Chan's. I would recommend everything I have tried including the Moo Shoo Chicken, Sweet and Sour Chicken, and Chicken and Vegetables. The service is also very accommodating - I have a terrible habit of ordering just about everything "my way", and they have ALWAYS gotten it right! Excellent service and surprisingly pleasing decor are the icing on the cake at North China.
I could not have trusted a better person with my daughters needs. The staff is amazing and very helpful. They know her name and you always feel like family when you come in. Every one from Dr. Adam to the receptionist is so warm,. professional and caring. Keep up t he good work "HEIGHTS ORTHODONTICS"!
None
Rachel has photographed our pregnancy though our almost 3 year olds life including his birthday parties. Her pictures capture such precious memories and she always seems to catch his one of a kind expressions!
Great food and great people. Family friendly. Surf and turf special is very good. Their house chowder is excellent. I travel a great deal and this is my favorite tavern by far.
One of my favorite places in the world! !?
I've placed multiple orders for pickup and more than once have been greeted by Nicole, who looks you in the eye, smiles (!) and speaks clearly. People just don't do that anymore, and it's really pleasant to see. And oh yeah, pizzas from here are always great.
Wonderful and very knowledgeable! They have a very good selection and reasonable priced. Would highly recommend to anyone! Thank you for making my yard look wonderful.
Was seen by appointment right on time. Staff were very efficient. Dr. Smucker was personable and easy to communicate with. He listened attentively and answered all of my questions. He thoroughly discussed options and plans for my health care. I came away from the office feeling this was the best choice for quality medical care and that Dr. Smucker was an excellent physician.
Went to CLS Direct after finding them on Craigslist. I am a college student and was looking for a new bed. I was greeted by Chris at the door and he was very helpful in helping me find the bed i needed and also gave me a great price. Great service and great prices plus free shipping so i was a happy customer
i LOVE Del Taco!
None
Trives godt her.
None
Randy fit me in same day I called for emergency furnace repair. Replaced the bad blower motor with a brand new one, took him approx 30 min. Total cost $355. Furnace works great.
None
Erik Stensland takes amazing pictures of Rocky Mountain National Park (RMNP). The resultant artwork would look great in either home or office. While the images are of RMNP they wouldn't be out of place elsewhere in the world. The gallery is a lovely place to visit with perfect lighting to show off the beautiful images of the scenery in the area. Helpful advice as to what print (if any) would be suitable for the customer is provided by Erik and his team. Thanks!
BEST SERVICE FOR FEMALE PAYING GUEST , HOSTEL , RENTAL ROOMS AT MUMBAI BORIVALI KANDIVALI ..............
I am so happy I found Clarus Dermatology and Dr. Shah. I had some areas on my face that were always dry and flaking. Dr. Shah recommended a laser treatment. His quiet confidence and sense of humor made me feel comfortable throughout the procedure. The results speak for themselves, I wish I would have had this treatment years ago.
Beautiful place, great food, very friendly staff.
We've had Randy work on our car a couple of times and he always does a fantastic job! He's very thorough, quick and charges an honest price. We never leave there feeling like we've been ripped off, and I really appreciate that. So many shops I've been to try to take advantage of me because I'm a woman, but Randy is not like that. I'm so glad we found his shop because I finally have someone I trust other than my dad to fix our vehicles. I also found out he does the work for our church bus and van, so that's a pretty good recommendation right there!
Absolutely love this shop. The guys are super cool, very knowledgeable, and are willing to spend as much time as it takes to make sure you get what you need. In addition, their bike service is super quick!
Warm atmosphere with plenty of exposed brick and reclaimed wood. The service was excellent; can't think of anything I would improve. The food was delicious and arrived in a timely fashion even with a packed restaurant. The price isn't cheap but I will definitely return to Salt.
The people that work at this location are by far the best of all Starbucks in the Jacksonvlike area! They are friendly, smiling & give 110% to everyone. You feel like family when you go there not just another customer!!
My "go-to" for Livermore cabernets. John Evans does some really big cabernets, and his peach mignon is simply delightful. The Big White House offers a very deep tasting menu and the setting is truly unique. John's sister is an artist and many of her original paintings adorn the tasting room, including originals of some of the wine labels. If you go wine tasting in Livermore, put Big White House at the top of the list!
Spider House is the Austin coffee shop experience!! The drinks are absolutely delicious, and the food is awesome! The service is friendly, one usually ends up leaving with more friends!
My son has been apart of CCN Destin since he was 6 months old, he is now 5. Do to a move I enrolled him in another center, that lasted no more than 2 months and despite the traveling I re-enrolled him in the Destin CCN where he remains to this day. The center and providers are a wonderful and very family like. Mrs.Theresa, the center's Director is one of a kind and has always had a personal approach to dealings with us parents and Miss Michelle his VPK teacher is a blessing. Her teaching skills are above average and my son is reading at 5!! I would recommend any concerned parent join this family and rest assured that your child will be well loved and taken care of!
I easily check off all 5 stars for my experience at Shaker Family Ford Lincoln. From the moment I walked in and was greeted by Ed Shaker to when James Cianciolo shook my hand a final time before I drove off in my 2011 Honda Accord my experience there was excellent. Jim was especially helpful every step of the way; from our first phone call, through our test drive and signings, Jim answered all of my many questions thoroughly and was certain I knew the full answer and understood everything. Jim really helped me understand the whole process and his knowledge and experience was very easy to pick up on, and was comforting as a first-time buyer. This is a family-owned dealership with a great family-like atmosphere and I highly recommend Shaker Family Ford Lincoln to anybody looking to buy a new or used car.
I discovered Dr. Buttler a little over 2 years ago and he has turned my life around. When I met Dr. Buttler I was having problems with arthritis pain and liver issues. I was taking so many pain killers that I was killing my liver. I was also experiencing menopausal problems, night sweats, hot flashes, overweight. After he did an extensive blood panel, we found out that I was pre-diabetic as well We started a treatment plan and, almost right away, I started sleeping better, the pounds started dropping off, my pain had decreased to the point that I no longer needed drugs to make it through the day. My energy increased so much that all my friends started asking what the heck was going on. They wanted to experience what I was going through too. It's been life changing for me. To be free of pain, 60 lbs. lighter and full of energy is amazing. I highly recommend his techniques and approach. I've tried several Dr.'s but none have given me the result that he has. I have no need to go elsewhere.
Great Indian food!
Great place!
None
it is awesome :) specially dry manchurian and chinese bhel . I love it :)
مستشفى راقية !!
None
None
Hands down the best sushi around. Every roll is fab, el fuego and kamikaze two of the best.
I Have used Pallardy electric for multiple jobs commercial and residential, and they always provide a high quality experience, are very well priced, and very easy to work with. I would recommend using Pallardy for any electrical work if you live in the St. Louis area.
The best food on Earth.
Ayer cené en la Piccola Cucina Itaiana celebrando mi 57 cumpleaños. La comida excelente el ambiente íntimo y Vittorio como siempre fue capaz de amenizar la noche con sus recomendaciones para dejar un espacio de intimidad a nuestro especial día. Muy recomendable.
The best healthy smoothies and juices. Excellent service, very clean environment...and the best Mediterranean sandwiches I ever had :-)
Linha de bebidas em geral, entrega rápida e aluguel de jogos de mesa.
I have visited this store often, and I have always been happy with the service and the knowledge of the staff. I think they work very hard to learn about the products they offer. The place has a great feel! One automatically feels better when walking in. It could be the friendly staff, the atmosphere, the incense they burn or just the energy of the place itself, but I usually feel much better after spending some time in the store. I have had a reading with one of the people they provide space for in their store. It was a very positive experience, and felt she really was gifted and she provided me with good information about myself and the possibilities of the future. I like the variety of products available at the store. From stones, incense, tarot decks, books, music, candles, jewelry and statue figures to some classes and of course the healer and readers... this is a pretty complete store and as mentioned in another review, if they don't have it, they can usually tell you where to find it. I will visit there often!
Alyssia is amazing. I wish I could get acupuncture from her every week, but, alas, I have to settle for every month. She never fails to provide much needed pain relief from my eternally aching back.
Quick and painless, nice waiting area, and the service people even took an extra coupon I had. Carwash could have been better but hey, it was free. Great experience.
Northwest has the most experienced and friendly staff I have ever encountered. My wife gave birth to our son there and I had some personal treatments there. I would highly recommend using Northwest if you ever need to. Be safe and stay well.
I took a class in PMC at Big Arts several years ago. It was a lovely place and seemed to be the hub for arts on Sanibel.
None
Had A Great Experience At Plaza Lexus thanks to sales professional Nick Jackson and his support team. I had been shopping for a pre-owned RX for some time. On a whim, I decided to stop in and was greeted by Nick. Not only did they have the car that I wanted in stock, but it had low mileage, new tires, and was Certified - all for a price at was lower than what I had been quoted for vehicles in lesser shape (an not certified). Nick made sure that they car was well detailed. The finance manager got me a great deal and the used car manager bent over backwards to make sure that I was happy - both before and after the sale. Overall experience - GREAT!
Based on a friend's recommendation, we decided to try Bulwark and I can't say how pleased we are. Customer service was great. Our Tech Michael was on time and completely everything well.
Efficient, very friendly service, and superb fish and chips. Recommended.
I've been to other Crossfit gyms before and this one is my favorite. Not only does the gym feature a spacious and fully fitted showroom, but the atmosphere is uptemo and the people are friendly! Don't be afraid to walk right in and start talking to someone because they are very welcoming. Different from other Crossfit facilities, the staff here really lets you improve on your weaknesses and allow you to customize your programming to fit your specific needs. They realize that not everyone has the same methods of meeting their fitness goals, and I have realized first hand the benefits of that. I would recommend stopping by no matter who you are or what shape you're in, don't be intimidated by the Crossfit on ESPN, there are all types of people here at Paradigm.
Great Sales Staff, especially Brian He's personally an Outstanding Salesman who gets the job done. Knowledgeable and serving up a great product in a convenient location.
Robert is very good. I will always come back because of him.
Outsiders CrossFit has completely changed the way I define "being fit". I've tried just about every form of exercise, from distance running to P90x, but nothing has challenged me and given me better results than Outsiders CrossFit. As far as crossfit boxes go, this one is top notch. Great space, great people, great times.
None
Good people, like the location. Easy access to unit. Very clean property.
Happy living here.
None
This is a truly outstanding model of much needed service delivery ....one which takes away all the stigma around sexual health and associated problems. It is not a gay clinic although it serves a large gay population The Chelsea and Westminster should be congratulated by everyone by this innovative approach which everyone agrees is an example we can all learn from. Unfortunately despite this they are always under threat from budget cuts - which is deplorable but typical ...set up great clinic, prove its a success and then see if you whittle it away...imaginative downsizing??? The staff are always courteous and the whole place makes an effort to ensure everyone is comfortable. Thats not bad for starters leave alone the well thought out decor and excellent medical staff. If only Mental Health Services could learn something from this approach instead of languishing in ggrim back wings of hospitals. How about a service like this for adults with ADHD, who are usually either not treated or treated like junkies This is national service so ANYONE can walk in or call for advice. WONDERFUL ***** five stars MORE PLEASE - This is how is CAN and should be DONE
Janice Seney David Kruger is a great dentist ..... very little to no pain. I really appreciate his knowledge and wisdom and skill in the area of Dental Care. I could go to another dentist closer to where I live but I consider it worth my time and dental health to travel a distance to use David Kruger as my dentist.
Awesome burger.
Got an awesome car from them and I loved it.
Everytime is great! Pizza is great, and I can always get the Derailed Ale or try one of their new beers.
None
Great food and friendly service. Always a lot of Indian families dining in which is a good sign! Try the vegetarian thali & the masala dosa.
this place is such beautie. a lion inside was cool. underage drinking... i think so lol. nice place 5 stars
None
Everything about this bar is amazing. Great atmosphere, great bartenders and great food/drink. Best bar in town....bar none!
I had looked all over town to find someone to not only dry clean a two-piece suit, but to fix a tear in the pocket of my suit pants. The tear happened earlier in the week and I was set to attend a wedding in two days. Northside was incredibly professional and after trying two other cleaners before driving all the way across town to Northside, they were the only ones willing to take care of me within the time frame that I needed. I will use them every time now!
I'm a regular because it's good people, nice atmosphere, excellent selection.
Where do I begin on how awesome Paul was for our wedding this year? Kelli and I hosted our wedding at the Sacajawea Hotel in Three Forks, Montana. We contracted Paul for both his Bozeman DJ services as well as the photo booth. Paul MC'ing our event made our day! We met with Paul a couple of weeks before our wedding day to discuss our plans. Paul was professional and well organized. His documents and explanations really helped us to get a better feel for the wedding timeline and the details of "what happens and when". Paul showed up with plenty of time to provide microphones for our officiant and was really knowledgeable about mic'ing the live musicians (cello, violins and guitarist). After our wedding my wife kept commenting on how awesome it was to actually hear her wedding song as she walked the aisle. At the reception, Paul was clearly in his element. He knew how to stay out of the way but also knew how to step up and keep the event moving. He has an excellent voice that carries well without sounding "cheesy" (for lack of a better word). We hadn't provided Paul with a ton of direction besides first dance music and song selection for a few other reception events. He did an outstanding job of feeling the vibe of our guests and playing a great mix of classics and newer music. Two weeks after our wedding I'm still getting great comments about the photo booth too. He had an assistant staffing the booth and making sure everyone was having a great time with the fun costumes. Our guestbook is so much more interactive that a bunch of signatures. I would never hesitate to enthusiastically recommend Paul and the Bozeman DJ service. Without his services our day would not have been nearly as memorable!
I purchased a 2014 LX-S today thanks to the expertise and sincere assistance from Michael Martin. Frankly, I was floored by the genuine concern demonstrated by all the folks at Mohawk Honda. Everyone there makes you feel at home and at ease with what can be an daunting and impactful financial transaction. I'm convinced you can go to Mohawk Honda and buy a car without worrying about being "sold" something you don't need. Bottom line: these folks are DEFINITELY in the buyer's corner!
I REALLY LIKE SAU
This is good place for kids, so they can see why the US military is #1!
Muy bonitooon
None
these guys are AWESOME... We've had issues with people parking on our property and finely had enough. We called them tonight and they were here in less then 10 minutes and the car was gone 2 minutes later. It stinks for the people getting towed but they only have themselves to blame. Thanks again guys
A really great church and great people!
awesome selection and prices of hard to find old school games as well as the new stuff!
I don't have to go often, but when I do ... Scott's the only one I go to. Moved here about three years ago and needed a visit soon after the move. Found Scott and have been going back ever since. He's very thorough and professional, and I always get good results. The Pain goes away. Thanks Scott.
Fast courteous service, nice staff, I was in and out in no time . They wasted no time giving me my check up and doing all the tests . They found I had a detached retina so I didn't get to pick out frames or anything, referred me to one of the best eye surgeons in the country so I'll be back when everything gets fixed. All in all a good experience.
Dr Kassir is the best surgeon i have met! He helped me get a more youthful appearance and has increased my confidence level dramatically! He is a true artist and has great personal skills. I would recommend Dr Kassir to anyone who is looking for a more youthful appearance.
Great food and staff! A bit hot in there, and the bathrooms stink when it's hot. Other than that, the food is awesome. The market has some good desserts in it too.
Polecam! Bardzo smaczne naleśniki. Najlepsza naleśnikarnia w Gdańsku.
This is the most clean indian restaurant in the greater Seattle area. Dont believe please visit. I visited several indian restaurant 99 percent are cheaply decorated and nasty, dirty, this is very good one, I hope they will keep that way.
Great place to go on a first date after a movie. The cupcakes are awesome and the owners are good people
I usually buy everything from Amazon, but when I purchased my first espresso machine I wanted to go with someone I could trust. SCG offers a wealth of educational videos and machine reviews that led me to the best machine for me. I purchased from them because I like the fact that I can get on the phone and call if I need help, and they offered me a 10% discount for joining the mailing list. I bought a grinder as well, and ended up spending less than I would have on Amazon (2nd day shipping was really expensive though!). In addition to the machine, SCG gave me some free goodies and an extended warranty. I couldn't be happier!
Overall Very good Liked: Very good. U must visit it.
Had some delicious Pad Thai this weekend at Cafe International. I was surprised they even had a vegan gluten free option. Friendly staff, I even chatted with the owner a bit, and reasonably priced too. I would definitely recommend Cafe International. In fact I have recommended it to a number of friends.
The first time we went to Red Rocks Country Club we absolutely loved it. The course is beautiful and challenging. We joined two years ago and decided after six months to move into the neighborhood and could not be happier. It is a unique community tucked in the foothills. Close to everything but you feel like you are in a mountain resort. We ride our golf cart to the club which is one of the only courses in town that allows your own golf cart. The club has fun events for the members including happy hour on Friday's in the summer by the pool with bands. We've met many great friends since we joined Red Rocks and look forward to the social and golf events during the year. I see many communities since I'm a Realtor but decided on Red Rocks and the Willow Springs area because it is a truly great community and golf course!
Cuando tengo que comprar flores o plantas voy allí. Las dos dependientas(madre e hija) siempre saben asesorarme y me llevan el encargo a casa(servicio a domicilio). Tienen todo tipo de flor fresca, seca, artificial y adornos florales. Está floristería ha sido reformada recientemente y ha quedado muy bonita, os recomiendo pasar a verla, seguro que os encantará.
This is a great place to go for all your repair needs. They can fix everything you need done, and they do it quickly too. I dropped my car off on Tuesday and it was done the next day after replacing a timing belt, water pump, rear shocks & struts, and fixing my exhaust header leak. That's a lot of work in a short amount of time. I definitely recommend taking your car here, especially if you are a Subaru owner like myself. They even wash your car after they are done working on it. The owner is a great guy and easy to talk to. He will explain everything to you with no BS. I will definitely be bringing my car to Foreign Auto Specialists again.
My family and I travel to Myrtle beach every year, and every year I must get them to come here to Donatos! The pizza here is probably the best I've ever eaten, with super sweet sauce, delicious meats and perfectly golden cheese. On top of the amazing quality, the food is affordable, and the staff are super friendly. They checked up on us and made sure we liked the food, and even gave us a free order of cinnamon sticks for dessert! I tell you, that's one way to get customers to return! Whatever you are doing, those of you at Donatos, KEEP DOING IT!
Dr. Lipkin was recommended to me by another teacher in my district. I had bad lower back and neck pain when I started seeing him. After the treatment plan he recommended I am nearly good as new and highly recommend him. Now I just need the occasional tune up to keep me pain free.
Our son had been struggling for a couple of years, but we kept thinking that he would catch on eventually. By the sixth grade he had not only failed the TAKS test, but also two subject classes and with no TAKS retest for sixth grade he had to repeat the grade. His self esteem tanked. During his repeat year his self esteem recovered a little, but he was still struggling. In seventh grade his attitude was better, but he realized that after the next year he would still be in Junior High and his friends would moving on to the High School campus. He asked if it were possible for him to catch up enough to make it to his correct grade level, and with Sylvan's assessment it seemed attainable. Since starting at Sylvan our son has grown in his self worth and skipping has become less important. His missing gaps are being filled and he has become proud of his achievements. His new attitude is affecting all of his activities. We are very pleased with his progress and happy that our smart sensitive boy has returned.
The Eggars had a booth set up at a local 5k and I bumped into them because they were handing out flyers. I was so blown away by their candor and warmth that I called the following Monday to get a no-obligation quote. Unbeknownst to me, I had be over-paying on my car and home insurance by $1,000 a year! I couldn't believe it, since I had been quoted by another company so recently, but they really made sure I had all the discounts that I qualified for with brought my rate down so much lower. I also love that they are open on Saturdays because I am so busy during the week.
None
I love taking my Mr.Redd to Glamour Dogs in Edinburg. The people are always friendly and the prices are affordable. I know that leaving my Mr. Redd there will be in good hands.
The groomer treats my dogs with care. He tries his best to fit our schedule. Our dogs come home happy, smelling and looking great. Please help support this local small business man.
I stayed for 2 nights in July. I can not say enough good things about the hotel. Views are fantastic, rooms are clean and up-to-date. But the staff are their hidden jewel. So many others at my conference were also commenting on the customer service. I was always greeted with a smile and never felt as if I was "bugging" them. All were complete professionals!
Helpful and reliable, I know they stayed late to help me out more than once, followed up on all maintenance requests the day of and went above and beyond giving me parking even before I move in.
We found Tiffany right before our trip because our friends had to cancel on us at the last minute. She was amazingly nice and understanding about our situation and she was able to help us watch our dog. Next time we need to go out of town we will definitely call her. Some one here was asking why some of her reviews were done on the same day. Well one explanation is she kindly asked her customers to give our opinions, and feedback on her work. I got her email and I'm happy to write a glowing review for her.
My wife and I visited the LaTruffe Sauvage for Valentine's Day. The dinning experience was absolutely exquisite. Meal portion was adequate. The meal presentation was first class. The atomsphere and the service was excellent. We will recommend this estalishment to our friends. In my opinion,the price matches the food, service and atmoshpere.
One of the only real butchers in the area. Very fresh, lots of local. You can get very reasonable items, or really fancy/expensive meats. Both have always been great....
Gracias por todo. Recomiendo tus servicios sin dudarlo a todos mis clientes y amigos. Excelente trato , soluciones de calidad a precios muy competitivos, además de las garantías de los servicios realizados. Aprovecho la ocasión para desearos Felices Fiestas y Próspero Año nuevo.
Dr. Barnes, Brandi and staff are extremely helpful in all respects of pateint recovery. Kind to patients and with an outcome of getting me back to post MVA care. Many thanks for ongoing efforts
I see Dr. Andy Wright at ABA. I started seeking chiropractic treatment in my hometown several years ago for whiplash/vertebral sprain following a car accident. When I moved to Toledo, I began a search for a new chiropractor. I visited several different offices, but ABA and Dr. Andy made me feel comfortable, explained to me the different type of chiropractic care I would be receiving (because it was different technique than what I had received previously) and he treated other issues I was having sometimes even before they caused me pain or discomfort. I am now 5 months pregnant and Dr. Andy and Laura, one of the massage therapists who works out of ABA, have kept my pain, discomforts, heartburn and headaches to a minimum so that I rarely have to take Tylenol for relief-keeping my baby safe as possible. Scheduling is great - if I need to fix a problem I am almost always seen in the next 3-4 days! But I typically receive care from them every 5 weeks. I really feel as though the treatment I have received through Dr. Andy & Laura have helped me to gain overall health as well as help me to have a smooth, healthy pregnancy.
None
Excellent! Great customer service, friendly and quick.
None
Mr. Long and his staff are some of the most professional and courteous people I have ever had the honor of working with. I have worked with several attorneys in the Craven County area regarding my particular case. When my attorney passed away in the middle of my custody case, and after 2 years of the case being prolonged by other parties, Mr. Long's firm took on the case and it was resolved in a matter of weeks. Just when I had lost faith in the system, Mr. Steven Long showed me that it can work. An attorney that not only has experience, but cares about and believes in his clients is key when dealing with the Craven County court system. If you are looking for the best, look no further.
Love that virtual training room and the selection of training sessions is amazing.
Recomand din toata inima...sunt instructori de scufundare excelenti...
best pizza i ever had... in my life
None
Joey helped me here on a saturday morning after I spilled coffee on my laptop and in panic mode. He was so nice, patient and went out of his way to give real advice and not just try to get me to pay the most expensive solution. Very genuine and helpful, thank you so much! Also a plus they are the only store I found open saturday.
I've used Ace Computing a couple of times now and thought I would add a review as its refreshing to find an honest, reliable and affordable place to take your computer when it needs some TLC. Steve from Ace Computing has always offered a professional and prompt service. He fixed an xbox 360 on the first occasion after i'd spent days trying to make it work, Steve did it within an hour. This time my son managed to break the screen on the laptop, and this was quickly fixed and back to as new condition within no time and at a fair price too. Thank you and if i have any computer related problems in the future, I will be back!!
Had a Panic Attack Sunday evening when the Garage Door just went you know what. What to do, who to call, checked Goggle found the name "Father & Son" and said why not. Called first thing Monday monring figured it would be a day or so but 2.5 hours later Dan and his son in-law Mike was there to save the day as that is what happened, 30 mins later it was fixed and at a price that was unbeleibe able. Thanks Dan and Mike your name is your bond, thanks. God forbid but if anything else goes wrong, I got your number...Dave
None
Excellent food but a tiny place. If you can get a table you will be delighted with your meal.
None
I stumbled upon Memorial Weight Loss Clinic by going to physical therapy and I so glad I did. The office staff and doctor are great. They turned me on to the website of My Fitness Pal and it's the greatest thing to track your calories and exercise. If you are not using this app you really need to try it. I like that the clinic is all about eating the right foods and keeping it at a certain amount of calories and exercising for a lifelong road to happiness.
I called on a Saturday and spoke with Ron about an electrical problem in my house. He showed up on time first thing Monday morning and replaced the switch quickly and efficiently. His price was very fair.
Comfortable. Serene. Peaceful. Alhamdulillah.
Love going to Abbey's. My family's favorites include the pulled pork, and brisket of course. Cornbread is moist and sweet. It's almost desert in itself.
Bought my F150 from there as they had a quad cab with long bed. Really nice people.
Never disapooints! More young people need to go here though. My boyfriend and I are the only people usually that don't have white hair.
Excellent!
Lo Mejor en comida Japonesa
We just got married at Sunstone Winery in Solvang. It is not the easiest venue to have a DJ but Scott managed to set up all of his equipment without any problems. Scott's equipment is top of the line !!! The dance floor and his DJ table looked absolutely amazing !!! Very professional. A challenge for Scott was that my husband and I are from different countries so Scott had to combine Croatian / Bosnian / American music. He did a great job mixing all the songs. He is great at feeling out the crowd and playing the songs that keep the party going. We were beyond happy Scott was our DJ /MC !!!
Un excelente lugar para comprar Vinos y licores, tienen mucha experiencia y conocimiento de los diferentes tipos de vinos.
Ci sono tanti ristoranti italiani a Madrid e quasi tutti sono di alto livello, ho mangiato qui nella pausa del lavoro e devo dire che é stata una bella scoperta. La pasta di casa era ottima e devo dire che anche la pizza non era male tutto va bevuoto con ottima birra ghiacciata o con un vino ovviamente italialiano o anche spagnolo che non é male
The food is superb excellent customer service large portions
They have excellent food. Pizza is great. The deep dish pizza is the best I've ever had. The salad is prefect.
My wife and I stayed here for two nights. The room we stayed in was excellent while not too expensive in USD (about $200/night), the hotel's restaurant was very good, and the hotel's service surpassed everywhere else my wife or I have stayed, in the US or abroad. If we make it back to Cappadocia, we'll definitely stay at this hotel again. Also, if you stay here and the opportunity arises during your stay for a tour of the hotel's property, take it... a hotel tour sounds like it is a gimmick, but it really is worth the 30 minutes at this historical location.
This place is great - friendly people, answer your questions, comfortable environment and flexible hours (get me in before I have to go to work). Has the local Liberty feel to it. Loyal customer since I moved here in 2010.
My experience with the team at Westgate Chevrolet was simply awesome. Not only did I recieve a fair value for my trade in but a great price for my new 2012 Chevy Cruze. I live in the Dallas Fort Worth Metroplex and I was hesitant to purchase a vehicle sight unseen from Amarillo. However, the whole package deal was so appealing that I could not pass up the offer. Westgate even had my new Cruze delieverd to my home. I would recommend John Thurlow and his team to anyone. Thanks Westgate Chevrolet!!!!!
LOVE this place! All the girls are sweet and helpful- even if the salon can get a little crowded and/or busy. It's truly a "neighborhood" nail shop experience- join the conversation and get to know some people! Just by chance, had my first-ever Shellac mani with McKenzie and it was SO gorgeous...but I didn't realize that hers happen to be the BEST IN TOWN. I've had Shellac done at three other salons for various reasons, and nobody even comes close to the finished product of her work- I'm hooked. I can and DO recommend this salon to anyone!
Great space, great staff - what's not to love? All three spaces are stunning, and the Banquet Hall is a great setting for everything from weddings to galas. Ask any member of staff and they'll be glad to tell you the fascinating history of the place and maybe even take you on a tour. Can't wait to come back!
One of my family's favourite places in Mississauga. We love the fountain where kids and kids-at-heart can run through the water and play. It has provided several hours of free entertainment for my daughter this weekend. During one of the free concerts they had, my husband and I were dancing in the water. I'm really looking forward to the free public skating this winter, now that my daughter is old enough to try. But there is more too! Free yoga, free movies on the big screen, and a great place to go watch the soccer game!
I have gone to Dr. Hernandez for over 25 years. Even though I have relocated further away from his practice out to the Rowlett area, I continue to go the distance to see him because he has taken wonderful care of my cats and dogs through the years. My daughter even travelled from Fort Worth to have her two kittens declawed there because he had the most reasonable prices in the metroplex. He will always take the time to explain treatment options and always is very kind and thoughtful and has a great sense of humor. I always walked out of his office feeling better than when I walked in.
On February 15th I was driving when a rider coming in the other direction was cutting into a turn went straight on with me.. I luckily jumped from my 2005 Honda F4i motorcycle just in time to miss being smashed by the vehicle.. but my motorcycle did not.. and ended up totaling the front end of my bike.. So I towed everything home.. and thought I could fix the motorcycle myself.. And after barely starting in it realized how way over my head I was.. And with tons of electrical problems too boot.. Forgot about my baby for months.. I then came back to it as I could not continue paying $500 a month in gas to commute back and forth to work.. and Put a Plea out on Craigslist to have all my prayers answered by The Awesome Owner and Lead shop Mechanic Tony.. After speaking with him even shortly I knew I finally found someone who had the same compassion for motorcycle's as I did.. and he setup to first come by and check out the problem, and then after assessing that we decided it would be best to tow it back to his shop.. He came with his own truck and trailer and did so, and within a week had a honest upfront estimate.. That was 1/10th the price that another shop by Costco.. (I will not name, but you know who you are..) had given me.. They had given me every option in the world.. Even to allow me to pick it up and do my own work.. but with the price they had charged me.. it would not be practical at all.. and Ill leave the mechanic work to the mechanics.. from now on.. They allowed me to buy my own parts.. which i did and upon receiving a used ECU from eBay.. for $300 instead of the $3000 from the Honda dealer.. My bike was back in business.. and I was back on the road.. Not only will I take my Motorcycle, Dirt bike and girlfriends Wave runners to Motorcycle Zone for all of my Maintenance and work.. but I will bring over any and all friends I have... Because no shop will even compete with the Honesty, and straight forwardness as I was dealt with at Motorcycle Zone. Put me back on the road for close to nothing.. And I was never in the dark about anything.. Thank you so much!! You guys ROCK!!!
I was very pleased with the level of care and service I received from the staff. They were great, and very helpful in my frame selection. Very laid back, and personable. The decor was modern, and the shop was very clean. The prices seem reasonable and fair for both the exam and glasses. I strongly recommend them when it comes time for your eye care.
It's school, not a universoty. Asoka College, Colombo - 10
Crystal Hernandez has been doing great with the laser treatments! Throughout my experience at White Pearl Medical Spa, I felt comfortable even though laser treatments are not very comfortable. Thanks to Groupon, I was able to save a lot of money and try something new! The place was clean, professional and I especially loved the decor! I'll be setting my next appointment soon.
MVK... The name for the kannur people to say about BIRIYANI.. If you would like to have the famous MALABAR BIRIYANI. Ofcause you have to choose the Name M V K, yes the many years of service we could blindly tell the name of MVK for the best BIRIYANI served in kannur and even in malabaar region This is a chance of you people to have taste of pure malabari biriyani from expert chef of MVK. Try it once and make sure about these words..... Aswin Appu
I moved to Brisbane from Sydney 3 years ago and have been a patient of Calm Dental for the last 2.5 years. I have nothing but good things to say about the surgery. All the staff are great - Bella at reception always greats me with a genuine smile and call me old fashion, but I like that Dr. Kham (my dentist) comes out to reception to greet and collect you and escort you in for your treatment. Notwithstanding the quality of care I have received has been excellent and I recommend Calm Dental without hesitation.
Whatever the reason may be, please know that I have already begun telling people in my network they should head to Criswell Nissan in Germantown, MD to get their next vehicle. I, personally, anticipate another vehicle purchase in my family this upcoming summer and you are #1 on my list.
I called Robert at A Posh Limo last week for a corporate transportation pick up to the airport. He was very friendly and reliable! I would highly recommend their services to anyone looking for a great limo and transportation company! I will be using their services again in the future!
The Oarsman is a great local pub - comfortable pub atmosphere - great staff and great food - if you like Wings theirs are great - pub wrap is also great and the sizzling mushroom boat is a must!
I go here often and never have a bad time. Nice selection of beer on draft. Depending on the day/event it can be crowded enough where there is no table or place at the bar.
Working with Paul Lyda and SignAffects was absolutely wonderful, he helped us create the perfect sign design that fit our brand and then worked with the city officials to take care of all the necessary paperwork. His installers were very professional and courteous. I would recommend SignAffects to anyone intersted in a sign or any other item they may need to help promote their brand. We absolutely love our sign!
We live in an older home in the Broad Ripple area of Indianapolis. After moving in we were constantly getting water backing up in our basement. We had hope come out to scope our sewer line and found that it had been crushed by tree roots. After collecting several estimates for the job we found Hope was by far the most reasonable and also helped us set up an interest free payment plan. They were able to complete the job in a day and we haven't had any problems since. They even replaced a broken shower head while they were there at no cost. I would highly recommend them and will use them for any issues we have going forward.
None
Great East Side spot to enjoy a game of pool, grab a burger and a beer and chill. Love what he's done with the decor and renovations as well.
None
None
I was taken there by a Mexican friend of mine about 3 years ago and I loved it. As a mater of fact I have not found a better place in Charlotte. I have taken a lot of my friends and they all said it was the best they have had also. The portions are big. The food is great and the price is lower than ALL the chain Mexican type restaurants. I could not rate El Taco Veloz any higher than 5 stars otherwise I would!
I've utilized Kapp's services for service and repair of my 'street use' Porsche 930 as well as my Porsche 951 race car. Specifically, Kapp's has done work for me as minimal as tracking down electrical demons, eliminating strange rattles, and installing a new clutch and as sophisticated as performing a full engine rebuild, roll cage fabrication, and suspension tuning among many other things. I've been utilizing their services since 2010. I'm very happy with the work they have performed for me, and with the great customer service and support that has accompanied this work. I recommend friends to Kapp's without hesitation.
This apps has make my work so easy
Like most people, my wife and I have had Chinese food from God knows how many restaurants, but this place is probably THE best take out Chinese Food we've ever tried at a very good price. We'll continue to go back for all our Chinese Food needs. Thanks, S
Een perfecte locatie voor het houden van een cursus of training. Verder is de keuken ook zeer goed. Kortom "a place toe be".
i needed a truck and they had what i needed and at a price that was reasonable. very curtious and made it happen. i want to thank all of you for you help in getting my truck. Thank you Alan L Smith, Owner V"n"A Scrap Iron
Matt Salling was a pleasure to work with. Matt was my salesman, he gave me good information over the phone prior to my visit. He was attentive,but, not high pressure and was very willing to work through all the details of the sale, making the buying process a smooth one. Further, he took the time to help out on some special issues and out of state registration on the transfer. In addition, he went the extra mile to ensure the car was as prepped as possible in every way. I'd recommend Matt and Brandon Ford for a new or late model used car purchase (I bought a 2012 Genesis with 18k miles).
I've been doing business with Zedimage, for at least 10 years, they've been hosting my web site efficiantly and at a very competitive price. Same for my business car, great quality at a ridiculus price. Would recommend to anyone, their the best in that business!
Their taco is amazing. Makes you forget the waiting in the line.
Jonathan is a true professional in all meanings of the word and the service is wonderful. Two thumbs up.
None
just ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!
After taking my 2010 Cadillac Escalade ESV to a local Cadillac dealership and getting ripped off, I took it to Johnny over at J.W. Auto Care to take a look at all the "Recommended Services" (over $1000 worth) for a second opinion. Not only did they give me an honest answer about what really needed to be done (most of it did not) they found a few things the Cadillac Dealership missed and gave me a much better price on the work that did need to be done. Good, honest work at a fair price. Can't ask for much more than that!!!
This site is extremely helpfull when it comes to renovating my motorcycles.... and normaly when they've got the parts in stock, a fast delivery time.
The service as excellent even though you don't make an appointment. Had to visit several times to make a final choice, but after visiting every shop in town 5 times, they had the best choices for me. I will be back every time I get married ;-)
I contacted Unger & Kowitt after receiving a citation I felt was unfair. Of course, the police officer was not interested in my opinion. Unger & Kowitt took the matter to court on my behalf, TWICE, all for the initial $69 fee, and got the case dismissed. It was worth every penny - no points, no payment of the ticket, no time spent at the courthouse. Throughout the process, the folks at U&K were helpful, courteous and encouraging. Highly recommended.
Animal Care Hospital has been caring for our herd since 2004. Recently we had to put one of our cats down. I struggled mightily with the decision, and frankly, am still second-guessing myself. Dr. Lindsay wrote the most amazing sympathy card. They understand and care about our pets. Why anyone would even consider another clinic is beyond my comprehension. I wished my primary physicians were as sympathetic, caring, and proactive as the staff at Animal Care. My remaining pets will live long, productive lives thanks to these wonderful people. Thank you!
Good Review: Took my '01 Dodge Ram 1500 here due to referral. Gave Technician List of things i needed/wanted completed. Took a look at everything same day and gave a call with Estimates for work. Mobile Tech was able to Replace my U-Joints, Transmission Flush, A/C fixed, Hoses replaced, Thermostat replaced, Removed vinyl from within my gauges, among other small things. Pricing is Fair: Overall Good, Labor varies a lot. Cheaper than Dealership, more expensive than the Backyard mechanic you may know. But you get Better Quality Work than the Cheaper alternative.
I love this place. Every time I go downtown this is a must go place for me. The clothes are cool, the miscellaneous items are cool, the setting is cool. I love it
Awesome! Very nice people!
You can't eat there, you pick it up and take it to go, but the food is wonderful. I always buy extra of the seasoned oil they use on the sandwiches and a loaf of crusty bread for dipping. The sandwiches are huge and I know I should only eat half, but they are so good I eat the whole thing and then feel miserable for a while. Worth it and I do it every time.
None
Everyone at this safeway made it easier for me to shop!!! the people were VERY nice and VERY Helpful. and everyone looks GOOD!!!!!!!!!!!!!
None
Essential Print Services produced publicity leaflets for a Lunar21 event. The quality of the leaflets well exceeded expectations. The transaction was simple and, at every step, there was the offer of help. Isn't this the way all business should be? If only . . . .
None
As much as you can like a dentist... Dr. Fehr is very good and has a very friendly staff. I have been going to her for at least 7 years now. Rarely do you have to wait to be seen. She uses computerized X-rays and explains everything very well.
We called Gregg during the ice storm last month, and they were able to come out to provide a temporary relief. We had used his father years ago on our previous home and it was good to find we can still count on them at our new home.
TechWyse had been an integral part of our business growth and development. The staff at TechWyse have always been incredibly responsive and knowledgeable. TechWyse has become a large part of our team at BedfordBrooks Design and member of our family. We take referring business partners very seriously and believe me when I say that you won't be in better hands with your web site design, development and on-going exposure. Ten out of Ten! Peter Brooks Principal Designer BedfordBrooks Design Inc.
Excellent, make a reservation
These guys are the best. Very friendly and honest. They take the time to explain how things work, and they have a really quick turn around time. It's always a pleasure doing business with them.
Everyone I know that has used 1st plumbing has been more than satisfied. Would recommend them to everyone.
I went to Thee Diner to get breakfast after taking care of an errand in the area. A quiet spot near a highschool. On stepping into the place I found it to be very clean semi filled with people from the Cicero area. My server was very polite and attentive. My food was brought to me in a reasonable amount of time. It was entertaining to listen to the regular patrons talk trash with the cook.
Fun for everyone and all kinds of neat home made items if you like arts and crafts go to these shows they are the best around.
None
This is a great hat shop, hundreds of styles to choose from and great friendly service. Highly recommend this shop if you're looking for any kind of western hat.
For the price this beats the crap out of every buffet I've been to. They even have a little bar where you pick out whatever items you want, douse it in any of like 12 sauces, and they'll cook it right in front of you in like 10 seconds.
None
None
I met a friend at Hunam one night, having barely been aware of its existence before, and it has been my favorite Chinese restaurant since. Best tasting food and excellent service. Get hot tea, it's fun to drink throughout the meal. Food is presented very conveniently. About them being understaffed, I have never waited longer than average for a meal. If they are considered understaffed, hope they do not change this. Expansion leads to streamlining. Efficiency is not ALWAYS best.
Omg...this is simply the best!!!
Douglas Akay is the most personable attorney, he has helped my company and is one of the most successful SF attorney's in the city. I like his staff and his energy in court. If you hire Doug chances are, you're going to win. His track record attests to this and the respect of his peers as well as courtroom experience.
About a year ago, my company had a staff meeting at PJ's. Let's just say everything needed improvement. After hearing PJ's was under new management, I decided to give them another try. I ordered the same pizza as a year ago. Not only was it edible, it was AMAZING!! Garlic chicken pizza, thin crust with toppings and sauce all the way to the edges. I've since had a personal pizza with pepperoni sausage olives and mushrooms, again toppings almost over the edges. Some people like to have a lot of crust and that's fine, but if u want a great tasting crust that just enhances the flavors of the toppings, then this place is for you. There's so much more they offer also. The staff i have encountered are attentive, friendly and helpful. I plan to try the pasta, burgers and salad bar soon. I highly recommend PJ's !!!
Great service! Really enjoy working with Dr. Mathew.
Andy was extremely helpful when he came to fix a leaking pipe under my sink. He talked me through the process involved in fixing it and stuck to his original quote. A big thumbs up.
Libby is a bright and talented photographer. Her youthful work is exciting and refreshing. Highly recommended!
Tout est bien et bon
None
My family has been going to Mike's for many, many years and I would highly encourage everyone else to take their cars there, too. Honest, dependable, and courteous only begin to describe Mike, his family, and his staff. Easily the best car repair in Clark County.
A couple of months ago my wife collapsed while we were walking through Queen Street heading for the low level platforms. It took approximately ten seconds for the first member of staff to enquire if she was ok and offer to get an ambulance. Another guy offered his jacket to put over her whist yet another one started guiding other people around us. Of course, Glasgow being Glasgow comments ranging from witty to sympathetic were all added in but all were concerned that she was ok. An ambulance duly arrived and a short trip to A&E followed, the Lady Wife is fine and fully recovered; it wasn't anything serious. But I thought it was past time that the staff at Queen Street, and the two officers from the BTP, got a public pat on the back for being a caring, helpful, kind bunch who will probably be totally embarrassed by the praise. Queen Street facilities-wise is quite limited but it's not a huge station. Standard fast food outlets, a bar and a couple of other shops. It's the staff that raise it from ok to excellent.
Visited for a meal whilst on holiday nearby. Food was fantastic, best fillet steak we've ever tasted, cooked to perfection, service was terrific, great friendly atmosphere. Highly recommend!!
Esta super padre y muy bien los peces diferentes especies me encantó
None
I have been quite happy with my new Hyundai Veloster so far, and not only with the Southpoint Hyundai dealership but with the dealership in Bryan/College Station where I bought the car, Attendants have always been prompt to greet you, and they have always been very accurate regarding the estimated amount of time it would take to service the vehicle, returning the vehicle washed and vacuumed out. I couldn't be happier.
Great variety! Good bakery and deli. LOTS of cheeses to choose from.
Very Helpful. Experts in vacuum cleaners. Great Products and Service. Very Happy
Awesome! Really enjoyed our dining experience. Great food and service.
Ontem jantei um fondue e um rústico, ô coisa boa!
Once again, Brandon Paluszak at Ehrlich Nissan in Greeley came through for me and my new truck purchase. Brandon always greets you with a smile and never hesitates to go to bat for you and get you the deal that works best for you, not just the dealership. Other members of Ehrlich are great as well. Always helpful and greets you with a smile. If you want a no hassle car or truck purchase, go to Ehrlich and don't waste your time anywhere else. Thanks Brandon - I will see you again soon!
“New Jersey Welcomes South Beach for the Perfect Get Away!” My fiance and I stayed at Hotel Icona on a whim after looking to get away for a few days. I wasn't formerly familiar with this place, but the pictures online of the new renovation looked really nice. Upon arriving, not only did the hotel meet our expectations, but far surpassed them! Once entering the lobby, it felt as though we stepped out of New Jersey and in to South Beach. Our room was gorgeous - modern, chic, calming, classy, and new! I couldn't stop looking at all of the amazing light fixtures and simple yet ornate details. To my surprise, the room had a full service kitchen, living room, bedroom, and nice bathroom - 2 plasma TVs and a great balcony with ocean view! Everything was incredibly clean! I felt like I was at home on some levels which was nice - not only because of the cleanliness, but because of the comforting touches everywhere. Talk about an escape - the pool is SO blue and clean and the dark wood furniture and white umbrellas surrounding it (and some other cozy furniture and tables as well) makes for such a relaxing atmosphere! Waiters even serve you poolside! The Coastal Blue restaurant that is in the hotel and attached to the pool is amazing!!! The decor in there is very new and South Beachy also and the service and food our excellent!! They are very accommodating! A private beach awaits you outside of the pool and is perfect for laying out and swimming! Diamond Beach is incredible! The sand is so soft and you can walk out in the water quite a ways and it still only comes up to your knees! The beach is not overly-crowded either since it is private which is nice. Icona's location is fabulous! It's right in between actual Wildwood and Cape May. It's in a classy section surrounded by elegance. I will absolutely be revisiting and most likely be making this my annual getaway! I think the price is perfect!! I'm almost shedding a tear as I write this because I would love to transport myself back there right now! At least I know that I can make a quick get away that isn't too far to escape reality and be treated nicely. It's amazing how every single worker in the entire place either said "Good Morning" or "Have a Nice Day"! Where else do you find that? I even threw on an Icona robe one night and just pretended I was a celebrity relaxing in South Beach because they made me feel that important! Thank you Hotel Icona!
They have the best tamales ever!!!
Just bought a great car yesterday. Robert (Bob) Ott was WONDERFUL. He took the time to explain everything to us and was very patient. After working with him and moving through the entire process, everybody we talked to were friendly and helpful. This was our first experience buying a car through Spitzer and we would recommend them to anybody. Thanks Bob!
Fantastic dealer! Excellent staff provide quality service that makes for an incredible car buying or leasing experience! They do an excellent job of clearly explaining everything!
Riquísima comida
We first visited First Redeemer because we were looking for two things - 1) a contemporary service 2) a strong student ministry. My best friend attended there and suggested that we visit one Sunday with her family. We connected quickly with Jeff Jackson (who was the assistant pastor at that time) who ultimately prayed with our son for salvation a few months later. It was not long before we became active in a Sunday school class and our son became very involved in the student ministry. Last year we joined the church and our entire family was baptized together last summer by Pastor Jackson. We love the staff and the message (God loves you and wants you to know him) and we look forward to getting up on Sunday to be there!
I loved my stay .. the free wifi with single ssid is great across the resort. however this place can be further enhanced by bringing international restaurents and cafe. No starbux no costa whatever cafes here u have never heard of before. Expensive but delicious food. I would want to see a starbux or a tim horton Variety variety variety please
None
I had a great experience. My auto broker took care of the price negotiating and when I got there I just had to sign the papers, car was washed and ready. Everything was as discussed. Brent, the finance manager, was awesome. ALSO I asked them if they can hook me up with a free oil change and Vanessa, the sales manager, told me my first oil change would be on them. Definitely would recommend this place!
Always do a great job. They always get you in and out in a hurry!
Excellent food, always piping hot, always plenty to go round and enough for bait the next day
The food and service were top notch. You have to try the mac and cheese for your side...it was so good! Definitely recommend
my school best in da world
Harriet is an experienced dance teacher with a very professional approach. She is knowledgeable, encouraging to her students and promotes a friendly, supportive atmosphere in her school. A first class dance school!
Had had a few but the service was pretty good and the good was amazingly consistent.
nice place, near high way
I live just around the corner from Koza Restaurant and decided to dine there one evening to see what it's like. The first thing that struck me was the ambiance and atmosphere. It's extremely pleasant inside, and the uniquely shaped building provides a nice view of the street and the park across the road. The food there is fantastic! Very fresh, the portions are generous, the service is first class (very friendly staff). I like the website, even though it looks like it's not yet finished. The menus are very easy to read. It would be nice if some images of some of the dishes were added, but that's just something that would be nice to have. I'd also like to be able to add a review directly on the site too. All in all, I was pleasantly surprised. I'll definitely be recommending Koza Restaurant to my friends, and I'll definitely be eating there again.
Fantastic resort; friendly yet serene
We really like the advance phone call to alert us when the techs are on their way. The techs were courteous, used their booties, and answered all our questions and concerns.
I first met Dr. Baker at a social function a couple of years ago. After talking with her about various things that were going on with me, I made an appointment. This was one of the best things I’ve ever done. I had no idea how important Chiropractic is to good health. Each time I visit, I feel so much better afterwards. Being an older adult and wanting to keep up with those much younger than me, I find my visits to Dr. Baker invaluable. She is truly concerned with my wellbeing and treats me accordingly. I have absolutely no problem recommending Dr. Baker to anyone seeking Chiropractic care. I my opinion, she is the best.
If you're looking for a stress-free (even enjoyable) car-buying experience, I recommend going to Linden. Went by Linden VW today to look at buying my first car. I went in with my guard up. I was under the impression (this being my first buying experience) that you need to play down your income or what you can afford, otherwise, they will jack up the price... My experience was the extreme opposite of what I expected going to buy a new car. I ended up buying a Passat and driving it home the same day. They spent over 4 hours with me, going over every possibility - not once did I feel that I was getting screwed on the price. They even went out of their way to make sure that I got everything that I was looking for AND fit into my budget. Also, I definitely recommend working with John Rios (salesperson) or the manager, Anthony. Good people.
Got a flat on I90 in the construction with nowhere to change it as I was too close to the road to safely do so. Blystone sent out a truck to pull me off the road and the driver, Deren, took me to an area close by and even helped me change my tire. Quick service, great driver, use this company if you're in need of a tow.
Dr. Kamara at Benbrook Dental has truly been amazing. Over the last few months I have seen the quality of his work. He does not only provide excellent service, but he takes incredible care of the people who come through the door. I have a lot of respect for what Dr. Kamara is doing in his community.
Nové pokoje, dobře vybavené. Pěkná koupelna. V restauraci vaří skutečně velmi dobře a porce jsou dost velké.
Great store, great service. Looking forward to coming back when I actually have more time to shop
I have done the NTR testing with Dana and have been visiting with her since for about a year. I have never felt this good, I have more energy, feel and look healthier. The testing helps to determine what supplements are necessary for your body to perform at optimum levels. Before I went I was never 'regular' and was always tired, my life has drastically changed for the better thanks to Kabir Center for Health.
Ascent Builders is the first place to go to for your building projects. This team has incredible experience and are extremely trustworthy!
None
None
Wonderful stay! I have just spent 12 nights in this hotel, and I prise myself for a good choice. Exellent service, rich half-pension menu, nice location just near the Santa-Ponsa beach, spacious air-condtioned room - I will certainly return to this place. The only disadvantages I can think of are poor bathroom ventilation and noise isolation, but these are small things comparing to all the others. The web-site does not say this, but there is a free Wi-Fi in the hotel lobby. It is also possible to lend (for a deposit) beach towels and hairdryer.
Amazing and tasty food in large portions. The new location (an old Burger King) is SO MUCH NICER than the old place!
Einfach der beste Friseur hier im Umkreis... Da fahren mein Babe und ich gerne von Recklinghausen nach Gladbeck!
Had my wedding on the roof
None
Had work done by Andrew that totaled over 4 hours. Very happy with my first tattoo and it definitely won't be the last!
None
I had a new system installed last January. I was so impressed with the staff. Everyone was so nice and professional. What I liked most was my 1 year maintenance program at no additional charge.
The best hairdressers in the land. Listened to my requirements and really understood them, giving solid advice in return and a great hair cut and colour. Daryl is an exceptional stylist.
Great food
None
Woo hoo furthur
Nice collection of Furniture. Recommend to buy the insurance since some stuff can go wrong with a young family with kids....
Vito's is a great family restaurant with a friendly staff, excellent service, and amazing food. This was the best pizza we have had in St. Louis! The atmosphere is just what we expected and the drinks were fabulous as well. I would recommend Vito's to anyone. Cheers!
Top notch knowledge and expertise. Excellent craftsmanship and attention to detail.
I have visited Undiewarehouse and feel amazed after seeing an awesome range of stylish and highly comfortable lingeries. Starting from the basic ones, till the maternity and nursing lingeries, everything ensure the top most and best quality. I my self had buy one and feel excelelnt in terms of fit and comfort.
These are the best in the business. Patient, attentive, careful, and insightful. When I'm considering an investment in jewelry - something that is relatively expensive and I'm going to have for a long, long time - those are the kind of qualities I want. I want to be sure I get something that I'm not just happy with, I want to be thrilled. That's Skatell's!
None
Was een heerlijk weekend! Goede gastheer/vrouw en gezellige intieme sfeer met die enorme open haard. Ook de kubus liet niks te wensen over.
Excelente aplicacion
If you have hair loss you must visit this NYC doctor. I wish I could give a higher review.
I've had many amazing massages at Massage Envy, Bel Air. I saw Jenn yesterday (for the second time) and felt so taken care of- I wish I would've gone for a 90 minute session instead of an hour! I highly recommend her! Other therapists I have had are Anthony, Marquita, Lisa, Janine and Christina- I have so much pride for all of the therapists here because they do a great job of customizing your session and taking good care of you. They are all certified, experienced, professional and kind. TIPS: Make sure you communicate with your Massage Therapist during your session because only you know what your body can take and what techniques and pressure help you relax. Also be sure to communicate with the Front Desk as to what you are looking for so they can help you find a therapist that has the touch/technique that suites you. ( It is best to book your appointments in advance on the weekends, same day/walk-in appointments are easier during the week). Hope this was helpful!
I'm a regular customer at kiss. I love their wigs and hair products. They're affordable and I'll continue to shop there.
Went for a replacement card. Expected a long wait and confusion , but was in and out no confusion excellent help. Awesome.
Favorite neighborhood pizza loved by students,folks,celebrity chef and the President.
Great place to watch a football game. There is no place like Nebraska!
John was my salesman, I have to say that I was a little scared to take this big step of getting a new car, however John was very friendly and gave me lots of good information. he kept me right where I needed to be with my payment, the rest of the Regal Kia staff were also amazing. I will recomment anyone to them.
I called HC Blake and they were out first thing the next morning. Our air conditioner that was barely working was like new. Preston was great! He was nice and courteous even with our two 100 lb. German Shepards. I would recommend HC Blake to anyone. They have put a sign in our yard!
Много съм доволна,страхотни професионалисти. Закупих преди 2 дни климатик Фуджицу Дженерал 12 от фирма "Д енд Д трейд" ЕООД. Климатикът ми беше доставен безплатно и монтиран за около час и половина. Момчетата работиха чисто и бързо. Доволна съм от фирмата и я препоръчвам.
very helpful, when it comes to my insurance needs, I recently moved to vegas,from seattle wa, and love my Insurance co, made the transition very easy thanks s.k
None
Joining Cobra Kai was the best decision I've made in quite a wile. I don't really have too much experience with other gyms since this was the 1st one I joined but I have never thought about going anywhere else. Everybody who trains there is just as happy to see you getting better as they are for them self. Sim Go has a great was of teaching and is all ways great with answering any question I have had. Bottom line is that if you want to learn jiu-jitsu in Las Vegas then Cobra Kai is a great choice.
Great night. Quick and friendly service. Cosy bed. Quiet sleep.
HONEST, KNOWLEDGEABLE and VERY RELIABLE!! I manage a busy dental office and had a computer down in one of the hygiene rooms. I had a quote and installation completed within 7 hours. They were also $350 cheaper than my usual tech and 3 days quicker!! Also Josh had no problem installing and configuring my dental software. Welcome to the team Computer Guys of OC!!!!
These shrimpies are not to be trifled with. Place is fun, staff is friendly, blah blah blah shrimp. Shrimp shrimp shrimp.
Very friendly, fast service and explained the contract in detail. Thank you Adria!
For those of you naysayers that don't believe in love at first sight, Callooh Callay is here to prove you wrong. From the very get go - upon hearing of a Narnia inspired wardrobe entrance - I was absolutely smitten with the idea of having drinks here. I was so keen to document my magnificent entry through the wardrobe that I even documented it - oh so casually, one might say, if posing by the door a half dozen or so times with a gleeful smile counts as 'casual'. The bulk of the bar is a cool, enigmatic space reminiscent of fantasy speakeasies. With a gramophone playing lazily in the corner and disco balls twinkling overhead, I was thrown into a state of playful confusion. I was in a speakeasy jazz bar (or so the dulcet smooth jazz overhead told me) and I was eyeing a menu that looked suspiciously like an Oyster card. Which it was, of course. In perfect miniature lay before me an Oyster Card: drink edition menu. Filled to the brim with whimsical aphorisms like the "Spruce Willis" ("a drink as long as McClane's rap sheet"), whittling down my choice to a few drinks was going to be a difficult feat. Listening to the giggling, slow dull murmur of the crowd around me, I gathered my courage and ordered the Disco Gin Pernod, a drink filled with Tanqueray gin, mulled orange syrup, sweet Vermouth along with a nice little Cynar and Pernod absinthe. I'm no heavy drinker - I tend to shy away from burly drinks filled with Vermouth and Whisky - but I absolutely adored the Disco Gin. It was as playful as its namesake, with hints of bitter overlapping slight sweetness - perfect for an eager yet fearful novice like myself. Being an American and not privy to absinthe, I was (inappropriately enough) giddy like a child to try my drink. I was shocked: the absinthe wasn't bitter like I expected, but instead had a tamed sweetness; never cloyingly sweet, but rather a drink that had been expertly tempered with other happy mixins. All in all, I can't wait to come back and take another leap through the wardrobe - who knows what I'll find on the other side next time.
None
On time, professional, friendly and SUPER convenient! Came to my office and fixed my phone while I worked. I highly recommend this service!
GREAT FOOD A LIL PRICY BUT WORTH IT VERY SATISFIED :)
I have tried many things on this menu at this restaurant. Being a garlic lover to the max, I absolutely love everything. Joey's rule big-time!!! Christine is absolutely wonderful and so are the delivery people! I never have found anyone who does not listen and care about my order. ICO fries, ICO wings, Joey, Greek salad - all things I love - and they do them just the way I like. The sandwiches - especially on garlic bread - are wonderful. Go Enjoy! Yummmmmmm!
Amazing work!! From start to finish he worked with us and did a fabulous job capturing the spirit and personality of our family.
We stayed five days at the 1927 Charming Lakefront English cottage that they rent. It was outstanding! We felt welcome from the minute we entered; the owners were gracious hosts. With a big dock area, canoe and the whole large cove to swim, we were able to totally unwind. A ping pong table, large checker set and plenty of places to curl up and read gave us the opportunity to get away. Cable TV was there if we needed it, but weather was so perfect we did a lot of outdoor things including horseback riding and exploring Chimney Rock State Park and ate every meal on the deck overlooking the lake.
jai shree shyam
wonderful
Wow!!! My experience with Dr. Curtis and staff was more than what I expected.. The customer service was very professional and they made me feel comfortable... I would recommend all my friends and family. Thanks for the adjustment I feel great..... Thank you all for your help..........
I went in for the very first time and had asked if they did walk-ins or by appointment only. The receptionist, who was very friendly, told me by appointment only, but I was able to get in in 30 minutes due to a cancellation. The entire staff is very friendly. Dr. Fleck was very informative and treated me like he had known me for years. I will be picking up my glasses in about a week and I will be going to them from now on.
David was great! Came to my house and tinted my 2010 Camaro. Looks amazing and he was fast! I highly recommend Beat the Heat Tint to anyone!
Top notch bail bonds lady. Friendly and she is the best when it comes to bail in Riverside!
He is an exceptional photographer. His workmanship and dedication to achieving perfection is admirable. I was pleased with his work and the quality of his end product. I received full sessions for our engagement and our wedding. I also received a beautiful engagement album and a beautiful wedding album. Currently still working with him and so far he has completed my work in a timely matter. He is very flexible with appointments and will meet with you multiple times. Additionally it is very easy and fun to work with him. During our event, he took many photos, but also being considerate and allowing my wife and I to enjoy our wedding. He took all the right photos and captured some very special moments. Thank you Miguel for your work.
I've been going to the Parlor for about a year. Consistently good haircut every time! I recommend any of the three barbers who work there - they all do a great job. If you're looking for a consistently good haircut, look no further. Robert
Cafe Moderno's food is exceptional. The Cambridge Chamber of Commerce uses them to cater meetings at our office. Outstanding staff, outstanding food
Probably the best pub in the World! I was born and raised, and, have lived and worked in the North all my my life and The New Bee Hive is one of the best pubs I have been to - a perfect combination of great beers, a Juke Box (is it still there?) with what apperred to be my CD collection loaded into it, amazing!, a pool table, a variety of smaller snug rooms, real fires (are they still there?) and a night club in the cellar, awesome! It's up there with The Fighting Cock and The Shoulder of Mutton, Kirkgate but more.
None
Heerlijk puur Italiaans eten, zeer persoonlijke en uiterst vriendelijke bediening, bijzondere sfeer en keuken met ware houtgestookte pizzaoven.
I've been a frequent customer since years ago. Awesome food there.
Love red cat!!! AMAZING coffee!!!!!
None
Six Dog is amazing! I've used them both for a single item and larger quantity as well. They always are more then willing to help with what will work best and the quality NEVER! disappoints. Six Dog has never missed a deadline, and even sneaked in a quick order that was last minute and important. I would never recommend anyone else!
Thanks to Justin Draper for getting me all set up with a new phone plus fixing up my account. Great place to go!
I have had great service at Gilbert Veterinary Hospital. My lil Peanut (shih tzu) gets great care. I appreciate the staff and all they do to take care of her.
None
Bail Bond Superstars is a professional bail bond service! They work with you personally to ensure the process is smooth and hassel free from bail through all your court appearances. They can come to you or do bail by phone/email in many cases for a fast secure process. If you want the best, call Bail Bond Superstars!
Cerveceria muy calida,al lado del campo de futbol del Talavera de la Reina,muy buenos precios y siempre una tapa,de lo mejorcito de talavera de la reina
Jason is a very thorough and qualified professional. As an engineer I have designed multiple projects of which Jason had a part in their construction. His unique combination of engineering and construction skills were key to the success of those projects as well as his Certified Home Inspections.
If you're looking for a unique and quirky place to stay while visiting Portland, this is definitely the place to stay. The rooms were extremely clean and very well taken care of, the most comfortable beds we had experienced while in the area (we stayed in 3 hotels whilst on a week vacation), free movies while you stay, free PARKING for guests which is a very rare find, and the staff really couldn't have been any nicer! All in all, after paying to stay at a hotel almost double the rate on a previous day, The Kennedy School is one of the nicest hotels I've stayed in. It really was a great experience.
Building devoted for the degrees of (BBA), (MBA), (M Phil) (M Phil BA), (PHD) & (PHD BA).
Marvin did an excellent job finding what would be a good fit for our needs. No pressure. Have worked with him several times and always consistently good service. Thanks.
I had a specially good experience in shopping for a used car at Peak Kia, Littleton. From my first visit this morning until we closed the deal this evening, I felt that John Morgan was looking after every need that my wife and I verbalized. He took special interest in making sure we had water, that we understood every piece of paper we signed and every option we had. He was extremely patient, allowing my wife to drive all the way home to pick up a document that we had forgotten to bring. By the end of the day, we felt he was our best friend, even though we had just met him. We gave him and his boss, Mike, a number and they responded with a fantastic deal for us. We left feeling that we could recommend our friends to this dealership, in general, and John Morgan, specifically. We are grateful and happy for this whole experience, especially since we have had a history of very negative experiences in shopping for vehicles at other dealerships.
Great service range, friendly deliver drivers, tasty pizza!
I've trained in martial arts for many years in different disciplines and under different instructors. There are schools out there that have become mainly a business with less emphasis on the development of the individual student. There are schools that will promote students even though the student has not shown proficiency or has not earned the promotion. Salvosa BJJ is most assuredly not one of them. For those searching for an instructor who genuinely cares about the development and progression of each student and will gladly give individual attention, Professor Salvosa is definitely one such instructor. For those looking for a place to train where emphasis is given to growing as a team and each success is earned, Salvosa BJJ is certainly an academy to consider.
The food is amazing! There is so much variety! The wait staff is super friendly, and the prices are unbelievably affordable.
We've just come away from The Turkey Inn after having a great meal. Excellent food at a very reasonable price served by very attentive staff. Well kept Timothy Taylor's Landlord on draft and a great mix of music playing. Highly recommended!
Fantastic guitar shop - a gem. Well worth the visit. Each time I enjoy the quiet feeling of respect & love the owners, visitors have and the place is filled with for fine acoustic instruments. I'm not religious about religion, but when I'm there, it's like being in a country chapel.
Excellent food and friendly service. I have tried the Akash twice now and my daughter has used the their carry out service. Food is excellent quality, full of flavour and good value. Service is personal and welcoming.
I agree with Gwilym - this feels like the lounge away from home. Music, coffee, food and staff all great. C1 has something a little extra, which is hard to define but which makes you feel comfortable and welcomed. A great place to hang out for breakfast on the weekend
None
I needed to top up the engine oil (under 10K). I went there today and they did it very fast without any charges.
Greatest Northern Thai restaurant in LA EVER!! Actually, I think it's the only place you can find here.
best in the world
Excellent museum of Viking expansion. Truly amazing boat, which sailed it's way to NewYork in 2000. Also, the guide is very helpful and friendly. Thanks!
None
These guys are wonderful! They take the time to get things right, will work with you at the level of experience you have, and are forthright in their recommendations and suggestions. They follow through with information when they say they will, and are attentive to the details. Above all, they maintain a rapport that makes the customer feel like family! I bought my first windows from them in about 1999, and only wish I had known about them sooner. First rate all 'round!
None
Достойное заведение
Amazing jewelery, great clothing selection, great purses...and decent prices too. Great stop on my visits to Whitehorse!
In one word excellent
هع
I took my standard poodle there. I've been wary of trying any new groomer, he's had some horrible haircuts in the past! But Julian's showed excellent service, a clean environment, and really listened to what I wanted. My poodle boy came out prancing happily and with a great cut. I think what counts the most is that my dog was happy. He's been so miserable other places, so I imagine what happened behind closed doors was an excellent positive experience for him. It took 2 hours, which was much better than I expected, and I won't be taking my boy anywhere else!
Best damn university in the area!
Amazing food!
None
None
Great place. People working there actually come up to you and ask if you need assistance unlike shoot straight
None
My salesman David was very professional and courteous. Car buying can be a very stressful process and Keyes Audi made the experience very pleasant. I highly recommend buying an Audi from this dealer. Thank you!
Billionaire CEO and Founder Von Pratt inc
Have you ever heard the term my family loves food, well if not I know just the restaurant for your family or guest! The flying tomato bar & Grill in Graham Washington owned and operated by the Walker family., and they do just love food! So today the un-food critic and company will visit the flying tomato and try out some of their specialty items. After entering the restaurant a friendly server showed us to a comfortable booth. As we were seated the server immediately ask for drink order and presented us with a menu. I can tell you right now I really enjoyed the fact that the server paid attention to each detail of our meal order. For starters we ordered the zucchini sticks. The zucchini sticks have been rolled in a special batter with just the right amounts spices then deep fried to give a rich full flavor. The sticks were served with a home made a cucumber sauce. I'm never enjoyed zucchini but this is the a real taste treat. With each meal at the flying tomato you receive what they call Recession Bread Basket. This wonderfully baked bread comes with a creamy butter spread that has a very smooth mouth watering taste. After enjoying the bread and the zucchini sticks, I decided to try a Philly steak and cheese sandwich. Now I know that sounds not like what you would want to buy at an Italian restaurant. However I wanted to see what they mean by term flame broilers burgers and sandwiches. All Burgers and sandwiches all come with your choice of either french fries, side house salad or soup du jour, for the price of $10. My brother who came along with me on this particular trip decided to have the Old World Meatball Sandwich. You have to understand that my brother is somewhat of a very knowledgeable food critic himself. He pointed out to me some of the interesting items on the Menu. The restaurants the DE-core is very family-style with added touch of class. Where else can you dine at and actually have the opportunity to draw on the table covering. This I found it very interesting especially when my brother was creating his own flying tomato sign. The waitress brought the food items to the table in a condition that I'm not ready for. The food was hot. The place settings were simple and very functional. The food itself was displayed properly on the plate with an eye-catching appeal. Now I'm always under the understanding that a Philly steak and cheese sandwich is served on a hoagie style role. What a surprise Philly steak sandwich is served on a round dark brown bun. The sandwich incorporates a combination of onions, peppers, cheese with seasoned Philly meat. Each bite has a taste of fresh peppers with a subtle hint of onion. Combined with special season Philly Steak meat makes what I call a real Philly sandwich. The old world meatball sandwich combines Marinara, onion strings, fresh peppers, & mozzarella. This sandwich also was served on a round dark brown bun, stuffed a specially seasoned meatballs. Here's a sandwich with a great taste..... that you don't have to ask where's the beef. The Flying Tomato Bar & Grill has a complete menu that covers salads, great pasta dishes, Flame Broiled Burgers and Sandwiches, Pizza, & Seafood items, prepared in the family tradition..... As for the un-food critic this is without a doubt one of the finest Italian restaurants in Washington.
I bought a 2013 Silverado 1500 from Colonial during the Memorial Day sale. Aside from the great discount I got, the service Colonial provided was exceptional. I live in Maryland so I was unable to be present to sign any of the paperwork. Joe Pells did a great job finding the exact truck I wanted and then overnighting the package for me to sign. Once I picked the truck up he walked through all the features with me and even synced my bluetooth. I wouldn't buy another Chevy anywhere else.
I love the rotating, seasonal menu and local sourcing of fresh ingredients. One of my favorite restaurants in lawrence.
يستحق الزيارة
We bought a used Cadillac CTS from the dealership. The car was in excellent condition, the transaction went smoothly and Laura Singer was a great salesperson to deal with. All our questions were answered and faster than expected we were on the road again. Thank you so much! A car buying experience can't get any better.
Drove all the way from Wichita, KS to purchase a vehicle from here. Nothing in Wichita came close to all the added features and price. Internet staff was very friendly, I put a deposit down to hold the vehicle until I could make the trip there to test drive. Everyone was very friendly, and the entire experience was great. We'll be buying all of our future vehicles here.
Had a cracked windshield replaced. Excellent workmanship and customer service. Highly recommended.
It's not that often that you are able to deal with good honest Christian business people, but Beneficial is one of them. They are honest and charge a fair price for their services.
The best craft beer line up on this side of Orange County
I was pretty sure that I wanted a MINI when I walked into South Bay but the whole experience of getting my little red car was more satisfying and fun than anticipated. I worked with Ash who is warm, friendly and courteous. I felt no pressure to buy and he made me laugh - sending me pictures of my "gorgeous" red mini after I test drove it. (I was torn between red and pepper white and he was trying to help me decide). Ash even brought the car to me at work so I could see the sunroof and the color red in bright daylight which helped me make key decisions about my MINI. The facilities are great, too and the VIP program is the best - with free car washes on a drive-in basis - That matters in LA. The finance person I worked with was also very good and patiently helped me choose among the extended warranty options without pressure. Altogether, I was treated like a valued customer from start to finish when I drove off. And, I now look forward to driving just about anywhere because the MINI handles well and is a really fun car to drive. Thanks to all the good people I worked with at South Bay.
Best tibbs ever!!!
None
None
We used Baynham Home Improvements during 2012. In particular Phil Baynham who completed the renovation of our sitting room which in its own way presented numerous challenges. The over view of the work that needed to be done was to open up the fire place to enable a double sided wood burner to be installed, then to re-plaster board all the walls and beamed ceiling. He then leveled the 32 sq mtr floor to enable him to install a solid oak wood floor, which was done to a meticulous standard. Overall the whole conversion was completed in time and with the minimum of fuss, I would recommend Baynham Home Improvements for any work that may be required and will be assured of satisfaction. Useful Gerry Newman - Hereford
I had and excellent experience at Rejuvenation MD! Dr. Phillip was very friendly and competent. He described in detail everything that he would be doing and also took the time to discuss other procedures that I had questions about. He made me feel very comfortable as did his friendly staff. Most of all, I love my juvederm!! He did a great job and I look great!
Excellent and marvoles
Great hotel, excellent service!
Excellent after sale service.
None
Wing Eyecare has given me the ability to create a practice that allows me to care for my patients to the full scope of my license. I enjoy the freedom to treat everyone with the time they deserve and the level of detail that I expect for myself. I enjoy all aspects of eye care to include comprehensive eye care, ocular disease and all specialty contact lenses. I look forward to seeing you and your family in the near future. Thank you for showing your confidence in us through the referral of your friends as well!
Went to buy an spare tire for my car. Marco offered an extraordinary help and explained clearly the options I had available. The tire was not available at the moment so I had to order it. The tire was ready when promised. Outstanding service and very knowledgeable personnel.
I was very frustrated with dealerships and the whole idea of car shopping. Classic Nissan was a breath of fresh air. Ian was great, He took the time to listen and find us what we needed, not try to "sell" us. He was professional, courteous and honest. T.J. was great as well, He wen to bat for us and got us a great deal. John was informative and straight forward. It was a no Nonsense process. I will recommend this dealership to anyone. Plus We LOVE our new Rogue!
Love this hotel
Dan is an excellent, honest mechanic and very affordable to boot. Really a very good all around mechanic. I have no complaints and will take all my cars to Dan. Recommended him to all my friends and family.
Dr. Van Stralen has been my dentist for over 10 years. He completely restored my mouth and now I have very few problems. His work is top notch, and he is always makes me feel comfortable. I would highly recommend him!
Music Source did a fabulous job at our August 24th, 2013, wedding at the Oakley Lindsay Center in Quincy, IL! Jon Roth was great to work with throughout the whole planning process and really paid attention to each little detail, making my job as the bride much easier. Jon met with us several times before the big day to go through details and made sure everything was just how we wanted it to be. He is very prompt with emails and all communication and always responds right away. His high level of professionalism and commitment to providing the best DJ service in the area is one of the many reasons we are glad we chose him to be our DJ, and we are so happy he was willing to travel all the way to Quincy from Springfield. And he not only acts as a DJ, but also as Master of Ceremonies (MC) to ensure everything runs smoothly. The music sounded great, we had fabulous looking uplights around the room in our light pink wedding color, and Jon made sure to keep everyone having fun all night. We also rented the bubble machine, which was a huge hit, especially with the youngsters. For our father/daughter dance he spent along time putting a 6 song mix together that had everyone raving all night. I would highly recommend Music Source DJ services! - Graceann and Andrew DeVlieger
y ademas estan bien buenas las tellers especialmente la kristen jiji
Had the pan seared salmon and tried the steak and both were excellent. One of the better meals I have ever had and would highly recommend it.
We absolutely LOVE this place! If you're looking for an authentic and peaceful mountain campground, this is it. The Owners are so friendly and make themselves accessible 24/7. The river is beautiful and the campsites aren't all crammed together. This is an awesome place to "get away from it all".
Great service!
Ursula's is one of the finest dining establishments in the Twin Cities. No one should ever miss one of their wine dinners. They are awesome. Last night we attended on featuring Huia and Honky Dory Wines. Each of the 6 dishes were a delight and the wines were simply extraordinary. Each dinner at any time of the year has been a culinary adventure for us.
Professional yet affordable service! Never any surprises when using this shop. The staff is courteous and friendly. The owner Deb, has put together a class business!
I really like going to the movies and this theater is a pretty good one for a small place like Rocky Mount.
I bought a 2012 Ford Focus and though I am not extremely pleased with the car, I love the service from Rob Sight. I got the best price I could find on the car. $2000 less than another car I test drove with same features. I have had a couple problems with the car....including the transmission, and they have been great at taking care of it for me.
#LizarranGaudi está muy cerca de la Sagrada Familia en Barcelona, es un excelente lugar para disfrutar de cañas, pinchos y tapas a muy buen precio. La atención por parte de los camareros es muy buena. Y se puede disfrutar de la transmisión de todos los partidos de fútbol.
The Caroline is a blessing for Troy! Our family loves having dinner and Sunday brunch here. The food is great, atmosphere is awesome and the staff is very nice. Keep up the good work! Thinking about the food is making me hungry. I'm going to have to stop by for lunch!
None
None
Great service and great veg. option for food.
My check engine light came on after 9 pm on December 30. I had the car at Ganley by mid-day the next day (Christmas Eve). The car was fixed the same day, but I chose to leave it at Ganley for several days because I wasn't going to be in the area. When I came to pick it up before being at work at 9:00 a.m., the service people were so customer service oriented that I commented on their service to my colleagues at work (also a customer service oriented entity). My car was repaired, I was told what the problem was, and they washed my car and scraped off the snow before returning it to me.
i love this place, its very hard to please me when it comes to chinese food, im use to the chinese food from the 80s which was too good, well this place resembles that flavor. the egg rolls are the best and the beef and broccolli is amazing. it is the cleanest chinese restaurant i have been in, keep in mind its more of a takeout joint than eat in. Enjoy!!!!
I absolutely miss this place. I moved away from Colorado back to Phoenix 2 years ago and wish they had a Pahgre's here. The owner is awesome, gave away food on Christmas AND DELIVERED IT! Absolutely the best meatballs I've ever had. If you have a problem, bring it to his attention, he will straighten it out! One of the friendliest people I have ever met. Thank you so much.
None
Get the Lavender Mocha! It is the bet coffee I've had in Austin.
Tire Barn Warehouse on Kingston Pike was great. I usually keep my car at the dealer for general maintenance but when I received my quote for new front tires and tire pressure sensors on my Chrysler Crossfire I had to look around. My first quote was Tire Barn who literally quoted me half the price for the same Michelin tires. The service was friendly, quick, and satisfactory. I would definitely recommend!
A huge thank you to Carter Auto Repair. Very professional, with morals and integrity beyond compare. We dropped our Lincoln off, they quoted a better price than their competitors, repaired quicker than expected, and upon arrival to pick my vehicle up, we found the balance to be $200.00 less than the quote we were prepared to pay. Thanks to Tommy and Carter Auto Repair and its team of professionals.
This store is fabulous! There is apparently new ownership, for the better. I would certainly rather go here than a corporate pet store for crickets for my bearded dragon.. among other things. Also, out of all the pet shops in our area, this one is the nicest hands down.
Great place for immediate construction work. Awesome helpful staff, great personal attention!
Always a fave destination :-)
Our Favorite sushi place!
Perfect place for when you need a good ol' burger. They tots are delicious and their fry sauce and tarter are divine!
A great stay! Checkin was great, with very attentive and helpful staff. Room was comfortable, with a great European flair. Will definitely stay here again! Highly recommend the lounge with a great bar and pool tables!
None
My experiences there are very good. They are all very nice and helpful. They always explain what they are going to do. Thank you for you for all the time you put into your job. :)
Jim Bowman was the sales consultant I worked with and definitely the best one ever in my 40 years of purchasing vehicles. He was professional and extremely helpful in answering questions and getting the right product for me. He is a great listener and steered me directly to vehicles that were best based upon what I had communicated as my goals and objectives. Jim is extremely knowledgeable about the products which was very helpful in changing my decision to purchase a new, rather than used, Tacoma 4x4 pickup. Jim did a great job of explaining the process and introducing the entire Checkered Flag Team who were a part of the transaction, including those assisting in the service department. He made me feel like I was a part of the Checkered Flag family and both my wife and I can say that this was by far the best experience we have ever had at a dealership! I have already referred three people to Jim Bowman and will continue to do so. He is definitely the go to guy in this area for new or used vehicles and the Checkered Flag experience is definitely the very best!
None
Thai Basils is a wonderful, authentic Thai Restaurant. If you love Thai food or just want to try something great with wonderful flavor, this is the place!
when i made an appointment i was told for $16 I would get the best hair cut of my life and I did. He is fast and really cheerful making you laugh the whole time. I left and got my girl, she absolutely loved it. My boss, friends all loved. If your a guy and never been to a barbershop before give it a try. It was way better than your strip mall salons.
I was visiting from out of state with my dog that developed intestinal distress on the trip. Unfortunately, her accident occurred in my best friends car. I called Kool Rides on Friday morning and they were able to detail the car the same day. It could not have been a pleasant job but they did an excellent job and I am very grateful.
I don't know what the Google User three years ago is talking about. I've had my tires mounted, rotated, inflated, repaired, replaced, and balanced with no problems. The old tires just disappeared no hassle about disposal. Maybe the Google user was at a different store or just got out on the wrong side of the bed. As for their online site and phone messages - come on. This is a mom and pop operation. The people who work there know tires. They know how to get them off and on your car with a minimum of fuss. They do it quickly and in a friendly manner. You get this for a rock bottom price and yes their tires are used. If you want to pay more they have a limited selection of new. I can live without the fancy website and the polished phone message. I use these guys all the time for my business. Thanks Roman!
None
Beautiful salon, exceptional staff and reasonable prices!
Rico:3 ah.
I've been to this place at least 5 times both for my car and for my daughters car, and she is very bad with taking care of her vehicle..... Alan is very good at explaining what is wrong and what needs to be done, and if you can't afford everything like in my daughters case, he'll tell you what can wait. I don't know what was wrong with the guy who gave this place a bad review, maybe it was him.
Great place
Nice clean spa! Amanda was great and always makes you feel refresh after a massage session with her. Great location too! very nice to relax and walk along Steveston Village after a great day at the spa.
Very nice place. Not too expensive and lovely food. Cannot beat it for Italian food, a must visit if your in the mood for an Italian
Love jack in the box
The store is still open and they make great take out food, try the Lumpia..
Great Experience, we just used them to move packed boxes and furniture and they did a great job. Moved out 3 bedroom house down the street in just 4 hours. Very professional crew and worth the money not to have to spend all day doing this ourselves!
I can't say enough things about the Shari's in Federal Way. The waiters greet you at the door, make you feel at ease right away. Sit you at the table quickly and answer questions about the menu items with knowledge of each entre. And bring the food piping hot to our table with a smile. We love going there every Friday morning for breakfast. Come join us! You'll be happy you did!
Nice trip to cancun, had fun and had a good car new, no problems and on time, every time!
None
I stayed the night there and it was a great. They had very nice accommodations and the breakfast the next morning was awesome. I didn't see in any ghosts but the place was definitely creepy.
My BMW has issues from time to time, and I highly recommend these guys. Jason is very good at diagnosing problems with my car, and the estimates for repairs are always far lower than what I would expect to pay at the dealership.
Fantastic architecture, food and service. Excellent lounge and bar. The group and private dining areas are distinctive - any excuse I can find to book them will be taken!
This place is great I can't believe no one wrote a review about it The Kabob Sandwich is the best The person who works here is very friendly. It's not in a perfect location but the food is amazing I love it
10 jaar geleden heb ik bij Imed een cursus mogen volgen. De marketing technieken die ik van hem heb mogen leren pas ik nog steeds in mijn dagelijkse werkzaamheden toe.
None
отлично, только мало, всего 40 минут представление было!
Had not been into an Elmers in years. Stopped in on a crowded Sunday morning and the line moved quickly (big positive.) My waitress was very good - helpful without being my new best friend. I had a ham, cheese, mushroom omlettle and it was great. My son the berry crepe which was outstanding. Price was fine and the coffee kept getting refilled regularly. Great place.
Very clean and secure storage site!
Giving some much needed love: I've been with T-Mobile for almost 10 years and recently moved to the St. Louis area. I've been to this store 3 times and each experience was great. First was to purchase 3 galaxy S4's. Service was great. It took a while, only because the computer systems wouldn't let the agent ring up the devices for full purchase. My agent had to have me pay for the 3 down payments, then pay off the rest in another transaction. Not his fault, and he was very apologetic. Second was to pick up some accessories, same agent, and he actually showed me where and how to make the purchase online to save me money! Waste of a trip? Not to save money!!! The third: had an issue with one of the S4s and TMO customer care said they couldn't do anything about it. Same agent was able to process a warranty exchange, and we had the new phone in 2 days. I'm heading there again tomorrow to pick up some Galaxy Note 3's. Maybe it's just the agent but I love going to this store, and I love being a T-Mobile customer.
First off, It was nice to find a bike store open on a Sunday! Thanks for that as my Saturdays are filled with Floor Hockey and other items. My wife and I noticed a great price for a new Specialized Dolce Road Bike on the internet. I emailed and received a response within 12 hours! Not too shabby in today's world. We met Michael at the shop and he was very helpful in finding the right size and bike for my wife. The bike was purchased and assembled the same day. We met Sam(Owner) and his wife when we picked up the bike. It is great to see an owner that is so passionate about his work. I would highly recommend this store for your bike needs!
Place to buy cars yes u hear Me please ask for dan cucu u will get the best price in town
None
I love this place. Nice, clean, great service. Unique weight loss experience!
None
In simple terms, this dealer ship was great to my dad and I! I bought a used 07 Chevy Tahoe. We inspected this thing like no tomorrow, of course there was some things I would want to be fixed in order for me to buy it. Tommy Haynes was the one helping us with the sale and he was great, he's your typical sales guy! We addressed what we wanted done and he got them done. I decided after seeing the work done, this is the car I wanted, so we bought it. Financing was laid out very clearly, which I like. So far, the vehicle is GREAT! If I ever decide to buy another car, I will be going back to Auto Nation Ford Katy.
Perfect visit. Charming staff and doctor. They are all great. Very lively and funny. They gave great explanations and directions. I swear I will floss more. :)
None
When you call to make a payment, the staff is wonderful to work with and very kind hearted.
Patrick and his team at Phacient are truly knowledgeable and vested in their client's success. Phacient consulted and provided strategic guidance on several projects for our company. Phacient's team is able to provide a unique perspective on real estate businesses, especially in the area of business processes, branding, and guidance on building successful business cultures. I would engage Phacient for additional projects in the future.
None
Amazing amounts of understandable biblical knowledge is given here using the bible not just saying it
I purchased a new AR-15 through Paladin and am very pleased with how helpful the company was. I then looked up the same exact rifle on a used firearm site and it turns out I saved a few hundred dollars! I also took the NRA certified basic pistol class with Paladin and the class was amazing! It was very informative and I learned a lot. I highly recommend this company to anyone.
Amazing food. Well worth any drive.
None
I had 2 vintage Omega watches that I needed opened up to get serial #s and make sure they were working properly. When I called most stores, I got the feeling that they were giving me higher quotes because of the brand of watch. I also read the reviews on the stores that I called and was not impressed. CSS had great reviews and was very informative on the phone. Not only was Scott friendly and knowledgable but extremely helpful and the price was very nice! It's refreshing to get reasonable prices and excellent service once in a while because sadly enough, it only happens once in a while... Thanks Scott! Jason
I have been seeing Joe as my Tattoo artist now for over 4 years. His Cosmic Tattoo building is spotless, it has beautiful art to purchase and just an all around up scale place to have your tattoo done! I enjoy the people that work with Joe, and to have Joe see your vision of what you want done and then put it to ink is amazing. I am proud to show his work of art that he has done for me and the fact people stop me in 5 star restaurants to ask me where and who did my work on my back! Thank you Joe!
The people who vote 1 star or less than 3 stars dont know how to review review restaurants. The people giving this place bad reviews are more than likely use to eating at 5 star restaurants or have outrageous expectations. The food is really good! I got tge
Great service, friendly staff, and they always have vehicles ready to go except during Manhattan's infamous moving day around the beginning of the month when everyone decides to break their lease and move to Timbuktu.
The restaurant was small, but festively decorated and had a fun atmostphere. The service was terrific. And the tacos are only $1 each on Taco Thursdays! I highly recommend the Tacos al Pastor; they were the most delicious and authentic Mexican food I've had in months. And the margeritas on the rocks were cheaper and tastier than most other Mexican restaurants--it tasted like the real thing, rather than processed margerita mix. Had an awesome time!
Wonderful service by Chris R.
None
Gluten free!
@mr. abhishek ..sir we take all measures to keep the hygiene conditions proper and tidy...you r most welcome to visit and check.We maintain the dignity of such a famous beverage brand and also we are the oldest bottling company to have pollution checks of our vehicles regularly.
One of the BEST Orchards in our area...From fresh farm fruits and vegetables to fall pumpkins, peaches and apples...All in a beautiful location with knowledgeable associates to help and answer questions! Lewis' is a blessing to our community!
Renco just HANDLED IT. From the quote through the completion of the work everything went fast, smooth and easy.
Manger ce midi super bien malgre une entre dessert unique
I've worked with many different shops for mobile electronics since I got the tech bug when I was 16 (20 years ago, ugghh!) and I have to say the people at Sound Connection blew me away with their knowledge and professionalism. Not to mention their work is second to none, and I would recommend their services and products to anyone, and have many times! Keep up the great work guys and gals!
The wood fired pizzas are incredible. If you have the same pizza from the gas oven it is good, but no where near as good as the wood fired oven. What does the wood do? I don't know, except that it imparts a taste to the pizza and a consistency in the dough that makes it delicious. One day we bought one of each just to confirm our suspicions that the wood fired was better. It was confirmed alright, definitely a superior product.
Luxor Limo saved this Texas mom from freaking out when another car company forgot to pick up my son. The car arrived within 10 minutes. I was SOLD. We have used Luxor Limo several times and they will be the only car company we call. My son has had a great experience and really likes the level of service the drivers provide. Thank you again Luxor Limo for helping this mom calm.
Been going here for almost 20 years. A local favorite!
Best Ford dealer in the metro Boston area. Professional, courteous and knowledgeable service staff.
Our salesman Suvin Viswanathan at Criswell Honda made our car buying experience enjoyable. From the first talk my wife and I had with Suvin about purchasing a vehicle from the dealership, he did not play the normal dealer games that some sales people use. He treated us with respect and honesty, and we hold that in high regard. When it came time to talk vehicle price, he gave us his best price first and there were no high pressure tactics applied to purchase the vehicle as soon as the price was given. This gave us the sense that the timetable to purchase the vehicle was ours, and not the dealer's. Again my wife and I respect this type of treatment. When my wife and I were ready to purchase, the price remained what was quoted and the whole process was quick and enjoyable. I need to also say that manager Esteban Mesa was also pleasant to deal with at the dealership.
My bride to be was ecstatic when picking up her unique and complexly tailored $2,000 wedding dress. It took a couple of visits in to get it just right and there were unforeseen issues that came up during the process. Despite these unforeseen issues, the original quoted price was adhered to. The future Mrs. was pleased also with the demeanor of the employees. When she is happy I am happy, because I am the cleanup crew when things go wrong. A seamless transaction always leaves me grateful and satisfied.
Fully lived up to expectations. Fabulous experience on all counts
I still remember the day when i stepped into the main gate of UET,taxila. The Journey towards the electrical department was full of mysteries. The fear of being ragged by the seniors and the excitement of studying engineering was disastrous. But time is a great healer. as time passed a fell in love with UET,Taxila and its belongings. The things that used to irritate me from the word go begin to be a source of sereneness. 2 years have passed by. Right now em 600 km far from UET,taxila sitting on my bed writing this review,enjoying the summer vacations but on the harsh side missing my University too. GoD Bless u UET,Taxila. May u prosper. (Ameen)
Kiwi's Creekside Cabin We loved it! The house is very nice and very clean. Has a wonderful deck by the creek for meals, a smaller deck upstairs for relaxing, and a nice hottub (with privacy no less). The kitchen is well-appointed and the dining room table spacious. The twin beds bedroom downstairs perfect for little (or big!) children. The house is fun and attractive and not full of kitch! We would love to go back there. Carolyn Wallace
great school gives me lots of memories
Best ice cream ever. At least once a month or stop by and treat myself. Because it is a treat.
Ottimo, personale squisito!
Chris and his team replaced old and worn out iron roofs for my buildings at Epsom. He did a meticulous job, which went beyond the call of duty. His team were always helpful, tidy and professional and most of all, cleaned up the site after they finished. Chris has as organized team and one has only to trust him with the job and you will always be delighted. He is now our friend and I recommend Tyson Roofing very strongly for your roofing work. If you would like to see his work, visit the 2 buildings at Caring 4 Smiles Dental Group, 475 Manukau Road, Epsom. All the best Chris. Thanks for a great job.
None
None
Sadie really took care of me. As a last minute walk-in on possibly the busiest day of their year, I was bowled over with their customer service. Will buy all my flowers here in the future.
I had excellent service, respect and care for my Great Dane, Whitney. Whitney was close to the end of her wonderful life and this clinic was wonderful to her. I went for acupuncture to help ease Whitney's pain and it was helping her alot. Also, when it came time for Whitney to ease away to the Rainbow Bridge, our vet from this clinic came to our house on her day off, to help Whitney go in peace. Can not say enough wonderful things about this clinic and people!
Get the combo plate, it's absolutely delicious
Friendly, Quick and delicious
Who was that chick with the seven heads?
Eye doctors in Rockville are all over the place. You can get glasses or contacts just about anywhere now (even Walmart!). That said, what you can't get anywhere else is an optometrist who will treat you with the respect, care, concern and professionalism that Dr. Glazier and his team will give you. Over the past three years I have been treated with nothing less than the honest concern one would expect from a health care provider. Hats off to Dr. Glazier and his entire team.
Amazing instruction! I have been a dancer since childhood and Leyla Soleil is one of the most experienced and energetic teachers I have taken class with. Gained a wealth of knowledge about many forms of dance from her and I have now been one of her students for over 5 years. Also, check out her videos for beautiful and inspiring performances. Dance du Soleil is one of the most creative and unique bellydance companies around!
None
Heerlijk gegeten met een prachtig uitzicht
Doug is a sandwich master. While the soft serve is great, I go to the Freez when I'm in the mood for massive amounts of meat and toppings in a sandwich for less than $5. Understated, this place is a gem. Easily the sickest Freez/Sandwich shop in the universe, let alone the Happy Valley.
Extremely helpful staff . I got my man a great pair of underwear he swears fits him like a dream. Tandem-gear has a largest selection of mans underwear in have found in Tacoma. Tandem also has a nice selection of bdsm gear and fetish gear. Corsets and some great club wear for the ladies . Not your average store , defiantly worth checking out .
None
None
Blake's Tree Service provided a professional tree service last week, when I called them to help me cutting down a tree in front of my house.
Never had better. Food was very tasty and the right degree of spice.
Their pizza mostly taste great, me and my mates usually order them for company functions and team lunch. You can't go wrong in selecting any of their pizza selections.
Love shopping here; friendly staff; efficient check out, including self check and we always find what we need. Oh, and great samples, too. :-)
Awesome deal... $2.99 for a slice and a drink!
I regularly stop by Allen's NY Pizza just for the combo deal. Where else can you get a great slice of pizza and two sides for under $7.00? On Fridays I will also order online and then Allen's delivers (for free!). Love this place!!
None
I am not a vegetarian but after eating at this restaurant I might switch. Why you ask? Because it wasn't until after I finished eating that I found out it was a vegetarian restaurant and the chicken I ate was actually delicious healthy tofu. If all vegetarian food was like this place, our fields would be overrun with cows.
Fantastisk god biff red curry och servicen inget att klaga på.
I recently purchased a Genesis coupe, i love my new car. my friends recommended me to go to tint king because they have a good reputation. They did an excellent job in the tint and im looking forward to my next visit in december to do the 3M paint protection! Thank You Carla
It great you have to go.Best Show
I love this Mellow Mushroom! My family and I come here frequently on the weekends. The dough is the best I've ever tasted, and the servers are always so friendly and remember us. Their calzones and marinara sauce are to die for. I wish I could swim in a lake full of their marinara it's so scrumptious. Other places have that awful, soupy, tomato-water marinara sauce, but Mellow Mushroom's is hearty and chunky and excellent.
saya sekolah disana
I am really impressed with the friendly people and how everything has it's place. It is very clean and organized and their clothes are precious. All the toys have it's place. I just love this store! The above review was posted as a service with the authorization of Kid to Kid San Antonio, and the above comments and opinions expressed in the review are those of the customer of Kid to Kid San Antonio.
Ich war nun schon mehrmals zum Essen im Landhotel Löwenbruch. Ob im Sommer auf der Terrasse oder jetzt im Winter innen. Der Service war stets freundlich und zuvorkommend und das Essen hervorragend. Komme immer wieder gern!
I love this store. They have a great selection of clothes and toys. My husband and I both enjoy shopping here. It is as if we are on a scavenger hunt every time we go. It's so much fun!! My son loves their play area, which allows me more time to look around. They have a large collection of shoes, which are great since my son grows out of his so quickly. I wish they had adult resell stores as well stocked, clean, and organized as this store. I haven't had any problems with the staff as other reviews, but I haven't tried selling anything to them. I would definitely give them a try. I have gone to Pumpkin Patch on South Lamar and find this store to be much better in quality and quantity.
Hermoso
I have been a client of Melissa's at Salon Antoine since 2005 and wouldn't go anywhere else. The staff is amazing and always greets you with a smile and a positive attitude. I always leave with an amazing style and a smile! I am lucky to have found such a great salon and stylist!
Doesn't it always seem like the heat or furnace goes out on the coldest day of winter? That's exactly what happened at my house. Luckily, Noble Heating & Cooling saved us from sleeping in coats and layers. I called them when our furnace wasn't turning on and the extremely knowledgeable and professional techs from Noble showed up within the hour to identify and fix our furnace issue. They were friendly, fast, and walked us through everything -- all at a great price. I highly recommend them.
This place was so nice and relaxing. It isn't very fancy, but I think that makes it feel even more relaxed. It was about 10 euros (less if you're a student), and there wasn't a time limit. Free tea, coffee, and water was offered. You could also buy some soft drinks and snacks, if you wanted to. It wasn't overly crowded, which was nice. There are spacious lockers available, that were included in the price. Two showers were also available. It was just a nice friendly atmosphere. You could even walk out into a secluded little patio, and cool down in between sessions. No one there stares at you either. It's very Finnish. It's also not an electrical sauna, so it feels a lot more natural. The man that was running the place speaks excellent English as well. I highly recommend!
Cash Camp CRUSH course at Big Slick was awesome! I have been playing NLHE for several years on and off but really got serious about my cash game this past year. I read books, watched videos, listened to podcasts, etc but I really wanted more hands on instruction. I researched classes/boot camps all over the country and found Big Slick. Because I live in San Diego, CA I really wanted to find a training where I didn't have to take too much time off work. I was very excited that they were hosting their first ever course of its kind. I read all the blogs and testimonials on the site and felt that Sean and Zach knew what they were doing and signed up. In comparison to other trainings I found online, I felt the price was fair and the chance to win your tuition back made it even better! Well Sean and Zach didn't disappoint. They are both incredible instructors and very patient with my questions. Sean really puts his heart and soul into his school and it shows. I was also very impressed with the high tech equipment at the school. I am really looking forward to getting a DVD copy of the class and our final table game to critique my play. I took about 100 pages of notes and am still digesting the information. They covered so many aspects of the game that I need to improve. I really feel like the course was packed with great content. So the real test was putting my new skills into practice. I left the class on Sunday and went to play at Winstar casino and I won more in my 3.5 hour session than the cost of the class! I know I will continue to improve as I digest this new information into my game. I feel like the most important thing I got from this course was more confidence when I sit down at a table now. If you want to take your game to the next level, go to their next Cash Camp CRUSH course.
I've always enjoyed the pizza here. Every time I come home, I have to pick up a few pizzas. The kitchen sink is the best!
None
I stayed at this hotel on a bike tour in 2013. It was a charming locally run hotel with very nice helpful staff, good food in the restaurant and comfortable accommodations. I highly recommend it.
None
None
Delivered our first baby at Bethesda North. The labor and delivery nurses were fantastic and the care we received after delivery was top notch. They were super supportive of our birth plan for a natural delivery. In the end I had an unexpected C-section and stayed in the hospital for 4 days. The doctors and nurses really took great care of us. The lactation consultant also was a great help to getting my baby and I off on a good foot with breast feeding. A+ care!!
My truck was badly damaged on the passenger side - both doors and the truck bed were mashed. When D&M got done with the repair, it looked like new. They changed out all the bent metal for new parts - no bondo. And they resprayed the whole side, to be sure it all matched. Excellent job, and I'll be sure to use them on any future repair work, although I hope I won't get hit by another bone-head any time soon. :-)
Extremely busy but worth the effort
None
Nice place . .
i had the BEST experience with autoplex! ABDUL WAS AWESOME!!! HATS OFF TO THIS COMPANY!!!! IF you have credit issues, THEY CAN HELP YOU OUT!!
I needed my wedding dress taken in on rather short notice. She did a wonderful job and for a very reasonable price.
Infinity on Camelback, by far is the best dealership in Phoenix. I worked with Tom in sales; he was very friendly and experienced....both with the auto itself, features and the paperwork. Lon came to my home, reviewed and explained the many features found on my JX....he was clear and precise with the directions! Super job guys, will be back and will recommend!
Good place to be
I recommend Hoffman ford Lincoln service to all my friend
The beer selection is pretty amazing for a Chinese place, but the real draw are the excellent cocktails. All the base ingredients are made fresh daily, and they have a great selection of liquors, liqueurs and bitters. The food selection ranges from better than your usual American-Chinese food to authentic cuisine. Highly recommended!
Nice place for a pint after a long journey
Our favorite sushi spot! Great service, food is the best, happy hour my wallet likes
The best mondongo like the Puerto Rico
Хороший зал та чудовий персонал:)
Om nom nom nom tacos are the best!!!
Omg the food and service is awsome !!!!!
There's another VN restaurant I've been going to for 20 years that I'd probably call my favorite restaurant overall. Mi Linh has been BETTER the first two times I've been there. In fact the second visit was one of the best meals of my life ... and it was carry-out!
Specialni chrestove menu se opravdu povedlo
Sela Gutter Connection installed gutters on our home that previously didn't have any gutters. They did a fantastic job installing them. The sales guy wasn't pushy and explained their products and options available, unlike some other outfit who think gutter are just gutters. The sales guy sized the gutters property according the roof size and we have no water issues to speak of. Thank you!
Great menu for both beers and food. If you have a hankering for those rare and tasty Belgian beers, this is the place for you. Excellent food items on everyone's plates and generous portions. The upstairs deck is a treat on a sunny day.
Went in over the weekend to see about renting a space for a family member moving this way. The overall experience was outstanding. Also, some of the best customer service I've dealt with when it comes to public storage in general. The Sales Representative, Mark, was very easy to approach as well as very knowledgeable about the array of storage spaces available and answered all my questions with ease. Definitely would recommend this to anyone looking into renting a storage space.
Olena is AMAZING!!! She is professional, and makes you feel very comfortable! ALL of the images came out so BEAUTIFUL it was hard to choose! I would recommend her for Weddings, Family Photos, Newborns, you name it...she will capture the moment beautifully!!!
Minha comum
I rely like the place. It is lively and just like home. I rely enjoyed my stay there for almost four month with no complain.
Dr. Muenzen and associates are hands down the best in New Jersey. I have been seeing Dr. Muenzen and Chuck since I relocated to Jersey in 2006. They have always directed me to the best specialists when I needed one and they were a tremendous help after my lumbar fusion. If you read some of the bad reviews on his "bedside manner" you will see a pattern of patients simply not wanting to hear the truth. His priority is and has always been the patient. He main concern is to bring you relief of whatever that may be. If what will help is not what you want to hear that is not his fault. Ask around amongst the doctors in New Jersey and you will be surprised as to how well regarded he is amongst his colleagues.
I love this location. I have been to other PT in the Raleigh area and this is the best by far. While they are not a quick lube, which some people apparently expected during their visits, they are very thoughtful, friendly, at a great price with thorough and respectful techs. Shannon, and the rest of the team have always made me feel that not only I have made the right choice of car care, but also I have never felt like they are taking advantage of me as a female. If you are not looking for a quick 10 minute oil change that will cost you an arm and a leg, I HIGHLY recommend this location to everyone.
I own a small bakeshop and recently acquired cleaning services from a new company in London. I was very disappointed and they even damaged one of my ovens. This second cleaning time, I knew I had to looked for a better oven cleaning company in London. Luckily, I found your website. The services and rates were simply perfect!
This hotel was fantastic. The rooms and amenities were perfect, especially the rooftop pool! The staff was amazingly helpful and courteous as well.
I have seen Leah a couple times for some low back and hip pain. Leah is the first massage therapist that I've met/seen for my specific pain/injury. I've had other massages in the past, but Leah get's right to the problem and I've already felt relief and improvement in the few visits we've had. I am completely impressed and recommend Leah to everyone I know in Salt Lake that even mentions a small about of pain or discomfort. I will be a client for life!
Incredible to watch this church serve their community so well. I am impressed again and again at the ease with which you can come and feel right at home. Even in the larger space of the new campus, it has the same home feel of Eastside. The leadership seems committed to reaching new people and those who are far from God. In addition their global teams and local compassion efforts are helping to bring hope into every corner of orange county. If you are looking for a place to feel at home, meet new people, and be part of something that is committed to changing the world .... come check out Eastside Christian Church.
Great hotel the service is great. the room was nice and clean and it was cleaned everyday that we stayed. the hotel is walking distance from great food and entertainment . you can find something new everytime you leave the hotel.
Love their smoothies!
Adaya real estate company is the best! They were really helpful and the whole buying process was easy. Thanks Sam. You guys keep up the excellent work!
I recently came in to purchase pavers for my back yard. It was HOT and so many customers and employees were tired and crabby (myself included). The cashier in the outdoor department (Gracy May?) was great! Super helpful and very knowledgeable on the inventory and what we needed. We ended up purchasing a pallet and they loaded it within 10 minutes. Will definitely be coming back.
None
Tressa met with us and gave us immediate advice about what steps we should take to prepare for the best outcome. She couldn't have made the steps we needed to do any easier and walked us through step by step. I couldn't have done what could have been a daunting task very understandable. She gave us very quick feedback and reassured I was filling out everything correctly. We feel so much better about going forward and look forward to working with her in the years to come. She's very approachable and very helpful. We feel very fortunate we found her and I have all the faith in the world her business will be great for this community and families like ours.
This is literally the best food I've ever had in my life. I'm picky, especially about BBQ and come to Texas every year to eat it. The two hour wait in line in the rain this morning was 125% worth it.
Fantastic! Awesome tasting food for the health conscious. The prices are in step with the food, maybe cheaper than it should be. The staff is very attentive and know how to put up with an overly talkative customer (me) and still get food out FAST. I highly recommend these guys!
I was really nervous about finding a church that my family and I were comfortable with. I wanted something that was more active with family, and especially the children. Well, Rockfish is the place to be and feel comfortable. My husband does not go very often to church, and I must say that he loved it! We did not feel like eyes were all on us, We were heart lifted and happy that we went there.
I don't usually write reviews but I felt that this company deserved one. My 2010 Acura MDX had major damage and as soon as the car was towed to 427 i felt like I was in good hands. The service rep called me to see if I was ok and to let me know the car had arrived to the shop and kept me in the loop the entire time. When I called my insurance company they asked me which shop was doing the work and when I told them it was 427 they said they told me that they were one of the highest rated shops and that their work was of highest quality out there. When I went to see the car I got to see the shop and was blown away as to how clean and immaculate the place was. I am in sales and deal with people and companies every day and the service and work I received from this company was awesome. I had a great experience and would highly recommend 427 Auto Collision to anyone!
First off as soon as I walked in I was greeted by Bob who answered any questions I had. I used to sell cars so I know how the whole sales world goes. But Bob was just a genuine person beyond trying to sell me anything. What's funny is I told him I was "just looking". Before I knew it I was purchasing a Gibson LPJ. Amazing guitar!!! Very affordable and you get that all American Gibson sound I've been dreaming to own for 15 years. I can honestly say that if it wasn't for the crew and how nice everyone was I really would have just kept looking. I could have held out for another month and gone back home to Texas to purchase the Gibson from a Guitar Center where the customer service is as bad as a smelly fart. Instead I bought at George's in Springfield, PA. Again thank you guys for your "southern hospitality". I will be coming by soon to say my goodbyes to all of you and maybe have a few cold ones as well!
They were able to come out and perform a dye test on very short notice. They were very friendly and knowledgeable. I would definitely do business with them again.
They have mind blowing subs that I found a refreshing meal. They have fresh and tasty pizzas. They put nothing but the finest vegetables.
Ethan the service manager is very easy to work with & a personable guy. I have bought several vehicles from different dealers. My GMC's are the only vehicles I take to the dealer. The reason is cause of Ethan the service Manager. I heard Rick is back in the sales department. Welcome Back Rick!! Rick is the best to deal with in sales. He is just like Ethan. If you need service deal with Ethan & if you are looking to buy a vehicle deal with Rick. If Rick isn't there it is worth it to wait till he is back. Rick will listen to your wants & do his best to find the vehicle you are after. I gave the other sales guys an opportunity to sell me a vehicle 5 months ago. I was looking for a certain thing. They came back & said it wasn't available I would have to order it. I went down the street & they got me what i wanted. Of course Rick wasn't back at the time then, As you can tell by this review I do buy a number of cars & trucks yearly. Thanks for your GREAT SERVICE Ethan & Rick!!!
Excellent Halal food with So many selection to choose from during the weekend Brunch
None
Not only is this a storied business that started in 1975 by "El Guero" who sold a gold chain for seed capital it is a business that has grown by attention to customers one conversation at a time. Although I have not dined in during peak hours on the weekend, I have been there at noon and the food quality & service have been family friendly. This place does not make the carnitas and chicharron once it the morning and keep it warm all day there is a constant fresh batch daily well into late afternoon. You are guaranteed at least a Free Taco of carnitas if your order is to go and Free order of chicharron if you check-in on Facebook. Feel free to tweet them at @UruapanCarnitas they will make you SMILE :)
This little storefront shop next to Publix has changed names/ownership several times, but the quality has never changed. They have great pizza and even better baked goods. Their pizza is true New York style and the baked goods would rival any found in a New York bakery. Try the Lobster Tail and the Canoli!!
Best bar in Broad Ripple by far! Great drinks and prices, friendly staff, and a great atmosphere for any night!
The experience of attending Cheremoya Elementary School has been really wonderful. What a warm and caring community of teachers and staff. The kids are great and seeing my child's confidence grow from learning how to read (first grader), learning about the natural world, and gaining math skills has been tremendous. It's a small and cute school that has been around since 1915 with tall windows and bright classrooms. There is a brand new garden program and arts drams programs that have been brought in from very active parent participation. VERY happy to have my child enrolled.
Suwanee Vision has a professional staff who demonstrate their knowledge and availability to assisting Dr. Reddy with my annual eye exam the moment I arrive for my visit. I appreciate the flexible schedule and highly recommend their practice. Carla Lawler,
I have enjoyed my experiences in the past three years at Veda Salon on Southgate Road. Angela does the best gel manicure always striving for perfection to make your nails look beautiful. Marie does great massage and is my instant stress reliever. I always am greeted by friendly staff which adds to the special experience. Give it a try!
A great place run by great people! You feel like family and friends here. Great coffee, and interesting local food items!
None
They always do a good job
Schnelle Lieferung freundlicher Service gerne wieder
"Overall it was a very good experience. The people are warm and the services are very fine....
I love this store. Very helpful. I will go here any day over Lowes and Home Depot.
None
None
my wife and I just purchased a 2010 Jeep Grand Cherokee from Damian here. Very nice gentleman and gave us great choices. He was able to work out a great deal for us....and was very patient...considering we ar not easy to deal with. The service department also was very cooperative. They gave us a great deal on a remote start addon. I highly recommend these guys over here.
I have always had a favorable experience with Another Attic self storage. They have a clean and well lit facility with a friendly staff. I would recommend that if you need a convenient location to store your possessions or precious mementos that you consider Another Attic.
None
None
No se le puede pedir más en cuanto a prestaciones y atención a sus pacientes. Rocío hace una apuesta continua por el bienestar de las personas que acuden a su consulta, y se apoya en redes sociales para hacernos llegar artículos y vídeos sobre buenos hábitos que podemos incorporar en nuestro día a día. Me encanta el concepto, es una clínica de fisioterapia que pasa a formar parte de tu vida diaria.
Great friendly service Great burritos Will definitely be back
I purchased a 2007 PT Cruiser from Bob Royston this week. He was a pleasure to deal with, knowledgeable and unfailingly polite throughout the process. He and Shawn and the service department went above and beyond to get a repair I requested made in one day, so I could purchase the car and drive it back to Kentucky, and not make another trip up there. I got a great deal on the car, a great price on my trade-in, and unbeatable service. I'd recommend them to anyone.
Their food is delicious
None
Un posto davvero unico nel suo genere. Molto accogliente e davvero ben curato nello stile dell'arredamento. Si inizia con un massaggio agli olii essenziali al cuoio capelluto davvero rilassante (sono andato di mattina presto per iniziare bene la giornata) poi si prosegue con il lavaggio dei capelli seduti su una poltrona che esegue un massaggio alla colonna vertebrale. Bellissimo quanto inatteso. Infine il taglio dei capelli molto professionale, attento alle mie indicazioni. Altro lavaggio e asciugatura. Simpatia e coccole continue. Un posto da provare. Bravissimi!
None
None
I am a detail oriented person, not in an annoying way (I don't think?)… In any event, our salesman Robert Batman, seriously his name, was so patient, very understanding and made the experience as effortless as possible. We currently have another BMW, and had already ascertained that BMW of Bridgeport was our preferred dealer for service. So the choice of dealer had been made, but we were lucky to find "Batman"!
My boyfriend and I stayed at the Jesse Harlow House this past weekend. I chose to make my reservation here due to the friendliness and caring that Kathy showed during my initial phone call to get a quote on pricing. I had called many other locations and she was the only one I talked to that wanted to have a conversation instead of generically giving me numbers. Upon arrival she welcomed us in at the door and showed us around the house. When she said make yourself at home she meant it. She leaves you full range of the K-cup coffee and tea, provides cold drinks in the afternoon (homemade lemonade!), has a tray of snacks (brownies and baked goods), and even has a fridge with wine and beer – making sure you know it’s all up for grabs. The rooms were very clean and well kept. The breakfasts were not what you would call "traditional" such as eggs and bacon but were interesting (in a good way) and tasty. For example, the first day included grapefruit with toasted coconut, blueberry pancakes, sausage, and a salad (with candied nuts and cranberries). I would definitely stay here again and would recommend staying here to anyone who asked.
Jimmy Knox was great to work with, Professional and has great insight into what his cutomers needs are.
None
Exactly what it should be. I wouldn't change a thing.
Great Bar. Great food during the day. Great craic at night time.
I have worked with Lusky & Associates and they showed a level of responsiveness and professionalism I haven't seen anywhere else.
Dr. Patel, is possible some people can get mad on staff , or delay , but if you really need a DOCTOR he is the best you can have. I am his patient for years and my entire family too. He takes the time to talk to you he is human doctor not robot just writing RX. I believe I wont be alive if was not for his care about my health. Dr. Stu Patel is best doctor ever. Don't go by mis communications issues find your way to meet him and any effort will be compensate HE IS THE BEST !
This place is a good hole-in-the-wall. I love going on a cold day for their Caldo de res/pollo. Very reasonable.
Excellent service. Greenblade is thorough and provides great customer service. We have been a customer for 4 years and have been very pleased. I highly recommend them.
I had an issue with part of the headphone getting stuck in my headphone jack, and apple was charging me to replace my phone, however iFixYouri fixed it in under 30 dollars! This place is incredibly, and I would highly recommend anyone that has any kind of issues with their I-devices to take it these guys!
Great job, technician was knowledgeable and informative. Did a good job on my oven!
None
Great friendly staff. My family bail bond company. Thanks again.
None
Insanely delicious. Went here by myself for a mini-escape and was absolutely wowed by the spectacularly good food. Smokin' Bone cocktail, Brisket sandwich and BLT. Yes, I had two entrees. Can't wait to go back! Super -friendly, easy-going service. Nice size chairs. Good music at a reasonable level. Really want to try the pork ribs, the smoky burger and the half pound of bacon. So I'll be back. Soon.
None
None
I work on MacDill AFB and this our place of choice for most lunches out. Their food is great and service is awesome. The prices are a little high - but its well worth it -- huge portions and great taste.
Shortly after our SUV was totaled, we needed a vehicle quickly and decided to get a minivan. Wesley Chapel Toyota aggressively priced the model I wanted and we were able to drive home with it the day after I found it online. The low-pressure approach of salesman John Deloach and friendliness/helpfulness of the rest of the team put us at ease, and we appreciate the lack of stress that accompanied this experience!
what a great place to visit lots of interesting times
Angela Moore at SixDegreesSEO did a fantastic job of outlining my options for SEO/marketing work. She is very knowledgeable and was willing to give an honest opinion which in the SEO world sometimes is hard to get! She spent a lot of time with me going through pieces I was unfamiliar with, yet did not even charge me for her time. I did have her do the keyword research portion for my site, and was pleased with her timeliness and explanation of the results. I would recommend Angela to others looking for an honest, helpful, and expert opinion on their website.
None
Quick and correct. They got my van in right away and it was fixed later that day. Had my passat in there before and it was done in a timely manner. I have supplied the parts both times. Have not had a problem yet with these guys. I would recommend them to everyone.
YUM!!!!!!!!!!!! I've never eaten in, just delivery, but this food is delish! Delivery is fast (even in a polar vortex) and stayed relatively hot. Pizza was good, but the pizza turnover was AWESOME!! Chef salad should be called "meat lovers" and the Italian salad is huge and very, very good. My kids love the chicken strips and appetizers. Can't wait to go in for a visit.
None
Très joli magasin
Alexis Ramos Excelente vendedor, recomendado un 100%, hasta ahora mi esposa y yo estamos muy contentos con nuestra Dodge Journey, mil gracias.
My firm has used Cavalier on numerous occasions to serve subpoenas, file documents, and courier documents between other law firms. They have never missed a deadline and have proved that they can capably handle all our needs.
Early 2013 - Great and fast service. Dealt with Michael Lupinski. Took the time to explain everything and got back to me in a timely fashion. Great business. Nov 2013 - Dealt with David. Fast service, great business. Professional. 10/10
Went by for a price quote and was impressed with Sergio and the facility.
Great trip. Check in was easy and we were on the river in less than 15 minutes. The gear was excellent. Take out was only a few feet from the water's edge and the owner used my name as I got to the bank. Great people.
Counselor Mastroianni in Milford, MA listened to me and helped me. He is a great lawyer and a compassionate guy. Thanks Ray.
Its been 4 year without a single movie in fame
Every time I go to Harry's I have an excellent time. The bartenders make sure you get what you need even when the bar is three people deep all the way down. They are always playing great music and the tables at the front look out onto the Westport/Pennsylvania intersection which makes for amazing people watching.
Best curry house in the area and much cheaper (cost not food wise) than others in Chatterton Road
Best hotel in hyderabad
Tracy (809698) is awesome! He was courteous, timely, professional, and made it as easy convenient for me as possible. Wayne is awesome too, and really friendly! All the drivers are, really. I wish I remembered the names. Thank you East Coast Towing (and AAA) for consistently providing fantastic, A+ service.
None
As I was leaving Dr. Vold's office today, I thanked him for his efficiency and for my pain-free dental procedure. Dr. Vold has been a dentist for many years, and his professionalism and expertise are unrivaled. Everyone in the office is so friendly, as well, making the trip to the dentist as enjoyable as possible.
These manufactured homes are brand new to us. Our house has been here since the 80s, and the people that lived here before hus had all kinds of things stuck in the drain. Granted, it took him a few times to come out, but each time he was fast, pleasant, and really friendly. He knew what he was doing, and his rates CANNOT be beat. I would recommend him to any and everyone.
Great service. Knowledgeable sales consultant. I appreciated the level of responsiveness and professionalism and felt I had the time to review all my options to make the right choice for me.
The Tennessee Valley Railroad is a great place for a good old family outing. For you can ride in vintage 1920's passenger cars and pulled by extraordinary locomotives. Ranging from many diesel engines to the ex- Southern Railway #630 steam locomotive. You can also take a range of rides from the Missionary Ridge Local, Summerville Steam Special, Norfolk Southern 21st Century Steam, Rail fest, and more....
Everything was fast and well done. Rick was cool and easy to deal with. My band looked all over for people to do our merch and we decided to get rick to do our stickers because of the price. Lets just say our bands stickers weren't the ones rubbing off of car windows like other local bands and he fit a sticker to what we need not just some cookie cutter selection. I highly suggest ace high printing, they've never let us down.
Excellent hiking and biking trails, beautiful dolomite rock to view from the water, informational environmental programs put on by experienced staff from the park and a fantastic beach to bring families!
Excellent strategic location
mood; good 、 taste ; pretty good、 place; good！ i love "lamb roast with raspberry source" !!!!!! wish i could be there again some time soon.
This was my first time at The Cheesecake Factory and I absolutely loved it! I ordered Chicken Fettucine Alfredo it only took 10 minutes tops for me to receive my food. It came on a HUGE plate and the food quality was excellent! After only being able to eat a small portion the waitress boxed up our meals for us and we ordered dessert! You cannot go to The Cheesecake Factory without ordering cheesecake! Best cheesecake ever! And to top it all off, we had an excellent waitress who was very nice and attentive to our needs. She wasn't overbearing and she came around all at the right times. I also enjoyed the decor of the restaurant. It had dime lights and dark colored walls, which gave the room a calm, warm feeling. I loved it! Lastly, we went to dinner around 6:30 pm and we had no wait! EXCELLENT!
None
Had a great time staying here while visiting the local horse stables and distilleries in the area. Great pricing too!
Dr. Gondi is an excellent dentist. I have been using his services for almost an year. He really takes time to do through examination and explain the issues in simple language. He is very efficient in the procedures he does and I never had any 'painful' experiences I had with my previous dentists. I take my 5 year old and 3 year old kids to him as well and they always are treated just like kids have to be with lot of patience and careful attention. I wouldn't hesitate recommending Dr. Gondi to my closest friends.
My labradane Daisy loves it here! The staff is fantastic. They take such great care of her, you can really tell they love the pups. She is always exhausted by the end of the day. I can't say enough good things about this place!
None
Very good
After horrible customer service at the Lawnmower place on fielder in arlington I decided to give Grapevine a call. Within two minutes i was told the parts would be at the front counter with my name on them. Couldn't ask for more. Will def. return.
None
I did business with these fine folks a couple of years ago when I was taking care of a sick relative. Wow, what wonderful kind caring people they are. They went above and beyond to make sure we got the best equipment and always with a reasonable price. If they did not have what I needed, they would direct me to other sources as they just now did today over the phone. They treat you like family. May God Bless them !
The owners and managers of Hoover Tactical Firearms have taken notice of your thoughts and words and have taken them as constructive criticism. If you feel that you are having issues ask to speak with a member of our management team. We want to know when you feel mistreated as well as when you have received the service you expect. We are close to the end of one of the worst retail events in the history of our industry. We have worked to better train our employees and are now offering more services than ever. The newest is the public opportunity to shoot the live fire PRISM video scenarios. Our Cerekote firearm painting program has grown leaps and bounds. Ask to see examples when in the store. We hope to have more information available on our website soon. Our inventory is gradually growing but we are still having the same issues that almost every firearms retailer is having in our country. Inventory has not been able to match that of demand. We feel that we have kept our word that we will, and have not, increased our prices due to the vast demand. We hope our customers will remember that when inventory is back to pre December, 2012 levels. We wish we could take special orders and expect to have them filled but our wholesalers cannot currently provide that service within expectations. The firearms classes and shooting range are available seven days per week. Come enjoy some time shooting holes in our targets as well as the PRISM simulator. We know there are many opportunities for you when choosing where to spend your hard earned income. Give us the opportunity to show you what we hope, and many others enjoy, to be a favorite stop when choosing what to do.
A hidden gem in Mishawaka.
This is a awesome dentist office Dr Lin Lan is amazing, so friendly and so funny, I loved her. She actually came out to the parking lot to do impressions for dentures for my client. He has trouble walking. More doctors should be this down to earth and empathetic. 100% recommend
Had a lift installed on my Jeep and bought 5 huge tires. They gave me a great deal and a loner vehicle for 2 days while my Jeep was worked on (had to wait a day for tires to get delivered). They called 2 days after to make sure everything was good and even did free check ups days after. Service was amazing and everyone was a pleasure to talk to.Highly recommend and will definitely be back!
Best storage facility around. Best customer service. Went in yesterday because I couldn't put my credit card in on the website for montly auto pay. Rose was there and in the matter of just a couple of minutes it was taken care of. Excellent service!! Thanks Rose for your help. I also have to say Hannah at this location has been extremely helpful as we rented one unit and because of an emergency we had to switch to a larger unit for my mother's household contents. It was a very emotional situation and Hannah was very kind and professional assisting with the switch. We have rented storage units from time to time and I was not looking forward to renting again because of our last experience at a different facility with the "Storage Nazi". At this location the service is excellent and they appreciate the business. I highly recommend Public Storage on Red Bug Lake Road!!
You just cannot beat this location! Talk about right on the beach... Had a wonderful time and a very courteous staff that took care of our every need. Loved it!!!
I've experienced lots of fitness facilities through the years and none compares to SicFit Scottsdale. From the high end programming, focused and personalized coaching, energized environment and amazing community of people to the nutrition and goal oriented drive, they are helpful to every type of person. I highly recommend visiting their location to be better starting today.
Great painting company, got a free estimate and a greeting painting job.
Great communication, very knowledgeable and gives noticeable results!
None
The crew at Basso made our wedding dinner perfect.
Worked with and purchased products from IngleSport, their knowledge and professionalism was outstanding and the product arrived quickly! Couldn't ask for much more.
Responsive, took ownership of what i needed, communicated brilliantly, Could not have asked more. alex
Great food at the average price
I was 11 back in 1958 when my mom would take me to Pizza Town. We only lived a few blocks away. I am now 66 and lived in NH, Vermont, and now Florida. Whenever I had and have a chance and to head north, I always make Pizza Town a prioty stop. My wife is from Italy and loves the pizza, zeppoles and the fried calzone which is very hard to find. I WILL BE BACK.
None
Lovely place with lots of potential!
1. Marcel has been excellent and most of all patient in explaining all of the ins and outs of the car. Very knowledgeable about the car. 2. The finance department (I am sorry for forgetting his name) has been excellent too in explaining the added value service for our new car. Overall, excellent team!
Dr. Hodges provides the information needed in a clear and concise manner, no rushing or pushing for a decision. The office staff was very attentive and helpful. Going to the dentist's office is never fun yet Dental Walk-In Clinic make it the best of a difficult time!
Here it is
I had an excellent experience at the Watertown Ford service center in Waltham, MA. I was heading off on vacation, so I brought my car in for a 40,000mi tune-up. While I was there, I mentioned that I was having an issue with noise in the front left tire. In addition to the tune-up and rotating my tires, they also diagnosed a problem (covered by my warranty) and fixed it that day, enabling me to drive the many miles on my vacation without incident. The service was fast and friendly, and because the problem they found was covered by my warranty, the bill was very reasonable. I'll be taking my car back there in the future.
EXCELLENT FOOD, SPOTLESS GRILL! !!!
Eines meiner Lieblingsrestaurants im Thurgau am Bodensee - Das Hotel-Restaurant Adler ist einen größeren Umweg wert. Exzellente Speisen, Getränke und Service - und das in geschichtlichem Rahmen - Auberge Napoleon -
Best auto repair shop in San Francisco. Fair prices and honest work.
My regular
Great music, commercial free, they play requests
This was out last stop on the Bourbon Trail (even though they are no longer part of it). We wanted to see where Blanton's Bourbon was made. I was very impressed with our tour guide, Freddie. He was a third generation employee there and he was very knowledgeable about Buffalo Trace. He also conducted a very impressive and informative tasting. Enough so that we went out and bought products later that day.
Good food.
Toller Service - bin zufrieden kann ich nur weiterempfehlen
This is the third car I have purchased from Mercedes-Benz of Cary with Mike Newman as my salesperson. He and the entire team gave me the best deal possible and found the car with the exact options that I needed. I also appreciate the full orientation to the new car even though I am familiar with the model. Thanks, Mike and Mercedes Benz of Cary.
There's not anyone else I would call. Even on Sunday, Gary and his team are there to save me. I refer him to anyone who needs HVAC or plumbing. I love them.
If ever visiting a geart all rounder.
Melhor universidade de Portugal na área da Psicologia!
These guys are awesome! If you need a new roof, look no further. Very polite, always on time, reasonably priced and their work rules! They got the job done quick and cleaned up to the point that I couldn't even tell that they had been here. It was a pleasure doing business with TGB Roofing. Thanks.
Absolutely the best cafe in Cambridge! Great food, wonderful friendly staff, the best coffee! A huge range of menu and cabinet items to choose from. This is the centre of Cambridge in more ways than one - fantastic!
my lovely school :3
None
Never has a company made your average real estate agent look so professional as Placester does with their websites. Leveraging the Wordpress platforms, the designs are clean and clutter-free. The sites are built SEO-friendly (i.e. ready to rank well in Google). Also, the staff is incredibly helpful and responsive. The Placester team has clearly studied and mastered what makes an effective real estate website. Any agent using one of their websites has a solid leg-up on the competition.
Good
None
I live in Cornwall and its the best choppy around
Great school!
I have had my wedding ring in our family for 5 generations. Needless to say this piece is priceless. Over the years the ring had taken some punishment. It lost a few diamonds and the etching was severely faded. The team at Golden Key were able to replace the diamonds and hand engrave the original etchings. I have to say they repair my family ring to its original quality in two days. Perfect timing for my 10 year anniversary. Thanks Guys!
I wanted to give the Wedding Shoppe a HUGE shout out. I wanted to thank them all for doing such a great job for my wedding party and I. I especially wanted to thank my consultant, Megan Kelly, for helping me find my dream dress! I explained what I liked to her and she went to work grabbing several styles that I liked. I ended up finding my dress that day! She even helped put my whole look together with accessories for my ceremony and reception looks!! We loved our experience so much we ended getting our bridesmaids dresses and tuxes there as well. Both the bridesmaids and tuxedo departments helped us put the whole look together. We received endless compliments on how our wedding party looked. Thanks Wedding Shoppe for making our day perfect!
Excellent service
Was pretty happy with this florist. It appears to be a mom and pop operation. In all seriousness here, sometimes I'm not the best boyfriend in the world, so it's nice to be able to get flowers when I need to.
The staff at Neff Physical Therapy is very personable and caring. They take a strong interest in each patient to help them get better. Dr. Neff helped me get rid of my back pain in which the cause was unknown to doctors and all testing. I got very frustrated because my pain wasn't getting better but Dr. Neff never gave up and was persistent when other doctors were not. My dad needed PT for his back and I recommended Dr. Neff without hesitation. Neff Physical Therapy is right in Quarryville so it is convenient for the community but their care is worth any distance. Above all the staff and office is small so they give you one-on-one quality care, which cannot be said at larger organizations.
Great management, quick move-in process, love it here!
Best service I've ever had from a paint shop. Sam Leonard is the best delivery driver there is, hands down. The man is always on time, polite, and friendly.
It has been a week since my windows got tinted at Glass Tiger, and I found nothing wrong with it. No dirt, particles, or fibers can be found underneath the foil. They even found a way to install the foil under the rear window’s taillight. That was impressive. The heat repelling foil is of outstanding quality and performance, and I did not even know something like that existed. They are a bit on the pricy side, far from unaffordable, but work of that quality should not be cheap. You buy cheap you buy twice. I definitely found my tint firm for life and have recommended them to many of my friends and coworkers. Taking everything into account I give them a solid five out of five.
Top
None
I am loving Horsepower! I hate working out at the gym and this is such a better workout than I have ever gotten in my life. Dan is great, and the staff and facility are top notch. Really glad this came to my neighborhood.
I have been working with Dr. Gale and his office staff for years now and they are a great group. I would recommend anyone with a foot or ankle problem living in the Bismarck area to go see if Dr. Gale can help.
I had never gone tanning until today. I am going to aruba in the middle of July so I wanted to work on a base tan so I would not burn. I got a tour of the facility and the girl at the front desk was very helpful in suggesting what bed to try and how long I should go. Cant wait to go back!
None
I would recomend VCS for all of you home stereo systems, I had my system installed by another company and it never work so after a year or so a friend told me about VCS and I call them they came out fixed all of my problems and it works great.
Theresa was very helpful in finding the best storage unit for my needs and getting the best deal for me. Just signed up today but if this is any indication of the service, I expect to be there for at least the next year. Thanks Theresa !
Very nice campus
¡Showroom y trato de 10!
Another happy customer never knew what it was to sleep all nite.My wife has restless legs and kicks all nite Dave @ banner got us into a temperpedic mattress now I never fell her legs kick at nite again! Dave thank you so much
I have been going here for more than a decade with all of my cars. They are honest and reliable. One good story is that I once brought my car in because of a side-blinker malfunction. It was an older car and I had assumed it was non-trivial (flasher, wiring, etc). Turned out after inspection it was a light bulb only! They charged me $2.10 and nothing else. Once I found these guys in the late-90's, I have not taken my cars anywhere else.
By far, the best curry in SF! Service has always been A+ for eat in, or take out.
I worked with Cliff Hudson and he was the best car salesman I have ever experienced. He listened to everything we said and stayed late after closing to meet my families needs during the sale. I will say that everyone I met went above and beyond to help us feel comfortable during the sale. I look forward to working with them again in the future.
I researched Laser Hair removal for quite a long time before actually committing. I could not have been more pleased with Franklin Laser. The staff is excellent. I was shocked at how fast you could see results. Don't be worried about the drive to Franklin. I can leave downtown, have my treatment and still get back on my lunch break!
We have used Tricity Computers for our computer needs (equipment sales and service) for many years and have found owner/operator, Dennis Defotis both knowledgeable and professional in all of our dealings. We highly recommend TriCity Computers!
The family love going there to eat. Mostly during lunch. Has a rather nice sushi set up and quite the selection. The noodle selection was great. The coconut shrimp hot, The fresh muscles and garlic steamer clams was nice and the fruit and ice cream was nice. The traditional dishes was also there. Staff was very courtesy and the waitress was spot on it from keeping the table clean to giving us the check. Kudos for the Asian Staff and the Chinese food... Rate *****
The Battlefield is well preserved and the new (2008) visitor center is spectacular! Don't go without checking out the Cyclorama which was restored to bring it back to its 1880's condition and size, it is breathtaking.
If you enjoy great food at a very reasonable price ... this is the place to go! My kids love the food, as does my picky wife. If you are a skeptic keep in mind pricing is a $ on a $$$$$ scale and the value wold be ***** on the same scale!
Great clubs and steak in the sack...
Excellent and very reliable service! I send flowers from here to my mum every 8th of March. All the times the service has been puntual and all the flowers very fresh and they make lovely compositions! It is very professional and at the save time very individual and personal. The artist who makes the compositions is very talented indeed. I highly recommend this company for all connected with flowers compositions and delivery for all events you may have.
Best pawn shop in town! Got paid very well for my gold, and coins. Staff are very knowledgeable and friendly.
None
None
as i came here, it was a beautiful place to study until i met new friends, groups, hostel, and beautiful people to fell in love with, the urge to rise changed to the fun and staying high, and now in 3rd year i can say, it is the best place to rise due to the co-operative faculty and without hesitating i can say this is the best i could get...
These guys do a great job very smart locksmiths. I wouldn't use anyone else, big thumbs up. Keep up the great work Acme
Great pizza, great sushi, and friendly staff. This is definitely my go-to place for pizza, bagels, and sushi in Forest Hills.
Took a 2nd trip with Captain Mike this fall, and once again, he did not disappoint. Four of us left for a day's worth of fishing. On the way out, I noticed we were headed towards a grouping of boats that I assumed were fishing a reef or other structure since the sun was just coming up and it was probably a perfect time for the fish to be biting. Turns out, this structure was a place to net bait fish. There were 7-8 boats there during the 10 minutes or so we were approaching them. As we got closer, I saw all these boats struggling to get their nets in the water, and always coming up empty cast after cast. Captain Mike pulled into a tight opening between two other boats, tossed the net, and pulled up more bait than we could have used the entire day. It was amazing. Watched those boats fade into the distance as we were off to put our lines in the water, and not one other boat pulled away. Captain Mike clearly knows what he's doing. We had our lines in the water in no time, and landed 10 different species of fish. We had plenty for dinner and fought goliath grouper, one over 350 lbs. Another awesome day! We'll be back.
Patrick is the perfect professional and an accomplished video producer. I could not be more happy with him, or his product. you will be richer for knowing him. Bob Browning
None
Mike Till Associates are top notch planners and engineers in Sister Bay. I heard about them from living in the area. I'm glad I used their services because they did an excellent job. They're experts in what they do and the work they completed for me is AMAZING!!
A fantastic coffee shop to study, read and sip coffee. Early evening hours may be crowded, but once it settles down it's incredibly chill. I don't even like coffee, but the Summermoon Latte is my one exception. I've come here for 3+ years and every experience is a great one.
A true value for my money professional design company. I am always pleased with the ideas and results of my marketing projects that they have worked on. I have recommended The Graphic Garden when someone is looking for Graphic Design work in the Fraser Valley and will continue to.
None
None
I think these bad review are from people who eat dominoes every week. CPK isn't just another pizza place, you won't get another version of pizza hut. If that's what you want, go to pizza hut. CPK has exotic pizzas that you would never think of. And they are all incredible! My personal favorite is their wonderful pear gorgonzola, which makes my mouth water every time I think of it! Definitely for the discerning palate, don't come here for greasy disgusting pizza, you won't find it anywhere on the menu.
Comida buena aunque algo cara.
None
I hired DJ Charlie for one of my events. He was able to provide everything I needed and was on time. Excellent communication - he returns emails fast! Highly recommended.
I just wanted to comment on the fantastic service received from your staff this week at Castle Hill Holden. Both the staff over the phone as well as Bob Crnovic were informative, helpful and willing to go above and beyond to make things happen. Bob was an impeccable salesman – he was able to promote all the features of the vehicle and build rapport very easily with the decision makers involved in the sale, without being overly pushy. He asked quality questions to identify our buying needs and goals and really listened. Even when there were a few objections, Bob was able to handle them with ease and able to provide simple solutions. I find this a very rare quality. We made the decision within 20 minutes and were able to sort out all the paperwork and receive the vehicle within 24 hours. I would highly recommend visiting this branch if you are wanting to purchase a Holden. I am very happy with my vehicle and so far the post sales service has been just as good as the pre sales service. Thank you Castle Hill Holden staff!!!!
Great location and very helpful and generous owners. The cabins were comfortable and clean and had a great view of a pasture and forest. We only stayed one night but it was a great place to get away from the touristy parts of Deadwood. I'd highly recommend the place.
None
None
Excellent food in a very elegant setting. Great service and better desert.
I was introduced to LP with 3 of my co-workers as the work was nearing the end on his new space on Farmers last year and we went to go check out the progress. It so happened that I was looking for a new place to workout as I was tired of the snobby attitude at the local golf course athletic club I was paying for. Instantly, when I met LP, I knew...he had a vision of what he wanted his space to be. The vision he explained far exceeded my expectations. Everytime I walk in looking haggard in the morning, I am greeted by my name by LP or one of his A-CEO's who are nicer than nice! Everyone else working out is also always friendly. There is not a pretentious bone in there. Everyone is there to do their work and actually seem to have fun sweating away. People are smiling and even sometimes dancing during a workout. LP always has his eye on everyone and even when he is doing his personal training, he will offer a helpful tip to you during your own workout. It is an overall good feeling, place and positive energy surrounds it. LP has changed my perception of working out and how fun it can be! Even when I don't want to workout, just the fact of knowing that I will have a smile at the door motivates me to get there! Thank you my friend LP!
My favorite restaurant the entire world!!!! The food is EXCELLENT!!!!
I just visited the Body Blitz East location for the first time for a soak and a scrub. Staff were very gracious and accomodating and the spa was exceptionally clean. I went alone on a weekday morning and it was very peaceful. I would HIGHLY recommend indulging in the Blitz Scrub- heavenly. (This would make such a great gift!) Natalia provided my treatment and she was extrordinary. If you book a treatment go an hour before to steam and soak. I enjoyed a lovely, calming and nourishing experience!
Easily the best bar I sat at in Rome. Order their version of the White Russian, you won't be dissapointed.
I have dined here several times; business lunch, special Valentine's Day dinner, and just for a regular Friday meal in the evening. The wait is sometimes long but it has always been worth it. Food is well prepared and as expected. The servers have been excellent. There is no better place in Greeneville to get a great meal and be treated well.
Having read all the reviews on Google before going to the restaurant, I have to say that I was not disappointed. Brilliant quality of food and very good service. The Fish curry was fantastic !!! Highly recommended, and if you are lucky, you might get a complimentary liqueur ;-)
Very nice! It's a taco shop so get the tacos. You won't be disappointed!
Rick, his wife and his team have always been great to my wife and I. We have two vehicles and take both of them there exclusively. Their oil changes are cheap and have never had to return to have work redone. Their mechanic fixed some potentially major issues with my truck and it's running great. They also donate all used and old oil to Oregon Heat, a local non profit that helps heat homes in the winter for families in need. Take your car here. You won't regret it. -B
I have been a cook's corner customer for years, and not only do they have a wide variety of coffee that is roasted in the store, but they also have teas, spices, and kitchenware. Very fun and friendly place and it is obviously a labor of love. Highly recommended this place for quality coffee and friendly service!
Great Store Love the layout
Недорогой отличный отель для тех кто приехал на два-три дня гулять. Небольшая удобная парковка для машин, удобный проезд, уютные номера.
best services provider for Outsourcing SEO Company in Delhi..
VanTasks took all the hassle out of moving. The move was quick and painless and took less time than I thought it was going to.
So far so good. Customer service was funky, friendly and professional.
I have purchased my last four cars (3 used and 1 new) at Rick Ridings and Chris Mataya has brokered the deal on each one. One of the reasons I like working with Chris is that he doesn't pressure anyone into a sale. He's patient and willing to go the extra mile to make sure you're completely satisfied with the car and buying process. The dealership provides CarFax reports for any vehicle and is forthcoming about the condition of every car on their lot...from the brand new down to the oldest used vehicle. I'm always out to get myself the best deal and for each of my vehicles, did a great deal of research to make sure that I wasn't overpaying. If you buy in Champaign-Urbana, you WILL overpay. If you drive to Monticello and shop at Rick Ridings, you WILL get the best deal. Period. The problem with reviews online is that you don't always get the whole story. There are a couple of people here who seem to have had bad experiences, but my guess is that the stories aren't entirely true or that details are being withheld. I know Chris and this dealership well...and the negative things being posted here sound more like slander than an accurate account of what really took place. Rick Ridings does not sell lemons (they will refuse trade or pass at auction...true junk doesn't go on their lot!), but they do sell "value" vehicles with higher mileage. With any used car, you get what you pay for and blame shouldn't go back to the salesman if you choose to sign on the dotted line. CarFax reports are ALWAYS available and you're welcome to have your "car guy" come check out the vehicle before purchase. Caveat emptor! I am a greatly satisfied customer of Rick Ridings and will continue to purchase my vehicles there. Chris has my business locked down for the reasons I listed above and more. Feel free to contact me personally. I'm happy to share my individual purchasing experiences with you. Because I can't post my contact info here, call the dealership and ask for Chris or Rodney. Either of them can put you in touch with me! I'd love to tell your about my purchasing experience. (2008 Ford Explorer, 2008 Chrysler Town and Country, 2013 Ford Edge, 2012 Chevy Malibu)
Amazing job done here, and he always is the lowest price in a 30 mile radius. Plus a lifetime warranty, can't be beat!
Fabulous food and great staff! I use it regularly and cant bum it up enough!!
They have a new DJ and he plays a variety of music. The best wings in south jersey. Been visiting for the last 2 months with my husband and family/friends and we have had a good time dancing and eating. So, whenever we feel like hanging out close to home we go to 45th Street.
Need your dog bathed? Ask for Megan.
I've had the opportunity to take two classes through Ride Chicago. I initially took the scooter class with Jenya a few years ago and had a really positive experience. It made me a more confident and composed rider, better able to face the mean streets of Chicago. When I began to think about upgrading to a bigger ride, I knew that Ride Chicago would take good care of me! I took the Basic Licensing class even though I had my license already, mostly to learn the ins and outs of operating a manual bike. Although I happened to choose two of the hottest days of the year (pushing 100 degrees!!!) Eric, Tim, and Brad were all friendly, enthusiastic, knowledgable, and completely unfazed by the searing heat. The instructors made the class incredibly fun; goofy conversation topics were plentiful and kept us laughing throughout the entirety of the class. I really had a great time and now feel ready to tackle the next challenge of riding. Having had the experience of taking both classes, however, I'd recommend that people thinking of taking the scooter consider the Basic Licensing class as many of the skills are transferrable and if you can ride a motorcycle, you can most certainly ride a scooter! Also, you get to spend an extra day with the hilarious instructors! Definitely worth it!
I am a real estate investor and use Ed Stone on every house! They do exceptional work and I would never use anyone else!!!
Best haircut I have had in years! Fast, Friendly, & Affordable. Just ask tell them what you want and done. $13 men hair cut.
Schade das nur am Zweiten Weihnachtsfeiertag offen ist alle anderen haben auch nicht auf
We have been going to Capos for years. We usually go there for special occasions....the staff is friendly...the food is usually outstanding...once it was not as good as usual but reading the reviews below it seems to me that someone is trying to sabotage this place. I love Capos and in fact, im going to buy a gift certificate for friends of mine to go there this week. As far as ambiance...it doesnt get any better. The food is amazing too. I like their old location much better than the new one for ambiance. I will continue to go there.....for the food and experience....i dont think theres another local italian restaurant that compares. On a side note, the owners could be a bit more friendly.
Our company have planned to design a website. So we have searched in Google for best Web Design Company in Chennai. After a long research, we have found this leading Website Designer "Concern Info tech" Private Limited in Chennai. We have got world class Web Services from this company. We have got complete Web Package like Website Design, Development and SEO Services in Chennai.
Great place to work out. Friendly people and knowledgeable staff. One of the best gym experiences I have had.
I started getting my teeth worked on. Today i was waiting to get a cleaning done.. And the management was going out to lunch, while walking through the wait area these two lady's talk to one of the manager's as she was walking out. The manager Nancy Valdivia stop and talk to them, which were Spanish speaking clients, they talked then Nancy left and then came back in and told them something,[], which i heard one of the lady's say ''Thank You".... Wow!!! now that's what i Call Customer Service ..You can tell Nancy Valdivia always goes out of her way to Help her Clients .... Boy!!! we love our Gentle Dental.... They are always very caring and helpful......
None
SLC Fit Collective is awesome! I started going there after buying a Living Social deal and made it my goal to try as many of the different classes as I could. The yoga classes are small enough that you get individual adjustments and encouragements. Kalari was a ton of fun and left my legs sore for days. As all the other reviews mention, boot camp is an amazing workout and always good for a laugh and a positive message. I really like using the suspension system for the workouts, its easy to adjust the amount of weight you're actually lifting as you get stronger (or on days you feel more tired :-) ).
A phenomenal all-around jewelry experience. Outstanding staff and a wide selection. I would absolutely recommend Aaland!
Our Bichon Frise loves the Pink Poodle and the care he gets there. Fine people and reasonable rates.
Scott, Areli, and Jason did a great job working with me through the whole process of getting my new Equinox. It was a great experience all around!
awsome would like to come again
I had the privilege of working with Mike Willock as my sales representative when I came in to look at the 2014 Mazda 6. After searching around for an affordable (yet somewhat loaded) 4 door sadan with good gas mileage I found myself at Mazda. Being in sales myself (and knowing the game) it was very easy to work with Mike as he let the car sell itself rather than force feeding me facts, pricing options, and any other uncomfortable situation salesmen can attempt to get you into. As an educated consumer I already new the flaws of the car, and what I would like about it...I just wanted to drive it, and see for myself what it felt like inside. I loved it from the moment I test drove it to the the moment I drove it off the lot 2 days later (again, with no pressure to buy the first time). For those of you who are posting negative reviews on here you obviously have a skewed perception in thinking that everything is going to go your way in every situation; so wrong. Especially when buying a car, you need to compromise! Nothing in this world is perfect, and what is great for one person may not be for another so don't believe what you read online, just go and see things through your own eyes. At the end of the day I highly recommend the Mazda 6 Touring (with Tech Package) and working with Mike at Napleton Schaumburg Mazda!
0532426083
Great team at Spargs, they go out of their way to make your motoring easy. Happy to look in to the little things to make everything run smoothly. Thanks Natalie & Chris!
Brilliant site. Views of the surrounding countryside beautiful. Site clean, shower block excellent. Staff very helpful, went out of their way to help. Site itself beautifully maintained. 100% recommend.
If you are looking for outdoor furniture, you must come here. I had been looking for months. I had searched online and visited several stores, and I just could not find what I was looking for. After seeing the commercials for Great Gatherings, I decided it was worth a trip. When I finally had an opportunity to go to the store, I misjudged the time and arrived at the store 15 minutes prior to closing. I met Keith, and explained that I realized the store was about to close, and would be happy to obtain a card and information on certain sets; I could come back at a later date. But he stayed late and took his time to show me around. He did not pressure me or rush me, and an hour after the store had closed, I made my purchase. Truly, excellent service, and the excellent service continued through the delivery of the furniture. Moreover, the furniture is exactly what I wanted. I could not have made a better choice!
I bought my first new car since 1977 from Primeaux. I have always driven used cars but due to the miles I was driving I decided I needed a new car with a big warranty. I have had all my service done at the dealer ship since buying this Sorento 48,000 miles ago. My experience has always been excellent! They have always treated me like they value my business and want to make sure that I come back to buy from them again. I have bought more than my share of cars in my 55 years and I can truly say that Primeaux has treated me the way I would treat my customer. I am happy that I did business with them and when the time comes I wouldn't hesitate to buy again from them. In fact, I have sent two friends there and they bought cars from them and are equally happy with the level of care and service they have received.
I am came into Today's Vision Willowbrook with busted up glasses and was met by a friendly and super helpful Optician named Enrique. He looked up my account and was able to get me a new pair of glasses thru the warranty I had purchased less than a year ago. I love my glasses and now I don't have to do without them! Thank you so much Enrique!
Der Rote Ochs ist eine Instanz: Ein uriges fränkisches Gasthaus, wo man richtig gut essen kann. Die Eigentümer sind auch sehr nett und man fühlt sich gleich wie zu Hause. Das Essen ist wirklich ausgezeichnet: Der Chef kocht selbst und ist ein richtiger Koch-Nerd. Zudem kommt ein Teil des Gemüses und der Kräuter aus eigenem Anbau (hinter dem Gasthaus ist ein großer Garten). Besonders zu empfehlen sind die Eigenkreationen: Meerrettich-Schnitzel, Biereis, Club-Mate-Eis. Genial sind auch die Vorspeisen und die Bierauswahl!
Our experience at Faulkner Mazda has left absolutely nothing to be desired. The experience was simple, quick and enjoyable. From the politeness of the staff to the quality of the product, Faulkner Mazda has covered all of their bases. The quality of the product is obvious and was explained in depth by our sales person Mike Ramsey and Mark Eager. We were presented with the best possible situation to meet our family and financial needs and we left the dealership in a much better financial position than we came in with. The finance manager, I believe her name was Amanda, was very thorough and helpful, and everyone helped to create a very non-pressuring environment. The deal that we received was exceptional and the additional finance help that we received was greatly appreciated, especially during the holidays! Thank you for your hospitality and positive interaction to everyone that we came in contact with at Faulkner Mazda! My wife and I are both proud owners of Mazdas and we plan to be a part of the Faulkner Mazda family for years to come!
I work out at another facility and came into town and came here. Jo was super accomendating. It's a great work out and great gym. You should try it. You will be hooked to the crossfit way.
Vraiment spécial a voir !!!
The team of doctors and staff are phenomenal. The oncology department, there are no words to describe how I feel. They are friendly, professional, caring, compassionate and determined. I have to say like any other hospital, you will find some unfriendly people no matter where you go...overlooking that, I have to say UAB Hospital deserves its praises. The place is beautiful, clean and HUGE,.My mother a cancer patient was treated with the best care, The doctors work diligently in getting our mother health back on track. I would recommend UAB Hospital to anyone.. This is my first visit to the hopsital and I was completely satisified... You be the judge..........THANK YOU UAB,[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],[],
My buying experience at Palm Beach Toyota was excellent. Kevin Reel and his colleagues were fun and easy to do business with, and answered all of my questions fully and honestly. I'm very happy that I chose this dealership and team for my new car.
I am a life long resident of Ligonier and this is the place to go. It is family owned and they treat their patrons like part of their family. The Jr Combo is the best and I haven't found a single entree that isn't awesome! This is the place in Ligonier for Authentic Mexican food.
My experience was with the jewelry wing of this store. They have fantastic customer service, plus the appearance of a nice fine jewelry store - but with amazingly low prices and bonus-added for me: treasure-hunting excitement. Walking in past the line of people bringing in their goods surprisingly didn't bother me - we scooted into the jewelry area in a few steps. Kay was so helpful and patient and took her time, really listening to what we were looking for and our price range, and showing us anything that might be made to fit our fingers that there was any chance we might like. We got wedding/engagement rings that (although they are a little more conventional than we were hoping for) are really beautiful, comfortable, and would have been way way way out of our budget at a retail shop. Way more sparkle than I EVER thought I'd wear. They resized and polished within a day. I'm super happy with my experience and the deals we got. I feel like reuse is a responsible way to source precious jewelry, so I feel good about that too. I would recommend this place to any budget-conscious person in search of precious jewelry (especially wedding rings.)
None
My wife and I make the trek all the way from North Vancouver to take our cats Itchy & Scratchy to Surrey Animal Hospital because while it may be somewhat of a "no frills" facility (out front at least), the compassion with which our furbabies are treated is above reproach. In addition, we feel that we are given ALL options, not just the expensive ones, with any risks/rewards explained to us so that we can make an informed decision best suited to our particular situation. Thanks SAH!
Big mosque with good facilities. Separate prayer hall for ladies also available.
Finally, some actually-good Tacos on North Polk. The only problem with this place is that it may be temporary!
Merci grâce à vous j'ai un logo et des cartes de visites qui "déchirent". Bravos et merci. Francis Hippolyte . CSEFI
After being well overdue for a Dentist visit, I chose to have some much needed work done by the friendly staff at Charlestown Dental. Having only lived in the area for 5 years or so, I'd never been to a dentist in Newcastle so I wasn't sure of which one to choose. After my great experience at this awesome clinic, I'm very happy with my choice and plan to be a patient of Charlestown Dental Centre for many years to come. Thanks!
I moved from having 2 homes in Maui and Ca. to one in Oregon.I looked for close to a year tried a real horrible place then stumbled on Salon Delange.I asked for the best & got it.Carol is a genius colorist.When she corrected the cut & color from another Eugene salon I was transformed,she got it right! If she ever moves I'll follow her anywhere.She Is that good.
Everything I've had here so far has been excellent. The owner is a great guy, and his employees always make sure you are being taken care of.
None
Great seafood, had a chance for the owner to serve me, and give me tips on how to improve my ceviche.
I loved it! The parking is something to get used to but the store is fantastic. It is cheaper than going to Publix and I love that they have their own brand, which really helps price wise. They have soo much that you would not be able to find at other places. I would recommend going on the weekdays though it can get really crowded.
I have been a member of Better Bodies for over 5 years, and have always been nothing but impressed. The new equipment is top-notch and the staff is extremely helpful and friendly! It's nice to be able to go to a gym where I can feel comfortable and not have to deal with the normal "gym crowd."
I work right by Grimaldi's of Garden City and love going there for lunch! Their pizzas are the perfect size for a great meal and are deliciously crispy. The sauce is amazing and they have the perfect amount of cheese. Everything that I've tried on the menu has been delicious. Even though I work down the block, I would travel from afar to eat at Grimaldi's. The service is great too!
None
Not your typical car sales man! When I walked in and was met by Nate Cosman I was shocked. He was clean cut, handsome, low pressure, and very sharp! He really was wanting to find out what I was looking for and at the payment I could afford. I had been to so many other dealers when they guy did not know what he was doing or he just looked like he rolled out of bed with his dress clothes on, but Nate I would definately reccomend and on top of it all if you send him a customer that purchases a vehicle you get $200!
Hello My name is Mohammad.I worked with Niren and Associates for our immigration applicant's cases for a year.I am delightful to say that their immigration knowledge,experience and high quality of services are really distinctive and is one of the best immigration law office that made our clients quite satisfied by providing high quality of services and commitments. I am proud of being as an small part of this group for that period of time, in my region.
My family and I have been customers since moving back here from asia in 2008. It is a family run shop and the service is always wonderful. We've had practically everything from the menu: japchae, bibimbap, dol sot bibimbap, bulgogi, dwaeji bulgogi (spicy pork bulgogi), jok galbi (ribs), dak galbi (spicy bbq chicken), yukgaejang (spicy beef soup), kimchi stew, and soondubuchigae (spicy soft tofu stew) to name a few. Without fail it is our "go to" restaurant here in the Couve.
None
Beautiful presentation combined with locally sourced produce make this smashing wee bistro pub a must visit for anyone in the area or farther afield.
Just good people
Ho partecipato ad un grande evento che si è svolto nel giardino esterno del ristorante . Buffet delizioso, pietanze presentate in modo impeccabile e di ottimo gusto, servizio eccellente, assistenza ai tavoli del personale molto professionale, sempre presente nonostante fossimo circa 250 persone. Organizzazione dello spazio esterno gestito con cura , lasciando il giusto spazio fra i tavoli per creare quell'intimità necessaria per coversare con tranquillità. Spazio gioco bimbi fondamentale per poter garantire anche ai genitori di trascorrere una serata in serenità. I gestori sono molto accoglienti, professionali e disponibili ad accogliere richieste particolari, molto attenti alle esigenze dei propri ospiti. LO CONSIGLIO sia per pranzi, cerimonie, sia per semplici cene intime in dolce compagnia, e anche con bambini!
Great food, great drinks, great atmosphere.
None
Jai maa sharda
If you are looking for a church family, this is it.
I was told by a close friend of mine to visit State 8. This is where he had purchased his motorcycle and said that the service and value was unbeatable. I was in the market for a starter Sport-bike. After arriving to State 8 I was not rushed with salesmen hassling me or trying to make a quick sale, instead I was approached by a great man named Shawn H. roughly 5-10 minutes after browsing through. He asked me what I was looking for and after sitting on and talking about several bikes, I sat down to sign the paperwork for a new 2013 Honda CBR 500R. Overall 5 stars and great service. Honestly unbeatable. I would highly highly recommend this to anyone reading this or thinking to stop on in.
Best burgers.
A former first degree black belt in Taekwondo, I stumbled across YB World Taekwondo Academy two years ago after an extended hiatus from the martial art. Three months and thirty pounds later, I was feeling physically better and more confident than I had ever been. I'm now in the best shape of my life and well on my way to second degree. YB World Taekwondo has provided me with intense and enjoyable physical fitness via expert instruction that has also cultivated in me a previously unseen degree of discipline and mental well-being. I'm healthier, happier, and more self-assured. I think that speaks for itself.
Byliśmy z dziećmi już kilka razy. Plusy: Wszystko pod dzieci, nic nie jest problemem, jedzenie b. dobre, czysto. Minusy: Cena, z roku na rok dużo drożej.
Hire a Cleaning it is very reliable, after one year with a big company i decide to call a local company.
I went about a month ago to have a burger and a beer for lunch. The pricing was reasonable (not cheap, but definitely got my money's worth), and the burger was delicious. I was the only one in the restaurant and felt very well taken care of as my server was frequently checking in. I also had a nice beer - a brown ale that they had on tap. I would definitely recommend this restaurant.
Connie and John were fantastic! They made the process of dressing myself and my bridal party easy. Connie went above and beyond on alterations for my, my mother's, and my maid of honor's dresses. Absolutely wonderful!
Good food. The carne asada quesadilla is really good.
We recently worked with Don as our real estate agent in purchasing a new home. We started our search August 2012 and ended with the purchase of a short sale that began in October 2012 and closed in the beginning of January 2013. Don is personable while still being a professional. He was always available to show us homes as they came on the market and always answered my many emails quickly. He knew what we wanted and didn't let me settle when I started to lose hope that we would find our dream home. You always hear how purchasing a short sale is a tedious nightmare, and I didn't find this to be true. I know it's because of Don's hard work and keeping everything on schedule. I would highly recommend Don to anyone of my friends or family. Thank you, Don. I couldn't be happier in our new home!
None
LOVE this place. After my dog died of old age, was feeling sad. So I looked on their web and found an OUTSTANDING dog. He is a 4.5 year old Terrier/Westie mix. Fully house trained, VERY lovable, affectionate, GREAT personality. After brought him home found out he can do tricks, solve puzzles, walk backward. When get a bigger place with look for a friend for him. CANT go wrong. Quality animals.
I have done business with the Mancuso family through 3 generations and 40 years now and they have always been great. Honest, friendly hometown service if there ever was.
Located using map
I was treated courteously and promptly during the visit. The Service Consultant worked with me to decide which 35,000 mile services needed to be performed on my vehicle based on it's history and how it is driven. The Dealer waiting area was very comfortable and served excellent coffee and other snacks. The work was performed well and completed on time. The price for the the work performed was reasonable.
My experience at Computer Palace was exceptional. There was no pressure to upsale or marketing. They addressed my needs and gave me the freedom to attend to my immediate needs. I enjoy companies that are professional and respectful. On the other hand, big corporate businesses are always trying to add to the sale. You will not experience that here. I will go here for all my computer needs in the future. Sincerely, Michelle Howe
The Pumphouse Creamery is home to the best ice cream in the Twin Cities. Part of what makes it so good is the use of locally-sourced ingredients, from milk to cream to the fruits used in the various flavors. Be sure to stop by during the summer and try some of the delicious rhubarb ice cream, made from neighborhood rhubarb. The owner is gracious and friendly. Dogs are also welcome, which fits the ambiance of the area quite well. The location is just a couple blocks North of Minnehaha Parkway, so it makes a good stopover when on walks. Make a trip to the Pumphouse. It will be well worth your time.
I had tea from this cafe, It was amazing.
None
El mejor claustro de profesores que puedas encontrar en Diseño!
Ambiente agradável, atendimento excelente e a comida é uma delicia (recomendo a moqueca de siri mole).
Sempre uma delicia saborear as empadas e pastéis do Jerke.
Love IT!
None
Andy, Johnnie, and all the people at Campus Automotive run a top notch shop. They are quick, economical, and do great work. Thanks!
Wednesday nights mean 5 cent ribs! They are actually amazing. This place is awesome! Just my opinion, but I am not too worried about the service cause the food and environment are awesome.
None
None
None
I love Dr. Chalkin. I visited so many doctors to get relief from tennis elbow. Rather than giving more steroid shots, Dr. Chalkin sent me to Tulsa Hand Therapy, a wonderful group of people who worked wonders for my elbow. We are very lucky to have a doctor with his experience and expertise. If he hadn't fallen for an Oklahoma woman, he might have stayed in Boston. I'm grateful for his service to this city. Julie.
I put off dental care for a few years due to not having insurance. I found Affordable Dental Care to be just that. Affordable. The staff is great and the doctor is awesome. All around great experience. I recommended them to my friends and even received a credit for my next visit due to a friend getting a root canal and crown. Thanks guys. See you soon for my next cleaning.
Service was great. 24 hrs fits my schedule. Food is great! Karen is AWESOME!!!!
We went to Regal after many years of great service at Manito Vet. The small office is very personable and all staff are generous and helpful. All questions, options and decisions are discussed and there is no pressure to do a procedure,( for instance on my very old Westie) They are good with follow up
We have used Tammy Counts State Farm for 12 years and have been more than happy with their service for life insurance, homeowners and auto policies alike. Tammy and her whole team have always been polite and responsive. I am a Realtor and often refer my clients to this team when making insurance policy decisions. You are not just another number in a system; and it's nice to have a personal connection in those times that you need it.
None
A really nice English mass with an awesome choir that gives a serene feel to it.
Like you are in the Caribbean! Wow!
Ozzie gave me his full attention and listened to what I needed. He was sincere and personable- I felt comfortable and totally confident that my car was being taken care of. I will definaely be back just because of the great staff and down-to-earth atmosphere!
I've had great experiences at multiple Maaco locations. I had an estimate done for a smallish dent in my front bumper; they said about $100. I wanted to check the price with another place who tried to charge me $900 for a completely unnecessary replacement. I'm VERY thankful Maaco doesn't rip people off!
This is the best Indian food I've had in a long while. The service was perfect, food was done perfectly abd the atmosphere is extremely comfortable.
I love Dis BINGO hall Weekns my favorite$500.00 &$1000.00 nights yessa!
You have to try them out the food is great and there is a nice friendly feeling when you go there. You don't have to wait for that next cup of coffee as it is there before you finish your first cup. We have been going to this place for many year. This is one of the place that is used for many shoots for TV movies
UCC TENNIS CLUB
I met my husband up on Cape Cod, and this is the first beach he took me to. Coming from being a SOUTH NJ shore girl (Cape May, Wildwood), Kalmus Beach is a nice, refreshing place to be. The air is rejuvenating up there, and the beaches are pristine. I never see a ridiculous quantity of people there, and never run in to issues. Whoever said something about a bunch of illegals obviously has some sort of other agenda going on. Remember, our country started out there with "illegals".
Readily lovely food, fantastic for family parties
My now husband and I eloped in New Orleans in October, and the only aspect of the experience I really cared about was the photography. I did an extensive search for a photographer that fit my criteria: fair prices, beautiful photographs with a more artistic flair than the run-of-the-mill wedding portraiture, and some evidence of satisfaction from former clients. Pamela turned out to be exactly that. She is a quirky, energetic, and vibrant woman who takes amazing photographs! I booked a boudoir session before the ceremony as a gift to my husband, and then Pamela and her very helpful assistant accompanied us across the river to the Algiers Courthouse. She was nothing but professional, and kept me relaxed and laughing even in my skivvies. Furthermore, Pamela and her assistant were extraordinarily helpful: they served as our witnesses, helped us navigate the city a bit, gave us suggestions for fun things to do, and even ran to an ATM to get our license fee when we found out the courthouse only accepted cash! Pamela turned the photographs around very quickly, and they're absolutely marvelous. I am so glad that I made the decision to book Pamela for my photography: I have some priceless treasures that will keep me smiling for years to come.
Muy limpio .
Very nice shop. Everyone working there is knowledgeable and approachable. Shop is exactly what you are looking for, and the range is a huge plus.
Our company has been using Cactus flowers since 2006...they have always been very helpful and professional. The online order process is easy and they never mind if I call just to confirm order.
Nathan was on time and soo helpful! He thoroughly explained to me and my husband the options to fixing our leaky outside faucet. It was a quick simple fix, but then he stayed longer to give us some additional preventative tips. I would definitely recommend Benjamin Franklin for your plumbing needs.
Came here for dinner with some friends of ours. I'm not a big greek fan generally but the food here was fantastic. Everything tasted really good, I had a Chicken Souvlaki salad. Will return
Best school ever!!!!!!
Very accommodating, great hotel. When I forgot my phone charger, they overnighted it to me. Very pleased with the service here.
This is the first dentist who didn't make me feel like a bad human being for not brushing my teeth as often as I should. Also Jennifer and her staff are amusing as hell; making my first visit (almost 2 hours) fly by like no time at all.
Dans son jus, magnifique petit restaurant qui est parfait sur toute la ligne et même au delà grâce à une cuisine qui sort de l'ordinaire. Bravo au nouveau patron!
If you visit Rome, GA, you HAVE to go HERE! Schroeder's is part of what makes our city super cool! Don't forget to order a soft bread pretzel as part of your appetizers! I prefer mine with Schroeder's homemade ranch dressing! Delicious!!!!
Amazing service despite being vey busy. Efficient with an amazing meal
Taco shells not as doritoy as normal.
None
I have a newborn who is 7 weeks old, and when I was pregnant I started to itch A LOT, everynight I had to have my husband just scratch my back for at least 10 minutes, I also had a little rash on my stomach which I had for awhile, before I got pregnant. I started helping Donna with your marketing 2 years ago, so when this started to happen to me I asked her what it could be, it was driving me and my husband crazy. Donna said most likely it was food allergies, I told her I am not allergic to anything. Donna said you may not think you are, she had me do a blood test to see what foods i was sensitive to. Sure enough it came back that I was in high red for cow's milk something I drank EVERYDAY! I stopped drinking cow's milk and changed my diet and had an amazing pregnancy and now we are watching for signs in the baby. I am SO thankful Donna at East West Wellness was there to help me out, my doctor just told me it was dry skin! Thank you Donna!
Michael was very professional. He was friendly and on time. I would recomend this professional
Very friendly staff and good food, one of my favorite places for lunch because I enjoy the atmosphere a lot.
Excellent service - very reputable and trustworthy! We have two high mileage cars -- we are so excited to have found such a great mechanic to be able to rely on for repairs.
Best Persian food around Philly! Great quality and reasonably priced.
Anchoring the new wave of hipster takeover in the Valencia area of the Mission, Fourbarrel is an excellent place for more than just coffee, but an excellent atmosphere with a good, art, music and style oriented community. Come enjoy a perfectly brewed espresso for relatively good value and have a seat. The decor is mostly bare, but it gives off a very minimal, industrial vibe that allows one to focus more on the coffee. The back of the establishment is the brewing portion of the cafe itself which makes sitting in the cafe more interesting as you can see the beans crushed just yards away. Come once, come often.
None
Couldn't have been any easier, i had a box of files over 10 years old that i decided to purge so i stopped into the Fishers location and the staff were extremely friendly and professional. The charge for them to shred my documents was dirt cheap as well. This is a no brainer service if you have sensitive information you don't want to simply throw in the trash!
I don't have any children, but I do coach for a summer swim team in the area. My younger swimmers that learn from Goldfish are far more advanced in comparison to other kids in their age group (by a large margin). The child-focus approach they bring to teaching children how to swim blows away any other program. Kids love swimming at Goldfish and with their heated pool, fun teachers, colorful environment, and a ton of games and prizes, why wouldn't they??? When I have children I will undoubtedly send my kids to their program.
Me and my husband won a date to eat there in 2012 i love it very pricey but well worth the food and service was awesome
I recently moved to Michigan and I went to 2 different Dental Offices and forunately, someone recommended this Dental Office to me. My kids and I love the Dentists here and they are truly the most experienced and professional Dentists that I have gone to. Their office staff is friendly, sweet, professional and most efficient. The Dentists truly give you their undivided attention and treat you with the best care. If anyone in Michigan is looking for a Dental Office, look no further and call Southfield Family Dental Care. .
None
None
None
Brazos Valley Services is very good about reminding me about checkups for both A/C and Heating. Brad was the technician this checkup and he arrived on-time, was friendly and professional. He checked the thermostats and furnaces. He informed me of a possible issue with the drainage of condensation from the A/C units which I appreciated. He checked the units outside also. I have always had good service from Brazos Valley Services and this time was no exception. Well done! Thanks
J'ai offert un coffret découverte de pilotage à un ami, outre l'activité elle même qui était géniale, l'écoute et les conseils de Sport Découverte m'ont vraiment aidé dans mon choix, cette structure est sérieuse et fiable, je la recommande vivement !
Because of the contradictory reviews, I had to go see for myself. It's a great little place with some wonderful teas. They have a large array in canisters on the counter, and you can smell them before you buy them. Haven't tried the food yet, just the tea, but I loved taking an hour out of my afternoon to relax over a wonderful cup in a nice cafe. The food is all organic (and mostly gluten free, for those who care), and it's all excellent as well. Easily my favorite Korean food in Boulder.
Instant Imprints Coquitlam was very quick to responding emails and requests. I had a rush order that needed to be done, and Ernest took care of it and delivered even before the due date. Ernest is definitely the person to go to for printings, advertising materials, signs, and other promotional materials. Great job!
Thanks Scott, Your quick action saved me from some very unsavory scammers. I hate trolls trying to get money out of me that I don't owe.
Calikites are awesome. Great customer service, going up and above to provide the best experience. Brian and the team are friendly and fun. Will have no problem recommending friends or other kite enthusiasts.
This is my preferred vendor because they have a well stocked store and excellent service.
Favorite all time best food!
Great people fantastic dress, awesome value, would go there again in a heartbeat
Fabulous experience! Kody was a great instructor and everyone had a lot of fun! Would definitely recommend it to a friend and would LOVE to do it again!!
I was very pleased with my experience at Lithia Dodge, they visited with me about my needs in a vehicle and called me when a vehicle came in that fit the bill. They worked with us to get us a good price for the car and our trade, very friendly and had great follow up. I appreciated Burton Pierce remembering me and taking the time to call to let me know when they took the car we purchased in on trade.
Went into Capitol Guitars roughly 3 years ago when I was in the Twin Cities taking care of an ill parent. I was just curious about how some different pickups sounded in different guitar woods and they helped me with everything I needed with a great attitude. Once I proved I was a musician I had basically my run of the place. Knowledgeable guys that just wanted to help me out. The only thing I bought their was a tremolo arm, had I had more money I would have went out of their with a lot more. This is how a music/guitar shop should be. Guitar Denter could learn a lot from these smaller privately owned stores. I still have family in the area and will be back the next time I'm in town. Made a great impression on me in one afternoon.
I would just like to say Thank you to Officer Woods for assisting us last Saturday night. We had a blow-out on our boat trailer on I-95 and the traffic never seemed to slow down, so I called *HP, but Officer Woods was the first to respond. He was very helpful and professional. I am a Councilperson in Williston, SC and hope that our officers are setting the same example as that of Officer Woods. Thank you, Wanda B. Matthews 310 Donna St Williston SC 29853
Larson's Toys is a great independent toy store. They have tons of non electronic toys games and craft kits for kids of all ages. And there staff is extremely helpful with giving you ideas for gifts for kids. You tell them a little about who you are buying for and they offer different suggestions. It really is a can't miss place for a gift for your favorite kid. And they gift wrap for free too!
A well stocked Christian resource centre, with Bibles, commentaries, Christian books, CDs, DVDs, children's books, etc. With a very friendly, knowledgeable & helpful staff. If they don't have what you want in stock, they can usually order it for you.
Very good food, atmosphere and attentive staff. Try the Thai glazed salmon and white sangria.
First off Brian is not only an outstanding Attorney, but an amazing human being! He is kind, compassionate, and understanding. From the very moment I met with Brian I knew I was in excellent hands! His knowledge of the law is second to none and he is really slick. My case was not a big money maker in any way, but this did not deter Brian from treating it with the utmost importance. He gave me his cell and always returned my calls promptly. I felt like we were old friends rather than client and attorney. I was facing very serious felony charges and Brian got me ARD! If your life is in the hands of the court do not hesitate to call him!
Always get veggie plate .. best greens d.t. Greenville by far!!
I bought a pair of Cressi fins from Nanko about a month and a half ago and after only about 6 dives they cracked at the toe box. I liked the fins so I went back to buy another pair and when the owner saw what happened to my first pair he swapped them out no questions asked. So glad to see a shop that stands behind their products! When it comes time to buy a speargun I will be buying it from Nanko
I have had my Hair cut by each one of the barbers there and have not had a bad cut at all. The conversation and atmosphere is great also. They don't make you feel like a stranger.
Kian Forreal is one of the most respected and talented tattooers not only in Australia, but worldwide. The Authent/Ink Studio is built on his experience, passion and dedication to his craft, which is second to none. I have been tattooed by Kian many times, and would not hesitate to recommend him and his studio – truly world-class.
None
"MY" Lexus has been the best car I have ever owned, driven, and slammed miles on as a single Mom (ie... taxi), news anchor and community advocate. My Lexus dealer cannot be beat. Joe Brooks is the person who takes care of me normally when I step through the doors of the Lexus dealership.....although Joe has not been there a time or two (I guess because he does have a life beyond Lexus) and anyone I've ever dealt with at the dealership treats me as if I'm Donald Trump and I have the power to say "You're fired !" Now....I'm not that kind of person but to get rid of my friends or the best car I've ever driven would be ridiculous. My last 3 cars were Jags....OMG. My problem now is not that poor little cat that can't keep up and cost a billion bucks every 3 weeks. It is my fear of retirement. I want to drive a Lexus when I retire....BUT WHAT IF I DIDN'T PLAN RETIREMENT RIGHT ???? I can't imagine being in any other car or with any other group but the wonderful staff at the Lexus dealership !!! You think that's silly right ?? It almost borders on lusting for the darn thing. I'm serious. Lexus is MY CAR !!!!!! Not just because it is GORGEOUS but it is dependable, easy for me to understand too. If my tires are low or I have a nail or slow leak...... it tells me. If something else is wrong, it just tells me. I go in acting like I know what I'm talking about although I know they would never take advantage of me any way. I am a single mother, news anchor and in the community with as many as 250 events a year. I have to have my car and I have one that is stunning and takes care of me. So does the Lexus team. No/.... "they did not pay me for this endorsement but they sure sold me a FINE car !!!
Going to make this short and sweet. The staff here are wonderful! They are serious when they need to be but also know that diving is supposed to be fun. We went on two great dives with Larry Hogan as our dive master. He was always quick to point out of the creatures that can be found in the waters off Hawaii and to know what to look for on each dive. Will definitely be going back next time I take a trip to the islands!
Very nice store. Great people and lots of wonderful rare things to choose from. Love this place. :)
My family and I started going to Dr. Galligan when I moved to NC in 2007. Since that time, not one of us has had anything but an excellent experience. The practice is staffed with warm, and truly caring professionals who always know your name and ask about your family. It is white glove treatment from start to finish. I highly recommend Dr. Galligan's to anyone looking to be treated with kindness, compassion, and care.
Awesome job. Very professional staff. Friendly folks and the dentists as well as the technicians they have hired do an outstanding job! I enjoy going to this dentist and would highly recommend this practice to anybody! Thanks for a great job Fantastic Smiles!
I can say that we had a very positive experience with Grizzly Hackle. The fly fishing guide, Dan did a great job of showing us around and giving us some pointers on fly fishing. Their store is also a must visit! Friendly service from employees that are obviously into fly fishing.
I was very impressed by the service I was offered by a car salesman at Watertown Toyota. His name is Elkin Pereanez. What a wonderful job he did to help me get my car purchased and took care of all the paper work only for me to pick up my keys and out I went. Thank you so much Watertown Toyota and Elkin as well for having such a professional and diligent way of doing this job. I will come back for the service and price was great compared to what else was out there.
I eat at JeJu sushi all the time. I found the place through some friends after being a little disappointed at some other places around town. Recently I saw a couple bad reviews online and felt I should speak up and stand up for them. I have been eating at JeJu for over 5 years now - I love sushi and probably go at least twice a month. They are always friendly when you walk in as all the waitress and cooks shout "welcome" in Japanese (not that I can pronounce it - ha ha). I normally sit at the sushi bar and talk and joke with the chefs. They are awesome and really know what they're doing and are very authentic - the head sushi chef is actually from Japan. The waitresses are great - always been super quick and friendly for me. I'm always trying new stuff and asking a million questions and they always have a good answer for me. I've never had a bad experience and I've dealt with them all. I read one review about an angry manager - I don't even think they have a manager there so it seemed weird - just the owner as far as I know. The owner is also cool - always walking around to say hi to customers. We always take our big birthday parties and other gatherings there - everything I've ever tried is so good and it's an awesome social atmosphere for a fancy night out on the town or just dinner with a friend. I would happily recommend JeJu to anyone who loves sushi, asian food, sake, knowledgeable staff, and a classy night out - you can't go wrong. It's the only place I eat sushi anymore. Hey - and maybe if your lucky you'll see me at the sushi bar - come say hi.
Decent place to live. Thanks Aishwaryam
Excelent ! :))
Man! I have been to this place for over 4 years and watched it grow. Now that they are serving food...which started as a take out only, has become a great place to dine in. The food was good then but now it is great and very delicious! I tell all my clients what I recommend for real Thai-Food and this is the one place that is close to me and easy to tell others how to get to it as well. Everything is reasonable price wise and you can't beat that from the other nasty fast food chains that are not fresh and healthy for you. If you know about Thailand and as it is called the third world country where poor people learn to survive...all the food is made fresh and very tasty. I love it for I have lived there for 8 years and know what I am talking about. Don't let me tell you about it...just go there yourself and see what it is about and taste the true Thai experience! Be very careful...very addicting and you will be BACK 100% sure of that! Pee Nan and Pee Pat are great at what they do and friendly as if you just walk through the doors back to Thailand. I miss Thailand but these ladies sure make me feel as if I am back there but only here in Port Charlotte, Florida. Keep up the great work ladies and many blessings to you all and the store that you have made it become.
My first visit today, and it was a wonderful experience! From making the appointment, to checking in, to my exam and the advice I received, everyone was professional and caring. I highly recommend!
I have been 3 times the area is stunning, the design of the viaduct helps it blend into the scenery seamlessly. I will be visiting again later this year. Just goes to show how nature the landscape and man's engineering can live side by side.
None
I've been really impressed with Ripplenet not only as a Web Design company but also with their friendly staff and supportive customer service. I also like that after our website was initially designed and set up, we were taught how to add pages and posts to it ourselves (though it's certainly a work in progress on my part!). I really feel like Ripplenet cares about us as people and not just as a customer and I know that should anything go wrong, I can trust Ripplenet to resolve the problem quickly and efficiently with no messing about.
Me fué muy bien y apendi mucho
I have been to the one downtown and it was great. Good food and great service. The staff was extremely friendly and kind to all of the customers. Their jalapeño Cheddar cream cheese is amazing.
Très bel endroit pour passer quelques jours au calme à Tana. J'y reviens souvent
I go there for all of my sports stuff. The quality of everything is great and someone is always there to help.
The best Thai food hands down. I love my Nisa's Pad Thai! The warm welcoming service makes it that much better!
None
Hours: Wed-Fri 9am to 6pm Sat 8am to 2:30pm Bill is a REAL barber and gives a great cut for $10.
None
None
Lexi is AWESOME! Awesome place. Awesome deals.
It was fascinating finding out all the things our camera could do and an introduction to how to use all the features. I would love to get a chance to practice more what I learned to take pictures on a whole new level now.
We worked with Traditions Window Decor at my office and were more than pleased at the professionalism and quality of service. With that, the product was exactly what we needed and looked great. From the initial call to the installation, the process was easy and seamless. I will do business with Traditions from now on.
I have been going to Dr. Clark for about a year now and my chronic neck/back pain has gone away. I love going to the office and getting adjusted. It doesn't take long and the staff is friendly and accomodating. I used to have neck pain when turning my head from side to side and lower back pain that would radiate through my whole body. Dr. Clark showed me some easy postural changes that have helped a ton, and the adjustments give me the relief I need to feel better. I injured my knee (dislocated patella) several months ago and wouldn't have thought to go to a chiropractor, but Dr. Clark has helped for it far more than any of the physical therapists I've seen or anyone else. The massage table thing they have you lay on prior to the adjustment is super rad also. Highly recommend!!!
Alterra provides an excellent service from start to finish. In particular, Service Pro Jorge was professional, knowledgable, and friendly. He answered any questions I had. I recommend Alterra to anyone.
None
I discovered this gem after experiencing a problem at each of the two major chain tire stores. The final straw was a chain's refusal to order tires for me over the phone. I called Warholak and they ordered the tires and did not even ask for my credit card. That was 10 years ago and I will not even consider going anywhere else. They know the business, take care of their customers and are very honest. I love them.
I Stayed here for 2 months while on a business trip and it was awesome!!!! Its really clean, friendly staff, quiet, and the breakfast is ok too!! I would suggest staying here especially if you need to go to the Methodist Hospital!
I frequent this place weekly. Sandwich portions are excellent. Choices are almost too much. Prices are fair. Always friendly service. The sandwich capital of Akron. I suggest trying the Old Bald Guy.
None
Growing up in this church has let me see every facet you could possibly imagine of the place. Change has always been constant, continually growing and learning how to live and love better, but one thing has remained consistent: This church is FAMILY. Regardless of background, race, social status, age, whatever, people find acceptance and hope when they come. I've grown up seeing that church, (and life) is more beautiful when it's made of all colors, ages, styles and types of people. It doesn't matter who you are, you've got a place to belong here, because this church is made of people just like you. I can't tell you how many conversations I have with people who have found us online, through a friend, or just by driving by. All sorts too: People who've been in church a long time, and also folks who are giving it a try for the first or second time. Don't let the big building intimidate you from coming a few weeks and making some friends. Simply put: it takes a big house to fit a big family! You'll be greeted with a smile and find that it's warm and inviting (and exciting!) if you'd give us a chance. Looking forward to seeing you there!
Erika gives the best massage. I had serious knots and pain in my neck and back. She worked it all out, and I was able to continue my work pain free. Very inviting and comfortable environment. I felt like a million bucks leaving there. A+
None
I need a deep tissue massage and it was definitely deep tissue! Very therapeutic. Also, lots of good deals.
Our company installs Geothermal systems across western NY and are happy to be WaterFurnace dealers. Our Sales Rep is professional and attentive. The Customer and Technical Support provided by WaterFurnace is superior to most other companies that we deal with. WaterFurnace is an excellent company to be partnered with.
As a wing fan I felt as if I could fly inside this family friendly diner where my ten nippers ran around dodging the high chairs. It was exquisite and I highly recommend it as you know it makes sense. Also the ball game was enthralling.
I've been going to Murray Motive for years, and have referred a number of friends who have been very satisfied. They have quality, efficient, and friendly customer service. Their work has been consistently reliable, and I find their integrity to be impeccable. If I could give "ten stars" I would! You can use the services of Murray Motive with complete confidence.
Very good food and drinks. Very busy on weekends but worth it!
None
The wraps are to die for.
Excellent local bar. Prices and service are terrific.
Sushi is great!
As a real estate professional, I have used Coles Inspections for many of my clients' home inspections. They are prompt and dependable; they are respectful of the property itself - taking shoes off when they enter the home and being careful to reset thermostats after the inspection is over and ensuring there is not a mess left behind. Their reports are complete, thorough, concise, and easy to read and understand. I appreciate their professionalism and assistance with clients' questions and concerns. An excellent choice for your home inspection.
Whether you're searching for a job or are an employer looking for some candidates I highly recommend working with Workbridge Associates. They work as a team to achieve top results, getting you more interviews faster than other recruiting agencies. From start to finish they are with you every step of the way by building a personal relationship with you and giving you the confidence you need. Within a few weeks I had several interviews lined up and eventually landed a job that satisfied both my new employer's expectations and mine. It was a win win situation!
My favorite Whole Hog in Arkansas. I've never had a bad meal here, the mgmt and staff are excellent. The service is quick and the food is always good.
I like the kindness of the staff members keep it up guys the great work
I was always worried about where to get a haircut in Las Vegas before I found NY Hair. I have curly hair that can be very hard to cut with style. Now I always go here to see Nikki. She's amazing with different styles and is also extremely friendly and willing to work with you to develop your look. My haircuts have been getting better and better the more I go. This place is always busy because everyone comes back. So check it out it's the best place I've ever been to and I've tried many of the high end businesses in town. They are all really cool, talented, and know what looks good - especially Nikki.
I was very happy with Dr. Wilson and I will continue to take my animals to him. Every person that worked there was kind, gentle and very informative. Monkey came home after they removed his left leg, he ate all of his food and slept well. During the night my baby boy got up 3 times to eat and drink. I cant thank Dr. Wilson enough for the time he took with me and my new kitty. Monkey Nut "was" a feral cat, he is now "my" cat! He will never feel the winter cold, the summer heat or ever go hungrey again. He may have lost a leg, but he scored pretty big with me as his new forever Mama. Thanks again to Dr. Wilson and his wonderful staff!!!
John at JD's is always outstanding to deal with. Price is always fair. When you think of being without your computer you know how important it is to trust someone to repair it and usually it's fast! He has helped me out of a few critical repairs and a few minor glitches. Can't say enough good about this company. THANK YOU!
Very tasty food, large portions, interesting menu. The avocado salad appetizer and the pork tips entree are especially good. BYOB, no corkage.
I have stayed at the Seaview Motel on three separate occasions now and cannot fault the price, accommodation quality and location. Walking distance to the beach and town centre. Looking forward to another getaway soon.
Coniglio Chiropractic is a wonderful chiropractic office. I have been adjusted by chiropractors for over 15 years--from all across the US (from Pennsylvania to Chicago to Denver to Los Angeles), including being adjusted by master trainers/teachers from the Chicago School of Chiropractic Medicine. Given all of this experience I have to rate Dr. Coniglio at the top very 1% of all chiropractors I've ever seen. His adjustments are so thorough, so complete, and done with such great care. He is truly a one-of-a-kind master chiropractor. When I moved to the South Jersey area I needed a chiropractor to manage my long-term (often times tricky) chronic lower back condition, and Dr. Barry Coniglio was there to help. By chance I stumbled upon his office, and to this day I am so grateful for all the wonderful care he (and his office staff, including Donna) have given me. For anyone new to the area, or looking for a professional, friendly, and extremely competent chiropractor--look no further. Call Dr. Coniglio TODAY! It will be the best decision you've ever made. Sincerely, Gregory D. Benjamin, Ph.D., M.P.H.
The best service, the most professional people all in one happy place!!! I highly recommend this dental office. I had a great experience from setting up the appointment and filling out forms before hand, to walking in the dental office being greeted so friendly by the staff to the highly experienced dental assistants to Dr. Redd who is so good at what he does!! He is very friendly, very professional and great at talking through each step of the way. He is detail oriented and makes sure you are ok and well numbed. Lol I had my old fillings replaced with porcelain and had my wisdom teeth pulled. This is a high tech dental office w/ up to date equipment. Why go anywhere else?
Dr Manish has helped me manage my sleep apnoea problem. The whole staff are very friendly and professional. I am very happy with the service and would recommend Smile Concepts to anyone.
I'm a very loyal customer at Gubbios best lunch buffet and price if your a big italian food fan like I am. The service is great. I'm always greeted by Owner Miss Kim with a smile and a hug. I feel like family when I'm there.
I bought my SnugTop from Darren and the boys at AA Topper some 7 years ago and thought it was time to dish out a few kudos! 1st of all I have never had any issues with my SnugTop and would highly recommend it to anyone looking for a quality topper. I've also purchased Fender Flares and a Grill Guard from these guys and the installation work on everything has proven to be flawless and reliable over the 7 year life of my truck. If quality products and service on your truck cap and other accessories is what you're looking for, you'll get it here.... and Darren will remember you regardless of how long it is between visits:)
Your team managed the recent water damage in my newly constructed condo very professionally. The guys displayed great confidence and assured me that the issue is manageable. Eventually, the issue was very well addressed and damaged areas were very neatly restored. I would highly recommend Rhino Cleaning Service.
Easy check in, good internet connection and right across the street from the Bahnhof. Hotel Ibis great place for any quick tourist stay.
The Pizza here is one of the best in Lima! The service is great and the food is even better. I have ordered food here at least once a week for the last couple months and haven't been dissapointed at all!
SAM IS AN EXCEPTIONAL LAWYER !! I have known Sam as a business associate for about 30 years. We have worked together on countless legal matters. I have been a consultant for Sam, and he has provided effective legal advice to our mutual clients. No matter what time of the day or night, Sam is there to take my call, and he always offers winning solutions to the case at hand, whether criminal defense or any state Board licensing matter. I have worked with many lawyers over the years, but I will always recommend Sam.
I had the opposite experience at Freed Vet Hospital. I had a sick 8 year old beagle with severe diareha and my regular vet was out of town. I was able to bring a stool sample and with only examining that and an exam my dog was given some antibiotics. I was expecting blood draw ups and XRays at the least and appreciated the staff for only running the one test. The staff was friendly and Dr. Cain was compassionate and thorough.
None
We bought our first vehicle in the 80 s from Mahaffey Ford in Conroe. Gullo purchased Mahaffey. Over the years we have purchased several vehicles from Gullo Ford. This time I had been searching for the vehicle I thought I wanted and dealt with several other dealerships over a 6 month period. I finally told my husband, lets go to Gullo. I trust them. We where not disappointed. They treated us like family. They did not rush us to make a decision on vehicle, in fact they coached us to look at several. We test drove the Ford Flex and fell in love it with. We are a Ford family, my husband still proudly displays his Ford Tough Boulevard sign on our garage. It is very comforting to know that you can trust a dealership who employees do look out for your best. You don t find that any where any more. During our car search we dealt with Morgan, Steve, Brett and Benjamin. I can t speak highly enough of these fine individuals. They are genuine professionals who care about you, their customer. I have no problem recommending anyone to visit Gullo and see for yourself the difference.
Had our Class Reunion in the upstairs area, it was perfect and so nostalgic with the decor. The food was excellent and plenty of it. The staff was very accomodating and friendly. Deidra our bartender was the best she really played the crowd. I am sure many of my classmates including myself will be back.
Love this place!!
None
As always everyone from the store was so sweet today, especially Molly. That's the reason we drive across town to shop at this Kid to Kid.
I came across Yes Air because of their 24 hour emergency service. I couldn't be happier with this company. They have very knowledgeable and friendly staff, fair competitive prices and a guarantee on their work.
This place has an AWESOME Torta!
Excellent easy to moderate trail. About 100 minute from Stanford Av or Ohlone college. All season long. Most of the trail is well surfaced. Ohlone side is more gradual but about 1/4th is not well surfaced.
"The Lock Ninja" showed up exactly on time as as quoted over the phone. He was also able to take credit card payment on the spot which was great because I didn't have any cash. He was also very friendly and quick. Thank you!
Great burger joint best onion rings...big portions
We highly recommend Foreign Affairs because it is a joy to talk with Klaus and it is our pleasure to work with a company that knows how to do business in a trustworthy environment.
None
None
Amazing doughnuts!
I love going to this store. I started going here simply to buy HeroScape, then it changed into HeroClix, now I go in for the comics. No matter what I go in for, the employees and owner are always incredibly helpful and fun to talk to.
None
Super helpful, very reasonable and willing to go the extra yard for you. Highly recomended.
These guys did a great job. I came in on a weekday morning with a flat tire hoping they could repair it quickly while I waited. They noticed that the sidewall was damaged so I would need new tires. He asked if the flat tire was driven on. Indeed someone in our family, who shall remain nameless (not me), had driven on it. He also showed me that the tire treads were worn down to the indicators and, since it's an all-wheel drive, he recommended replacing all 4 tires. He helped me pick out some decent tires and quickly got one of his guys to drive me to Wilton station so I could catch the next train to work. They finished the same day and called my home number. My wife answered and they arranged to pick her up at home and drive her to the shop so she could pick up the car. Normally I'd feel awkward asking a repair shop for a ride, but they go out of their way to offer them and it makes the whole process much less stressful and a lot more convenient. Overall, excellent service!
Amazing real estate services
A COMPLETE FAMILY SHOP YOU WILL GET GOOD AND NEW COLLECTION, BRANDED AND UNBRANDED, LOW RANGE AND HIGH RANGE.
Cheap food that tastes good, nice atmosphere, good drinks... I don't know what there is to not love about this place. Well, maybe the wait on weekends... I avoid anyplace on the weekends though. If it's not busy on Friday or Saturday on the Peninsula it's not any good. $3.50 texas tea is delicious. The buffalo chicken wrapper is great and huge. I eat half and save the other half for the next day lunch. Little disappointed they boosted their prices a tad, but I still love it.
The best southern cooking in Indy
Great park to take the dog too, took my beagle there on a sunday and she had a great time even the big dogs were friendly!! and there were at least 25 there when we went.
Needed a storage unit before I moved to a new place and found this place on-line and boy was I lucky! The facility was clean, well lit and state of the art. I was assisted by two professional gentlemen Ernie and Danny, they were extremely friendly and very knowledgeable. They actually stayed 30 minutes past their closing time to explain how to store my items and discussed moving companies. Even though I will not be renting from them because the place I am moving to has on site storage, I will be utilizing their storage next month when my sister moves back.
Just returned from a 4 night stay in the deluxe cabin. Can not say enough great things about this campground!! It is clean, very well maintained, a beautiful property and close enough to local attractions but far enough away from civilization so you can enjoy the peace and tranquility of nature. Also has a fantastic view of the night sky!! The owners are extremely friendly and helpful. Plenty of things to do on site also. We are very excited about returning to tent camp next year. We highly recommend this campground (we have tent camped for many years and feel this is the best all-around site we have experienced so far!!)
They have beer. Their prices are very reasonable (including their beer prices). I would much rather avoid the crowds at other movie theaters and watch the same movies at a lower price while drinking beer. This place is a no-brainer!
None
Genial tanto de día como de noche!
None
Gostaria de saber qual o contato da área de merchandising da Ambev? Cerveja Stella
great company did a outstanding job on our firms website!!!!
genial
My family & I had a great stay (3 nights Fri-Sun) at the Fairfield Marriott a couple weeks ago! The rates were excellent, especially when you factor in Free shuttles to Sea World/Aquatica AND Free breakfast every morning! But the main reason for my review is to give thanks & high praise to one of their managers, Kevin, who epitomizes what customer service should be (but often is not)! Kevin noticed me hauling luggage up the stairwell to our 3rd floor room & asked if he could help me. I politely refused as I felt I could manage what I was carrying. Then when I got to the room, he asked if there was anything else he could do for me & I mentioned the loose lock on our room door. He said he'd be right back & 5 minutes later, he arrived with a drill & tightened our loose lock in moments! THEN he asked if we needed a recommendation for dinner. He recommended a local mexican food restaurant & gave us explicit directions, so we went there to grab dinner & the food & service were both excellent! On another day, some (frankly whiny) guests were complaining about missing breakfast at the front counter & I heard him offer to get some breakfast items (eggs/bacon) from the already closed kitchen. Wow! Kevin is the kind of employee every company should hope for- such a positive, hard-working attitude! Thank you Kevin! We'll be back next summer if not sooner! -Brian Bailey, Austin, TX
Excellent except minor issues with parking
My child is excited about going to tutoring. He loves the staff and enjoys the rotations. The Tutoring Center cares about the success of the children and it shows! The one on one instruction is such a benefit. Students are motivated by their progress and the reward systems in place. Kids are always happy and smiling when they walk in the door!
Great food and pleasant staff.
What professional and good service! Thanks for fixing my burst copper pipe!
None
Greatest thing since sliced bread. Best adult entertainment in America and we all know how great America is.
Great atmosphere. Great place for drinks, great food, and watching football, baseball, etc. And BEST chicken strips EVER!
Grandma and I were trying to find just the right car for my daughter, and we looked all over the state for a Verano with all the bells and whistles. Well Liberty Buick had the best choices and the perfect car for my daughter, then they worked to make sure the price was right and we were happy. Thanks Kevin! You did a great job! We will always buy from you!
None
Perfect! I couldn't ask for a more pleasant, relaxed atmosphere to purchase a vehicle in. I just picked up my 2013 Optima SXL and I couldn't be happier. My salesman, John Filippone was very helpful and directed me through the whole process without a hitch. If you are considering a Kia, which I highly recommend, then this should be your first stop.
None
None
+1 Радостная новость - свадебное агентство "Лучший День" появились на картах в Google! Теперь мы можем получать отзывы о нас прямо на странице Google, будем признательны Вам за приятные и конструктивные отзывы.
They're the best. They ALWAYS remember me and my usual orders. They make me feel welcome and happy to be there everytime I'm there! That's amazing for a Starbucks!
Fantastic place!
Alex is awesome she is knowledgeable and friendly... I have a family of five and they will not let anyone else touch their hair but Alex....
After a night at Bastiens (look it up to see my review) and a great wine from Marcyk's to start the weekend, I didn't think it could get much better. Then I met a few friends for Saturday morning tea. House of Commons is the best spot for a nice quiet morning with friends. The owner can walk you through the history of tea while you sip on everything from an aromatic white tea to getting your caffeine fix with black tea. And don't forget - all the while you can be nipping at cucumber sandwiches, scones and little pastries. It was a great way to start the morning!
My most recent buying experience through Elaine Zhu at Heninger Toyota is the most pleasing. First of all, I was always treated courteously during my repeated phone calls / visits. All questions answered politely and patiently. Secondly, I was surprised by how much a lady knows about a Tundra! Thirdly, she helped me to make all the right choices about the (sometimes-too-many) options. Finance was made easy. Most importantly, I bought the right truck and enjoy driving it every minute! Thank you so much Elaine and Heninger Toyota!
Seriously, awesome! Friendly, great atmosphere, clean, good food. Stop here and enjoy!
I love Country Bars and this place has it all! Award winning Pizza and Wings. Great staff that makes you feel like family! There are some great local country bands that play here often along with many bands out of Nashville that are just incredible to see. They never charge a cover charge. Love the outdoor patio area. Has a corn hole area, smoking area and some outdoor seating. I could go on forever! If you are looking for a good night out, check this place out. Such a blast and great people!
Our house was built on clay about 20 years ago, and water pressure against the basement foundation was always a problem. Finally, after enough water was seeping in at various spots, we realized that major changes had to be made. I consulted some co-workers, one of whom recommended EverDry, and we have been very pleased with the results. The individual who visited our home to assess our needs was very knowledgeable and took ample time, almost two hours, to discuss the sources of our problems as well as possible remedies. We appreciated his thoroughness as well as the fact he did not try to pressure us into making a decision on the spot. While having this work done on our home was not inexpensive, we recognized the need to address the problem of water seeping into our basement and decided that the purchase would be well worth it in terms of helping our home maintain its value. Simply put, we wanted the job done right. We couldn't have made a better decision. The system installed by Everdry does its job in terms of eliminating external water pressure, which is the root source of seepage. Our basement floor is absolutely dry, and, because we also purchased the EZBreathe system, the basement air is also much less humid. It's reassuring to know we can once again use our basement for storage and not worry about mold and mildew buildup on our belongings. Having Everdry fix our problem was a great decision, and I give the company my highest recommendation, both for quality of work and for service.
I have known John Laughter through a Christian Business group called C12. He is a man of integrity and is dedicated to providing quality service to his customers. He has been a blessing to me in his ability to listen and give feedback to know what I want and need. When I am in the market for jewelry and service, he will be at the top of my list of people to talk to. Give him a try and I think you will agree with my assessment.
Muito legal! Mas tem que levar muito dinheiro pra entrar, dormir e ir embora!!!
None
Your neighborhood cheers bar....luv it
None
Just plain FANTASTIC Italian! They do sooooo many things right. Great food, the homestyle lasagna is out of this world! But they REALLY have a great staff. People are the best. Thanks all for the great experience!
Nyaman, rindang di tengah kota
Highly Recommended! I went to 4 other gold buyers locally and World Wide paid the highest amount. Fast & Friendly, Quick Cash!
Bhindi masala is fantastic!
None
None
Luv this place, one dinner feeds two and we get a great deal on a large pizza for the kids. Very affordable and awesomely delicious!
I witnessed John at work on the rejuvenation of a slate tile floor and the result was astounding. The amount of effort the John and the team put into the job was awesome, I couldn't believe that it would take what it did to make this slate floor look like new again ,and it did great job John.
This place is a GEM (we came here for dinner). After, 2 weeks of very budget travel in south america Zea Mais was a most welcome piece of luxury. The front desk/greeter has excellent english and is well traveled in general, the food was spectacular, 4 course meal, great down-tempo electronic music, very nice modern decore of local artists. I cant say anough good things about this place. Oh.. and i "think" its one of Sao Paulos oldest hotels.
I was a bit overwhelmed by the whole divorce process, even though it was amicable and uncontested. The system that Evan has setup made the process trivially easy. I've had job application processes that were more tedious! The Basecamp website makes communicating and exchanging the necessary paperwork incredibly easy. I'd recommend Evan's "MicroDivorce" service over those document services a thousand times over.
Mooie camping met overdekt zwembad wat bij mooi weer gedeeltelijk open. Sanitair van goede kwaliteit en goed schoon gemaakt dagelijks
It's a wonderful meal, go hungry.
None
I love these guys, they are always friendly!!!!!
I ordered shirts in bulk from My T Print for my college campus ministry. They turned out great and it was both a pleasure and positive experience working with the staff at My T Print through email. Our order was filled in a timely fashion and we were all very happy with how they turned out!
This is a great location and most important a great experience. I really like Krystal, the store manager, she is super nice, professional and loves to take care of her clients. Hope to continue doing business here. -Roberto
My house was in desperate need of repair after much neglect on my part. The paint was peeling, the gutters were rusted, and the soffits were falling off. I contacted three contractors and two were comparable and one was much higher. Exovations was the last contractor I contacted and they scheduled a very convenient appointment. Katie Ward was my sales consultant and showed up on time for the appointment. She knew what she was talking about and made a great suggestion on how they could do a portion of the front porch differently to make it look better, I ended up going with her suggestion and it looks great. Exovations price was comparable to the other exterior contractor I had contacted and I decided to use Exovations due to their warranty and the products they install. I decided to replaced my cedar siding with the Certainteed cedar lap fiber cement siding, they also replaced all the eaves, fascias, and soffits with Certainteed fiber cement product. Jim McCulloch was my project manager and he was also on time with every appointment. I had decided to replace the windows and exterior doors myself and he set up the work schedule to work around me. All of the crews worked fast and stayed on schedule despite a couple days of rain. They cleaned up at the end of the day everyday and didn't damage anything. It didn't all go smoothly but nothing ever does, what counts is they went back and made everything right. They also painted everything and installed new gutters. Now my house looks brand new and will be much lower maintenance. They stuck to the price of the original contract and didn't try to add anything in the middle of the project. I was skeptical of all the positive reviews I had read before the project but I am now a believer. They were great from beginning to end and I have no reservations about recommending them, I would definitely use them again.
Great Experience. Great Doctors. I had back pain for years and Dr. Bocci was able to heal me. thank you so much.
Its our go to place. The kids love it. We adults love to go for the atmosphere and cold beer to socialize with friends!
So simple and convenient. Great service and very informed. The process was easy and fairly quick.
None
Millstead is the premier botique coffee experience in Seattle. Brewed 1 cup at a time. Delicious pastries, while they last... Friendly staff, very willing to answer questions, and make recommendations. Mocha abd Lattes also to die for.
Kenny Castro Was a complete Gentleman and a pro in helping me do my trade. He is very knowledgeable and very passionate. All the other staff worked together seamlessly to put me in my truck! Love those guys! The best car buying experiance in Denver!
I outsourced Michael recently and he did a great job. Once I gave him a quick intro to the network, he worked on the workstations, server and network equipment with no problem. He performed the job without having to bother me with questions which was great. I will definitely be sending more business his way!
Absolutely fantastic coffee, fresh food and in a great location. Can't fault it especially with happy hour, coffee and cake for 5 bucks!
I go to this wine merchant every chance I get. They have the best selection I have ever seen besides a nice selection of cheeses to with my wine. I also took a wine class here which was fantastic. The employees really seem to know their stuff whenever I have any questions. They also have a wine club you can subscribe to, but to me, their wines are a little pricey. This really is a nice place to visit and partake of a glass or two of wine.
Хороший банк
None
The doctor I saw was very nice. I'm so very pleased with him, and his assistant for the ease of my procedure. And taking care of putting on my temporary crown. One of the best procedures I've ever experienced...
Love the staff great price not the normal price game that I hate.
This is the best tattoo shop in the area. They always make you feel at home and have the best artists. Just look at their pictures compared to some of the other shops nearby. They also have the best piercer in the area, never have any problems.
From beginning to end, I was extremely pleased with this office overall. Scheduling [A++]: I had to setup an appointment via online form/e-mail; as I work at night and am generally asleep the entire time the office is open. I had a reply at 9:15am the morning following my first submission for an appointment, and every time I sent another e-mail after that a reply was received within 30mins [after the office had closed for the evening]. Office Visit [A+++]: I arrived for a 9am appointment, at 8:50am and was already seeing the physician [Dr. Prapta] at 9:10am, after the initial paperwork and other items performed by the optician. Price/Fees [A++]: I don't have vision coverage on my health insurance from work, so I purchased the [TSO Vision Plan] for $10, which gave me 20% off all office visit related items [check-up/etc] and 25% off all Lenses/Frames. The 25% off on lenses/frames is not restricted, so it applies to any and all lenses/frames they carry or order. I bought a pair of oakley frames w/transitions; and they applied the discount. 3 years ago when I purchased my current oakley's with transitions from Pearle Vision, they did not allow any promotions/discounts to be applied to the more expensive brands like this. I priced the frames/lenses that I purhcased from this office online w/3 different online retailers and I paid $150-$160 less than I would if I had purchased them online, like I originally planned to. Customer Service [A+++]: I work in a medical office, and am very keen on how all the staff in medical offices can act. Some are less savory than others. However, this office is run in a very professional manner and all the staff were extremely nice. I hadn't planned on purchasing my new glasses from this office. After speaking with the optician for a few minutes, I decided to purchase them here. He was very knowledgeable and, didn't hesitate to tell me where spending more money wasn't necessary in regard to the lenses. They don't work on commission like some of the chain stores do; so he was more than objective in keeping my overall cost down. I will definitely return to this office in the future for any further optometry needs. If you want a good experience with your optometry needs, you need not look further.
None
I want to thank the staff at Motors on Wheels for making my buying experience an excellent one. They were extremely helpful and very very patient with me :) My friend referred me to you guys and I will make sure I refer others to you guys.
I love the music classes with Ira. Every time it's very fun and I learned a lot of stuff for the six months I've been studying sax. I've just got luck finding so friendly and erudite sax teacher.
Dr. Leonard Roudner is The best Surgeon, The nicest Team and the Best results !!!
had the pleasure of crashing with these guys while on business in wellington well priced clean and great sleep will def return if back in wellington. cheers guys goodtimes
The Best Universit y EVER :D
After exploring job opportunities on my own, I began searching for a professional career coach with exceptional knowledge and a commitment to personalized service. I was very fortunate to find Jeremy Worthington at Buckeye Resumes. After meeting Jeremy, I knew he was the only choice. His expertise and experience are second to none. He provided me with an exceptional resume and cover letter that highlights my experience and showcases my strengths and abilities in a way I never thought possible. The job search and interview coaching sessions have prepared me to have the knowledge and confidence to answer the tough interview questions with ease. If you are looking for an outstanding career coach with a high level of integrity, a proven track record and a commitment to personalized service, I highly recommend Jeremy Worthington at Buckeye Resumes.
Best Cajun in Portland!
Our family has had a seasonal site here for nearly 30 years. Lots of trees, decent beach, and plenty of friendly people.
We hire an AC Indigo car for Agra Trip on 30-09-2012. Best Service provided by Driver Vijay. New Car Provided by Travel India Online. we recommend travel India online is best service provider.
Quick service from a friendly, on time technician. It wasn't the cheapest service I could find online, but it seemed like the most legitimate. I'm very satisfied with the level of service that I received.
JCM Custom Homes has been assisting my wife and me for the last 4 years. He helped us customize our Kitchen, redesign the living area, helped us design and finish a workshop. When our Cupola required replacing he recommended a skilled craftsman to build a replacement. We followed his recommendation and the work provided was excellent. All work was completed in a timely manner and as per the proposed cost. He ensured all work was done in a professional manner to include the after project cleanup. We are very pleased with Justin's work and would highly recommend him and JCM Custom Homes any time.
I contacted Herman at the Leather Hospital to repair a leather jacket. He came up with a creative solution to me problem and the jacket looks perfect. No one will ever know there was a rip on my jacket. I dropped my jacket off at 5pm and Herman promosed it would be ready the next day. He called me at about 8pm to tell me it was fixed. The service was great and so was the crafsmanship.
I took my boyfriend here as a surprise treat and it really packs a wow factor. I had stayed before so knew what to expect but it's such a great hotel it feels like the first visit every time. Lovely clean rooms, friendly staff and great location. The theme rooms mack the stay so much more than a normal night in a hotel. The only negative was that my boyfriend, at 6'4", couldn't stand in our shower in the top floor Ophelia Fancy room!
Collin Cherry is the most talented lawyer in North Florida. He is exceptionally knowledgable and make cases work that other lawyer would give up on. He is highly ethical and obtains the best results for his clients. His charm and command of the courtroom wins juries over every time. I recommend him highly.
Fantastic General Tso's chicken. The decor is awesome from floor to ceiling.
Buderim's ginger bear lair!
Unlike many in their profession, the legal team at AlerStallings puts the objectives of the family first. The professionalism and expertise they offer in Estate Planning & Elder Law is second to none. AlerStallings doesn't dabble in all the various types of law like most firms. Instead they only focus on the best practices that safeguard estates from the high costs of probate, taxes, and nursing homes. I highly recommend AlerStallings Law Firm for anyone looking to design a sound estate plan for their loved ones.
Fantastisch. Wij hebben ons laten verassen en de kok heeft er iets moois van gemaakt. Hier moet je van genieten. Ga hier niet eten als je run-of-the-mill Foe Yong hai of Babi Pangang wilt eten, ga dan naar de afhaal van hetzelfde restaurant. Maar wil je iets speciaals, dan is dit restaurant een hele goede.
None
The steaks, sides, and dessert were fantastic. The service was also exceptionally good. The atmosphere was more casual than I expected, but not in a bad way. I'll definitely be going back.
Great Place Staff is very helpful Great Prices and have lots in stock Will be recommending to everyone I know.
Simply great chinese. Very courteous drivers and really easy to call in orders. The only thing they are lacking is an online menu.
Awesome food, BYOB, and love the slow service (seriously). Gives you an excuse to soak up your meal and time with family/friends. The pad Thai and the peanut sauce are incredible.
Amazing job on my car after hail damaged it pretty bad! It looked brand new! Thanks guys!
None
Výborná atmosféra personál i prostředí. Doporučuji.
Had a really great experience with my first hair cut at King James Cut. Big Moe took care of me and my hair cut was exactly what I wanted. I'll definitely be back in soon. Great conversation, good atmosphere and skilled Barbers not just guys who cut hair. A great and friendly Barbershop!
First time trying Odd Moe's and my wife and I are kind of pizza snobs (lived in Chicago for 9 years). Gal on the phone was nice and patient answering our questions. Delivery was fast and driver was a cool dude. The pizza was absolutely awesome! We had the Greek and the crust, sauce and ingredients were top notch. Highly recommended.
Great operation! Easy to book via web and cart shows up at the vacation rental the day you arrive then is picked up when you leave. They also provide an extension cord and the folks who deliver the cart find the closest plug and have it charged and ready to go when you arrive! Def beneficial to have a cart on the island as it allowed us to tour around the fairly large island and they make it so simple to reserve!
great waitress...(my daughter)
Agree with Abby Doodle... Briar Grove is worthy of your support. It's a survivor amidst the Walgreen & CVS sweep, and for good reason. To wit: After a recent major back surgery, my doc recommended a pain medication, for post-op pain, that would allow me to return to work quickly. I could NOT find this med anywhere in metro Houston (12 phone calls, spent 1/2 day chasing it down) w/o a 1 week order delay. Briar Grove had it in stock. The staff were also very courteous in the way they handled the "checking" they had to do in order to dispense this scrip. And, were quick to offer some customer insights into the various side effects I might expect. The store has an interesting mix of diverse inventory as well... see Abby Doodle's review. Good people, great inventory management... worthy of your business!
Best cup cake ever!!
The best martial arts school I've found yet!
None
We had Custom Closets & More update our closets in 2012. The experience was great, from beginning to end!! Everyone involved from the office staff, to our designer, to the installer were courteous and professional. We have sent several friends to CC&M and all have been very pleased!! A couple of months ago we decided that our garage needed to be updated. So, naturally we went back to CC&M. Once again, awesome service from beginning to end!! We can't say enough good things about the people or the product. We very highly recommend Custom Closets and More!! They are 5 star all the way!!!
Always busy taking care of my business... that's how I would best describe Strategic Insurance Services! No matter what I need, they get it to me promptly... and with smiles on their faces. Thank you Strategic!!!
None
The doctor's were on the verge of surgically gluing my lung to my side because they could not find an answer to why my lung kept painfully and spontaneously collapsing. Thank goodness for Brantley! His vast knowledge of the human body and his skill as a massage therapist honed in on my muscular trigger point, and in one fell swoop, stopped my recurring issue. Truly amazing! I know it sounds crazy, but it just proves how there can be such a simple solution if we just engage someone who knows how to listen to our bodies. It has been years and no repeat occurrence and I am so grateful. I have also had just good ol' massages from him and appreciate his professionalism and personal attention to making me feel 100% awesome in my skin. No matter what your need, he can tailor the perfect session for you.
Fantastic service. Mike got our vehicle in the shop immediately and drove us home while he ran the pressure test and other diagnostics. The bill ran out of our budget, but was a better deal than I could have gotten any where else in town. They finished repairs and agreed to accept 2/3rds payment and let us have our vehicle for two weeks until we were able to finish paying the rest off, this was very pleasing and unexpected. I always prefer to deal with a more down-to-earth small business than a faceless corporate-owned shop; this is what I found at Any Radiator and they are true professionals. Highly recommended.
Best sushi experience in Toronto so far.
Best Hot Chocolate
Thanks for the quick help with my last minute banner. I do the Town Hall event every year but seem to wait to the last minute. You were the only shop that really could get the work done Same Day.
Отличный магазин. Постоянно бываю)
Had a great experience with all the staff at Patrick Hyundai. And I LOVE my new car!
The best hardware store I have ever seen - midwest, east coast, west coast -- in the United States. Amazing.
"I was reluctant to smile and lacked confidence when I did smile. The treatment I had at Cashel Daisley was very efficient and the results are excellent. The team were extremely accommodating and professional. My new smile has changed my life!
hood
An excellent place to relax yourselves, play with friends, spend time with family...
I have been to about a dozen different medical doctors over the years to help relieve my lower back pain and all they ever seem to do is mask my problem. As soon as I stop using their prescribed medicine, the pain reveals itself again. When I was referred to Dr. Eric and met him, I instantly knew this was the person and the place that would relieve my pain for good. It started with a very thorough meeting where Dr. Eric took the time to listen to my problems, concerns, and fears. He educated me on why I never recieved results previously and showed me in a way I could easily understand why his establisment and treatment methods were the right choice to provide me with the results I wanted. I followed his advice and now I can say I no longer have lower back pain. Not only is Dr. Eric amazing, his staff is just as competent and professional. I am extremely happy with my experience at Dynamic Total Health and would recommend them to everyone.
On my birthday me and my ladies to to chilis, we had a great time, the food was delicious and the staff came and sung happy birthday to me. I though wow I must be special lol...
None
Great eye care center, great services, great products! I got a year's supply of contact lenses for less than what a 6 month supply costs. I would recommend Dr. Perry Optometrist of Fairview NC to anyone within the area! She is great!
I was expecting a large building with well stocked showroom. I didn't get that but I wasn't bothered. It soon became clear that I had made the right choice. I have a 'grey import' Toyota Regius mpv and had decided to go for s s/steel replacement rather than Toyota's conventional box. Right from getting the vehicle on the ramp everything was discussed about what I wanted, how it should sound and how it should look. I ended up with a dual exhaust -instead of the standard single - that ended in two very nice oblong end trims. I tried the round ones but the oblong were more in keeping with the shape of my rear light clusters. Tried a couple of boxes to hear how they sounded and ended up with the slight "growl" I wanted. Mine is a diesel so I wasn't going to get aV8 soundtrack. I got exactly what I wanted at a very fair price. No hesitation in recommending these guys. They are passionate about what they do and what their customers want.
One of the best Sushi's in town! Love, love, love their Uni (sea urchin). I am a big fan of traditional Sushi, and this place is right up my ally.
The customer service at the Omni Hotel in Forth Worth is awesome! We have been to two conferences at this hotel within the past year, and all the staff members are extremely nice, have a smile on their face, and go out of their way to assist you. You don't have to walk around looking for someone to help or ask a question, as they have plenty of staff on-hand and are easy to locate at any time of day or night. The food is great and the rooms are nice/clean as well. We would definitely recommend this hotel!
The peanut butter pie was "To Die For"! The staff were friendly and they seem to have lots of fun, family events scheduled consistently. Much more than just a restaurant! Make it a priority to check this place out .
Top Notch service from ARS Universal all around. The team installed my system last year and did an awesome job. This post is occaisioned by the semi-annual service. My tech, Sina, called me to let me know he was on the way, showed up at the right time, and called me to let me know he had arrived. He was professionally dressed in a sharp uniform, and wore shoe protectors in the house. He was professional, courteous and friendly, and worked efficiently and quickly. When he spotted some minor issues he took corrective action and kept me informed in layman's terms. I give Sina, and ARS Universal my most enthusiastic recommendation!
Hallo alle zusammen, ich wollte hier ein kurzes Statement zur Homepage der Firma Immobilien Team Eisenach aus Friedrichshafen am Bodensee abgeben, da es mir gefällt, wie dieser Immobilienmakler das Thema Immobilienverkauf im Internet mit in den Geschäftsalltag einbaut. Es werden hier nicht nur Immobilien angepriesen, sondern es gibt hier insbesondere auch News und nützliche Tipps, die richtig informativen Mehrwert um den Bereich Immobilienverkauf bieten. Ich habe zwar aktuell keine Immobilien zu verkaufen, aber die News/Tipps habe ich trotzdem gerne gelesen und in Zukunft werde ich sicherlich hin und wieder mal auf der Homepage vorbei schauen. Mir gefällt's und ich wünsche dem Team noch viel Erfolg und hoffe, dass die Themen nicht so schnell ausgehen werden. Gruß Michael
We have stayed at Bay Palms 5 times and we have been impressed with the service every time. Nice people, pet friendly, VERY clean and an excellent location.
Amor de Brazil brings the Brazilian Flavor to Matthews. The food and staff is outstanding! I am glad I found it.
I find Pier32 a pleasure to deal with. Always prompt and professional, their products have never failed to impress.
We've been going here for ever. Best Sushi in town hands down. They have ruined us on all other sushi. Love the new lounge/sports bar. No matter where you sit there are plenty of tv's to watch
We went to Lehman Mazda after having dealt with much frustration at Gunther and Carmax. Everyone we encountered was great. From Erin who happened to make a sales call at just the right time in our frustrating process, to Devon who followed up and got me to come in and get my boyfriend's car appraised, to Sam and Pierre who negotiated with us and answered our many questions, to Roland the finance guy who gave us an interest rate slightly better than the one we had gotten at our bank. The process was smooth and seemless and exactly what car shopping should be. No games, no nonsense - straight to the point and we had a deal before we knew it. They all really listened to what we wanted and needed and helped us get into a vehicle with payments we could afford. In all seriousness, some of the most amazing customer service we have ever encountered! We ultimately purchased a 2010 Mazda CX-9 which we absolutely love! It drives like a car but is a 7 passenger SUV! We definitely will go back to Lehman for our next car purchase!
I always get my flowers from The Floral Fixx. The staff is awesome to work with, and extremely accommodating. Never disappointed.
The Dean Team is excellent, and a pleasure to work with. Their internet sales department is polite, courteous, and most importantly, quick to reply to emails. Rick, in particular, did a great job helping me secure the vehicle I was searching for, and at the most competitive price I could find in the St. Louis area. They're attentive and friendly, making the car purchasing process fun and fast.
None
I went here for the first time today. I had been driving by for months and kept telling myself I needed to stop by. I wish I had stopped by sooner! The staff was professional and there were plenty of customers. I was able to get a great haircut at a great price. I highly recommend them.
Karatsu Kunchi is one of those traditional celebrations in Japan that brings a smile to anyone who experiences it. This festival dates back hundreds of years, and gives all the people involved the freedom to let loose! Random strangers will invite you inside to dine in their homes and drink their sake. People are happy, drunk, and have a big old 3-day party. The highlight of the event are the hiki-yama, or the neighborhood floats. They are intricate, huge, and old. Not to mention beautiful works of art. If you're in the Northern Kyushu area during this festival I highly recommend seeing it.
Dr. Zonner has been great taking care of my families infirmity's and injuries, I highly recommend his services.
As someone who experiences low-back pain from time to time I found myself in need of an Osteopath whilst in Wollongong recently. Dr Joelle Boustani was fantastic!
Best pizza in Peterborough
The TVS and the Cold Beer made this awesome. Will be back
Exelente escuela
domilya Group excels at any basement renovation or bathroom renovation project, we had an amazing experience in terms of high quality and professionalism!
Very good staf and food.
We just stopped for lunch today at what we thought was a local diner. BTW - The Indian Fry Bread Salad was wonderful! After lunch we perused the gift shop where we were told about an adjacent museum with the Dukes of Hazard Car, over 30 buildings, and 300 cars! We were also told of the fact by a very nice salesperson from our neighboring state of Louisiana about American Pickers recently featuring the museum. Who woulda thunk! We went to the museum door where we were personally and graciously greeted by the owner Dave Geisler. OMG!!!!! We saw every car imaginable! It was totally amazing! We even saw one of Elvis' motorcycles! Bring quarters. You can play all sorts of antique devices. We only had one quarter, so we tried a rinkey-tink piano. The museum went on and on. The cars were only part of it - and this place put the fantastic car museum in Shreveport (next to the casinos) to shame! It even had a 1964 Avanti - a car I coveted in my teenage years. Needless to say, the 1922 motor home, the antique tractors, the old radio shack, well, you get the idea, were unbelievable. Today was my first time ever in South Dakota and I will never forget it! Tomorrow, Wall Drug Store, Badlands, and later Mount Rushmore. Does it get any better?
When I was there last week they had superb happy hour cocktails which we then followed up with dinner and more drinks. I had the lamb risotto that was an ecstasy in every mouthful. The only quibble I had was their inability to split a cheque. We were a group of 12 and they couldn't break a bill. to be fair, it seemed to be a common malady in Portland.
I don't understand why this place has such poor reviews. I have always had great service with a great result.
Henry Bautista, Rene Sagastume and Mehdi M. Farrahi did an excellent job for me, Very courteous and very competent. I am very satisfied with the service that I received in purchasing my new Versa. I feel very confident that if I have any questions about my vehicle in the future that they will be there to help me. I highly recommend these three gentlemen to any one looking to purchase or lease a vehicle. Sincerely, Gail Wasserman
North West Roofing was an amazing company to work with. From the employees, Ruth and Maggie and in the office, to the contractors, Justin and Mac, that came out to my house, to the crew that put BOTH my garage and home roof up in under 2 days! We were extremely impressed with the professionalism and the efficiency of this company. They made it very hassle free for me too, dealing with the insurance company; they did all the work and all I was left to do was to enjoy my new (non leaking!) roof! I highly recommend NWE to any person needing a roof replacement or repairs. Thanks you guys! We are so happy to have been able to benefit from your services!
This AC company has been great to work with! I've developed more confidence in them then the previous company I had for ten years. Highly recommendable! They've already installed a few systems for friends as well.
I took my car in to Autobarn Mazda of Evanston recently with some torn wiper blades that needed replacing. Gigi Giuliano helped me in service. I was greeted and helped quickly. I'd say I was in and out in 15 minutes with a brand new set of blades installed. Price was competitive and service was great.
I just finished a full month at CrossFit Novem. Joining is one of the best decisions I have made in a long time. I am stronger, more flexible, and way more in shape. People have asked what I'm doing. All of the workouts are scalable, meaning you can come in there in great shape or less than great shape. The staff knows what they are doing and are fun. The other members of the gym are also awesome. The new location on Howard Street is incredible, too.
I've been going to Texas Dental for a year now. Dr. Ricci and his entire staff are all very fun people who are excellent at what they do. Between him and his assistant Julie, my recent root canal - of all things - turned out to be a very enjoyable experience.
Chantell did a good job helping us.
Dr Dillon is a fantastic Dentist. I needed some bonding work done and it came out beautiful. Dr Dillon was very gentle and did everything to make sure my smile was perfect. Thank you Dr Dillon for making this procedure so easy. I will certianly be recommending you to everyone.
My lab loves the folks at Townhouse. How do we know? She is all a-wag when we drop her off and the same when we pick her up. She loves the attention she gets during her playtime. For me, the hours are good for drop off and pick up and if you are a little late a phone call saves the day. I've never had a bad experience with this kennel.
None
Purchased a '99 4x4 Jeep Grand Cherokee; what a great deal! the experiences with sales-woman Casey, and General Manager Pablo were awesome! I would highly recommend you check them out. I intend to use them again.
None
I cannot tell the full story of what Jordan Harris, assistant Manager at this location did for us, as it would likely put them out of business if people knew about it. So, I will simply say that I almost walked out the door due to a policy that they had that put him in a position that he could not give me what I wanted. So, rather than letting me go out the door, he bent over backwards and helped me to be happy. I cannot recommend the customer service of this location and Jordan enough!!! I am literally still in shock over what he did to take care of an almost upset client. Got our tires on in under an hour and were out the door happier then we could have ever been!! Cuddos to this store and their employees!! I am now a customer for life!!
None
Bella Italia is my favorite Italian restaurant in Tri-cities. The atmosphere is as if you went to Italy and were dining in a family restaurant. The food is truly authentic and exquisite. I would highly recommend this restaurant to any family member or friend. It's perfect for a date night with your significant other or a family gathering.
I printed my wedding invitations with Print and Copy Factory and could not have been happier! I designed the files myself and they gave me lots of guidance on file size, bleed and trim so that they turned out just right. They were nothing but professional, prompt and accommodating. Dave and Becky made sure that my invitations turned out just how I had imagined, and turned them around in less than 48 hours. I was beyond impressed and would recommend them to anyone!
Pros: This is nice hotel we have stayed with cheap price of $58 in the price line. Upon our request price line have booked 2 beds in a room. Bed is spacious enough for 4 persons and one kid. The room and toilet is very clean. Beach and coastal bazaar is walkable. It is not a big city to see the view. You can have a good relax and it has one nice swimming pool and gym as well. Cons: Breakfast is not served at free of cost. For parking charge is $8/- per day. But for the cheap price it is affordable.
Never had a bad meal there. I have had the eggplant casarole, yogurt lu gyro and T Bone steak.
Perfect food. Able to order off menu and staff very accommodating. Only downside perhaps is can be too busy and it is small. Worth waiting for (and our own fault for not reserving, but they sorted us out well). One to revisit and try everything.
I had a great experience at BMW Murietta! Very well taken care of and Victoria was excellent. Customer Service is very important and seems to be forgotten in some places. BMW Murietta was very buttoned-up, very attentive and made my experience a good one. Go see Victoria Guthery down there and she will take good care of you.
Someone had brought in a bunch of Tatte's baked goods for an office event and they were lovely. I had to go in and see what this place was about. CUTEST space ever. Black and white for the main colors with touches of wood and hardware to home up the place. The chandelier gives you so much light. The service was great. The person behind the counter was both bright and cheerful. I ordered a blueberry hazelnut muffin and the roast beef sandwich. When I got my sandwich I discovered the only downside I've seen of this place...the sandwich's enormity. This really isn't a downside, it's just a cautionary note. 1 sandwich = two meals. I defy people to make it one and then pity for their foolhardy arrogance. Bring a wheel barrow and a friend to push you home if you're going to try this. The sandwich was great, crisp french fried onions, mild emmental, cress, and rare roast beef. What could be better! All in all, I have to say that this place has amazing baked goods. I could eat one of the blueberry hazelnut muffins every day. Not too sweet, full of blueberries, nice balance with the nut. All I have to say is, Get you one!
None
Best Goodwill I've ever been to and they have excellent prices and great selection. I purchased 7 pairs of name brand shorts and 1 pair of pants for $34. Their clothing selection is enormous and they have tons of name brand stuff that is practically new.
Fun atmosphere great food and polite respectful service and decent prices
This is a great oasis away within the city, and accessible by public transportation. The grounds are spectacular as are the exhibits. Be sure to make your way to the lower level where fine artifacts are displayed and to experience the gardens. If you are finished early and have time, go to the Metropolitan Museum of Art since it is included in your one day admission. Well worth the trip.
None
Car hasn't been this shiny since it was new from the dealer. Even after driving it around for a week in the salt and grime of winter, it's still looks fantastic. The grime just won't stick.
I've only purchased iced coffee from here, but it is SO much better than Starbucks. I very much enjoy Starbucks, but this place is much better. The coffee is better quality, and it's quieter. I order iced coffee with sugar free vanilla and skim milk. For the iced coffee, they use ice cubes made of coffee (iced coffee cubes). Their process for iced coffee with vanilla: Pump the vanilla, add a little hot coffee to dissolve the vanilla, add iced coffee/ice cubes, add milk. The dissolving the vanilla part makes a BIG difference. Plus, you're getting about 30% more coffee than you do at Starbucks. Also, I like that it's a mom & pop shop - support the local economy!
None
I am from New Orleans, and I must say I had the best bowl of gumbo in my LIFE here today. WOW!!! I will need to find a reason to return...
9,80€ Lunch, great value, good food.
I was referred to Dr. Scott Wright by a friend. I had a been diagnosed with a couple of dental issues that needed a high level of expertise to resolve. I was initially impressed by the detailed explanations and Dr Wrights willingness to explain his approach to correct my problems. And, now that I've experienced his work I am even more impressed. I will be using Dr Wright for all my future dental needs.
I called for service and had someone from Pop-A Lock at my car within 30 minutes, as promised. My hood latch is malfunctioning and when the service person could not get the latch to open she looked up the problem on Google. The service person took about 15 minutes working to get the hood open for me and she didn't give up. The dispatch operator was kind, the service person was professional, kind, and most definitely hard working. I was pleased to see that the reviews online accurately represented them!
None
These guys have tint several cars for my family, I own window tint shops in Colorado so I can not tint cars for my family that live in Troy but I can say after seeing their work they are the best I have seen in that area. I recoment anyone in Detroit to go to Buzz Off.
This is a wonderful jiffy lube. Went here for an oil change on veterens day (free) and even with everyone and their brother getting an oil change.... they were expedient! Kudos!
We booked this for our christmas party, the cab driver was great and he was on time to pick us up after our night! Great service!!! will use again.
Not too noisy, good friendly service, tasty coffee and teas. Great place to meet up and do business with me. :j
Great remodeling company! The kitchen looks great! Thank You! I knew you would take care of everything - as you did. I have pictured my countertops with tile for the past ten years, since it's where I spend so much time, and it is so PRETTY now! I feel just like the cat on front!
None
The Aio store in Rockledge is the BESSSSTTTT!!!! Love the customer service and Love the service period... Don't know what id do without David!!!! Thank you guys sssooo much!!
From the moment I walked in, right up to picking up my new denture, the experience was warm,friendly and welcoming. The denture is beautiful. I couldn't be more pleased. Beautiful product and superb customer service. I highly recommend this denture clinic.
Very great food and services
26 de octubre inolvidable fui aver a black sabbath
Great service. I was greeted with a smile. They way Edwina handled everything exceeded my expectation. Perez Notary goes above and beyond to satifsy their customers.
None
Went to WeFixIt about six months ago- oh my god! I do have some experience fixing cars, too! And as a woman, for probably only the second time in over 25 years I was treated like a partner in repairing my car! Dean actually listened to my explanations and descriptions and ACCURATELY conveyed them to Andreas! They explained when I asked for explanations, and treated me like if I knew enough to ask a question, I must know what I was referring to! NO patronizing, NO superior eye-rolling, NO acting like I was not there. These men were thoughtful, and offered that if I had any desire to work on my own car (sometimes I do- but no equipment or garage) I COULD! Because there is also the option for UFixIt at their garage...words cannot express my appreciation for the partnership with this garage. I tell everyone I know to go there, they know what they are doing and they do it well!
Robert was a true professional and gives you a 100% satisfaction guarantee. I highly recommend Son Bright Systems if you are in the Tampa Bay area and looking to have your tile and grout cleaned.
Excellent Fans! Very innovative.. Great on quality and service!
Lot's of machines, both washers and dryers, and friendly owners.
I don’t know if the community realizes how very blessed we are to have Dr. Patel and his staff to serve us. I've found myself in many Dr. offices translating for old friends and new ones alike, but never have I witnessed the passion and commitment....the caring and sincerity that I have in his office. My son is 22 and has visited the emergency room too many times to count, just to be turned away. I didn't realize a 2 cm kidney stone was not an emergency situation! My son lost all hope and was ready to give up. He came to visit last week. We spent the night in yet another hospital...just to be sent home with Ibuprofen. He cried on that bed..feeling his body "dying" as he would say. The next morning..I went into Dr. Patel's office without an appointment. He was in surgery and would be off the rest of the week. Mind you...my son has never been seen by him. One of the girls at the front desk sent Dr. Patel a text and we quickly heard back from him. He needed to know if my son ate anything that day...and asked that I don't feed him. My son broke in tears feeling hope for the 1st time in a very long time. My baby was in the surgery room by 1:50 pm that same day. I FIND NO WORDS TO DESCRIBE MY GRATITUDE! My baby has a second chance at living a normal life. THANK YOU Dr. Patel!!! You are amazing....and your team is unbelievable!!!
We just love the swim academy. We have had all three of our kids in classes and they are the perfect size for one-on-one interaction. The office is also very involved and helpful in scheduling the children for times and locations that we need.
Fabulous place, great Chebureki ( meat or cheese filled deep fried dumplings), Satzivi ( cold chicken with walnut sauce, Soup Harcho ( hearty lamb soup, but not as spicy as traditionally in Georgia) Khachapuri is very good although my favourite remains adjaruli khachapuri ( a different style of this dish), Try Georgian wines and Georgian soda ( syrup in mineral water). Great service, fast and friendly. Loved it, would recommend and would definitely go there again.
This shop is very clean and professional, it doesn't "feel" sterile, but when I looked carefully, I saw the working areas were pretty close. The artwork done by Dusty and Craig is awesome! I always get positive remarks about my two pieces that were done here. As for bad attitude from the artists, well, you get what you put out! These guys always spoke appropriately to walk-ins while I was there.
Being new to an area, it's always nerve wracking trying to find a new daycare for Nala. Once I got settled and moved into the Warehouse district, we tried out MetroDogs and it was love at first sight! The staff is always really friendly and the facility itself is really clean and bright. It's also nice to know that they offer a true full service - everything from daycare, boarding, grooming, and one-on-one attention. It's no secret that Nala is obsessed with playing fetch - so it's nice to know that the staff there recognizes this, embraces it, and throws a never ending ball! On mornings that she goes to MetroDogs - she practically pulls my arm off to get there - we won't be going anywhere else as long as we live in Minneapolis! Thank you to Amy and staff for opening a wonderful place for Nala.
We have been five times now, three for dinner, two for brunch, and have attended the oyster roast as well. The experience has always been favorable. Yes, the food and drinks are pricey, but it's worth it, especially compared to other similiar choices in town. Try the brunch to start, raw bar, trout, clams...
Really great service and tasty food.
Easily the best hostel I stayed in during my trip. Everyone was friendly and chill.
Super help getting me a few parts for flhtk.
None
I highly recommend Monica Cary. She helped a family member through a difficult divorce and provided excellent counsel with compassion and absolute professionalism. I will gladly be a reference for her and her firm.
Yesterday was my first time with Karen for a Shellac manicure and spa pedicure and I'm very happy with the results. She did an excellent job and really took the time to make sure her work was perfect. I'll definitely return and recommend her to friends.
None
Great experience with the facility, and also the employees and the doctor. Honoured my problem and gave me the earliest appointment possible and the bestavailable doctor for getting my root canal done with some nice music for ears and no pain to my teeth or mouth. Great Stuff!!!
I am surprising how people had a bad experience, since I am tasting Shanmukha's food from the past one year. The quality of the food was awesome, the Boneless chicken Biriyani taste was unbeatable. Also when compared to other Restaurants the cost is very nominal.
Notary Services @ 6 Onyx Xerox
Contacted various Ford dealers through internet. Only Anton and Sea Breeze were willing to answer all of my questions, and did so in very timely fashion and very pleasantly. I was treated very fairly and loved their family dealership atmosphere. They were easy to negotiate with and my wife and I left there feeling very satisfied in the deal we got plus the value of our trade-in. I would highly recommend that anyone looking for a Ford contact them.
None
None
Great
Had great support from Fast Track Ltd. They did it what I want do!
Muito bom!!!!!
I am a 17 year professional tattoo artist. I had never visited a chiropractor in the past, due to worrying about the cost. About 3 months ago I started feeling more soreness than usual in my back and shoulder. My husband who is a roofer, suggested that I go see his chiropractor. To my surprise, Dr. Groff was able to diagnose the issue without even an x-ray and I am feeling so much better with the therapy and advise. The staff are all very knowledgable and sweet.You are very much the top priority in this office. I am now a loyal patient.
Wish the double stack wasn't so expensive now
Awesome place with Swimming pool + a mastt garden + gym
My experience with Thornton's Plumbing was great. I cannot say enough positive things about these guys. Everyone was so easy to talk to and they were very knowledgeable, honest and upfront with me. They are reasonably priced and their work was impeccable. They were in constant communication with me regarding the progress of the job as well as communicating well with my insurance company. I would highly recommend Thornton's to anyone who wants to make a plumbing problem easier. They handled EVERYTHING and they got it done in a very timely manner. They clearly go above and beyond for their customers.
This is an outstanding shop and I can't BELIEVE its in Boulder, Colorado. WHAT a gem! They specialize in natural fibers and have the best of the best fabrics from all over the world. Its a great resource for art quilters as they have probably every shade of cotton batik ever made and in lots of designs too. They teach classes too, incase you want to sew with the gorgeous silks and wools but are intimidated. They have a FABULOUS mountain retreat where you can go to stitch and enjoy the view and great company too. If you are a fabric person at all, this place is not to be missed.
None
It was really great working with both Keil and Ed! It was my first time getting a car on my own, so the way Keil and Ed made me fell comfortable was really reassuring!
I had been wearing contacts for 20 years, and had never really thought of them as a nuisance. Had my contacts not started causing me pain about a year ago, I might never had opted for LASIK. But now, I'm wishing that I had made this decision years ago! I had my surgery two and a half weeks ago. Throughout both my pre-op appointments, the entire staff was prompt, courteous, and answered all of my questions thoroughly, including regarding payment options and post-op care. I especially enjoyed working with Dr. Weigel. She made me feel very assured of my upcoming procedure. On the day of my surgery, the staff did a great job of making me feel relaxed and comfortable. Dr. Holzman performed my procedure, and he walked me through the process as it was happening. My expectations were managed exceptionally well -- everything from what the procedure would feel like to my level of discomfort afterwards to how quickly I would see vision improvement. I had a complex eye health history at best, including a prolonged bout of iritis in my 20's and astigmatism in one eye. The level of discomfort I felt after LASIK was barely even noticeable compared to the discomfort my contacts had been causing me. Plus, at my one day post-op appointment, I was already seeing 20/15 -- better than I was seeing with my contacts or glasses before! Aside from dry eyes, which is common with this procedure, the cornea flaps healed beautifully. I can't thank Dr. Holzman, Dr. Weigel and the entire Tyson's TLC staff enough. I feel like I have a new lease on life now.
I've been going here for over 20 years. I struggled with acne as a teen which was easily cured by continued treatment and a effective product line which i could only find here. Currently, i struggle with ongoing back pains so bi-weekly massages are needed to suppress the pain. For me, my experience at Roman skin & body has been positve & life changing.
None
After researching Laser Lipo online I decided to give Sono Bello a call. Had a consultation with Nicole a few days later and decided right then and there that I was at the right place with the right people at the right time. Had the procedure done a couple weeks later and it's been one of the best decisions of my life. Dr Soler is amazing and the Laser Lipo procedure was virtually painless in my experience. I experienced a little soreness for a few days afterwards but I was up and going the very next day. The results are unbelievable and I continue to see them each and every week. Can't say enough about the staff, (Yahaira, Mike, Nicole, Raini, Jessica, April, Anie, Heidi and Shianne) everyone there just makes you feel like you're part of the family. I'm now going in weekly for Venus Freeze and starting to see results from those treatments as well. If you're considering Laser Liposuction you should pick up the phone and give Nicole at Sono Bello a call, it's really that simple.
Joe Corsmeier is one of the finest attorneys I have had the pleasure of working with. I first contacted Joe in an abundance of caution to ensure we were complying with the Florida Bar rules pertaining to how we set up our law firm and client trust account. Joe was always prompt, friendly and easy to work with. Further, I have consulted with joe on many occasions since and each time it has been a pleasure. His staff has always been first rate as well. If you should ever require ethics advice or legal guidance concerning issues with the Florida Bar or the Board of Medicine, this is the lawyer you want on your side. I have personally avoided ever having issues with the Bar by seeking Joe's guidance from the outset. I strongly recommend this attorney without any hesitation.
Great service. I am an avid rider but not a mechanic. They explain everything without talking down to me. I like every guy in the service dept.
Great place to take friends to watch sports on the big screens, play pool,or darts. Often take my business guest for drinks, cigars and light eats. Always get good remarks. Cigar humidor has a great selection. Sales people know their cigars and are alway ready to recomend something new. Have nt been disappointed yet.
None
I wasn't sure about this place at the very beginning, but I decided to try it one night. The atmosphere is pretty good and the live music just give it something special. I really recommend the burger. It´s the best burger I've ever had! The staff is nice and friendly. If you're not sure about this place, just give it a try. You will enjoy your night as I did.
I had the vegetable dumplings. Absolutely the best vegetable dumplings I've ever had. Considering that it's what I've order at every Chinese place I've been to that has had it, that's saying a lot.
Most Modern, gorgeous, and biggest campus in New York. Their education is also a quality. Student teacher ratio is great too. As a public varsity one of the best in New York.
Best place for window tinting in El Paso. Just picked up my car today. This makes 3 vehicles that I ve taken here. You can t beat the service or professionalism of this place. Would definitely recommend it to anyone looking to get their windows tinted
I'd like to thank A&T Motor Company for the1st class service which they provided me with earlier today. Andrew managed to book the car in at short notice and within a few hours our car was MOT'd and back on the road. I would defiantly recommend this garage to everyone, further more their endorsed by the Best Of Walsall. Thank you.
Excellent display and range of products..must visit for all...
Power Max is the premiere place to purchase new/refurbished products. It is a great alternative for those who do not have vast's amount of disposable income.
Una buena selección de zapatillas y consejos muy pertinentes.
None
i love this college having great faculty and studying facilities...
None
had the pulled pork shoulder. It was fantastic ! Service was excellent! Highly recommend!
I had been there once and am going again! Found the sushi I had ordered last time to be absolutely wonderful, the soup great and the service friendly and professional. for a meat restaurant, the prices were good. It is a semi fancy atmosphere and one that you could bring a date to or your family. either way a great choice!
Had my daughters' Sweet 16 catered by them. Everyone loved the food !!! Delicious , thanks for making great food !!!!
Uno de mis lugares preferidos en Caracas
I love Eastwind, James, Roger, Patty and the whole gang. Our small office use them not only for computer repairs but for networking. These men know their stuff and the staff is friendly, courteous, and extremely helpful. They don't try and sale you up, they give you what you need for a fair price. Thanks Eastwind, you guys rock!
I go to to this place to get new phones, but my cpu broke down and randomly the dude fixed it in like 30 minutes. Good shop. -M
La mejor oportunidad para toda latinoamerica!
Woke up to a severly leaking water heater the day before vacation! I called Superior Water and Air and they had Burke Hawkins at my house within a couple hours and he replaced and installed my new water heater in one afternoon! Fantastic customer service and friendly and courteous installer! What started out as a stressful morning, ended as a very happy day! New water heater and a rebate from Questar on top of it! Thank you Superior Water and Air!!
My glasses broke shortly before a flight back home. I looked them up, I was in and out with fixed glasses in about five minutes (without telling them it was a rush job). Very happy.
My wife and I have been there twice. Both times fantastic. Can't say enough about the food. Best roast lamb I have ever had. Wife says the souvlaki is amazing. Service was great but restaurant was a little cramped. Out of 10 I would give them a 9.5
I don't live in Kansas City but every time I go up there, I visit this place because of its exotic Egyptian ambience, wonderful sheesha, and excellent customer service. I would recommend this place to everyone.
well what can I say such service. Our handle broke on our front door on Sunday afternoon. Luckily we could lock the door but it was basically out of action. Emailed Julian who responded asap to advise on how to lock the door and to discuss our problem. Today less than 24hrs in contacting him Julian turned up replaced our handles but salvaged our lock to save us any extra expense. I would highly recommend this company they are fantastic.
I want to comment on the professional manner in which your firm handled my case. You immediately assured me that my rights would be protected and your knowledge of labor law placed me in a comfort zone where I felt I was being properly represented. To say the least, the results you achieved on my behalf were well beyond my expectations. Those of us unfamiliar with the legal process rely on others to protect our interests. In this regard, I could not be more satisfied. Thank you again for your professional representation.
Have to say the food here is some of the best I have ever tasted, this place is literally like having a restaurant meal at home! The roast potatoes from here are to die for!
I bring my dog here almost every Saturday for the socialization and the staff/trainers are really nice. This location even has a pet hotel!
None
Village Draft House has EXCELLENT food, wait staff, and of course any beverage you would want! The environment is warm and inviting and a great place to watch your favorite team play! I highly recommend visiting and eating here! I cannot make a trip to Raleigh without meeting my friends to eat here!
This place is fantastic! All the activities for kids are great, fantastic fishing, Jim and Karen are very friendly and helpful. Strongly Recommend!
C excellent et tres amical♡♡♡
Great place to start the day.
Excellent course in Oceana county! The staff are extremely friendly and are always willing to work you in o nshort notice and the course itself is one of the better maintained that I have ever played on! Don't let the par 3's fool you, it is more challenging than you think! Go give it a swing!
Clean, well-maintained facility run by a smart and friendly staff who got me the perfect unit for my storage needs. Hands down the best storage facility & staff I've ever come across, and easily my best experience with any storage company. A+
I have used Bizcard Xpress for all my business cards, magnetic car advertising and all my business handouts and have been extremely pleased with all. You can get these kind of items at many places, but you will not get the superb customer service you get from Kim, Samantha and the crew.I highly recommend them to anyone who needs advertising of anykind and once you see the service, you will be a customer for life.
My child is in the 4th grade here at Jefferson Elementary School. This was definitely a top choice. I really like how the environment is very welcoming and exciting. They definitely get the parents involved!
This place is great, I went in with my beat up car and they gave me a fair trade in price and a good deal on a new diesel VW. Not only did they save me money on a new car, they also saved me money in gas with a fuel efficient engine. Mike Ladenheim is the man!
Karim was an excellent customer service representative! He answered all my questions in a proper way and was very kind!
These guys did a great job on my car. took it in for quick estimate, drop the car off and had it done with in 5 days. The quality is amazing. I could see anything left on my car. I highly recommend these guys they really take care of you.
None
Great limousine company with a great service. I needed a Limousine service for me and my family and I was soon met with outstanding service and perfect price. I always recommend.
I went with my fiance to buy wine for our wedding. The assistant manager helped us select good wines within our price range. He was incredibly helpful and we were able to stay within our budget. I highly recommend Total Wine & More for the huge selection, good prices, and knowledgeable and helpful staff!
One of the top three running stores in Orange County and one of the top five in Southern California. Amazing store, selection, and excellent customer service.
We hosted a reception for about 30 work colleagues from around the world on the indoor bocce ball court last night. The food, the service everything was excellent! Four of us liked the reception food so much, we decided to stay and have dinner. Totally amazing! Great salads, pasta and entrees. Thank you to the folks at La Scala for making our event a success, our evening wonderful, and our dinner delightful. We will be back. Mark J. Spalding, President, The Ocean Foundation
Rebuilt the transmission on my 2002 Accord. They finished the work within a week, and it's been running great. Al was very honest about the diagnostic, prognosis, repair costs, etc. and patient with my questions. I double checked all the facts & figures with our family mechanic from out of state, and he verified that Al was indeed completely honest. Later, he also did both front & rear brakes on the vehicle as well. If my car ever has a problem, my first call will be to Al.
The property manager was very helpful to me and my family and went out of her way to remove fees that we were unable to pay to prevent us from loosing our belongings in our time of need! We were pleasantly surprised by her kindness as well as the level of commitment she took to ensure the highest level of customer service! We would recommend this location to anyone in need of a storage based on the great service we were provided here. Thanks
None
I like the reservation system and prompt service, along with the great exercise my dog gets while at day camp.
We first reserved our 10 x 20' storage unit online and moved into today. Alecia was very helpful and kind. The whole experience was definitely 5 stars great. Though it did feel like we were buying a house signing all the paperwork!
Kristie was great working with my little family. Our 18 month old boy doesn't like to be still ever. We are very happy with our photos. I know we will care about them for a lifetime.
This place is my go to all across america.
I used to love this place, however, the restaurant is closed now.
None
The chicken tikka masala was seriously one of the best meals I've ever had. It was crazy good!
I have taken 2 of my dogs to this wonderful vet to have surgery. The first was to remove a lump on the shoulder of my adult male pit bull. The pricing was very reasonable and the level of professionalism of the staff is what led me to taking in our other Pit to be fixed and have a tooth removed. Both experiences were delightful and I am glad to say that I have found a NEW local Pup Doc! Thanks Gentle Vet our Dogs LOVE YOU!!!!
Pulled up just before closing, they were happy to help me out. They came out to my car to get me started right away, made sure I knew about other problems with my car (didnt push for the service), and were very friendly while I was waiting. Will be returning for.my service needs.
Dr. Armitage and her staff are great. They are engaging, knowledgeable and were VERY patient and helpful while I tried to get contacts in for the first time.
Excellent, authentic food! Very good staff! Relaxing atmosphere. Food wait was a little long...
None
Geoffery and Stephen Dyer did a AMAZING job on my skylight in south Eugene! The bid was affordable and the work was completed on time with no mess! I would recommend Dyer Skylights to anyone with a skylight of sun-tube need!
J'adore J'adore J'adore!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Excellent Pizza, very hot wings, Awesome atmosphere!
I used chipsaway for the dent removal service they offer, On my vehicle was a dent 7 inches long most dent removal companies i was quoted from were telling me it needed to be filled and painted which i was not happy with at a cost of £350,I went to chipsaway and was told no need for painting and was quoted £70+vat which i accepted and booked the car in ,I was blown away with the results you could not tell the dent was ever there,i have sent friends and family to chipsaway and everyone has been happy with there quality and results.i would 100% recommend.
None
Nick Roesner and TechNIck were an absolute God send to my life. I am totally illiterate when it comes to the world of technology yet one of my key responsibilities is our Web Site. Nick was able to help me understand how we could do things simpler and with better response and clarity. When first seeking him out I received quotes from four different companies and his was the best. Even better than his price is his word. When he tells you he will do something it is done. The same goes for his staff. I love working with all of them, they make my life so much easier and they make me look good while they are at it.
REALLY EXCELLENT
Working with Don Robichaud and his colleague Andrew Gregson at Floodlight Business Solutions has been a great experience. They have helped me to feel more confident in my business decisions, given me invaluable direction and helped me to make sense of social media. My website traffic is way up and I now know how to blog and tweet. Most importantly I want to say thank you to Floodlight for bringing me to a new level of success in business. You are sincere in your desire to see me succeed, you are generous with your time, and you are true experts in your field. Thank you!
Amazing baked goods.
Rented out the private party room this past weekend for a double birthday party. We had about 35-40 guests and fit perfectly with tables and chairs for those who wanted to sit as well as plenty of room for people who wanted to stand and mingle around. The room was spacious, clean, well laid out, with its own bathroom off of the kitchen and they let us plug in our own ipod for the room. Christen (the lady I was in contact with to set up the event) was fully accommodating and responded to all of my emails/texts in a timely manner. We had a personal waiter for our party room who went above and beyond to keep everyone happy and a drink in our hands at all times and was happy to do separate checks (no idea how he kept track of everyone but he really did an excellent job). There is a $500 minimum that you have to reach by the end of the night to guarantee the party room but I'm sure we way surpassed that, even with the $5 well drink special they offered us (we had the room for 4 hours). We brought a cake and they were happy to keep it in the fridge for a few hours as well as provide plates and forks (they even washed off my cake plate after!!) I would 100% recommend Double Wide as a place to rent out for a birthday party or other casual event and I am looking forward to reserving the room again for a future party. cheers!
None
They done such a wonderful software
Love it!!
Great beer both lager and real ale. A proper pub for people who appreciate a decent pint.
I recently purchased a Toyota Rav4 EV from Diane Whitmire at Carson Toyota. She responded to my email quickly, with full details of all aspects of the purchase. The paperwork was ready and my wife and I were quickly on our way in my new EV. However, I was not surprised by the great service. We have leased or purchased 8 cars from Diane. In addition, I have sent numerous friends and family to her -- all of them sing her praises as well. Diane knows Toyotas, especially the Prius and electric vehicles, and will honestly answer every question about the car and purchasing or leasing it. The out-the-door price was the lowest of every dealer I contacted -- including the largest one. While I haven't yet had the vehicle serviced (it has only 1200 gasoline free miles on it), the service department silenced the annoying back-up beep courteously and quickly.
None
The Dog Lounge was so warm and inviting and really enjoyed my experience. Jennifer - the owner - was extremely knowledgable and very courteous. I would highly recommend a visit in the near future.
A Turkish friend took me here and we had brilliant food - the meat was really succulent and everything was really fresh tasting. It would be great if you felt like something healthy because many of dishes are vegetable-heavy and grilled or prepared lightly. No skimping on flavours though. The mixed grill was a highlight. And try the Turkish white wine - surprisingly great!
This is one of my favorite subways in missoula because they always make the best sandwiches and It has the best dinning area.
el mejor club aguante el lobo!!! I=GyE=I (GyE) El grande de entre rios!
Very helpful! Had a bunch of young guys working the locksmith counter but they all seemed well trained and courteous. I would recommend them as they were able to cut a very unusual key type I had (barrel key).
it's awesome
I' ve been with them since 2005 and they are great .Especially when an Apple Valley firm keeps trying to garnish exempt wages on an account that I've never had.
My first experience at The Lane Spa was through a gift certificate from a group of friends for my birthday. I had a 60 deep tissue massage, I can't remember her name but it was really great. The atmosphere and staff working there was perfect! I've been to many day spas, vegas, Los Angeles, Toronto and in the Caribbean and The Lane Spa is up there in my favorites. Since my first experience I have been back for many massages, facials, and most recently began getting my hair treatments at their salon with John ( who is fantastic ). I enjoy my time there and feel like i've stepped away for a little slice of heaven in my own backyard. See you soon!
None
Good job. Keep it up.
Adam Griffee was great at finding a house for my family. I felt like he worked just as hard for me as he would anyone else even though I was not going to be even close to a "big spender." At times we were helped by others in the company and I felt the same kind of care from them as well. I'll recommend them to anyone.
My friend Carol recommended this. I visited Last month (around the middle of November 2013) and loved the service. The restaurant was moderately busy on a week night, and the cold outside was quickly countered with hot tea and friendly service. The food was great. I'm not a big fan of Chinese cookies (they are bland for cleaning the breath and palate), but the Spicy Kung Pao Chicken was great. It was also a large enough serving to enjoy 3 meals. I dined alone so this was a fantastic plus. I also saw one couple sharing an entrée. Other couples throughout did presumably the same as I did; taking home extra for lunch or dinner. I was frequently checked on during my short visit, and the staff was quick to accommodate my needs. I appreciate Carol's recommendation and will gladly share it with anyone interested. PLEASE NOTE: This is not your typical Chinese buffet type restaurant. If they do offer a buffet, it is at scheduled times and I am positive the buffet service would be equally satisfying.
I just barely bought my first Harley from GoldenSpike. Fantastic group of people. I wasn't just a sale I was treated like "Family". Introduced me around to the parts team, sales team and service. Not one time was I treated like this when I owned my previous bike. Cannot say enough good about the entire team there. Paige was amazing to work with on the purchase... Low key and no Pressure and I appreciated that. I have and will recommend GoldenSpike to my friends.
Todd, Rhonda, and her crew are amazing! Work hard and fast and go above and beyond taking care of someone's moving/packing needs! Trustworthy and dependable, which is what you need when dealing with a stressful move!
Kenny's is a really fun place with great food, but you have to like the noise level amp'ed up a little. I went last night and really enjoyed the blue cheese bacon burger. Cooked to perfection and just a really good flavor. I am sorry I ordered the stuffed jalapeno's and not the cheese fries. But that is why they make weekends. Hope you enjoy the food.
My experience with William Waldner was more than excellent - it was fantastic! From my first consultation meeting to the actual hearing, he always made me feel at ease and gave me all the information and tools I needed to feel 100% confident that my case would be a slam dunk. He was attentive and had genuine interest and concern for my individual case, while at the same time managed to be efficient and respond to my questions and concerns very quickly. All of this being said and after much research into other attorneys, his fee was very reasonable. With William's help, I can now focus on my future and I am on track to achieve financial freedom.
None
I can admit, I was the annoying costumer that had to keep rescheduling my appointment. But the ENTIRE time they were patient and very understanding. One of the better shops i've been to. I am VERY satisfied with my tattoo!
If you have kinky frizzy hair like me, ask for Charlene, she spends quality time on your hair and leaves it super straight. She is awesome. My hair was silky straight for a whole week!!
None
Desde Julio de 1993, Metro de Maracaibo viene desarrollando la obra de dicho sistema de transporte, con arreglo a la programación de sus actividades. El anteproyecto de la Ingeniería Básica de la Línea 1 del Sistema de Transporte Masivo para Maracaibo (STMM) y su viabilidad económica y financiera, fue concluido en 1.995. Desde ese mismo año, la empresa ha desarrollado a cabalidad el proyecto como tal, el cual fue creado fundamentalmente para la construcción e instalación de las obras y equipo para la promoción, diseño, mantenimiento e instalaciones de super estructura, operación, administración y explotación del sistema. A partir de 1.996, Metro de Maracaibo, una vez realizadas la definición de los métodos constructivos a aplicar en la Línea y la adecuación del proyecto a los nuevos escenarios económicos del país, inicia el proyecto de la ingeniería de detalle. El 22 de marzo del año 2.004 se comienza la ejecución de las obras civiles de la Línea 1 del Metro de Maracaibo, con la construcción de una trinchera cerrada para dar paso al Metro, a lo largo de 6.5 Km. de vía férrea. Ésta parte desde Patio y Talleres hasta el sector Las Playitas, en el área central de la ciudad.
Delightful each time we go. They have a small, perfected menu along with a great local beer selection. The servers are well-informed if we have questions, and they do not disrupt your meal every ten minutes to "check-in," which is always pleasant. Overall, a great place.
Gifford is a great individual who cares about his customers and the service he provides. I highly recommend Triple Cross Towing when you need 'em!
The waitresses are stupid, other then that great place
Very professional and courteous would recommend to all my friends same day service if I have to rate on a scale from 1 to 10 I give him 10
Super fast and excellent service! It was a pleasure bringing the car in for service.
The thing that I love the most about Jennifer Fisher Essential products is they are all good for you using natural ingredients. I love that there are no testing on animals and that I can pronounce each and every ingredient on her listing. Jennifer is such a pleasure to deal with -- always bright, optimistic and a smile on her face. What's not to love about Jennifer's line and service!! I highly recommend her products and service to anyone who wants to improve their skin care regime.
My favorite restaurant in Atlanta! I'm (very) slowly working my way through the menu, since I typically crave the delicious Signature Sea Bass. Still love that they took my suggestion to heart and offer the vegetarian strawberry creme cake. Great food, great service - WIN!
I am the third person from my family to have passed my driving test with Utah. I would recommend anyone that is looking to pass the driving test to contact elliottss chool of motoring. Utah is a really good teacher, he was encouraging and determent to get me to pass. As someone that did not even dream about ever driving a car he boosted my confidence and made me feel comfortable behind the wheel.
i go to this school!!!!!
None
I first went here because I did not have insurance and these guys had the best prices. Shortly after I got insurance again, but have been coming here for years - prices aside, they simply do a good job. Doesn't hurt much during and not at all after, the doctor (I've been seeing Dr. Igor) cares about you, and takes the time to explain what's happening. He actually drew me a diagram of what a root canal procedure actually involves when I asked him about it - not many docs will do that! Would recommend.
This place was so much fun! My friends and I had a blast! The atmosphere is closer to a club or bar than a driving range. A great alternative to bowling, movies, clubbing, or a bar.
I have always appreciated the doctors at Seville Eye Center, and went to their Chandler office before they opened the Gilbert location. They are a friendly, knowledgeable group with a caring and efficient staff. They make you feel welcome, explain the procedures, and the results of your exam. I recommend them highly.
None
Impartí una formación en el hotel y me pareció muy confortable y acogedor. Es el típico hotel familiar que te hace sentir como en casa. El personal es muy amable. Wifi por todas partes, lo cual es un plus!
None
None
I love this hotel
Nice shop
Even for a party of 16, the food arrived promptly and was fantastic. I tend to eat large meals and wasn't disappointed with the portion size. 3 courses and two drinks came to around £30, but you could eat here for under half that if you didn't pig out! I'll definitely be coming back.
Best gym ever! climb here now.
None
fantastic staff!! Clean, quiet office as well.
There is much to love about this establishment. We ventured into this place because we wanted to try the newest brewery in town. The beer was fantastic and the food was really good too. Best part is that we never had to wait for a table. When my family was in town they kept asking if we could go back to Brew and drink Fiona's (coffee stout). I would recommend Brew Pub to anybody.
Ms. Julie Moore # 449 helped me a lot by solving my initial problem of looking the right brand of tire my HondaCRV has - Continental all over Muskegon,Michigan - the next day my tire replacement problem was solved after bringing my car just less than 30 mins. The mechanic was Zeller Anthony # 439. Good job by both. She is nice and so professional and knows how to solve customers' inquiries. I am recommending her upward promotion in your Honda business. She is an asset. Thank you. Respectfully, Bernie C. (Ret.) from Chicago, Illinois
None
We sat at the bar. Eric took awesome care of us. Older clientele which made me feel at home. Will be back.
Qcon SP
None
Best value for foreign travelers. Good atmosphere all around.
None
I love playing on this Course. It is beautiful and challenges even the mst professional golfers. I look forward to playing every year!
They have a new FULL BAR!
“Couldn't have asked for a better sales experience!”
Ira couldn't have made leasing my wife's new Lexus RX350 any easier. Initially I worked numbers on the phone with Joe who was very pleasant and then we went in the next day to test drive the vehicle and Danielle helped us (Weds is Joe's day off) Danielle was terrific and my wife felt at ease with her which was great because she hates buying cars. Needless to say she loved the RX350 and we arranged for a 11:30am Friday delivery. On Friday we arrived early and we were greeted bye Nigel the General Sales Manager who was responsible for putting together and honoring all the numbers sight unseen on our trade, he is very nice and runs a gorgeous store. This was a no nonsense car buying experience just a straight forward honest transaction. Bob the F&I manager was also terrific he didn't try to shove a warranty or paint sealant down our throats but explained the benefits of both, a true professional. Delivery was prompt and before we new it we were off enjoying the Lexus. I will be looking to in the very near future to switching around a few other cars and being a BMW guy would have never considered Lexus until now. Thank you IRA for an excellent experience Sincerely, Craig & Maria Johnson
Great service, amazing prices and very personable... I highly recommend their services.
I hired Big Sky for over night visits to care for my two Labrador Retriever.s Ken was terrific and the dogs loved him. All of my instructions were followed and the house looked just as it was when I left. I couldn't be happier. I'd recommend Ken and Big Sky to any of my friends.
These guys have moved me twice here in Austin and each time the experience has been AMAZING! My folks used them as well and had a great experience. If you are moving and don't want to do all the work yourself I absolutely recommend this group. THANKS VOSCO MOVING!
Working with Ed and Paul has been a wonderful experience. It was great dealing with professionals that truly understand their business and listened to us when we had questions or concerns. I would definitely recommend using Integrated Home Systems to anyone automating their home or building a home theater.
Before I chose a storage rental location, I looked at a lot of facilities. This Extra Space location is the best, in my opinion. The hours are very convenient, the prices are competitive, and the staff is helpful.
Awesome Dj and a great all around guy! Has become a great friend in the process! Got the party started and kept it going all night! helped keep this scattered bride on the time table i wanted! Great time had by all! Have even used Lance for Holiday parties for my work as well!
Game On has the best prices for your dollar and the most diverse selection that one can expect from an independently owned video game store. Game On is by far Pickeringtons best video game store serving the community since 1999.
Old school style park with great family feel backed up with great rides and fun concessions. Affordable and a good fit for families with both small kids and teens. We had a blast.
Hands down the best burger in NYC. The meat choices are beyond the basic beef with choices like elk, ostrich, bison, and on occasion boar. Pair any burger with the onion ring platter and a beer and enjoy the night.
Mr. Shah and staff at US Photo at 125 S. Clark are very efficient and have outstanding customer service. Because I work in non-profit we require FBI fingerprint background checks so they have received our repeated business. They offer Livescan fingerprint and take Passport Photos and do so with so much enthusiasm. Mr. Shah is awesome (not just saying that) he gets you In and Out. We certainly will continue to use their services.
Great place to be!
I eat at Elmo's once a week because I work down the street. I call ahead for my lunch pick up and it's ready within 20 minutes. The staff is always nice and I usually only need to spend a few minutes inside picking up my order. When I took my girlfriend there for her fist time for a romantic dinner, she absolutely loved the food and she wants me to take her back there. Great place for seafood or burgers
Mobile Shooting Center is the best in town, and for a long distance outside of town. Their prices are consistently lower than anyone else nearly 100% of the time (on firearms), their staff are very helpful, and know a great deal, and they are the nicest folks you'd every want to meet. One anonymous poster here talked about buying a "new" firearm, and it was 2 years old... Well, you can also go to a car dealer and get last year's car. Still new. I would imagine that person got an excellent deal. These people are not dishonest in any way. I have never - ever - had any issues with them. They have always stood behind everything I ever got from them, and they even help me with items I got before I knew about them. They even helped me fix a gun that I broke (and I mean _I_ broke it, through my own stupidity), and they didn't charge me anything other than their hard costs. (Shipping to the OEM.) I have bought at least 1/2 dozen firearms from them in the last few years, and they are 100% on all of them.
I have been going to this group since I moved to Memphis 27 years ago. I have followed them through 3 or 4 different office moves and will continue to do so. It is a family not a sterile office environment. They care about their patients and I have a specific family doctor but have NO problem going to anyone on the staff if my doctor is not available. I actually had to go in today without an appointment because I had an attack of some sort at work and was told to go to my doctor immediately. I just walked in and they worked me in within 30 minutes and took such good care of me. They have the best Nurse practioners in the entire city. I am just as comfortable with them as I am with my own doctor. Sometimes I actually prefer them. LOL There are many offices located all over Memphis so no matter what area you live in, you can find an office. KUDOS TO THE WOODALLS FOR MAKING SURE THAT THEY HAVE A CARING AND CAPABLE STAFF FOR US!!
השירות ואיכות של אקווה נט - מהטובים שקיבלתי!
Works all time.. smoothly
Great vibe, great location, friendly and knowledgeable service, delicious tea and pastries. Highly recommend.
Pizza to die for.
I used Attorney Wise for three different closings on my personal home and investment properties. He did a great job, particularly since two of the closing happened simultaneously and it was quite confusing as three loans had to be paid to make it all work. Well, all I can say is that everything went off without a hitch. Robert was very accommodating and even came to my office and worked around my schedule for both closings. His attention to detail is flawless, all the paperwork was to perfection, I received every penny I was due to me, including excess taxes, fees and so on and so forth. Quite to my surprise, Mr. Wise even sent a $75 refund several months later when the bank filed the release and his office didn't have to do it. During all my years in real estate, I've never seen a real estate attorney perform at this level of integrity and follow through. I will be using Mr Wise for all my future real estate closings.
"Irish Band" the Irish Band are fantastic and brilliant performers! I was there in Sloane Square when they were performing and entertained many people passing by. They probably sound a lot clearer without the traffic noise behind them in pubs clubs and other venues. Eclectic songs sung to capture the mood and feeling of the moment. Definitely worth going out to see and enjoying the experience…
The yogurt is amazing!! The cashier there was nice and sweet. He had the same name as the yogurt place. I thought he owned it lol. But that boy provided the best customer care ever. Besides that, the place is clean, the bathrooms are spotless, and the atmosphere is family friendly. I RECOMMEND IT TO ALL!!!!!!!!!!! :-D
The staff at Alicia Pet Care center are very compassionate and caring. They understand that our pets are our family and have been most helpful with providing care for our 2 cats as well as giving excellent care and guidance for our mature 14 years plus - senior dog.
Great place for steak. This is a typical Great MT bar/steak house.
Breakfast is the bomb.
I have been at Central Christian for quite a while now, and have always loved it. Sure, there might be drama, but that's at every school. All of the teachers are excellent! I have enjoyed different things about each of them. I especially enjoy the fall and spring retreats that the junior and senior high go on every year. Also, the chapel speakers are always great. I have made so many memories that will last a lifetime. I would highly recommend this school.
None
great airport. very fast to get through
Plumber came out quickly and worked late into the night three nights in a row for our emergency sewer situation. He even hired more plumbers to come out and help dig in our backyard. Abba Disc0unt Plumbing and Water Heaters gave me a really good discount and even pulled out my dishwasher after having worked all day to install a new sewer system. I'm so relieved they came out and fixed our caved in sewer line so quickly. I'd definitely use them again!
This morning when I got in my car I noticed a "check left side brake light" warning. Fortunately I was already on my way to North Scottsdale and I stopped in Porsche North Scottsdale at ~8:30 and was greeted by Service Consultant Jeremy Neujahr. I told Jeremy what was going on and he had my car checked in just a couple minutes. Within an hour Jeremy gave me a call to let me know my car was ready and it had also been washed. I was totally surprised when Jeremy told me they had just charged me for the bulb with no labor making my total $7.50. Thanks to GM Dave Zoloto and his team for taking great care of me and my car. Very impressive indeed.
None
Cerritos was the 3rd Hyundai dealership I visited, looking for a new Genesis. The first 2 dealerships, South Bay and Harbor, did not seem interested in selling me a car. One didn't even have a salesperson come out and greet me. I had to go to reception and ask for a salesperson. And the last one was not interested in negotiating with me, and allowed me to leave after talking with me for a matter of minutes. Maybe they didn't feel I was interested. Cerritos Hyundai had excellent service. Although our salesperson was rather new there, only 16 days in, he was very nice. I would say it helped him a lot that he didn't have to try to sell me the car, as I came with the intent of buying. On the other hand, David the Sales Manager was there trying to sell a car. He was more than willing to negotiate with me on my trade in (gave me higher than KBB Fair!!!) and give me the price I was looking for. Was there a little pressure to buy yesterday? Sure, that's their job... But they gave me my space and allowed me to return the next day with my wife, so she could test drive the car. They left us alone to talk after the test drive and then we were in and out of finance in less than 5 minutes! UNHEARD OF! I would definitely recommend Cerritos Hyundai to any prospective buyers. I would definitely look for David if you are looking to trade in a car. As for the dealership, bathrooms were very clean and the showroom was well kept. I would recommend a small popcorn machine for the kiddies!
I had a great experience yesterday! After going to another Chrysler Jeep Dodge dealership that is closer to my residence for the last year and received average to below average service, I'm glad i made my way back. The waiting room was spacious, clean and kid friendly. I didn't feel rushed or forgotten. I will be coming back for all future service visits!
Since kid
Freshly Rennovated. Everything was clean, up to date, and modern. Free breakfast and friendly staff. Everything was to my satisfaction. I would definitely stay here again
Ich bin mit der Leistung zufrieden! Die Erreichbarkeit und die Beratung waren gut. Ich gehe davon aus, dass ich auch das zur Zeit beste Angebot erhalten habe. Vielen Dank!!
Am basically from wayanad... and I know the present situation of other hotels in mananthavady. .. so usually I give first preference for indian coffee house... Thanks.
None
Helpful people, but being closed on Sundays makes no business sense to me. Weekends are the mother of Spring projects, and being closed on Sundays has forced me to go elsewhere more then once.
Prisli jsme do narvane restaurace a otevreli nam salonek. Obsluha prijemna, prevelky vyber jidel, ceny v pohode, wifi, predkrm zdarma, jidlo docela rychle hotove, berou stravenky ... absolutni spokojenost.
Lovely tapas. Great prices. Very tasty beers
You get a lot of food for your money! Many things on the menu you can request different levels of spicy. We like our spicy food! General Tso Chicken is my favorite!! Lunch time is the cheapest time to go. Meals come with choice of Egg Flower soup or Sweet and Sour. The decor is like stepping back in to 1975 but the food is worth it! Waitresses, not the best, but again for the food it's worth it!
The pizzas are wonderful. Friendly happy people with GREAT reasonably priced food.
Awesome training institute and faculty also. They are really provide you live training projects and also provide you job guaranted. Now, I am a senior php developer by the help of this institute. Thanks sir.
Great gym for the athlete or average person looking to get stronger, faster, and fitter. Their gym equipment is top of the line and well curated by the coaches. Speaking of the coaches, all of them are extremely friendly and a wealth of knowledge. I highly recommend this facility.
Delicious ice cream and atmosphere! !!
None
We LOVE going to Adventure Dental. The kids love the friendly atmosphere and we are always so pleased with the service and how much they really try to make each visit a positive experience for the kids!
Been there dozens of times and will be back again. They do it right every time.
Super lecker und vom Preis mehr als in Ordnung! Hatten Nudeln + Pizza + Pizzabrötchen! Einfach super! Gerne wieder!!
None
Excelente trato y calidad
Jason was a huge help when I got into my accident. A man ran a stop sign and put a big dent in the rear corner panel of my car. I work 50 hours a week so I had very little time to deal with this set back. Jason took care of all the logistics with the insurance company and took over so I didn't have to deal with them at all I would highly recommend mirror image to anyone looking for quality repairs / service
We always get great service and food!
I've rented a car from them 3 times already.. So far no complaints; car is clean, service has been great, no pushy sales (for extra). In all, there is a good reason I keep coming back. oh! and price is good.
He has the best deals and does not rip you off! I recommend him to everyone my buddy drove from Indio to have all four tire installed in his ride. I pass out his business cards every chance I get. It is kinda hidden though.
Lisgar garden in full bloom!! absolutely beautiful and tranquil. Must see it this winter!
Nothing but good things to say about them. Friendly and helpful. Would absolutely recommend for anyone in the area looking for some storage!
One of the best restaurant I've ever been.
Thank You Cindy for making our meal an enjoyable and a entertaining one. Hope you will be feeling better soon.
None
Surprisingly delicious homemade food for extremely reasonable price. If you're looking for a large selection of homemade vegtables, fresh fish, Chicken Fried Steak, Chicken and Dumplings, etc even a homemade dessert, you may want to give this restaurant a try. All you can eat buffet for $7.95 including dessert. As far as service, our waitress was #4, always kept sweet tea refills coming and with her 34 years experience, I can see why she's one of the best. We'll definitely be back! However, next time I'll try not to eat everything on the buffet. Time for a much needed run. :)
Great experience. Was able to quickly get an appointment. Tech was professional and did a great job on my eyebrows. European Wax Center was so clean and the prices were very reasonable. I'll never be able to go back to the old way. I look forward to returning for additional treatments.
Love this place the food is great and the serviers are really nice.
Titans Gym is awesome, they've actually recently relocated to the old Salvation Army building on Church st and it's even better than before. There's loads of new equipment as well as free weights, there are also some massive tyres outside the front of the building to practice your tyre flipping and show off! Tim is a great bloke and really helpful, and he offers pay as you go membership which is much better than the long subscriptions and contracts that other gyms try and rip you off with. Best gym in Blackpool!
The food was amazing, the service was great and everything was done exactly how I ordered it. Definitely going again!
We had tried a number of personal tutors and tutoring centers over the years and were never terribly impressed with the results. It was my daughter who came across C2 Education in Paramus during her sophomore year of high school. The initial intent was to use C2 to prepare her for her SATs. From our first meeting with the center’s Director, we were impressed with C2’s approach of tailoring the study program to the student’s needs, matching student and tutor based on compatibility as well as the breadth of expertise available. We quickly realized that C2 Education offered much more than just SAT preparation. We began to see results almost immediately. My daughter quickly transitioned from a mediocre to an outstanding student. After seeing the results in my daughter, we decided to move her younger brother from “another” education center to C2 with similar results. My daughter is now successfully enjoying college and my son continues to improve as a sophomore in high school. We highly recommend C2 Education in Paramus. The results speak for themselves!
I have nothing bad to say about Southern Dutchess Eye Care. The staff is kind, friendly, and always smiling. This includes everyone, doctors, opticians, and administrative. They are very courteous and have never been rude. They treat every patient like they were a VIP. I love their ultra-modern, state-of-the-art equipment. It helps them get the job done right the first time. They have yet to mess up a pair of glasses, where other eye care facilities could never get my lenses the first time. They have a huge selection of frames, and not junk. They go out of their way to make you feel comfortable and welcome. I never feel ill at-ease there. Not many people would drive 40 miles to go to a doctor, well my family and I do. It's worth the trip!
None
Having worked behind the scenes here for a good few years, I still make a point of returning as a customer. The programme offers amazing variation on the usual blockbuster business, I miss my films comps greatly. Everything is as it should be in the filmhouse. The business strives to succeed artistically and is balanced with a huge and very powerful social and environmental conscience, add to that delicious food lovingly prepared on-site and it is little wonder that the filmhouse is perennially busy and successful.
A warm friendly atmosphere. Great traditional Italian food. Great value! It's a must stop for me every time I make it to Buffalo. Please open an Ilios in California!
I have used Active Body to address chronic back pain and training-induced hip pain. In both instances, they made quick, correct diagnoses, and resolved the pain quickly, just as they said they would. The doctors and the staff are tremendous. While I do not look forward to training injuries, I do look forward to having a reason to visit Active Body.
Omg. From Tyler, TX and have found the best donuts ever! Glazed chocolate cake donut was my favorite!! :)
Home Comfort Care in Phoenix is a great Co. they are proffessional, reliable and most important friendly. You can get the small town feel while living in the big city! Pay attention to their ads they run great specials on housecleaning.
Great everything. Drink and enjoy.
None
None
I work in Biltmore Park and always have yummy meals from BT's! Surprisingly, though, what puts them over the top is the customer service. I was in a hurry on my way out one day and accidentally spilled my fries. One of the girls that was working saw me do it and got me a to-go box with extra fries. Then today I went over to get a chicken sandwich and almost left because the line was so long and I only have a half hour lunch break. The manager caught me leaving and said "The line moves fast, don't worry..." I told him that unfortunately I only had a half hour lunch and I didn't think I had time to wait, so he went behind the desk and put my order in. I got to enjoy my meal and had 10 mins left over to relax before having to go back to work. They take care of there locals! :)
Wonderful fall stay in Dubai. The Park Hyatt's grounds, facilities, rooms and service were top notch. I plan to visit again soon. I loved the spa suite!
AWESOME!!!!!! Great job, Great customer service, friendly, cost efficient and reasonable turnaround time. I received 4 quotes to repair my car and these guys beat them all and did an EXCELLENT job. I received my car back same day. Couldn't be happier. By the way this was my first time using their service. I would give them 4 thumbs up but I only have 2 so.... :) :)
free breakfast every morning cooked to order. i had like 20 pieces of bacon every morning for the last week. free apples oranges. staff were nice. don't really care if they aren't im not there for them. free cocktail hour everyday 530-730. beer. some liquor. mixed drinks. they have small snacks like trail mix and salsa and chips. i drank everyday for the whole week i was there with my buddies. dennis is the guy that works behind the bar hes a great guy. im not sure what this lady is talking about the valet damaged her car? valet is $16 a day. on weekends you might as well use the parking meters b/c they are free. i used the valet and shuttle service for a week. july 211-july 27th 2013. they took us everywhere we wanted to go. casinos. restaurants bars. all for free. the only negative thing i could say was the housekeeping. they threw away my contacts for my eyes for some reason? i had them in the case. but thats not a reflection on the hotel itself really. the atrium is amazing. flowing water with coy fish surrounds and emcompasses the whole place. $3 vending machine drinks. kinda expensive. breakfast was great. i think i gained 15 lbs. cereal. pastries. eggs. sausage. coffee. juice. rooms were nice. beds were extremely comfortable. pillows were amazing. coffee makers and mini fridges in each room. well lit rooms. good air conditioners and heat. 3 elevators. at night time you don't really stay inside the hotel unless your older. the old market is outside the front door. conagra park is next door. durham muesem is 5 min away. free newspaper. local usa today ny times free coffee. great atmosphere. i was there for a work conference for a week. pool. sauna. small fitness room not worth it unless you like treadmills and dumbells. no machine weights to speak of. 4.5 stars no question about it. loved cocktail hour. nice staff. friendly staff. helpful staff.
great Walmart it has variety of products and good deals
It was only okay at best. The stay was fine & the sheets seemed clean. It is close to the airport.
Excellent meal. Nice staff.
Awesome workmanship! Competitive pricing! Great people to work with!
Our experience with Hamstra has continued to be a joy for over 22 years, and recently when we had to replace our old system, the experience was just as excellent as it always has been! Everyone from our first contact (Randy McDonnell) to the last worker finishing the project, were professional, efficient, and knowledgable, as well as fun to be around! They made getting a new funace/AC a very quick and painless experience, and we would recommend them to everyone! Thank you for keeping us warm this winter!
Dr. Pieh and his staff are very professional. They make everyone feel comfortable as soon as you walk through the door. He makes sure each and every patient gets optimal one on one care every visit. I would recommend anyone to come here for his/her treatment, for you will get excellent and fast results. He also offers massage therapy, which by the way, Nuthera has the best massage therapist. She can find just the right spots to give you instant relief and relaxation. This clinic is truly a blessing.
My first experience with Stonewater was a much needed brow wax. I had been working 70-80 weeks and didn't have time to keep them well maintained. I couldn't find a single salon that would fit me in with almost no notice. When I called Stonewater, Daryl worked hard to get me in that morning. Before I arrived I was concerned I would be rushed through and they wouldn't take the time to find out what I wanted. I was wrong. Alicia found out exactly what I wanted and took the time to do it right. I scheduled another appointment with Alicia to do my hair just two weeks later. When I returned I again felt relaxed, and was able to get exactly what I wanted out of it. Alicia made my hair look AMAZING. I have never loved my hair. It has been unmanageable, heavy, frizzy, and sad for quite some time. Alicia give me a new style, and found a way to make it look sleek, light, and beautiful (even when I am at home). I will be returning. Their prices are in line with other salons and spas in the area and their service is incredible.
I have attended Digital Vidya training, there course curriculum is awesome, trainers are really good with in depth knowledge about Digital Marketing. I have compared Digital Marketing courses in Delhi and found Digital vidya is far better than any one else, the best part of the training was 'online' learning. It was so easy for me to attend the classes without any problem. After completing my training, I got a full time assistance from there team member's. Thank you Digital Vidya for such a great learning experience!! you guys rockssss!!!! Regards,
I used Apollo Plumbing several times over the years and Dan Barger has become my trusted professional for my plumbing needs. I used him to install a new water heater in my office and once to fix a small leak I had due to freezing in my barn. The real test however was this last year and the entire reason I signed up for AL. Superbowl Sunday morning my neighbor and I (who share a well) wake up to no water. We check up by the pump house and for some reason it is broken and leaking all over. It is superbowl Sunday for crying out loud!!!! I called Dan knowing there was no way that he would be able or willing to come out. He was there within about an hour, spent hours in the mud chasing down the leak and fixed it. He definately missed the game and I did not. I have referred him to several friends and family members who also have had good experiences.
Skvelé jedlo za výbornú cenu. Výborný salaš v okolí Bratislavy, navyše sa deti potešia domácim zvieratám. Odporúčam.
I have went to a local Gamestop today. They had the Wii U on display. I played Rayman Legends for a few minutes. It was hard to put the controller down. It was so much fun. I could have played for hours. Thank you Nintendo. You are awesome. I have a suggestion for the Wii U. Please make it have a big sale during the Christmas holidays. It would be good for a lot of families. Thank you for putting the Wii U on display for Gamestop. Please put the real box art of games to Gamestop soon. Thank you for being so awesome.
None
Generally a lovely place to eat. The food was delicious - the best restaurant food I've had in a while. The atmosphere was cosy and welcoming, with clearly well maintained facilities. The staff were friendly and attentive – there was only one error with our order, which they were very quick to correct. I definitely recommend giving this restaurant a visit. I will be returning!
I am a regular at the Pour House, especially for their Jazz/Fusion shows. Adam has his finger on the pulse of the hottest, coolest musical acts and brings them to the the Pour House from all over the world. The recent Hiatus Kaiyote (Australia) and Snarky Puppy (Brooklyn) shows are great examples of bringing cool to the area! The venue itself has a great deal of character and back alley ambiance, a characteristic that is becoming a rarer commodity in downtown
Surpreendente! A qualidade e inovação são as características diferenciais do restaurante.
Endlich...die immer weniger werdenen Haare liegen wieder perfekt! Ich hab mich sehr wohl gefühlt und Dieter als erfreulich positiven Gastgeber erleben dürfen. Vielen Dank. Bis zum nächsten mal.
I stopped in Barb's bakery this morning because I couldn't find anything except McDonalds or gas stations, and I refuse to continue buying CEOs new cars and vacation homes. I was greeted warmly by a young woman (who was not Barb; she passed away some time ago), and she helped me decide on a cheese danish. Oh My God. Amazing. I hope the people of Phoenix realize what a gem this bakery is, and decide to give their business to this beacon of quality, customer service, and damn fine pastries. Thanks Barb!
We used Azul for our engagement and wedding photos and we can't rave enough about how fabulous Christobal and his crew were! For our engagement shoot, he made the whole process very fun and the pictures came out great! But I must say, our wedding pictures were even more incredible! Christobal and his assistant, April, did an absolutely amazing job capturing every detail of our special day! Not only that, but they were very easy going, professional and FUN .. they really added to the excitement during what could be a very stressful time! I love re-living the big day by looking through our photos, and I know we will cherish these for a lifetime to come! My hubby and I would absolutely recommend Azul to any couple who is looking for the perfect wedding photographer, or for any other special event in your life. You won't regret it! :-)
These guys do very precise work, and they will deliver the goods with no headache. Unparalleled quality in the Richmond, VA area for CNC turning, milling, and EDM work. Always my choice for difficult to machine and multi-step processing
The service provided on my old 2006 Avalon was great. I recently purchased the 2013 Avalon and the service department has already scheduled my next appointment. Thank you for your continued great customer service. --Posted as a service per authority of the business, review written by customer.
None
Honest work done well. I will never use anyone else!
Great hotel, great price, hey its Bakersfield what do you expect?? The breakfast is not free, but this is something I have seen at other Holiday Inns in downtown San Francisco and Washington DC. Food was good and price was reasonable. Pool wasn't 80 degrees, but it was hotter than the surface of the sun outside and the pool was quite refreshing.
A perfect quiet get-away. Great beach, great location. We loved it. Kiawah Island Vacation Rental provided a no hassle solution for our last minute booking. We'll definitely do it again.
Some places make you feel at home and Nola's Lounge is one of them. Awesome staff, tasty drinks, and a fun atmosphere!
I have only dealt with Magnum Collision Repair Center once and I will go no where else from this point on. The moment I walked into the door I was treated with excellent customer service and the all mighty updated communication. I was kept informed on a weekly basis as their craftsmen repaired our BMW. They treated me as I would have wanted. Their work is second to none. Body work and painting is perfect. Under the hood is perfect. Price is competitive. Much like great food or great wine you get what you pay for. Magnum is where to go for any and all your automobile body repairs regardless of how major or minor the requirement is. Our contact was James and he was great. Thank you
My recent experience with Service King at this location was excellent. The staff were so courteous and professional that I had to check for spotlights to make sure I wasn't on the set of some nostalgic movie about what the 1950s were supposedly like. Everyone I dealt with here seemed to know what they were doing, and everyone made an effort to make sure I understood the whole process and was kept in the loop. My car looks good as new, there was no hassle involving my insurance, and I would definitely come back here if I ever needed another repair.
The whole experience with Chino Hills Ford was and is friendly and easy. From the time we spent on the website (easy webpage navigation), the drive up from San Diego, to looking at and test driving the model we planned to purchase and Neils knowledge of the Certified Pre-Owned 2013 Taurus Limited is impressive. Assistance with anything the car needed was a snap. Sync info along with media technology is at our finger tips. Thank you Neil and all the others involved with our vehicle and us.
None
Bryce and Brennan Great Job! Very happy with my service again! I will definitely bring my ATV here again and recommend them to my friends. This is a very professional dealership. --Posted as a service per authority of the business, review written by customer.
None
Great Service. Competitive Prices. Exceptional Advice. Worth the drive to West Kelowna. Highly Recommended.
This was a great time for the entire family. I recommend Will as your guide.
Great atmosphere with a lodge cabin decor' inside, very spacious. The food was delicious the drinks were great. I ordered the steak with mac n cheese (awesome). My spouse & friend had the shrimp dinner and enjoyed it. I even brought my nephew (7yrs old) his dinner came with ice cream. The waitress was very polite and attentive. August 23rd 2013
I got into motorcycle riding about 6 months ago and was looking for an affordable used bike to get started on. By sheer chance, my wife suggested I drop by there. Their prices are very reasonable and their selection of quality used bikes are the best around, especially for the size of their shop. Gear prices are good considering they're a local dealership and their service is also great. Buying was a breeze and I felt no pressure whatsoever. I'm very impressed
My experience at Baker was exciting. I leased my first truck from them and couldn't be more pleased with how I was treated and the cooperation of the sales team. They keep a number of cars and trucks on the lot in a variety of trims that really helped me envision what I was really looking for. I would recommend anyone to check out Baker before anyone else in Charleston. I look forward to a great few years in my new car and plan on returning once my lease is up.
Great to work with. Purchase was made easy.
None
Excellent review for these guys. Went above and beyond with customer service. They detailed my new car to concours quality too. Perfect car and great experience.
SUBHANALLAH.....
None
Just go there. The fact that it's organic and all that is just a benefit to how well made it is.
I was dreading having to go to a car dealer after previous experiences but I needed something reliable, safe and affordable to drive. After talking with Gary Kazda, taking the Passat and Jetta for a test drive and working with all of the helpful, friendly people at Inver Grove Volkswagen I felt assured and comfortable with my buying decision. This was my first lease so Gary took the time to explain how a lease works by breaking down how many miles I could use on average and estimating how many miles I typically drive. He also compared the fuel efficiency of the VW models I test drove to the gas guzzler I was currently driving, showing me the money I'd be saving in fuel alone. That, a smooth financing experience and thorough explanation of all of the features of the Passat and Jetta by Gary, convinced me that I wanted to do business with Inver Grove Volkswagen now and in the future. Thank you Gary, Angela and everyone else for your help.
Great gathering place.
This place is all about value for your money. Sure you could get a more expensive room somewhere but these rooms are very nice, clean, well taken care of, the staff is great, they have free wifi, and they offer a lot for the price.
On Tuesday, June 18th, 2013, I was on my way back from Huntsville, AL, to my home in Virginia in an attempt to bring my parents' truck in advance of their official move back to Virginia. On the highway as I was traveling through Knoxville, TN, the check engine light started to flash on the dashboard and the truck's engine began to show signs of considerable misfiring. I immediately had to pull over at the next exit. After a short Internet search on my phone, I found this repair center and was able to drive the truck. In no time, the manager, Calvin Esau, looked at my engine, hooked up the diagnostic tool, and was able to confirm the misfiring of my cylinders. He then proceeded to move the vehicle into the shop and the mechanic quickly determined that there was a problem with my distributor cap and rotor. Within minutes, Mr. Esau was on the phone with a local parts dealer and was able to get them to deliver the parts that I needed for my vehicle. In only 15-20 minutes since I arrived at the center, the truck was fixed and I was able to return to my highway travel back to Virginia with no more engine problems. I was truly impressed with the professionalism and honesty that Mr. Esau and his crew showed me. He could have easily taken advantage of me by giving me additional charges that were unnecessary especially considering I was caught in a bind, but yet he treated me with class and respect. I would highly recommend this center to anyone who is in need of car repair whether it is a transmission or general engine repair. They will treat you right. Thank you Calvin and Speedy Transmission!
Double Diamond has been a great gym. Super facilities. I make use of the cardio machines and SPIN Classes and never have to wait for a treadmill or spin bike. The star of the club has to be Sanddon. I started my membership supplementing my cardio workouts with personal training with Sanddon. More than just punishment, Sanddon looked at my whole program, what I was eating (and how often), how much was I working out and what I was doing. Then of course was the punishment. Sanddon is great at getting the best out of you, pushing you when you need to be pushed but mindful not to over do it. I would recommend Double Diamond and Sanddon any day.
When making your selection for the wash it has an option for the attendant to prep the car. I wasn't sure what this was about but for two dollars more I figured what the heck. For two dollars I got a gentleman that pre-sprayed our car, used a brush to SCRUB all of the bugs off the car then actually used his fingers for the hard to reach places. We were travelling through OK on the way to TX and had hit thousands of Oklahoma bugs that previous evening. I wanted to leave these bugs where the had originated and found this place using Google Maps. I guarantee that if I lived in Claremore or within 25 miles this would be the only car wash I would pay for. Great service!
None
Great hospital with great staff, I'm working there :).
DJ Charlie was very responsive to our needs. His employee, Andrey, did a great job setting up everything! We will use them again!
Stopped by for something to snack on, saw the cinnamon buns and had to try one. Spectacular! I've been back several times since then because they are just so good. Can't wait to get another! This is one of those places where the people seem passionate about what they do. Also, very friendly staff.
The BEST pizza in L5P! Plus their salads are amazing! I've had nothing but great experiences here!
Great Pizza and great people. Nick the manager is awesome and easy to work with. The location is great and everything is comfortable and clean. Tivoli Beer is on tap! Cheers!
Thank you for the installation of my new furnace system for my older home. I was impressed with the level of professionalism with the entire transaction: Prompt communications, education about our current setup and recommended setup, multiple options to meet our budgeting needs, considerate crew, and leaving us with a great feeling that we made the best choice out of the many possibilities. I highly recommend Efficiency Heating & Cooling. Thank you again for a fine job.
The guys at this location are really friendly and helpful, will definitely return in the future!
This place is amazing, the service, the food and atomsphere. I've been back 3 times already highly recommend and great value for money!!
Very nice hotel..
We are chicken people, we love it and it's hard to impress me and I'll scream it at the top of my lungs King Edwards is the KING OF CHICKEN! I know Randy & his family from being long long time customers and I'll say this. You'll have a hard time finding better chicken & friendlier people than at King Edwards. Amazing chicken, (We don't eat fish so no reviews there) great price and wonderful atmosphere.
A friend of mine suggested I check out Artxit and I am glad I did. The website was really user friendly and I got to preview my avatar prior to the final masterpiece. I plan to get a few more avatars of my family and friends in the next few months, it's a great gift idea. Thanks everyone at Artxit.
None
None
Jimmy is the best bartender. Very clean and organized. Great location right off highway 30 service road in between dallas and fort worth. Excellent menu
I have been seeing Dr. Tony now for about 4 months and my overall health has never been better. I went in to see him with some lower back pain I thought was from lifting my sons and sleeping on an old mattress. Within about 5 minutes he had found the cause and proposed a plan to alleviate it. With his help over the first month of altering my diet and getting tune-ups from Dr. Tony I felt great! He continues to provide excellent insight into my overall well-being and I am now a healthier and happier person because of it.
Some of the best pizza around.
En la horaa de la comida... Con la familia.....
Great burgers Great fries Runzas are unbelievable
My new, favorite cafe in Portland serves up highly distinctive roasts from around the world. I come for the coffee, but the architecture and the staff are wonderful as well. I'm currently drinking their Rwanda, but the Burundi, and the Ethiopian have been excellent. The staff has a lot to say about various growing regions, globally. Finally, they spin some choice vinyl on a turntable. Love this place.
This is "boutique" shopping at it's best. They have amazing jewelry at great prices. The staff is very friendly and knowledgeable! Lana Cavassa
I called to make an appointment with David's Bridal, for a Saturday. The associate told me that Saturdays tend to be a zoo, and asked if a Friday would work for me. A Friday appointment was fine, especially since they worked around my schedule, and I was allowed to bring who and however many people I wanted to (I was told at other dress shops that I could only bring __ people, or no kids, etc..). My appointment was made for Friday at 7pm. I was treated very nicely the whole time I was there, and my sales girl was very patient with me, as I can be a bit indecisive at times. I ended up finding my dream dress! The store associates were very helpful, and ever allowed us to stay after hours to make sure we found everything we needed/wanted. I would definitely recommend!!
Gran Universidad
Fantastic location clean really good pool would recommend and stay again.
I love the family atmosphere here and the fact that they will make whatever you want as long as they have it!
Awesome
Having never purchased a new car before, I was totally amazed at how easy the people (Jason Motter), made the experience. They totally respected me and my wishes and were very helpful. Jason answered all my questions those I had and those I did not think to ask! Everyone was very helpful and very friendly. I will definitely recommend Ricart, and continue to do all my business there. I love my new Juke and I am very pleased with my purchasing experience!
None
very easy to work with...exceeded my expectations!
None
Very impressed with the way my car looks now. It looks almost brand new even though it is 6 years old. I will definitely have K & C Solutions Auto Detailing detail my car again before selling it in 3-4 years to buy my retirement car. The work is excellent, the service was fast, friendly and fantastic. I even came back 15 minutes after the detailing and they fit me right in to get buffing done. If you're going to have the detailing done, go the extra little bit and have your vehicle buffed as well. It really made a difference. I highly recommend going to these great guys to have your vehicle detailed.
Rick from Enviro Safe Pest Control was every informative and walked us through their services. Rick has been to our home at the appointed time (they always give you a heads up) as promised every time to spray. He gives us tips on how to make sure we keep the pests to a minimum and is thorough, quick, and professional. Thanks Rick, and Enviro Safe Pest Control for your great service.
The people at Pellman's got my van running better than it ever has. We had a long list of problems that needed attention and they help me understand what needed to be done and prioritize them. They also help me by letting me know what could wait a little while so it wouldn't completely tap me out.
This is a neat place. Owners and staff are great..so is coffee pour overs and iced coffees. FEELS good to stop by. Love countertop with coffee beans made in it.
Best pipe and tobacco store in town. All the staff are friendly and helpful, prices are great, and I happen to know they don't carry a drop of Chinese glass. Would not go anywhere else in town for great products...
I want to say thank you to Shane Watson and Scott Clark Honda for great customer experience. You made buying a car painless. Thank you
I have become so upset recently with medical offices and their constant focus on insurance and the hoops that they have to jump through to "treat" patients. They book 10 people every 5 minutes and you end up waiting hours. This place is the complete opposite. They are there to make you better and run it like a business because let's face it, too many are run FOR the insurance companies. Refreshing to have a place stick to a schedule and treat you like a human and not a number/insurance participant. I hope the serum works for me because allergies are no fun:)
What a wonderful experience we enjoyed at Bob Evans last night! We were a bunch of Canadians celebrating our Thanksgiving with our children who live in Michigan. We gathered at the restaurant and informed the manager that we were here for "Thanksgiving". He had us seated in a private area where we leisurely savoured our turkey dinners. The food was outstanding! Turkey was absolutely scrumptious!! We so appreciated being able to linger and enjoy each other's company. The staff went out of their way to be friendly. This truly was the next best thing to being home. Thanks, staff at Bob Evans, for a fantastic Thanksgiving!
He did a really great job for me. I had a pretty pronounced gap in between the two front teeth and they were just not really straight - long story short, I wasn't happy with it for a number of years. I had a complete smile makeover and it looks wonderful. It looks like I had braces for years and after that had everything whitened. It only took a couple appointments rather than years, and the results are probably better than I would have had if I had gone with the long route. I actually feel good when I smile now - I can do it ear to ear and not wonder what people think.
(: it is clean. And a good environment
Never really had much luck at the Chili's where we used to live in Davenport, IA but thought we'd give it another try while we were getting out tires changed at Sam's. Definitely pleasantly surprised! Had some amazing grilled chicken and fall off the bone ribs and some really great customer service.
Gooooood
I went into Matthews with what i thought looked like a mullet that a different salon had given me the day before. I was welcomed by James who told me that it was not as bad as i thought it was, but he would do what ever he could to make me happy. he not only fixed the mullet but gave me the cutest a-line. I have never had such a great experience at a salon. Matthews is definitly my new salon! Thank You
None
We had a wonderful trip with Evan Evans! They helped us out during our trip to Bicester Village and the driver was also helpful and kind. We can't wait to use their other services for our upcoming trip to UK. Two thumbs up!
Great Place for rentals. Excellent Place to work!
We have just come back from Phuket, and we loved the stay at Aquamarine Resort, Kamala Beach. The resort has a wonderful property. The swimming pools have an awesome view and the swim-up bar is indeed very exciting. The Delux Seaview rooms are done up well. The staff is extremely polite and helpful. I would love to visiit the resort again..!!!
Hannah Montana hooked me up!!! I love her spirit, and she free styled!! I love my nails...definitely will be going back!!
Best multiplex xperience in the heart of city.
My wife wanted to buy an acoustic guitar so we went to George's Music in WPB. After some time testing guitars, we decided to check for more guitars in another store in WPB. The lack of attention to us in that store was a strong determinant to went back to George's music and purchase the guitar there just because we felt treated in a personalized way. Besides George's Music store is modern, clean, and well organised. The managers in George's Music are wonderful people, they gave us enough time to decide, and helped us a lot. We really had a great time buying the guitar!
Best chocolate chip cookies ever.
Jättetrevlig personal och god vällagad mat. Dessutom en av Sveriges bästa musikpubar.
very good for skateboarding.
I didn't feel like I was pushed into anything. I was able to test drive the cars I wanted, even the ones I couldn't afford. I got in and out several times, front and back and found the Elantra I wanted. It literally just came off the truck. Financing is never fun but it wasn't painful either. I am thrilled with the car.
It's a great little shop these guys run. Good hair cuts, reasonable, friendly.
Très bon souvenir .... merci
Have bought several (no less than 7) mid to high performance PC's from them as far back as 2008 for use in my home and business. All of them are still up and running without issue. The last one I bought had a power supply start acting flaky after a couple of months and even though they could not duplicate the problem in the shop, they still replaced it, no charge. As far as I'm concerned, they have always gone above and beyond to serve their customers well and to deliver quality computers and equipment.
None
Good food, friendly service and moderate prices! I keep going since they also accept taste cards :-)
None
Awesome experience - was a crappy situation, turned out cool! I changed clothes at work, and was headed to the gym, when I realized I locked my keys in the trunk. I did a search for "locksmith" and "Local Locksmith" came up. Gave them a call, told them my location, and dude said he'd be there within 10 minutes. He arrived, handed me his business card, "Beau Norton", and proceeded with his tools. Had the door open in no time! Will definitely keep the business card and number on file for future reference. Highly recommended!
superb cakes,[], superb home made ice cream! and having a wifi/wlan is always a plus..
ggghhhh
Excellent & quick service. I got my 1st 2 tires for my truck in 2012 & I've been going there ever since. So do my parents
one of the best motels I ever seen
None
Fantastic spa! The decor is beautiful, the ambiance is peaceful, the service is impeccable. All the staff are well trained and you're treated like a Queen (or King). I highly recommend this spa!
My dog looked and smelled great. He was done quickly, which I and he appreciated. The bad reviews you find were when the salon was under different ownership. The new owner has really turned this place around.
Dr. Po is the best dentist ever. I recommend him to anyone who wants to change their smile. He is very creative and a true professional who cares about his patients. I have never had a favorable Dentist experience until I met Dr. Po.
None
A beautiful place where my heart is overwhelmed with exquisite energy. Being at the Temple was beyond any words I can find to say. Long live His Holiness XIV Dalai Lama.
About time we get a really good Asian spot down here. We have dined in and ordered out. The food has been consistently great. They also DELIVER! :) Very satisfied customer.
This place is great. Very fair prices and great services!
$100 fills a grocery cart top and bottom with fresh food awesome
I have used Rowland's automotive for a number of years. They are fair and honest and the service is top notch.
“Describe your experience at Chadra Mezza and Grill”…To begin with, our experience at Chadra Mezza was indescribably incredible. We were immediately greeted in the most down to earth friendly manner at the door by several staff members. We were immediately taken in by the warm ambience and relaxed atmosphere of Chadra’s. We enjoyed the Saturday evening buffet. This is where words escape me. This has to easily be the most incredible spread of food I’ve ever seen and tasted. Salmon, lamb, salad, fruits hummus just to touch the surface. Additionally, during our meal the owner, Nehme, personally came to our table to welcome us to his “humble establishment.”. It was reminiscent of visit by Rick at Rick's Café Américain from Casablanca. From beginning to end, this was the best overall dining experience my wife and I have had. We gladly now count ourselves as regulars at Nehme’s Chadra Mezza and Grill.
None
Great restaurant and atmosphere.... loved the old home this place is located in. Excellent food! Took a little long to get the main course after the starter, but the quality of the main course made the wait well worth it.
The food was very aromatic and flavorful. It is a nice quaint and small family owned restaurant with excellent food. It was me and my family first time eating there and we all loves it. My 2 daughters who are 9 and 10 years enjoyed it. You can tell that the food was fresh and cooked with care
The place was great with amazing custom pizza! It had a good alcohol selection also!
My name is Chon Tarango and I am the office manager of LHBA. I was made aware of this review a few days ago and want to reply. First I would like to point out that James Morales has never worked for or with LHBA. No one here has any idea who James is. So I don’t see how James would have any idea what he is talking about. Employees filling out 1099’s? Our employees fill out W4’s and our subcontractors fill out W9’s. Not sure where lying to the IRS comes from. Volunteers? No volunteers at LHBA, we are all here to serve our clients and make money. Big bosses? Everyone is in the office every day so I’m not really sure what James is talking about. Hire and fire people every two weeks? This is simple, if you can't manage to show up to work every day on time or you can't keep up with the production requirements then we can't use you. Is this a new concept? As to the rest of James' review I'm not sure how to even respond. He simply has no idea what he is talking about. We are an insurance brokerage and sell many lines of insurance to people of all ages.
Ver y neat job! Very clean and professional.
None
I ordered my Mother's urn from PM and it was beautiful. Because I was impressed with the quality of the item and care I just ordered two ornaments for my and aunt and uncle. They turned out exceptionally well. My family is happy with the outcome. The pictures transferred fabulously. I recommend PM to anyone in need of items like these. Dr. Mari Jayne M. Frederick
I have used ASAP Screenprinting multiple times for shirts and everytime has been a success. They deliver quality work at great prices and on time. I recommend ASAP Screenprinting to everyone.
Otto's Rocks.
In my opinion this is the best Thai resaturant in Charlotte. They have great food and great service. My wife and I eat here weekly. We always enjoy the food, and the service. Our favorite items are, Fresh Basil rolls with tofu, Pad Kaprow, Masaman Curry, Vegetarian Delight, and Pad Prik. I encourage anyone that likes Thai food to try this place out, I also encourage you to go beyond the Pad Thai, there are so many good items on their menu. Everything is always fresh and delicious. Thanks to Brooks, Melissa, Maria, and Femy for providing such good service!
Great shop with a knowledgeable staff who know what they are doing. Their alignment tech was even willing to work with my aftermarket suspension parts, which not a lot of techs will do. I went in expecting a quick toe and go but the tech spent the extra time to get everything dialed in how I wanted. These guys are definitely better than any other brake check location around town I've been to.
I was a field staff employee at Mountain Workshop for the 2013 season. A recent college graduate, my time at MW was a wonderful transition from college to "the real world" and the experience I gained was instrumental in helping me to get a graduate assistantship. My co-workers were some of the most kind and genuine people I have ever worked with, several of whom I know I will be friends with for a long, long time. The supervisors of Awesome Adventures and the School Programs provided me with unconditional support as I made arrangements for the next season. Similarly, I felt as though I was a valued member of a team. These supervisors continually asked me questions about my experience, anxious to find new and exciting ways to make this job even better for future field staff employees. While definitely tiring, I truly loved this job and would recommend it to anyone who loves to work with cool kids, cool people, and some seriously cool outdoor adventure equipment.
I went to Michelle about three weeks or so ago for the first time. I had just been going here or there to get my nails done and never realizing how much better they could have looked. One trip to Michelle and they look spectacular!!! I have naturally long nails and Michelle was able to do the acrylic overlay on them without making me cut them down like other places and helped me to get them shaped right so they didn't look horrible. On top of this, Michelle went through all sorts of great information with me on how to really care for my nails. She showed me where some damage had been done to my nails by salons that don't take the time to properly do them, and helped me get on a regimen to get them back on the healthy track. One of my absolute favorite things about Michelle's nails is that she mixes her own acrylic powders. Any color you can think of - she can do! So, you don't have to worry about it chipping or fading or wearing off. And her nail art is simply awesome! I swear that this gal can do anything you ask. When I went in to get them filled, I showed her a few pics of nails that I liked on my phone and she was able to come up with something unique that I totally loved! Her prices aren't anything higher than what you're going to pay at a crappy salon, and I'll tell you that I would happily pay more just to go to her anyway. Not only does she have a very clean, sanitary shop, but it's a very relaxed, laid back, fun place to go. Michelle has a wonderfully awesome personality. She'll be the first to tell you that she's been doing nails for over 25 years and it shows in her work and her attention to detail. I will never, ever go anywhere else. Even if you don't live in Owasso (I don't), it is beyond worth the drive over to see her. She also does pedis and reflexology! Go see her!!!
None
McNeel Eye Center has been a great experience. Dr. McNeel has bent over backward to make sure all my concerns and questions are properly handled. I've spent a good amount of time in the office with various appointments between getting diagnosed and fitted for gas permeable contact lenses. In that time, I've always found the doctor and staff very pleasant and friendly. I'm not sure why one reviewer would ding them for only having one doctor. In my opinion, the centers with multiple doctors are nothing more than volume cattle calling with little or no relationship between patient and doctor. I believe a one doc practice will spend the time fostering good relationships with the patients, and that has been my experience with McNeel. I'd recommend them to anyone.
ShoreTel is the leading provider of all IP based office communication systems - best known for lowest total cost of ownership, highest customer satisfaction and superior ease of use for administrators and users. No wonder why it is used by over 14,000 businesses around the world! How would you like to be a hero in your company by untangling complexity found with legacy PBX solutions? Make the move to brilliantly simple unified communications solutions from ShoreTel.
Really a very nice institute this is! This is one of the best management institute in Lucknow. Their faculty is world class level.
None
The Pour House is nothing fancy. It's a fun place to hang out, drink and network. It has a good variety of beers, and you can order awesome food from the Old Bag of Nails next door. There are several TVs, which makes it a good place to catch a sporting event or two. Great evening hangout, and the location along Big Walnut Creek and near Creekside is a big plus.
What a great shop! Charlie and the entire Tucker Tire family are wonderful. The prices at Tucker are competitive and you always feel like you got the special treatment. What I like the most is the honest approach they use with my wife and I. Good job...keep it up!
this is a asias best open air cinema
This was my first Porsche purchase and I had a lot of questions. Phillip Marquis was my Porsche Sales ambassador and he did an amazing job answering my questions. He was knowledgeable, professional, and easy to work with. He was responsive to phone calls, texts, and e-mails. He usually would get back to me the very same day. The dealership is clean and the entire staff is professional and great to work. I will be coming back for my next Porsche purchase when I upgrade, and when I add a second Porsche to my german fleet of cars! Thanks, Leith Porsche and Phllip Marquis.
its always rocking
My husband and I purchased a 2012 Jetta from Mike Raisor. Our salesman was Neil Dossett. He did everything possible to get us the car we wanted. He was a real pleasure to do business with and I can still call him and ask for his assistance when we need something. It is great to have a salesperson that cares for his customers. That will keep my family coming back to Mike Raisor as long as Neil is our salesperson. :)
I broke the LCD screen on my Samsum Galaxy SII and thought I'd get it professionally repaired rather than do it myself. Gophermods made the entire process remarkably simple, affordable and very quick. The website was very easy to use, place the order, and complete the checkout. From that point, they shipped my phone in about 3 business days and pronto - I had a working phone with absolutely no glitches. Fine worksmanship, quick turnaround and only $50 more than what the LCD would've cost on eBay. Very well done guys.
All time run
I had been looking for a vehicle to replace the sedan I owned for years and was looking for something more along the lines of a pickup or SUV. I saw this 2000 Chevy with just about 90,000 miles on it, came over, and test drove it. Scott, the salesman, got us through the process quickly and Peter in financing is a pleasure to work with. When I have to replace the pickup, I'll look here first thing.
None
Great food!
I couldn't be happier with our experience with Doug. He was able to get life insurance for my wife and I along with our kids for a much better price than anyone else we talked to. He and his staff were incredibly friendly and helpful and I would highly recommend him.
Atmosphere, food, people, and overall quality of the place.
I was very happy with this company. They were extremely courteous and professional. They answered all my questions and really set my mind at ease. There is no question I would use this company again. Their services and promptness were well worth it.
None
Beauty of lhr
I love this place. As much as I want to try something different, I'm always so happy with the Carnitas taco, rice and chips and salsa. So delicious. I haven't been for quite awhile and one of the ladies there recognized me and asked me how I'd been. Great food, even better customer service.
Abritel est une de société parmi les plus importante en France. ils offrent un service de qualité et avec un rapport qualité/prix au top dans son secteur.
I've eaten in Italy, and the food here was perhaps even better than that. Anyone who dislikes the food obviously does not like traditional Italian food. The service was helpful without being overbearing, and the atmosphere was comfortable. It was absolutely amazing, and I can't wait to return!
Richard, the manager of this location really went out of his way to help me. Many thanks!
Great dog grooming for a great price!
My overall experience at Uptown Vision was great! They take any insurance and utilize it fully. I was interested in Rayban, eddie bauer, etc and all other places i contacted that carry these frames only offered discounts through the insurance. A young lady by the name of Bridgitte helped me when I went in and she made my experience wonderful. She helped me choose what looked good on me and you could tell she was giving you honest feedback. Sweet gal. She also followed up as soon as my glasses came in. Great Place with lots of options on frames. Customer Service was awesome!!!
Brian, Paul, Josh, and crew were very hospitable. They installed a Bluetooth/XM Ready radio with special harness for steering wheel controls in my 2007 MINI Cooper S. While actual install time went over due to issues out of their control, they were super awesome and let me know what was going on the whole time. Their install was clean and professional and the radio looks great in the car. If you want a local company who will take their time to ensure that EVERYTHING is up to your expectations, give them a call.
The food here is unbelievable and very tasty! I highly recommend the samosas and the yassa chicken, but anything on the menu will be worth your while. And, at 14 euro for entree et plat, or 17 euro for entree, plat, et dessert, the food is a steal.
None
Best fat free yogurt. Ever!
Today I was pleasantly surprised with my experience at Value Store it! I am very happy with my XL space and friendly customer service. I highly recommend Value Store it to anyone in Miami Dade who is in need of storage! It was a 20 minute drive to South Beach. S worth it to pay half the price than other storage facilities charge on Miami Beach. I am Super Happy with my storage space! Thank you Value Store it!
One of the all time best concepts. Mostly an art gallery. The bathroom installation alone is worth visiting for. Try the osso bucco. These guys really get it.
I used to visit Oxford 6 times a year for 7 years and ate lunch at Coco's most every day and dinner some nights. I loved the food, the ambiance, the staff and the decor.Never had a mediocre dish. I miss it. If I ever get back to Ox. I will certainly stop in and say hi to Simon.
I dropped my scooter off with this guy and he had it back to life within 4 hours. If I ever have any problems with my scooter I know where to take it. I recommend this guy to anyone and everyone. Very fast and extremely cheap!!!
This has been my first experience going to a chiropractor. I was very nervous at first but at Superior Family Chiropractic they made me feel much more relaxed and comfortable. Since I have started going I have noticed a huge difference in the pain I suffer from fibromyalgia. I am just amazed. I can do more with my kids now that "mommy isn't hurting". I highly recommend this office to everyone! They are awesome!
We are very happy with the blinds we ordered. Tim was extremely helpful and a pleasure to deal with. Great Personality! The blinds were ordered, delivered & installed within 2 weeks. They look AWESOME!! Thanks to the whole staff!! We will definitely refer Tim & his staff to everyone we know.
Avalon is a great! They have phenomenal staff, and amazing prices! I called in and ended up with a great haircut, and an even better stylist! Porche did a wonderful job and gave me a little of her own fab flair! Brianna did some sensational highlights on my friend, and finished her off with a stylish cut! Where else can you get a $10 haircut and highlights for $45?
None
Excellent service before, during, and AFTER sales. Work was excellent and response time was fast and very pleasant.
I love It !!
Their service is always exceptional. Whether you want traditional or hibachi prepared food, or just to grab a few sushi rolls and a drink, you'll never be disappointed here. I try to get here at least once a month.
None
None
None
It's the best in medak
The best car buying experience one could have. Completely hassle free. I called up Aaron, said "Hey, my car's dead and I need a new one." We spent about a week discussing possibilities and how his process works and I ended up getting a ridiculous deal on a 2006 BMW 325i almost-fully loaded. I honestly thought I had 10 years before I was in BMW ownership territory but Aaron made me look like a fool for thinking that. I have recommended him to my friends (one of those recommendations not only bought a car but started working for him!) and next car I buy will definition go through him first.
As a first time car buyer, I was nervous about the whole car buying experience. We had gone to another dealership in Pensacola and weren't impressed with their sales people, or their selection. We came to Sandy Sansing and Billy took care of everything for us. He found us as many cars as he could for me to test drive, so I could find the one that felt just right. He suggested different cars that we hadn't thought of, and we ended up choosing one of his recommendations. Billy went above and beyond for us, and made sure that I was 100% satisfied with my experience and purchase. I will definitely be going back to see Billy for my next car!
All the food is fresh and super delicious! The bread is amazing.
None
None
This is my all time favorite yoga studio, I love being greeted with a smile, also it's awesome to buy a package that doesn't expire :-). The teacher's here are caring and always make me feel safe when I practice. I highly recommend Andi the owner and Janya who teaches Yin Yoga on Fridays.
Dopo quattro di anni di NAM avrei tante cose da dire in merito a questa scuola. Insegnante eccezionali, competenti, pronti a seguire l'alunno passo dopo passo, e a motivarlo. Sempre presenti, e hanno la capacità di coinvolgere gli alunni e di far crescere sempre più l'interesse per le diverse discipline. Le lezioni non si fondano sul solo studio del proprio strumento, ma mirano anche ad ampliare gli orizzonti musicali allargandosi anche alla teoria (solfeggio, armonia e arrangiamento) utile per migliorare l'approccio con il proprio strumento. Fondamentali, a parer mio, sono anche le lezioni di storia della musica, per conoscere più da vicino le origini della musica che suoniamo, ascoltiamo, viviamo. Insomma è una scuola completa che offre anche possibilità di aver a che fare con persone esperte e di alto livello musicale pronti a dare ottimi e validi consigli. L'ambiente è favoloso e penso che questo sia un elemento fondamentale all'interno di una scuola. Sicuramente seguire le lezioni in allegria è vantaggioso anche per affrontare con serenità argomenti più difficili. Come hanno già detto in molti, la NAM è diventata la mia seconda famiglia, una scuola che mi ha aiutato a crescere sia musicalmente ma anche e soprattutto umanamente. Grazie anche a tutto lo staff!!! :)
Beautiful gardens and park!
I have been going to Precision Auto Tech for several years now! Nick and his techs are awesome at dignosing a problem and fixing it, for a great price. I refus to take my vehicles anywhere else because I know for a fact that I can trust Nick and his work!! I personally served with Nick and he is one of the most honest people I know and it shows in his ownership and dedication to his customers. Nick has even made a house call, because my husband was away at school and was stuck at home with my kids! There's no one that can compare, price, quality work, honesty and customer service!! When trading in my vehicle, Nick was the only person I called to get his opinion on what type of vehicle to get for what was best suited for me and my family!
My husband, Erik, and I chose Tara for our wedding photographer. We got married in a town just north of Boston, MA. Tara was such a pleasure to work with. She made the planning easy, and the day-of, I knew I didn't need to worry about a thing. Our pictures are fantastic - and there are so many! It was so hard to choose our enlargements because they're all frame worthy! I highly recommend Tara, and wish she still lived close by!
None
Very professional, Highly knowlegable, There is a reason they are one of the top firms in North America. I am very pleased with the level of service, quick response and professionalism from all I come into contact with at this firm. Keep searching GOOGLE for Gowlings, you will not be disappointed.
None
None
Excelente atencion, los platos exquisitos, en fin, altamente recomendable. Ah! y no fue excesivamente caro. Creo que el precio justo para la atencion y servicio que ofrecen.
None
Great Clips has terrific service and great prices. I hate getting my hair cut but, at Great Clips it's not bad at all. Crystal Dragon is fantastic. I can tell her a vague idea of what I want and, she'll understand perfectly. I won't go anywhere else.
Restaurante con comida muy rica y con una terraza super, sin coches. Las setas empanadas están de muerte y tiran bien la cerveza también. Seguro que volveré al comedor a tomar un codillo que tenía muy buena pinta.
Great location (as far as I'm concerned!). 30-minute open parking space in front. Last fedex shipment at 7 PM. Can not do better from Cambridge.
A rare gem in a world populated by now generic and medium quality brand S. The only place that I have found in south OC that makes a brew on par with Peets. Run by Tim and Debbie Higgins, just opened recently. Tim is a passionate and meticulous expert Barista. Not just a guy that thought a coffee shop was a good idea for a business. Nice selection of high quality pastries, sandwiches, juices and breakfast goodies. You won't see cheap donuts or sugar bombs there. A few nice touches: There is a secure play area for tots by the main window, stocked with a small mountain of toys. Perfect place for mom's to chillax in the afternoon. Knife for my bagel with cream cheese was made from recycled wood. Not a single container or utensil was non-recyclable. On right side of road for southbound morning traffic. Tons of easy access parking
Love the food here. Their daily specials are always incredible. My personal favorites include the cajun chicken sub and the combo club. Employees are always nice and food prepared fast. Definitely would suggest Madison Deli for anyone wanting a good breakfast (oh yea, they have amazing breakfast sandwiches!) or lunch.
Always friendly staff and the sandwiches are great. Love it when the cold cuts are actually cold.
A fantastic pool, clean and well manned. The staff are very helpful. I use the pool for adult sessions and also take my 2 year old who loves it. Excellent changing rooms for family users with lots of safety equipment in there to help you get ready. The water is much warmer than most public baths and is comfortable for older and younger users. Although they do not have a cafe they have a good selection of vending machines with snack and drinks available. Highly recommended.
None
Dr Curia is the only dentist I would ever recommend. He is an artist, for one thing, and not only has he never, ever hurt me, but his greatest concern is that he does NOT hurt you - he is amazing. The pain-free is only one of the reasons I suggest him for all ages. Doctor also won't let you leave his chair if your bite is not PERFECT - I MEAN PERFECT. I truly love this dentist. I am old and difficult with aging but he still treats me like a much cared for patient. He never rushes. When I leave his office, I sometimes hear my own voice say, "Thanks for the good time!"
I want to bank with the bank
I love the show , Bernice is my favorite. I love South Beach Tow please don't sell it
I've been having every vehicle that I've owned serviced at this place for the past 5 years. The owner Muhammad and his guys are absolutely amazing. I have a hard time trusting automotive shops but these guys can be trusted 100%. Besides the excellent and diligent work, the customer service is excellent as well. They will never leave you in the dark and the pricing is great too. I would, just as I have in times past, recommend BAAM Automotive to everyone.
None
Right now I'm on the road in Virginia with the family for two weeks and really missing Car Bux! It seems no other city has a car wash that can compete. After 1,000 miles, our Suburban is looking so dirty... other car washes either don't really get it clean or they want $9 just for an exterior-only wash. No, a $4 wash is not the same as a professional detailing. But, for keeping your car clean week-to-week, Car Bux can't be beat. LOVE the unlimited vacuum. I hate rushing, feeling like the timer is going to run out right before I get the back seats done. My only regret is that there aren't more of these around Jacksonville. Guys, one on CR 210 would go gangbusters!!
None
As an expecting mother and someone who has long suffered from aches and pains I was looking forward to trying EarthySoul for the first time and I was not disappointed! Eileen was incredible in the way that she progressively worked through all of my tension and aches, leaving me feeling relaxed and ache free days later. I was even fortunate enough to experience some of the reflexology she offers and I must say that it worked wonders! Overall it was hands down the best prenatal massage I have ever had and I look forward to booking my next appointment!
Hello, I would love to share with everyone that Lexus of North Miami is amazing. I have received a 2013 Lexus GS 350 here just recently and my purchasing experience was above and beyond. I was able to receive my car day of and everyone seemed very straight up, honest, and hard working. If you want an honest, amazing purchase plus service experience as well, I highly recommend Lexus of North Miami. You will not be disappointed. Also, make sure to try their cafe. The young ladies there are great, make amazing coffee and sandwiches. Thank you Lexus of North Miami for everything.
The other reviewers must have gone to another UPS store as both people behind the counter were quite nice. Nothing was thrown at me at all!
None
Love the Bluebird. The Juarez, Corgi Street, Salmon Scrambler, Californian are all amazing. The staff is wonderful and always stock my favorite hot sauces.
Best car purchasing experience I've ever had. I worked with: Bethany Juneau - Bus Dev Mgr. Erik Holm - Sales Chris Wright - Finance We ended up buying a Certified Pre-Owned Outback and there was no pressure at all. They showed us everything we wanted to look at and helped us find exactly the right car Financing was very easy/quick and the rates were GREAT through Subaru. In and out with the perfect Subaru for our family!
One word describes it best: Perfect
This is a quiet, comfortable, safe, and affordable complex to reside in. Most of the units have been renovated over the past few years, and it looks like the remaining units will be done soon. It's a great location if you commute to either Oakland or San Francisco regularly, with AC transit, Emery-go-round, and Casual Commuter stops all within a couple blocks.
I really can't say enough nice things about Dr. Henry and his staff. They bent over backwards to come up with a payment plan that would work for me. They always remember us and are so very friendly. Dr. Henry takes time with us, never rushes us, and genuinely cares not only about his patients but their families. I recommend him to EVERYONE interested in starting treatment! We love Henry Orthodontics!
I give 5 star, but it is a dentist office, and I loathe the dentist office, just because they are dentists offices, but that aside, I did have a very positive experience. The hygienist was pleasant and personable, and the dentist snuck in during the cleaning to take his mandatory look around, so that I didn't have to wait around after the full cleaning for him. I actually really liked that. My appointment was 10:15, I arrived right around 10:00, I was out by 11:00. The prompt care pleases me. They took care to advise me of costs in advance of care, which I also think is important. I also particularly like fish tanks in the waiting room, complete with clownfish (Nemo/Marlin) and pacific regals (Dory). I giggled.
None
None
None
I have used Stephen on several occasions and have always been pleased with his work. I found him to be knowledgeable, professional, organized, and affordable. I have recommened his services to friends and will use him if I need legal services in the future.
Known as computer and information technology teacher.
None
Scott did a superb job repairing my grandmother's antique tip top table base that my teenagers had broken and tried to repair with superglue. He had excellent pricing and great skill to fix that break, and another break that I hadn't even noticed. I highly recommend Gressitt Studios!
LOVE THEM! Been going here for years. Excellent customer service and excellent product quality. Staff are very personable and they carry a lot of unique eye wear brands you don't normally see. They are current with the technology and information and always go above and beyond. Definitely check them out!
I have been a regular visitor to Budapest over the past year, and tried a few places, but this is by far the best. Not only is it ideally located in the interesting part of Budapest, but it is also quiet. There is plenty to enjoy in the thoughful provision of things to make a stay easy, enjoyable and interesting. John also helped me out when I needed it.
None
Great family restaurant with outstanding service.
Very enjoyable car buying experience. We spent a considerable amount of time researching cars and prices. We visited Toyota of Naperville early in the process. When the day came to make our purchase we were confident of what we wanted and what we wanted to pay. We contact several Toyota dealerships and with most got the usual car salesman nonsense. There was none of that at Toyota of Naperville. They were very upfront and the price they quoted us at was significantly lower than what we had researched and expected to pay.
Having a great spa experience is something to look forward to and at La Miranda, Anna and her fabulous staff make it seem like you are world class celebrity every time you go. Annie, Tina and Q are wonderful technicians and estheticians and I always recommend them to my friends. My daughters look forward to their visits because "Spa Day" is one of their favorite activities on Marco. They are the best on Marco for quality and value.
As a resident of Toronto and a student of the University of Western Ontario, I was worried about how I was going to move all my apartment furnishings from downtown all the way out to London. I found Metropolitan Movers easily on the web, and was reassured by the information page on their website, "Yes, we do long distance moves." I also appreciated their free quotes look-up available right on the homepage, letting me know exactly what I was buying, and letting me know their rates were competitive. Throughout the process, I was never worried about my possessions, as the movers were open, transparent, and professional. I will continue to use their services every time I require moving between Toronto and UWO!
We bought a 2014 Dodge Grand Caravan from Jerry Anstaett. Jerry was professional, courteous, and friendly. We would definitely recommend him and the dealership to others.
None
I was living in a house at TC 11/32, Pattom P.O.,Near PMG's Jn,Trivandrum 695004(behind Samarias center on NH) and found this area was declared as commercial and buying land become remote as nobody wanted to sell off now. As such the area little far away from CBD called Plamoodu became a bigger shopping center after CBD.
I could not be happier with the people and the facilities. I have a 1 year old 40 pound dog with a history of abuse. She is terrified of new places and new people, but within a few minutes she was wagging her tail and having a good time. The receptionists, the techs, and Dr Leibovitz were all so kind and loving. They worked with her anxiety and once she calmed down, they took care of her with no problem and gave me all kinds of pointers on raising her. I'm so happy that we found a good place that we can trust.
Marcus Brown helped my husband and I buy our first house six years ago. He was helpful, patient, and professional. He recommended an outstanding inspector and even helped us locate the best price to have the floors refinished before we moved in. Fast forward to this summer, and Marcus helped us sell our first house. He found a fabulous home photographer who showcase our house's best assets, helping us get three offers the first weekend it was on the market! He helped us navigate through the inspections, coached us on the offer/counter offer procedures, and counseled us on working with the tenants who were currently renting our home. He even negotiated to have our furnace repaired! Selling a house can be a daunting process, but with the help of Marcus Brown, this was the best possible experience for us. We extremely appreciated his attention to detail, willingness to go above and beyond, and professional manner. If we buy a house in the Portland area again, we will most definitely use Marcus Brown Properties as our Realtor. Nicole Heinlein
If you need a good counselor, try this one!
really enjoy visiting this pub - excellent staff
None
einfach hervorragend!
É um restaurante que dá gosto repetir a visita, muito bem apresentado, confecionado e com espetáculos, muito bom mesmo adorei. Obrigado e que continuem, saudações
Its comfortable adorable and suppurb place...
I recently purchased a family car from Diss Car Centre. The service that I received from Rob was really friendly, helpful and in my opinion honest. He also gave me a fair price for the trade in of my old car. Being a small town I did a little word of mouth with some friends that had purchased from him and they could only praise him up. One of his customers did have a problem with her car, however she said that Diss Car Centre dealt with it exceptionally well and she praises them up for dealing with her problem so well. When I need a new car I know where I will be going first next time.
locals love it! There mixes are great. Smoke a bowl in the store for free!!
None
The garden is opening this Sping on March 2nd. It's one of our favorites. Not only because of the fin fruits & vegetables but also because of the Weston Family that ownes & operates it.
I stayed at the hotel from 10th August 2012 for 2 nights, the beach facing hut with a private lawn was superb. The hotel has a good restaurant but the cheff needs to learn a lot by putting taste into the well presented dishes. A perfect place to stay with your family and the kids are going to love it.
Had an issue with my phone ..brought it in, Bryant was understanding of my situation and took excellent care of me !
this is an amazing little restaurant for such a small town. Clearly authentic Italian cuisine, amazing desserts and an outstanding little coffee shop in the front part of the restaurant. This is not your chain generic Italian food--this is authentic cuisine. And not only that the only Italian restaurant in town that serves great wine with your meal. Wonderful service-- It's like having a 5 star restaurant in Ottawa! I eat there whenever I am in town.
I came to Muse and started seeing Sophia around 6 months ago in the fall of 2013. Sophia's approach in getting to know me was absolutely wonderful, and just what I needed. Sophia did a great job getting to know me, my likes/dislikes, and what I was trying to achieve with my hair. When I first came to see Sophia, my hair felt like it was thinning out on the ends and the color was starting to look too fake-blonde. After only six months, my hair is back to it's original fullness, the color is absolutely perfect, and my hair is growing much faster and stronger than it was before. Sophia does a great job taking care of your hair, while keeping it gorgeous! Recently, I went in for balayage, instead of foil highlights. I was completely amazed by how beautiful and natural-looking the color was/is! I am already getting a ton of complements from friends and family -- all wanting to know who takes care of my hair! After doing balayage, I will never go back to foil highlights! I am beyond satisfied with Sophia's work with balayage and my hair! I can't express how thankful I am for Muse Salon and for Sophia!! She is absolutely amazing and I highly recommend her!!
Great class and a good price if you buy on KSL. Mike presented the information in a good way, where we could follow along without going to sleep.
I read hete
Had wonderful service, two people had referd me to come here. Last Thursday brought my 2000 9-5 in to see what was wrong. I was in and out with in 45 min. This Tuesday I ended up bringing my car in to finally getting it fixed. I will be coming back. *They know what they are doing!
Best zoo I've been to by far! I've been to a few too! Awesome and largest indoor rain forest and desert in the world. Huge aquarium too! Very large gorilla area and all the other animals you'd expect to find in a zoo with a ski-lift to take you over there exhibits! I also lost my black toiletry bag and they found it and mailed it to me for free the next day!
I have had the pleasure for the last year and a half to have Fastrac Printing doing my feature sheets for my Real Estate listings. They have gone over and above to have them done for me when I need them, sometimes last minute for an open house, whatever needed including dropping them off to me! The quality of the print is impeccable, they even check spelling.... I would highly recommend them for all of your printing needs.
We have been taking both cars to Sahlani Brothers for almost 3 years and they have yet to disappoint us. They are honest, reliable, and have reasonable prices. Jim Sahlani also greets you like an old friend and seems very genuine about it. The only thing I would change is adding some mechanism for earlier morning drop-offs (8 am is tough with our work hours). Overall we feel so lucky to have identified a mechanic we like and trust.
the fc muffler I think could be the best place to get a car fixed they work on so much with your car and really do what they can to make sure you get your car back asap they really go the exrta mile when your car is in the shop they dont just take your car to fix it they make sure that when your car is there that you have a way to get around town. they have the free shuttle and have loaner cars if needed. they are super nice and really do have great staff working there. they have became like my second family. I have gone to the fcma with every car I own and dont trust any one with my car. my whole family goes there we have never been unhappy everytime that something goes wrong they have been there. I highly recommend them to anyone who wants there car done the right way and wants there car back fast.
Best Ace Hardware around! Great customer service (sometimes you have to be patient because they help everyone!) and great selection of goods! Love supporting this locally owned store
None
None
Simple yet pleasing decor,friendly staff,amazing food. Had the chicken noodle soup(don't get fooled by the name and think its noodle soup from a can).it was delicious and the quantity was monstrous(for just $7). The chicken curry and rice was good too. I highly recommend the place.
Beautiful music. I have listen to Paul write, teach, compose, and play music for almost seven years. He is a fantastic individual and takes care of everyone he does business with. Also, his skills in the recording studio and on song production are unparalleled. I cannot not recommend this musician any higher. Just phenomenal!
Detroito
Great chairs and very comfortable. I love the Mirra chair and their price is unbeatable
I have received a word in due season from Paula White as she has brought forth the word of God. A defining factor of this truth comes the boldness in the delivery of what God's word is speaking to us during this era. His word does not return void, it accomlishes that which He has set it to do. In my spirit, I have been impelled when things were't lining up with the word. I find no evidence of this here, be it the juncture of my present walk, I need to hear the word delivered with boldness, a now word, for a now time...It saddens me that other believers can comment as I have had the unfortunate pleasureto read, yet failing to grasp a biblical principle, "touch not my anoited" Pauls White, pastor is shepherding the sheep, addressing the many diseases sheep are prone to contract, merely by virture of grazing from pasture to pasture, which is customary for sheep to do...There's a message in that analogy...God bless the leadership of New Destiny Christian CHurch and God bless all His creation, for that is our reasonable service to bless, not curse...
I have had nothing but excellent service in the past 4 years of coming here. I am shocked to see multiple poor reviews, and laugh that a majority are because they won't mount your discount tires. If you are willing to send money to big box companies out of state to save 8 bucks on a set of tires, then you should just mount them yourself. I work for a bicycle company and have to replace moped tires on a regular basis by hand (no easy task) and mike took the time to walk me through his process for doing tires with a tire iron without any problem. Maybe its because I work in the customer service industry and understand what it is like to have to put up with "holier than thou" types, but I have felt that every question answered by Mike has been nothing than helpful and professional. Mikes has fixed two of my bikes that have been down in the line of duty due to negligent drivers, and has done regular maintenance for me over the years, and treated me with respect. I do not feel their mechanic charges are more than the going rate, and I am one of the college student they supposedly try to fleece (one who works full time while attending school for the past seven years and works hard to enjoy their toys.) Mike, keep up the great work. The loyal customers that have come to you for years will do our best to keep up your great name.
None
This is one of the best personal training places around! The employees are great and truly care about their clients, the facilities are always clean and well organized, and the music is always fun. I have been to other personal training locations and the thing that makes Fitness Together stick out to me is their trainers. There is no judgement and they are always attentive to what you are doing and they want you to succeed as much as you do.
None
A first class game company. While I may not care for all of their games, every product they put out is dripping with quality.
If you enjoy any type of coffee drink, you must visit Arrow Coffee ASAP. They have the best quality of coffee and service in Manhattan. Absolutely incredible. They purchase their coffee from Corvus Coffee Co., who share personal relationships with the farmers they buy from, ensuring a fair price on the quality coffee they receive. Additionally, they have homemade breakfast items and lunch specials every day, not to mention they're fair trade, organic chocolate bars! Most importantly, the employees at Arrow Coffee are phenomenal. They offer great service and would love it if you stopped by like....TODAY!
I absolutely love going to Dr. Wing for my orthodontic treatment, I love my braces, they have never given me a problem and I see changes in my smile every single time I go to get an adjustment. I am very happy to have chosen Dr. Wing as my orthodontist. I am fascinated by the way my teeth are moving and shifting. The staff is always very friendly and they remember who you are so you always feel welcome. Dr Wing is an outstanding doctor who I definitely recommend when people go to into the dental office I work at. Thanks so much! I'm super EXCITED for May when i get my braces off!
I highly recommend Valley View Vet Clinic. The staff has always been very helpful and kind whenever I have called with questions. Yes, they are busy, but I believe they handle things quite well despite that. As for Dr. Lee, she is best veterinarian I have ever had for my animals. She's great with the animals and I feel she does an excellent job anytime I've taken any of mine to see her. She is also very good at explaining and helping me understand how my pets are doing. You can tell she truly cares about what she does and the animals that she sees. I can't imagine ever going to anyone else for my pets needs. Thank you Dr. Lee and staff for always being awesome!
Always have everything I want and open 24hrs can't go wrong
Great service and tasty food!!
None
I owe my life to the staff in the Golden Jubilee. A very successful triple bi-pass. Now I'm back fighting fit.
So it looks like they have done alot of renovations to the property and it really looks and feels great. We stayed here for four days and couldn't ask for anything more. The rooms are clean and spacious and they have great amenities. The staff was friendly and very helpful in directing us to where we needed to go and just all around made our stay very pleasant
Great food, great service, with great prices. In the more than two years that I have been eating here, I have tried the Keke, Chicken-Afrodia, Somali-Steak Sandwich among others and I was not disappointed once not even once.
Nice Place
This hospital has some of the kindest nurse and doctors in the nation!
Dr Kaiser is a highly recommended, extraordinary doctor and person. My husband had a sudden eye issue over the weekend. We were referred to Dr Kaiser by our Optometrist, Dr Frank Boone on Sunday afternoon. Dr Kaiser meet us at the office on short notice and after a thorough exam he discovered an issue which could have quickly become serious. He thoroughly explained the problem, the recommended treatment and at 8:30 pm on a Sunday evening we were on our way home with treatment completed and a more serious condition averted. Without the care, concern, and dedication of Dr. Boone and Dr. Kaiser, the outcome could have been very different--especially if we had been forced to wait until office hours on Monday for evaluation and treatment. We are extremely thankful and grateful for the care received.
Had a great experience at Young GMC. They worked with me to get me where I needed to be and more importantly in the truck I wanted. My salesman Gift, was a real pleasure to deal with and he made my experience that much easier. Thanks!
I highly recommend Vienna Dental Associates. They are great. The staff is friendly and the dentists are top notch. Last year I had to have an emergency procedure and they got me in the next day! The office is pretty up to date. They have monitors that show what is going on, and you are able to view your x-rays up close. Everything is explained to you before it occurs. Dustin is my Dentist, and he is beyond approachable. We talk casually as if I have been a patient for years. I felt comfortable from the moment I walked into the office. I will continue to go back here, and recommend this practice over others I have been to in the past.
Wasps were everywhere in our office, and Donpedro's Termite Control came to the rescue! They were quick, professional and efficient! Thank you so much! You will be the first ones we call if we ever have any problem again!
Company 50 did a fantastic job creating my website giving my business a huge competitive advantage. I would highly recommend their services to anyone looking to digitally market themselves. Greg was easily accessible and very knowledgeable making my web site ideal for my specific needs.
None
The grounds look great and the service is spectacular and courteous.
My granddoggie Summer visits Preppie Pooch every month and she gets a fabulous experience! Whenever her mom says it's time to go to the groomer's, she prances around and gets really excited. Summer just loves to go there. They do a great job and she smells and looks very pretty. Summer also loves the socializing. It's a great place and I recommend it to anyone who wants the best for their babies.
Enjoy the office! Great hygienist, superb doctor, been going there for many many years!
My son dropped my iPad and broke the screen. CPR fixed it in a jif and cost was very reasonable. Thx CPR!
This place is awesome! The staff were most welcoming, the birds of prey show was excellent and i learnt an awful lot from it! Compared to other zoo's that i have been to, we could get so much closer to the 'action' so to speak and as a result it felt a lot more like a personal experience to us. Even though i do not have kids i can imagine that it would be a perfect place for a day out. A great variety of animals, some of which you simply do not see at other zoo's or wildlife parks. I will be sad if i dont go again this year! :P. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED! A++
“The service and speed that I recieved for the items I ordered was excellent! The Team was very helpful and I recieved my order all the way in Germany in about a week!”
Magnifique !!! Le cadre est tout simplement magique. Je n'aurai jamais pu imaginer un tel endroit dans Paris. ON se croirait dans un conte de fée ! Cuisine rafinée et délicieuse... Poisson parfaitement cuisiné. Un vrai moment de pur bonheur ! Allez y avant que ce soit pris d'assaut !
Dr. Nick and Dr. Stefanie are both elite adjusters in the chiropractic field and have an incredible passion and amount of knowledge about the profession. Dr. Stefanie has taken great care of my spine for many years and will for years to come. Their clinic is a friendly and healthy atmosphere that would make anyone want to better their lifestyle. I also enjoy tuning into their ESPN Charlotte am 730 radio show each Saturday.
Just moved back to Centerville and I forgot how good this place was. Luckly they sent out a mailer that got me and the girlfriend to come in, now it's the only pizza she'll eat in Davis county. The Hell Wing challenge was just mean though....
Great Food!
None
Cakes and Pastries.. Yummmm
I was looking to get into another Nissan as my lease was coming to an end. I had a very unique situation. I had shop a couple of other Nissan dealers with no luck. I was able to connect with Also Jankulla and Mike Rowe. They listened and delivered where other Nissan dealers did not. I would highly recommend adding Colonial Nissan to your list.
Martin and mike came by because my timer was leaking. Martin referred to my unit as an antique, but said it was still serviceable. They looked over the hardware in the utility room, found some light corrosion on a water heater, noted that my water pressure was at max and then proceeded to do a fine job on the repair of my antique. They made a heart felt pitch for a new unit, but weren't pushy about it. One day the antique will need to be replaced, when I do, I will have Martin and Mike do it for me they were absolutely professional and courteous. Great service guys.
Otimo e ainda aceita Cartões ALELO Refeição e alimentação
Honestly, I hated having to rent a storage space... walking in, Monica was so helpful and funny and trying to help me find the best deal! Who does that?!?! My 5-year old enjoyed the candy at the counter too! Monica was a joy to work with, and I thank you for taking the time to show me the different storage spaces/sizes!
None
The most vibrant place in Ringwood!! Its whatever you want it to be.. Just a coffee with friends, Lunch or Afternoon Tea, A quick Beer after work, An amazing evening meal or a great place to meet for Drinks and socialize!?:-)
I work for a small software company and we called Wire-Rite out for an estimate and they arrived almost immediately, were professional and courteous, and gave us an appointment to complete the installation of a few electrical outlets the very next day. They even arrived a bit early to do the work, which was fortuitous, as the unit we own is a former radiologists office, and Greg (the owner) discovered we had lead lined walls. This caused him and his helper to be here many hours beyond their initial quote and caused quite a bit more work than they initially expected. However, he only charged us slightly over estimate and stayed cool, calm, and collected during the entire frustrating situation. Greg was very professional and turned what could have been an expensive disaster into a painless experience for the company. We will continue to use Wire-Rite and VERY highly recommend them.
It was our lucky day when Desiree' Steele from Anderson Auto Group, showed us the 2013 Ford Escape. My husband was waffling between the Escape and getting a 2013 Kia. Ms. Steele did a fantastic job of showing him, and later myself, all the features of the Escape. Never was there any 'push' to get us to purchase the vehicle. Her concern was that we both understand all of the fine details of the Escape. We did make that purchase, at a lesser price than the Kia, and have had calls from her since to make certain we are satisfied, and to answer any questions. We will most certainly be returning to Anderson Auto Group in the future, and we hope Desiree' is there to assist us. Thank you, Desiree'!
The Noble Manor is convenient located only a short distance from historic Pensacola on a quiet street lined with victorian houses. Their rooms are well designed and the breakfast was more than enough. Bob and Bonnie are excellent hosts who go out of their way to make sure you know where to go during your stay in Pensacola. Pluses: WI-FI Internet, Pool, Jacuzzi, Quiet and relaxing atmosphere, close by to downtown and great restaurants.
i am a student and this school is good
I placed the order at 9:14 and in less than 15 minutes it was ready to pickup. The pizza was great, good proportions, not over or undercooked and just how I ordered it. I did not take delivery, so i can't comment on it, but the staff where courteous and fast to take care of me. 3 Words: Good, Fast, Simple. Good Job Domino's!
When i was looking for some solar panels to put on my roof i heard great information on Absolute Solar and Wind which turned out to be the best choice I have made. The whole process was smooth and efficient with polite and professional installers. I highly recommend this company to deal with any sort of renewable energy needs that you have.
مسجد كما ينبغي ان تكون عليه المساجد، Mosque the way it should be
None
None
None
None
I love this restaurant!
Please disregard Google's description that this is a Used Car Dealer. This is NOT a used car dealership, this is an Automotive Mechanic, where you take your cars for repairs. I'm cross posting my Yelp review here to provide this place with some extra visibility. I received a recommendation for Dixon from a few coworkers who had known him for a long time, and I'm glad I took their advice. Dixon was very professional and knowledgeable. He was formerly a mechanic at a dealership since the late 80's, but started his own shop a few years ago. My vehicle was having an intermittent problem (which turned out to be a fuel pump) and he took the time necessary to figure out the root cause of the issue rather than taking expensive guesses. He took the time to explain to me exactly what was going wrong and his process for diagnosis. He was able to get me a discount off of the retail price for the part, and his billing for the labor was extremely reasonable. Dixon will be my go-to mechanic from now on, and I'm happy to say that I've finally found a mechanic in the Athens area which I can unreservedly recommend.
Well stocked Portuguese Mini-Market, close to Place Flagey. They carry many common Portuguese (but hard to find in Brussels) grocery items, along with a large selection of Portuguese wines, deli items and bacalhau. One of the best Portuguese mini-markets I've found in Brussels so far.
I love this place! They have an amazing collection of Japanese and Korean furniture with pieces that fit in a variety of settings. I have had a number of their pieces for several years and they still look great. The staff there are really friendly and knowledgeable without ever being pushy. The owner, Dale Storer, knows his business well and has always been a great source of advice and provides first-rate service. Highly recommended.
true news
None
None
I leased my first vehicle through Darling's in Bangor. Great choice. I got the price I wanted, I got friendly service, and Bryan Lackee helped me through each step of the process. I would recommend Darling's and their friendly staff to anyone looking to get into a new or used vehicle. If you want someone who will help you out and work to get you the best price, ask for Mr. Lackee.
Great family or romantic location, make sure to bring a camera. Local eatery Fox's Lobster House nearby or Brown's Ice Cream up the hill.
Great Service and Amazing Expertise!
The service was great. My pc with all my music was busted, so I thought I'd ask before I replaced it. They were able save all my music and I didnt need to buy a new computer. They suggested setting me up to where I can listen to all my music, from my pc, through my stereo in the living room, intead of having to listen through my phone. They also found me a better way to set Netflix up, instead of my old, loud xbox.
This is one of the best experiences me and my daughter has had. Finding a dental office that would allow parents to be in the room while exam/procedures are being performed is good.
I couldn't understand why I was running a full minute and half slower than usual. Pain seared in my hip joint, but I didn't know what to do. Call a Dr? Would he just recommend pain killers? Instead, I found Peak Balance Chiropractic. With just the first treatment by Dr. Harlow, I felt a tremendous difference and was able to resume my training schedule. Dr. Harlow's knowledge of sports and her desire to improve the performance of your body, are just a few of the reasons I highly recommend her and Peak Balance. Dr. Harlow's care helped me rediscover my love for running!
Dr. Musunuru is an excellent physician. She takes time to talk to you about your condition. She follows up with you personally about lab results. The wait time to see her is minimal. Her staff is friendly and helpful. I highly recommend her.
Ron did a wonderful job constructing our dream home. His sub contractors were all very professional and very polite through the entire process. We would recommend him to anyone building a new home.
Best biscotti ever!
Excellent accommodation. Space
Very professional and friendly team at the Office. You feel at home whether you are in with knowledgeable Jason or Dr. Porretta taking a shot at your wobbly teeth. Nicely set up office with no dearth of good magazines for book worms and latest updates from a HD TV for the couch potatoes. Overall, a wonderful experience, a wonderful team!
I called with an electrical issue in my bathroom, which required urgent fixing. The electrician from this company made a thorough check and fixed it properly without making any mess. Recommending Mister Sparky to everyone.
Let me start with the key componet why I purchased "Darren Lazar"! Had he not followed up with me and kept in contact via text and e mail I would not be driving my 335i Convertible today. I came in at 5pm on aTuesday night just looking, Wed night he sent me a tocuh base e mail Thursday a touch base text outlining the offer, I countered and the next thing I knew I was driving away in my Dream Car. He made it happen along with his team and never once did I doubt they had my interest at heart. I love my car and I loved my expereince at Braman, Thank you Darren :) Your professionalism and follow through made my experience seemless and enjoyable. Thank you and Thank you Raj. Myra Alicea, Sr Mortgage Specialist
In 2003 bought a Golf and Frank Heinz was the sales person. He was the only sales person out of all the dealerships in the Metroplex, that told me no we don't have what you want, but I can have it here in a week. Every other dealer wanted to sell me whatever they had on the lot. True to his word he had it in a week later. I had done most of the paperwork financing via phone/fax. When I arrived, I was there 30 minutes tops and drove out with the EXACT car I wanted. I had good luck with the service department too. Now, my Golf is gone - but every dealer I have dealt with since is mentally compared to these guys. Only a couple come close to how easy it was. Thank you.
Excellent service! Shante and Ashley were very friendly and helpful!
You will never feel more at home in a professional office, let alone at the dentist! All of the wonderful ladies on Dr. Koeppel's team are warm and nurturing and you are made to feel as if your are part of the family. While your care and treatment are a top priority, so is your comfort. When under Dr. K's care, you not only benefit from his many years of experience in cosmetic and general dentistry, but you also benefit from his unmatched skill and expertise, thanks to which ensured for me a totally pain free treatment. I not only have a new smile, but I love to use it, especially in Dr. Koeppel's office!
The pulled pork is some of the best we have had. The chicken was great as well. I personally like a dry rub on my chicken so it was a bit too saucy for me, but the sauce was great so it didn’t bother me. Their mac n cheese was gone in seconds. We loved their vinegar slaw – so fresh. Everyone at the party agreed that it was great BBQ and FRESH. . For the price we got amazing BBQ, amazing service and everything was included.
None
None
None
None
Recently purchased (yesterday) a Volvo XC90 from Sunset Motors. I was treated kindly and professionally by Hons. I feel like I purchased an excellent vehicle at a very fair price. I believe he was very honest in his knowledge of the vehicle. Used vehicles are just that, USED. he represents his products to the best of his knowledge.
Everyone at Steve Moore Chevrolet is very polite and friendly and I always feel like a member of the family when I go there.
Very smooth and straight forward. No time wasted and easy to deal with. Worked with Rizwan and tested some cars and finally ordered one from a California location. He kept us updated throughout and the purchase process was excellent. Great financing and simple.
Not so pricey option if you visit Boston. Comfortable given the price.
Oldy worldly wonderful atmosphere pity not enough space. But then against this might spoil it
I came to Fergus for relieve from persistent back pain. Fergus was encouraging and warm. He offered a range of solutions and was very knowledgeable. I liked that he was open to all types of treatments, e.g. dry needling. Overall my experience was very pleasant and I would definitely recommend him to friends and colleagues. :)
None
Wonderful store with quality products, tended with care. A little of this, a little of that. Such a treat to stop on our assorted trips from Ithaca into the east and northeast. Worth the handful of miles "out-of-the-way" off 88 just to be greeted by Kendall and have a nibble of something real and delicious and cup of good quality coffee. Just go...you'll keep coming back!
400年続く歴史ある、アルベルゴ、リストランテです。 自家製オリーブオイルが確か15ユーロくらいです。(250mlくらいだった気がします) オーナーシェフのロベルトは日本びいきで、コメディアンの 「何でだろ〜♩、何でだろ〜♩」って言ってみて下さい。 目を煌めかせて反応します。 ロベルトはF1大好きです。 イタリア語でF1の話ができれば会話が弾むはずです。 温野菜が美味しくて、そして最高の贅沢は、人がいない。 静かな至高の時間が過ごせます。 初秋がいいですね、紅葉を感じながら散歩して、時間があれば朝からバスでカステル・デル・ピアーノへ一日ぶらり旅。時間とお金の余裕があれば、そちらで一泊して、また、アルベルゴ、シレーネへ。 本を一冊持って行くといいと思います。
Really appreciated how they handled my inspection and questions about additional repairs / estimates. I was not overcharged or pressured into any services I did not want (always a fear with dealers), and Sam was responsive and helpful whenever we talked on the phone. I will definitely take my cars there again.
All the staff helped me with everything I needed help with. They were all very nice.
Great library. Just huge!
Blimpies is great! I was extremely impressed with the staff; they are very friendly and good at what they do. The sandwiches are of high quality and definitely worth the price. This was my first experience with Blimpies, and I quite enjoyed myself.
This has to be one of the best cafes in Paris. The food is excellent and the Paris ambience of the rue cler is well worth the visit.
Best Ford dealer around!
I go at least once a week, and the food is always an A+. Best dim sum lunch east of the 605!
Last Saturday in Portland, it was over 100 degrees. Perfect day to be driven to four great breweries and learn a bit about Portland's great beer culture. Despite the fact that the OldPDX bus did not have air conditioning, the tour was well worth the money. If you like beer, hop on the bus!
Wonderful, Wonderful, Wonderful, Wonderful, dental office. The prices were amazing. The work was amazing. They did everything in their power to make me not hurt, and to make me not scared. I am clinically fearful of the dentist. I am squirming in my seat just thinking about the procedure, as I bite down on my gauze. Bottom Line: This is the best dentist I have ever been to. You will be treated fairly, and with true compassion for any fears you may have. A+++
None
Bob took great care of the Atlas technology team. He was very patient with us, going over and over the different options that fit within our budget. We highly recommend 10 Pound Gorilla for any and all web design and web marketing.
Before going here I went to a few other places close to where I live the prices they threw at me were insane... Advanced Muffler was the best price not disappointed at all the installed a new cat-back with a rocket exhaust and a white tip on my 2011 Nissan Versa and now I couldnt love my car anymore! They were super quick and knew their stuff the guy there helped me with all the questions I had and made some great recommendations. I will definitely be going here for anymore work I need done. --Chris--
Just got a volvo xc60 off this dealership. The customer service per sales was very good and post sales was excellent. James Susler Looked after us with price, services and the small stuff. Thanks.
Just at there last night, after a day of X-country skiing, and every second of the meal was exquisite. Well, maybe the house salad a little uninspired. Spring for the special salad if you have a yen for one. But the special I had, which they dubbed shrimp ragu, was fantastic.
This is a great little zoo, the new otter exhibit looks awesome
Popped in to see Avatar 14/1/10, screen 11 I think, and it all went very smoothly. On my Dayrider going in to Leeds I was thinking of course of all the things that could go wrong smelling my armpits, and I wanted the best possible position in the house, eye level, on a par with the screen. I got it. A seat perpendicular to the screen and sound system with my 3D glasses for 7.25. Your bogs are clean and tidy, your Staff helpful and informative, but why do people sit on the back row or near walls or under the screen? It felt like my own private Cinema. My only comment as a critic... My English teacher back in the 70's said a critic is positive. So there I am sat right in the middle of your Cinema. I'd give the storyline of Avatar a B+, slightly change the balance of sound to my left, the picture a wow factor and apart from that, Rock on Dude.
I have purchased two vehicles from Dave Smith motors and I rate them very highly. I traded in a Range Rover in 2011 for my new Denali and they beat my local dealership price by almost 10k. A year later I purchased a new Durango Citadel and again they beat the best local dealer price by 7k. I had the Durango shipped to Seattle for $400, it was a seamless transaction.
The first thing I noticed when I first came here was the Stumptown coffee. The only other places I have been able to get this coffee is Seattle, Portland and NYC. I have been craving this coffee for sometime so when I heard this place serves the coffee here, I knew I had to pay a visit. The layout of this cafe is pretty versatile; you have tables out front, stools at the bar, individual stools/tables on the side and seating upstairs. It's a pretty vibrant place unlike other coffee shops where patrons look like zombies and the ambiance is a bit depressing. The popularity of this place is evident in the rating on Yelp and also the difficulty in finding a seat here. It's a great place to grab lunch, meet a friend over coffee or get some work done (free wi-fi).
Don't know why everybody has to bang this place it's a sports bar not a 5 star restaurants go in and sit down and eat I don't get it
We have a fleet of 17 vehicles and engaged the Car Kit Company to install GPS tracking into a few of these vehicles. We were very impressed with their service and quality of workmanship. I can highly recommend them for any installations that you may have as we had a really good experience dealing with this very professional company.
Another GREAT experience at Cramer Honda of Venice! Al Issa is my guy and will always be my salesman! This is my third vehicle in the last 4 years from Cramer Honda and will go nowhere else. Dealing with Al, Lance O'Fallon and Tim Platt is always a pleasure as they make you feel like true friend and very welcome in their stoRE. I needed to stay within a certain budget and they did everything they could to accommodate. This is truly one of a kind dealership, and the Honda product speaks for itself! Go there, you won't be disappointed!!!
Love this doctor!
good food , dlecious
These folks are absolutely friendly and very keen on supporting each and everyone needs. They go beyond time required to show you around and offer the best possible options for you. Very friendly staff and most importantly well securized storage unit. Units are clean odor free, no rodents, and well lit. They also give you a free truck when you first move in. One of the best storage places and also very reasonable i their pricing. Highly recommend it!!!!
I love Yakitori Sake House of Boca! They have the best sushi around and the service is great. Can't wait to go back and get my favorite roll super ninja!
I have been dealing with Sheehy Ford for 15 years. I have had the pleasure of great service in both the sales and service department for all those years. I would recommend Sheehy to any of my friends or family.
It was a lot of fun! We went on a saturday afternoon. Great atmosphere, very friendly, decently priced and the staff is very helpful!
Waiting for Bangkok air line
best place ever! If you believe in the 4th "r" reuse, reduce, recycle and REPAIR, this is the place. Good service, good price and great fixes.
Truly excellent local fare, this is the only restaurant in the area that could hold its own in a more urban environment. There are no small town compromises here, instead, they use the local element to enhance an experience that would stand alone anywhere.
None
Excellent job, highly recommended! Preston from Premo Construction recently did not one but two home inspections for me and both times he was extremely thorough, knowledgeable and professional. In addition to providing an excellent write up with photographs he also took the time to show us areas of concern and offer tips on how we could fix it ourselves. Preston took the time to answer all of our questions and helped make buying our first home less stressful.
Really nice pub with food well beyond my expectations. Spot on all round as service was excellent as well.
It was my luck to watch a movie there. Its very hard to plan such buildings but the builders have done exceptional job.I like it.
I worked with Alfred Martus in purchasing my 2013 4Runner SR5. Not only was he friendly and courteous but, he was very knowledgeable in the products he sells. He went as far as taking me on 2 separate test drives, showed me his own vehicle for comparison, and worked with me to get a reasonable price. I would definitely recommend Alfred and Charles Maund Toyota to anyone interested in purchasing a Toyota.
Super knowledgeable staff who helped me get the hard-to-find parts I needed as well as going the extra mile to ensure they worked correctly with my classic car.
Food was excellent with great presentation. Price is also very fair for an all you can eat sushi place, menu is extensive. The service could've been a tad better with a little more smiles. This place was full on a Wednesday night, shows you the food is good! :-)
None
I had Mike at JungleTV do a quick one minute video for my business web-site. It was a fun time and I really enjoyed the quality of the finished product. I highly recommend JungleTV and Mike for any video production work you may need. Thanks JungleTV.
Tony & Leanne really know their stuff. The stuff they teach is not based on theory alone, they've walked the talk. But more than what they know and their ability to communicate it, they are all about action, and they will hold you accountable to make sure you take the steps required so that you can get results too. Thanks guys, looking forward to working with you even more in the future.
Dominos .............in SHopping Planet .........just amazing ............SRS Supermart easy way to shop
pinkie pro eyebrow and hair.
Great sashimi, super fresh! Make sure you really love sashimi if you order this since it is quite intense! 2 options at 35£ and 50£ for medium and big size sashimi boat! It is a great share for 2/3 people
None
I'm relatively new to Auckland so when my car needed some repairs, I needed a mechanic... Easier said than done in a new town! How do you find someone that is honest, fast, cheap and good at their trade? Anyway to cut a long story short, after searching online, I decided to give Your Neighbourhood Mechanic a go. Well! I feel like I've made a great choice. Chris (the mechanic and owner) is polite and friendly. He has an in depth knowledge and experience working with not only Japanese but also European vehicles (mine is an Audi) and above all he was honest, prompt and reasonably priced. I have now had my car serviced and repaired a couple of times here and have had such good experiences that I felt I should share the secret! I would highly recommend Your Neighbourhood Mechanic if you want a second opinion on a job or are looking for a new mechanic. Give Chris a call!
None
These guys have been fixing my cars for 25 years. Honest, smart, hard-working. They know their stuff.
Ahhhhhh....Mary's. Best Chinese food in Scotts Valley!! Mary is awesome & the food is always good. We have been eating here for 12 years & she never disappoints!!!
None
La carne a la piedra, exquisita, pero como el resto de la carta. Déjate aconsejar por Víctor.
None
Always great service from this group.
I found New City Moving by the reviews on Yelp. My experience was amazing! The movers were quick, efficient and very friendly. The whole entire move to the less than two hours, and my final bill was much less than the estimated amount.
None
Knowledgeable staff. Care about the customer. Nice shop, well merchandised.
Excellent care. Highly professional, courteous and caring staff. I had two dogs undergo emergency orthopedic surgery and Dr. Galesch was a miracle worker! This is the only place I would recommend to someone in or around Frederick in need of emergency or specialized pet treatment. It's not cheap, but that's because they use all the latest technologies and procedures, and the office is well-staffed by caring experts. This is by far the best specialized care you can provide for your pets in the Frederick area.
one of the best temple in this location
great and fast service today
Transglobal offers free services to its clients from exam tips to recommending and even preparing students for entrance and admission tests that are essential for admission to international universities. Contact us to know more details about IELTS, TEOFL, SAT, GRE, GMAT and PTE exams.
Loving the sales service of Mrs. Sara Love! The whole family at Norris Acura was very accommodating. They worked with my husband and me to attain a monthly payment plan within the constraints of our budget. They also found me a lower interest rate than the original 2.99 my bank offered. Sara's professionalism and easy-going attitude removed the stressful environment usually associated with that of a "pushy salesman." We found some minor issues with the SUV after we drove off the parking lot, but they immediately scheduled an appointment for us to come back and have them fixed. It was an easy process, and they gained a life-long customer.
Edgewood Animal Hospital is the best vet clinic we have ever attended. The office is located right down the street from our home so it is convenient to pick up food and prescriptions. Not only that, but all the workers are so kind, friendly, and offer top notch customer service. One of our dogs has had both knees operated on and thanks to Dr. Bruce, he is like a puppy again. He is 13 years old and is kept comfortable in his senior years through the use of medicine, exercise, and the loving care of EAH. Our other dog is 10 years old and was diagnosed as diabetic 3 years ago. I'm convinced that he has lived this long, comfortably, because of EAH and their treatment plan. We are kept up-to-date with the needs of our pets through postcards and emails. We are never left in the dark with where they stand in regards to their health and well-being. Although EAH is pricier than other vets, I am happy to pay a little more for such great care.
Everyone here is so nice and friendly! They certainly made my first visit a little less stressful and a had a great outcome! I will definitely be visiting this location again before my cruise in August! Thanks so much!!!!
Had a blast going to Vegas and staying at Palace Station from your website. I like that you emailed reminders of things to remember. I got a steal of a deal on the room as well, so thanks
None
I've been going to CPU for several years now. The staff is always friendly and helpful.
Loved it. In its own rough-and-tumble way, the broth was the equal of the finest demi glacé I've ever eaten. And the house pickles were outstanding.
Amazing selection of Flowers and Gifts. I found just the right arrangement for my Valentine this year. :) <3
Delicious wings, wonderful wait staff.
Went first time for any Bengali food. My friend and I ordered sizzling Rupchanda and Spicy Chicken Masala.Both were very spicy and delicious. We ordered Mango Lassi with it too. It was well complemented with the *kick* in dishes. The portion size is big and they also served salad with it.The food we ate could easily be shared among 3 people.We also got complimentary chocolate in the end. We paid £24 in total. The service is quick and the dishes is well cooked.The staff is polite. Place is clean and tidy and the aura is comforting too. I really liked the restaurant and going back for Hilsha some other time. A bit pricey but good value for money. MUST RECOMMENDED. :)
see all other ratings :)
None
Yolanda gave me my first microderm facial and it was great. I got a lot of compliments about how good my skin looked. I lost touch with her for a while and had other spas perform microderms for me but I didn't look or feel as good as Yoland's. I was so happy to find Yolanda and Speranzi Facial Spa again! She set the standard for me and no other place is as good! I would definitely recommend her and have done so to numerous family and friends!!
We have used them for party. Their food was excellent and they deliver it on time. We will use them in the future for sure.
BEST PIZZARIA EVER
Their pulled pork is great especially with the sizzlin' sweet sauce.
I have known Dr. Brokstein for over a year now. He is a very ethical and compassionate doctor. I highly recommend him and when it comes up I will personally refer patients to his office. A great asset to the public as well as the profession.
I can only describe our recent purchase of our Volkswagen as seamless and joyful. The staff and team at Audi-Volkswagen are friendly, courteous and professional. This is our 10th car purchase from New River Auto Mall and as long as I live in the lowcountry-- I will do my car shopping here. Thank you Warner, Kahn, Sunny, Chad, Nikki and Danielle!
I scheduled a consultation with Simon Goldenberg to discuss my student loan debt. He was extremely knowledgable, friendly, and honest. I highly recommend the one on one consultation, and I look forward to working with him in the near future.
My husband bought a new Nissan Sentra from Gary back in 2003. His experience was so positive that we decided to return our business with Bommarito Nissan to trade in the Sentra for a 2012 Rogue. Matt was very professional & clearly had experience in dealing with car sales. He treated us well from the very beginning & never haggled with us on price. He understood our budget and worked in our favor to bring the price down to what we can afford while still getting us into a new car. Kyle was also very professional & courteous as he also worked with our budget for the extended warranty. Both Matt & Kyle were patient & understanding with our toddler as they have little ones of their own. Thank you to everyone at Bommarito for making my family feel important & giving us an overall positive experience!
Anthony Laden and his team at Jobspring are consummate professionals. They were meticulous about finding opportunities that fit my interests and skills. I would recommend them without hesitation or reservation.
If you can't find what you need in this place, then make it yourself, because obviously you're doing something crazy like making an atom smasher or something. Wait - you could find the supplies to make it yourself there too!
THE best wings in Denver. Best wings I have had maybe ever...they offer a smoked version and I believe a deep fried version, I highly recommend the smoked wings. Spectacular, I am going back there today as my friend and I both enjoyed it the last time.
I had one of the Oreo Cheesequake Blizzards tonight... YUM!!
Liebevolle Ladenbesitzer, günstige Angebote (wie sonst nirgends in Zürich) und für alle Ledertaschenliebhaber ein absolutes Mekka! Von Akten- bis zur Reisetasche alles zu finden.
None
Best veg restaurant @ decent price
Rachel was so wonderful to work with! I was very comfortable and she was able to help me pose so my best features were displayed. I was so thrilled when I saw my images- they were amazing! I definitely will be recommending her for glamour portraits and for everything else in between.
The guys at Doctors Express are amazing! You get great service with a very reasonal price... much cheaper than going to the emergency room. The facility is very clean and they can do most everything under one roof. Go see them for your urgent care needs
I Love this place. Everyone is always friendly and willing to help. They have great variety of quality vaping supplies. I recommend it to anyone looking start vaping, got jipped because you paid too much across town or got some knock off that was real cheap and you found out why when it start leaking a week after you got it.
None
I work in my yard 1/2 acre, it's on a slight hillside. My first visit was more than I had imagined it to be Shea work on the back& legs I felt some pain, he worked the knots out. Yes I will be going back. If you want a excellent massage contact Shea, you will not regret it.
CJ is my lady! She is the only I see at this salon and she is phenominal. I always get compliments on my cuts from her. In addition to being incredibly talented, she's an authentic and entertaining person that's fun to talk to. Her style is definitely more on the edgy side, but she's helped me step into some really bold changes with my look! She was the first person I went to when I donated 14 inches of my hair to Locks of Love and since then I've been feeling more and more comfortable with shorter and sexier hair. Thank you CJ!
Where I live
None
This place was the most professional, the most fun, the most friendly experience I have ever had in a "touristy" activity!f I loved loved loved everyone - our grandson(6) and grandaughter(1) had a great time. The talk was not canned, but very informational, and personal. Thank you all for making this a wonderful experience. I will bring other family members here as they come down to visit!
The service is always very professional. Our sales rep (Paul) is knowledgeable and went the extra mile to be sure we got the vehicle we expected. At the end of the sale, he walked through the vehicle operations with me so I was aware of all the features and maintenance requirements. Terrific service!!
The sales meeting and pre-assessment were both excelent. On teh day of install the team arrived on time and knocked the work out in a timely manner. Out house had some setteling issues and they were able to work thru these and make the door fit. The windows and door look better than expect and operate as advertised. I would highly recommend Power and we will use them again.
My first time there I really wanted the sundae (I forget what its called) but you were out of ice cream. Sad day. But the carrot cake is GOOD!!! Excuse me, KILLER CARROT CAKE!!! Yum!! :D
Infinitely better value and experience compared to Chipotle!!
So good.
Excellent customer service! The managers are great!
The place and design is great! Good Djs all nights and friendly and professional staff!
None
I got my first tattoo here and plan to get all of my future ones here as well! So talented and friendly. They made sure I could fit my appointment in before I moved back to school and had no problem answering all of my first-timer questions.
decent community theatre. also fun to volunteer.
This is by far my favorite far east restaurant in this area. The food is excellent in every way, the presentation is very nice. The atmosphere is almost like visiting a friend in their home for dinner. The owner/ operator is a very beautiful and gracious lady who takes her quests as serious friends she has known for years and invited to spend a little time with her and her family for dinner. I only take my close family and very best friends there because I know they will enjoy their meal and the beautiful atmosphere. A perfect place be alone with people you enjoy being around.
WP24 had an amazing view of downtown LA! The Chinese chive crystal dumplings starter was really spice and good! I would recommend it !
Cori is amazing! She is easy to work with, she produces high quality images and offers such a variety of services which is great!!! I have recommended her to family and friends and will continue to do so!!
Deservedly popular place. Very attentive and friendly service, never overbearing. Good food. The vegetarian red curry was delicious: crunchy vegetables, coconut milk just piquant enough. Clearly they use the best ingredients and the cook knows what she or he is doing.
Hervorragende Werkstatt, fachkompetent, zuverlässig, preisWERT!
I have eaten cupcakes, cookies, cakes, some sort of 'atomic ball' (I forget the name), and have seen large cakes designed by Shockley's Sweet Shoppe. The cupcakes/cakes (they sometimes sell small cakes) are delicious. The designs they come up with are not only top notch, they are original. They are not copying other peoples designs, they are creating their own and setting trends. (See their chocolate/vanilla split cake that has been in magazines) I have watched the staff deal with me and others with utmost respect and professionalism. I have sat there eating a cupcake and watch people come in, buy cupcakes or pick up cakes and stay 15-20 minutes just to talk to them. I can not recommend Shockley's Sweet Shop enough!
I've experienced a ton of different burgers in my life, but none that can compare to the Bully Burger at Bel Campo....it just melts in your mouth Goes great with a side of beef talo fries. Other notables are the pulled pork sandwich, and warm root side dish.
The people at Colonial were great: very professional, helpful, knowledgeable and concerned about me being satisfied with the vehicle and the deal. I tested several vehicles on the first trip there, but the timing wasn't right for my financial situation. They did not bug me at all. I returned several weeks later and they showed me more options and everything worked that time. I am very pleased with the vehicle and the deal. Highly recommend you do business here. GMC has set a new standard of excellence and luxury with Sierra. What a marvelous piece of engineering! Colonial is committed and experienced in helping make this an enjoyable and affordable experience. Ask for Paul.
I Just picked up my new car and I couldn't be happier! I had a great experience from when I walked in the door till when I picked my car up. My salesman Jack was great! He was friendly, professional, very knowledgeable and overall a pleasure to deal with. Jack got back to me in a timely fashion and he never pressured me when it came to me making my decision. I would recommend Jack and Audi Fairfield to anyone that is looking for an Audi.
Great person to work with!!
Awesome Restraunt overall great taste if you're looking for new tastes
Thank you so much for sending someone out on such short notice. Our heat went out and everyone we called was out of the office or on vacation. Good to know you guys are there and fixed my heating fast!! Now the the wife is happy, the kids are happy, so I can be happy. Thanks so much!! Will be calling again if we ever have a problem!
One of the best restaurant in coorg. Ambience is nice and very reasonable. Good for family outing.
Awesome food! Burgers, rings, shakes! And... EXPENSIVE!
Song is great -- friendly, knowledgable, professional and kind. A real gem to find.
Great place to eat. Friendly staff.
JOSHUA COCKERAM!!! Spent several hours at Dick's Mackenzie Ford today with Sales Associate Joshua Cockeram. Best time I've ever spent at an auto dealership. Joshua showed me several autos and went through the new 2014 Fusion from top to bottom. This guy really knows his stuff. Very professional. I'm 66 years old and my first impression caused me to think he was too young and inexperienced. Boy was I wrong. I didn't buy today, but I had no intentions of doing so when I arrived. However, if my decision is to finally buy a Ford product, I will buy from that dealership, if not from Joshua. Bravo!
Joel and Charlie are the best! They have been working on all our family cars for 10+ years, and we have always found them honest, reliable and friendly. I recommend these guys to everyone I know! A good mechanic is hard to find...look no further than C&J!
Customer Service was very helpful. He helped me with all the information that i needed to know.
Did an amazing job at my wedding. Thank you... :)
None
a very good place to eat i would eat there 8 out of 10 times
As a fellow colleague of Dr. Bernstein I can say without a doubt he is one of the most fired up and passionate orthodontists I have ever met. He loves what he does and will not settle for mediocrity. This translates into a perpetual desire to excel and provide nothing but excellence for himself and his patients. Keep up the great work Dr. Bernstein, you are an inspiration to us all! Best, Dr Eric Wu
Have visited a number of times and not been disappointed yet, absolutely cracking pub if you're looking for fantastic food and proper beers.
None
Nádherný interiér, super obsluha a výborný mořský ďas na talíři spláchnutý dobrým vínem, co k tomu dodat. Ceny na Prahu taky více než obstojné. Určitě to za to stojí si tam po dni stráveném nákupy v Metropoli udělat procházku. Díky.
None
Great food, nice people.
None
None
Wow super ba
They didn't have Eggplant Parm on the menu, but made it for me anyway!
(Last review should be ignored, not sure what sexual orientation has to do with anything,and TVs dont belong in fine dining...) My husband and I recently enjoyed dinner at this restaurant, service was amazing, staff were friendly and helpful with food and wine pairings. Our food came out in good timing and was delicious! Try the creme brule!
Piatti di qualità.... molto carino il locale....prezzo giustissimo
This was an amazing experience. Live nearby, so bought Season Passes. TOTALLY WORTH IT!
None
Did a tour of the Montalcino winery Casato Prime Done with Antonella who's incredibly knowledgable, speaks excellent English and is a wonderful host. Very highly recommended!
I was having some lower back and some neck pain. I received immediate relief in both areas after coming in for the first time. The doctor consulted me on some of my habits to help with the neck pain, which has not been an issue after the first visit. The lower back pain took a bit longer, but I've been pain free for a while now.
Best bar in HB says Kory Whit
Stopped in for some late dinner. The bartender offered prompt and friendly service. Atmosphere was nice with great music and plenty of tvs. Will definitely be back!
Thanks to NOW! Marketing Services' website design and SEO efforts, our on-line visibility has improved significantly. We continue to work with Matt and his talented staff as they help us grow our business. George(Chi-City Enterprises)
Excellent.................................... I will Recommend all for this Company
Great place, fair price, nice staff. It's the perfect place to spend a weekend at.
None
I have a great experience with Andy Liu. He helped me to find the car which fit my personal need. After driving it for a week, I am so glad to buy the car. Thank you everyone in the dealership.
Lugar Famíliaaaa....
ABCD Computers Came To My Rescue! Once again Pete helped me solve many questions I had regarding my computer and my sanity! I have an opportunity with a new potential employer that would not be possible if it were not for ABCD Computers today. My stress and anxiety always disappear after Pete has finished the job. Thank you for your ongoing support & patience. Best Regards, Karen W (Loyal Client Since 2010) I have been working with ABCD Computers since 2010 and have had them repair my computer 4 times. I am so pleased to know that when my computer crashes I have Pete to make my nightmare disappear. Although my computer is fixed with expertise and efficiency every time, I am most grateful for Pete educating me on Anti-virus software, and for providing me with simple steps to make the most out of an aging computer, and my overall computer experience. Thank you again ABCD Computers! Karen W
Novo album da Beyoncé já se encontra na loja \o/
I went to the Gaston County Public Library to one of the meetings. Lots of helpful information. I went to Conner Financial Group for a free consultation after I attended the meeting. Everyone in the office was so nice and helpful. Mr. Conner and his associate Mr. Ratchford were super! It was time well spent and I commend this organization for helping people near retirement. Thanks Conner Financial for all you do for the citizens of Gaston County!
Taco Johns has a great selection of food that differs from taco bell. Their potato Oles area must have. I like mine with extra seasoning. * Open early for breakfast! Try their breakfast burritos. Bacon is my favorite, with ranch. I wish they were open later at night though. For my after bar close munchies. I think they close at 10pm. Open about 8am.
I have worked with San Marcos Root Canal Specialists and Austin Root Canal Specialists for over 2 years. Dr. Khosravian is very conscientious with the treatment of his patients. It's a real pleasure to work with him
None
C'est le magasin de référence en ce qui concerne les produits de fête à Levallois. Je suis tellement content d'habiter près de ce magasin, où je m’approvisionne essentiellement en ballons et confettis pour mes sessions photo de couples dans Paris. J'ai toujours été accueilli chaleureusement et servi correctement. Je recommande !
We always have great experiences at Performance Chrysler Dodge Jeep. Friendly and polite staff. Their service hours are unbelievable – 6am to 3am. Facility is clean. They have courtesy latte, cappuccino, etc while you wait, computers, WIFI, etc for customers to use. I wouldn’t go anywhere else for oil change but Performance Chrysler Dodge Jeep.
None
None
great store, always has what i need in stock and more! i cant believe the selection. super friendly and knowledgeable staff, too, cameron listens to needs and makes sure you leave with just what you need. they stand by every product they sell and make sure the customer leaves happy. will be returning, and will be telling my friends!
After doing my diligence and research about tires, I found Tire Hut online by accident while searching for the best rate on Suimitomo Tires for my Lexus LS430 L with 19" rims. All the rims were good. I requested a quote on line and the GM Jerry emailed me back before the end of the day with a quote and all of the important information I would need to know when making the right decision about my purchase. The cost of the tires new were about 35% below the best price I could find for the new tires, balance and installation and disposal fee. The next day, I went to his location in Sunrise by 8:00 AM on a Saturday. They took my car right away and I was out by 9:10 AM. Jerry R. was a consummate professional, concerned and caring about my experience and being concise with regards to my services. I would highly recommend Tire Hut to anyone and everyone seeking a great price for new tires and outstanding service. Thank you Jerry & Thank you Tire Hut. JB Jeffrey Bryer
It is the only restaurant by Newport Beach pier that lets people dine outside. Beautiful setting and great spot for people watching. I recommend the mahi wrap and, for breakfast, the french toast.
Great place
None
We had a wonderful time staying here, the proprietors are very friendly and the house is a real treat. Great history and convenient to downtown.
From start to finish, they were great. We bought a used car for under $10,000 and they took care of everything. Very professional and courteous. We will certainly be back!
Electronics Showroom...
Guys at Pro Audio are extremely easy to work with and are very nice. I took my wife's vehicle in to get a speaker replaced and Ben was very helpful in showing me what I could replace her speakers with, now she enjoys the new sounds in her car. The service was quick and with no hassle.
My husband and I renewed our 15 year wedding vows on November 30, 2013. It was such a Beautiful day! We couldn't have asked for a more! The chapel was romantic and the views were breathtaking! The minister was very friendly and the staff was awesome! They made us feel relaxed from the moment we got there. I would definitely recommend Angels View to anyone! Erica
None
Best Hotel in Town
Prices are high for the material products, but the info is a goldmine they give away free. I'm a CO native that left for the PNW for 16 years with the military. In the PNW I got into cider making through friends. Twice before I've tried brewing beer and quickly came to understand where the term "beer snob" came from. There's none of that at Barley Haven. Talking about the things I do out of the mainstream were met with interest rather than criticism and I was invited to come back when I had more time to learn more about brewing beer at no charge. I've been to Barley Haven twice now and both times experienced the exact opposite of what I expected in the Beer Capitol of the US (according the NPR, CO exports more beer than WI, CA and MO COMBINED). I've no doubt that I will become a regular despite the high mark up on actual products. If the tall bald guy or Elvis Costelo's twin (I'm terrible with names) spend half an hour explaining why hops are toasted or not, isn't that worth the extra $5 for a carboy?
None
A lot of TV's, good beer, good food. Seating options are limited, so you have to get there early before big games. Fun atmosphere.
If you want to have one of the best brunch in Berling you can go here! Good food, good price, good service, beautiful waitress
Herr Simo hat magische Hände! Mit sehr viel Gefühl und Geschick kommt er den kleinen Imbalancen im Körper auf die Schliche und rückt sanft und sicher alles wieder an den rechten Platz.
We only stayed the one night, but had 4 rooms between our family party. The rooms were excellent, cool and comfortable with the 48 degrees outside. Pool was a lovely oasis with free smoothies and frozen fruit sticks provided.one of the best hotel in india
We have purchased 8 different vehicles at Bud Kouts and have always been treated like family. Ted Holmberg in sales and Dave in the service department are two of the best customer service people in all of the Lansing area. I highly recommend Bud Kouts for a fair deal, service after the purchase and for giving you that "family member" feeling when dealing with them. They are the official car dealership of the Slocum family! -Britt Slocum
None
とっても優しく親切な先生です。落ち着いた空間で治療していただけます。歯医者さんのイメージが変わりました。
I have been using SBT for all my graphic needs, from truck lettering to simple signs. They are fast and reliable, producing top quality signage. The owners of the store are Always friendly no mater what, and they have a great set of people working with them. I recommend Signs By Tomorrow to take care of your graphics. Thank you and keep up the good work!
I was in search of a replacement Expedition because my engine had went up in my 2001. I stumbled across this place in Annapolis on line that had what I was looking for, so I made the trip from Baltimore to see if the vehicle would be worth the purchase. To my surprise, ACC was by far, the best used car dealer I had ever been to. The 2007 was in excellent shape, it ran extremely smooth, they gave me the car fax upon request, they provided finance for the vehicle with a better rate then my bank, and there service was so wonderful. So wonderful that my wife traded her car in on the spot and bought one also. We came home with 2 cars and only went to get one... Great service will do that to you. I will most definitely be sending my family and friends who are in search of a vehicle to the Annapolis Car Center. Pastor JT
None
My husband and I brought our 2008 Toyota Tundra in to Heartland after seeing the dreaded Check engine light come on. We made the hour plus drive down to the dealership and I couldn't have been more pleased that we did. Upon arrival the Assistant Service Manager, Scott Moritz was on it. Everyone has these suspicions that working with a dealership's service department is going to cost you time, money and that the employees can often be rude or arrogant. That couldn't be further from the truth at Heartland. Their expertise resulted in less man hours on the job costing less money and time. Scott was a pleasure to work with, easily reachable and I felt like getting to the bottom of our problem was his number one concern. He is comfortable, confident and qualified, easily identifying problems with our vehicle that took our mechanic weeks to locate. What more could you ask for? This service department has the feel of your local shop where they want to get to know you and your vehicle. I highly recommend them and Scott, together they make a great team.
He was friendly, helpful, fast and professional. He came out within hours of my call to help get the furnace working. I like the pricing as well.
None
Best Philly Cheesesteaks outside of Philly.
soooperrrrrb
Great location. Rooms are also very neat and nice. Newly done with a contemprary feel.
None
Chino is still as funky, fantastic and fabulous as it always was. The music is a perfect mix of funky house grooves. The room feels intimate and still looks perfect for a dinner date in red and black. And the food is as fresh, tasty and creative as before. The chicken tempura in a mango chilli sauce I just had is testament to that. When the Arena is in full swing, this place will be packed. Just make sure you don't miss out.
None
great quality and quantities of burgers and fries, and very good service in a casual atmosphere
None
Uff... buenisímo... Me encanta ....
Worked with Brad from the sales department - I spent two months and ~15 dealerships looking for a Yamaha FX HO for what I wanted to spend. Not only did I find it at Orlando Yamaha, they threw in a cover, fire extinguisher, and two life jackets. They beat the next closest dealer by $500 and the furthest by $3,000. Thanks guys, I'm a lifelong customer now - I'll be looking for a Mule this coming January.
Great service, high quality, reasonable prices. What more can you ask for? And the German Sausage is AMAZING!
The dog looks good!
On December 6, 2012 I bought a brand new 2013 Hyundai Elantra GT with the Touch & Go Package. I am extremely happy with my purchase and felt comfortable working with John Sacco to finalize my decision to buy the car. The price was reasonable for a brand new model car, and given there was not a very large inventory being held. I would definitely recommend Burns Hyundai to anyone looking to purchase their next vehicle.
Comida espectacular! muy barato y los camareros son muy agradables. Merece mucho la pena
Stopped in on the way home from Dallas. Great chain restaurant to eat. I pretty well stay with the same plate each time I eat JC: Chicken Marsala. There was nothing particularly special about this one, but the waitress and other staff were very professional.
Was enjoyed by everyone yesterday. All loved the salads. They were excellent.
None
Absolutely love this place! Han and the rest of the staff are amazing. It is the only place I go-I refer as many people as I can. Super clean environment and everyone goes above and beyond when it comes to taking care of you. I always get the spa pedi-its a must have!
I've known of Pixels for a long time, been renting from them on occasion for the past year or so, but this past week I finally had the opportunity to print with them. The image turned out great! Exactly how it looked on screen, and at 24x36 it was nice to see it so clearly. The employee that helped me with the print was very friendly, we started talking about mattes and she quickly led me over to their section of matte corners where I spent quite a while going through there huge selection. They let me lay my photo out on one of the tables so I could pick just the right matte for the photo. I figured it all out and had them cut the matte. They had to order the matte in but even with that it was 2 days turn-around. Which was fantastic! I could have an image printed matted and framed within days. When I went back in to pick up the matte the employee that helped me was also very friendly. This makes the biggest impression on me, when the people helping me, especially at a place that is for those that do/love something (like photography), clearly enjoy there jobs I am just that much more likely to enjoy my experience and the outcome of the product. This place gets 5 stars from me.
We travel a lot in the U.S. We always use Hertz. We are never disappointed. Hertz in Las Vegas is no exception. Easy in, easy out, accurate billing, clean dependable car.
The most friendliest staff I have ever known/met. Always greeted with a smile. Will definitely miss everyone when Noah completes his treatment. :(
great food, great decor, amazing atmosphere! their Carne Asada is some of the best I've ever had. Guacamole is to die for. and everything else I've ever had I've loved. know the owner well, and before he opened this place he went to mexico and lived with a woman for 3 months, she taught him and 3 of his staff how to cook. cant get any more traditional than that. love this place!
Classic Burger of Los Gatos serves the best Patty Melt I have ever had the good fortune of tasting! The rye bread they serve it on is excellent, and they have the option of getting it prepared with avocado, which is a perfect addition to the grilled onions, melty cheese and beef patties in the sandwich. Definitely a must order. In addition, the people who run the restaurant are very friendly.
Freundliche Bedienung. Super Qualität der Produkte.
I stopped by here and *another* local gun store on Saturday and wow, what a difference. I used GunEnvy for a transfer awhile back and they did great, no problems. This trip was just for browsing for a new handgun and comparing models. The gentleman was extremely helpful and talked to me about the pro's and con's of different handguns without getting frustrated that I wasn't buying right then. This store is way more my speed. I was one of 3 customers there that morning, and I had their full attention. Any and all of my firearms purchases in the future will probably go through GunEnvy for a transfer or be purchased there. Great place, great guys, great atmosphere. This is how I would run a gun store if I had one.
My family and I were vacationing in Coeur d'Alene last summer, and on a whim, we decided to rent a boat to check out the lake. We called around, and chose KJ Watersports. We arrived at their location, and met with an employee that walked us through the sign-up process. She answered all of our questions quickly and efficiently, and got us on our way. Another staff member towed the boat to the lake, got it off the trailer and tied it up to the dock. All we had to do was hop in, and enjoy. The boat was in great condition, and perfect for our little outing. We had a great time riding the tube, exploring the shoreline, and enjoying the nice weather. Turn in was a breeze. We met a KJ employee at the dock, hopped out, and he took care of the rest. We followed him to the gas station to refill the boat's tank, and we were on our way. I recommend KJ Watersports very highly, and hope your experience is as good as ours was.
It's a beautiful mosque built like Al-Aqsa mosque.
Great place to eat. Staff is friendly, food is delicious.
Seriously awesome pizza!! You can tell that Bella Rosa makes their pizzas to order and with fresh ingredients. The cheese was great and the homemade sausage was to die for!!! Kudos to a new restaurant for being able to knock it out of the park the first time around. I'll be back ASAP!
BLUE FLAME Family Restaurant at 13 Satluj Block in Moon Market
Excellent care and service! My lab and I have been coming here since day one and receiving great care every time.
The process of buying our new car was painless and quick. The paperwork took minimal amount of time, and we were out with our car quicker than ever before. Thanks!
Essen & Service immer Top!
None
I went in for an annual cleaning and left with a new crown as well as a very clean mouth. I have had no discomfort since having the crown replaced and would highly recommend this office for outstanding care and attention to the individual needs of the patient. Even a warm blanket is provided to those of us who get cold when sitting still too long! Cheers!
I have been a long-time customer at Marc Younts in Evans. The crew down there have always been top notch and they really support the local automotive enthusiasts. Randal, Marc, Jeff and the rest of the crew my hats off to you guys for doing what you do. Great people and great service.
None
Ottima qualità delle carni, ambiente ospitale, personale preparato e veloce, ampia scelta.
Good job - nơi thông tin xác thực và giao dịch bất động sản nhanh chóng
Riquísimo, aunque un poco lento. Cualquier spaghetti y las pizzas son deliciosas, en especial el calzone.
I came in with hopes and left with a smart car. My car I came with was a salvage, but Randall said he could see what he could do. After two test drive, an hour or two, and a couple of offers of coffee I left with my 2013 Pure. Everyone was friendly and I very much enjoyed my time with Randall as we waited for the financing.
The hotel is bran new, designed in a modern look. Check in was fast enough. Room was big and perfectly clean, minibar, internet and payTV all included. Windows sealed any potential noise from outside. The real highlight was the breakfast (not included), serving in a kind which can match to any 5star hotels.
None
I'm a fan.
We had a wonderful stay here at the hotel, especially with the staff. The entire staff was attentive, pleasant and wonderful. From the front desk through the breakfast staff. We want to especially mention Tanya at the front desk. From the time we arrived until our departure she has been great. When we were about take our trip to Luray Caverns she offered us the "paper bag" breakfast...muffins, water etc. It was just what we needed. My husband received the best service with the business center. The rooms were clean and smelled fresh :). My only complaint was the sound coming from the refrigerator. It would buzz every half hour like an alarm clock, but that was temporary. We would recommend this site highly.
Friendly staff with great product knowledge! Sales process was super easy and left happy :)
Adoro o bar do Edu. Ambiente descontraído, parece um bar de bairro no meio da Vila Olímpia. Faço questão de trazer todos os meus amigos!
I am in the automotive ecommerce business and have spent my entire career working with auto repair shops. Listen up and listen good. This shop is absolutely perfect. They do top notch work, offer super competitive pricing, and do not waste your time. Rafi the owner is perhaps the most efficient owner/operator that I have ever had the pleasure of dealing with.
Addy's dutch bar is indeed a original dutch bar. It felt like home, and can't wait to get back and grab a nice meal. I enjoyed the music, and excellent beer collection! BRAVO! If you want to grab a original meal, go to Addy's.
None
None
Rocio Bradley was most courteous and knowledgeable and when she had to check with the insurer, I was only on hold for a minute. She seems VERY knowledgeable about her products and pricing and I was treated with the utmost in respect and courtesy. She did not attempt to rush the conversation and treated me like I was the most important thing to her at the time. Thank you!
IBG
Buone le focaccie <3 o_O
The Lonestar Mansion is exactly what I was looking for when I dreamed of how my wedding would be! It has everything you could ever need for the ceremony and reception so takes away a lot of the stress involved with planning a wedding and the estate is absolutely breathtaking so makes for some gorgeous pictures. This Texan would recommend this wedding and reception resort to anyone!
Relax amongst the Macadamia trees. The best place in this area for Sunday brunch. Excellent cup of coffee.
None
i visited the store on 5th avenue not too long ago. i found that the customer service was great, the associates we're very helpful and friendly i dealt with sales person Mitch, he was very helpful, and had great knowledge of all of the merchandise in the store, he was able to direct me right to product i was looking for, he was also able to give me some gift ideas for friends and family, ranging from all different ages. If you ever stop in the store, i definitely recommend asking for him. Not to mention they had a great selection to choose from. i was very satisfied with the overall visit. i definitely recommend stopping in the store, when you're in NYC.
My husband and I have been staying at the Birchwood Inn for at least the last 15 years -- and we wouldn't consider staying anyplace else. Every room in the Inn is a gem, the staff and service is exceptional, and the breakfasts are without a doubt the best I have ever had -- anywhere. In the past, we had always stayed at the Birchwood during the summer months, but lately I've been coming up on my own nearly every month to get some quality work done for my clients (without the distractions of home). I've now stayed there every season and each season the Inn has it's particular charms and comforts: the peaceful porch in the warm months, the comfy sitting room and parlor (with fireplaces) in the winter. I really do consider this my home away from home. Seeing Ellen upon my arrival always warms my heart. She really knows how to make her guests feel welcome and comfortable.
CyberpowerPC builds a very solid PC and provides an excellent website for custom pc. It very fast delivery from the time they start build to time the time I received it takes less than a week. I would highly recommend to anyone who are interested in custom pc build to visit cyberpowerCP website.
Awesome people helped me out with printing out Texans tickets!
Great hoagies
My first experience with Fix-A-Frame dated back to 1999. The environment was warm and friendly and the art on display was amazing! The owner of Fix-A-Frame, David Schummy still has the old fashion way of servicing the customer- first class service and always opens the door for his delighted customers. Be ready to be entertained and involved by him whilst learning lots during the two way custom design process. He framed my Moon Oil Painting personally- still today is much loved by me.
Great use of time if you're traveling through Charleston! We booked a great hotel and scored some deeply discounted carriage and harbor tickets! You won't be disappointed.
My company and I love the prices and appreciate the service! StickersBanners were very efficient which their customer service. The process of creating the banners where almost effortless as well! Thank you for working with us!
None
Is a good hotel!
I placed an online order for my mothers 78th birthday. My mom absolutley loved the arrangement. She said they looked and smelled wonderful. I live in Virginia Beach, VA and my mom lives in Tucson, AZ. Placing orders from such a distance can be risky. But after my mom recieved the flowers, I knew I chose the right company. Thanks again for a job well done!!
It was awesome. Felt like the bars back home!!!
Small gun store that I found advertising on Backpage. The selection was not huge but they had fair selection of Glock and Springfield Armory, both new and used. What makes this place stand out is the prices. I saved $30.00 on my purchase!
Love this place and so does my dog, Olive. The staff are absolutely incredible and so kind and energetic. Even when i am being a ridiculous dog owner they are nothing but understanding and helpful. Olive goes to camp 2-3 days a week and boards a couple nights once a month. She always runs into camp bow wows doors and can't wait to to go play.
None
My Favorite Gallery in Asheville, bar none. Christin, the gallery owner, surprised me. At first I thought she was just a sales-girl; I just started talking with her and found her very helpful, and she was a good listener. The Mix is very eclectic. There were several great glass artists that caught my eye, and they had a very nice collection of my favorite: Raku. I ended up getting two beautiful paintings,.which she shipped to my house for me. This will be my first stop next time I am in Asheville!
So happy that we used U.S. Remodeling when it was time to add a addition to our house. Out of three different contractors they were the most reasonably priced and the work was top notch. Definitely recommended!
None
A cracking pub, with great people.. A real example of ... It does exactly what it says on the tin....
None
Our room was very comfortable, but smaller than I had envisioned. The staff was very friendly and helpful and was always there to answer any of our questions. The view of the ocean was breathtaking. I would highly recommend this facility to anyone staying in the area.
Great campground very helpful and informal. Many things to do here like volleyball swimming basketball. Very fun and I loved it.
Phenomenal I got great deal on a 2013 VW Passot very roomy and it had all the bells and whistles my sales associate Fernando Fantastic was very helpful answered all my questions it was a very smooth transaction I even got a $25 Starbucks just for showing up they kept all there promises .
Rusty Eck Ford is the only dealership that that I will purchase a vehicle from and the only service dept. I take my vehicles to. Very friendly staff and great service.
The owner Aaron is the world's most chirpiest guy with an extraordinary skill of making yummy but strong mochachino's. Cafe Urania, itself is an experience. The moment you walk in, it's as if you have been transported back to the 70's but I could have my decade wrong. Lol. Highly recommend Cafe Urania for it's beautiful coffees and yummy cakes! Absolutely delicious! Thank you Aaron!
None
My favorite place to be for tailgating on game day. The parking on the inner lot is reserved in advance for the entire year, across the street is public but costly. Music is always great (typically a live band on game day), out door food booth is fast and decently priced considering what you pay inside the stadium.
This was the best experience I've ever had purchasing a car. Terri was very friendly. the facility was very clean. i will buy at with Terry Bellamy at Bartow Ford from now on!
None
James and his team never let us down !! Servicing a wide range of our vehicles from fleet vans, to American muscle cars - and of course Mercedes Benz
Do tohoto podniku sa oplatí ísť na dobré pivo, je fakt fantastické, za gatronomickým zážitkom by som ale šiel inam, hodnotim len pivo,
What a great place to stay! All the staff was very nice.
Awesome place, descent prices.
Just went in for my first maintenance service, and there was zero hassle. The work was done quickly, and the service was excellent. Great job Karl Malone Toyota!
I love Trinity Tattoo. Great people work there, and great people own it. The atmosphere is very welcoming, and the people at the desk greet you like they know you (though they do know me). This particular review is about my Breast Cancer Ribbon tattoo that I got on Tuesday, June 12, 2012. Dave Lukeson was my tattoo artist. He is awesome. He knew exactly what I wanted and all I gave him to go on was a picture of a pink ribbon that looks a little tattered at the ends. He took time to explain to me why the ribbon was going to face a specific way and made sure it was the size I wanted. It is about 3 inches long on my left rib cage, close to my chest. My mom has the same one on her left shoulder blade, and my sister has one on her left rib cage as well. This year my 23rd birthday will mark the 10th year anniversary of my mom's double mastectomy and hysterectomy, and in turn 10 years of being cancer free. This tattoo is my tribute and kind of my version of the tattoo with the heart and the scroll that reads "Mom" across it. It's simple in design, the colors are beautiful, and its not just pink, there are purples and light and dark tones of pinks and white, and it looks like it was painted on. It was what I could see in my head, but couldn't explain, but it turns out I didn't have to. Dave and I had steady conversation the entire 2 to 3 hours I sat awkwardly in a chair. He made me feel very comfortable and took time to make sure I was doing okay (the ribs aren't fun). He was even excited to do something simple, and even though it's a simple breast cancer ribbon, it's beautiful in that simplicity. He made sure to go over the after care and told me to come in after about a week to make sure I was healing well. And once its fully healed I will be going back for a check up. I had the best experience and I am excited to get more work done eventually by Dave or any of the other great artists, and also the great piercing artist, Ms. Alley Bangarang. Thank you all for the great experience and I look forward to coming back for all my tattoo/piercing needs!
Great coffee, great service, great atmosphere.
Quality please, great food, drinks and service
Terrific tour of the distillery and a great place to grab an Irish Coffee prepared the RIGHT way. Surprised that they they turn out such a great product with only 300 employees. Only wish I could have fit several bottles in my returning luggage, especially the "only available here" whiskey.
Wonderful food and wonderful people. I will return soon; they serve the best gyro in this area.
I really felt loose after the classes at dahn yoga. also it seems like it's helping me to mentally calm down too. Now I can handle things with better attitude..^^
Love the food, there is a dish with plantains that is excellent. Cuban sandwich is great too. The owner, Daniel, makes sure you feel welcomed and are really getting the best experience possible. They make great coffee drinks too with the espresso machine. Highly recommend for lunch. Affordable and authentic.
Great place to find office furniture in Phoenix. The fact that they have both new and used furniture to choose from is great!
Dr. T is awesome! Nice, efficient, thorough and caring. What more do you want in an eye doctor?! I would highly reccomend her to anyone looking for an optometrist!
None
Very good Italian! One of the best homemade pasta dishes I've had!
Fabulous special Lamb kebab looking forward to next one.
I didn't think I could ever have a pleasant experience at the dentist, but I am living proof that it does happen! He was very nice and explained everything to me before he did any work. Plus his nurse held a small camera on my mouth so I could see what was going on. It was amazing. I had another dentist tell me that I needed more that $8,000 dollars worth of work on my teeth, but Dr. Thomas told me I only needed a small portion of that work done. My boyfriend hadn't been to the dentist in over 10 years because he was afraid of what they'd find, but he went to Dr. Thomas and the only things he had were 3 small cavities. I'm so glad I found someone I can trust.
I have been going to Bina for years, she does a fantastic job! I am happy for her and her family that they have opened this nail salon.
Going to Eastside Mazda VW always feels like coming home.
I will be recommending them to everyone!!! They completely saved the day when I called them thinking that my Imac was dead... they were able to get my Imac up and running better than ever! Very Quick Turnaround with Great Customer Service and reasonable prices!! I will be using them for ALL of my Mac service in the future.
Great course for the price. Staff is outstanding.
Their clinic is clean, calm and safe. I just finished my treatment plan and very satisfied. They did what they felt was best for me, not what I wanted to hear. Most times if you arrive early you get earlier. They are wonderful with kids, and never lecture you on oral hygiene. They listen to what you want, they look deep down, and do what is best for you. If I moved on the other side of Calgary, I would make the drive to see them. They do payment plans, and work with you, rather than taking all your money up front. Talking with the dentist is like talking to a friend...and they actually care how your day is going. Most of all, my kids like going there and they are 11,8 and 3 1\2. This is a great place to go. Give it a try and see for yourself.
Source27 has helped my business in several ways. I have found that marketing can cost a lot of money and with business being slower, you have to spend money wisely. I feel I get the most for my money every time I use Source27. They have made motivational posters, bracelet designs, grand opening posters and graphics for different events I have sponsored. There is no job too large or too small for Source27.
East park is an asset to the city that is a great place to gather and meet for so many functions, such as the band festival and for so many family/friend gatherings I have been a part of over my nearly 55 years in Mason City! I've witnessed first hand, on my many walks in our cities parks and they are so well maintain, our parks in town look great! Thank you Parks and Rec department for a great job!
Great Service, Amazing Food!!
Had the green eggs and spam. Good food and service! It's small, but worth a try and close to the Gaslamp area.
I can't say enough about my great buying experience! I spent a lot of time looking for a specific used van which they had. I drove 2 and a half hours to check it out and make the purchase! I was a little worried about getting something so far away, but they took great care of me. When I had a small issue, they completely took care of it! Actually they not only took care of it, they went way above and beyond the call of duty to help me! I would not hesitate to purchase another vehicle from them.
None
None
None
I purchased a 2013 Dodge Dart i love the car! Its loaded and gets awesome gas mileage. My salesman was Brad Kale, he is very professional and polite and isnt pushy at all he gives u the facts about the car and lets u decide. i was very happy with my experience at Community Chrysler. I have referred 2 friends already one of them got a car just like mine and she loves hers also! Thanks Brad!
None
So good!
The experiance was great. My buddy reccomended me to the dealership because they don't play games. I hate going into a dealership and having to play a game of poker. I told them what I could do and they made it happen, easy as that. The staff was great and didn't pressure us at all. If nothing else just go in and say hello to Betty Jo!! She is quite a character and makes you feel right at home. Thanks M'Lady Nissan!!!
Camped here in the fall of 2008. A man owns an orchard at the base of the cemetery. Further below there's an enormous rock quarry. The orchard owner may give you an apple in the morning if he sees you.
Shauna and her crew at Simplified Accounting Solutions are the best! I trust Shauna with my Agency's financial accounting and suggest you speak with her about your accounting needs. If you need smart, honest, and friendly accounting services, call Simplified Accounting Solutions.
EAT HERE!!! SMALL PLACE GREAT TASTE.
None
None
A nice place for a quiet family vacation. The weather is always pleasant, and the people are friendly. I heard it's not going to be very dusty this year. But then again, I heard last year was the last good year. Lots of conflicting opinions about this place. But I like it.
I know it's in their name for you to be in and out of the shop in a jiffy, but I didn't think it would be that fast! I think I might have spent 20 minutes there, tops and they did everything. Checked my car from end-to-end, did all the maintenance that needed to be done... It was remarkable! The guys there are super nice. They vacuum the floors for free! I love it. I'll definitely be going back there for my next oil change and other maintenance.
None
None
Legacy has changed my families life for the better. Love Pastor Steve. God Bless Legacy.
None
I now go here to eat every single time I'm in that side of town. They have very friendly people there and the food is amazingly fresh! I highly recommend this place to people that love sushi and to those who want to try it.
San Diego Mobility Vans came to our rescue when we wanted to provide our son a trip to Comicon last July. Jim accommodated us even though he already had a very full rental schedule. From our first conversation to us dropping off the van at the San Diego airport after an exciting adventure, Jim was professional and caring. We certainly look forward to calling on San Diego Mobility Vans when we are next in the area!
I have NEVER had a bad experience staying in this hotel. I have stayed here off and on for the past 4 years. When I come to Houma this is the ONLY place I will stay. The front desk, management and housekeeping are all professional, and I have to say "FABULOUS"!!!!! Keep up the great job that you all do and I WILL continue to stay here. Thank you.
The Maui Wowie Pizza is phenomenal...A must try!!! I can hardly order anything else. Really like the atmosphere, great beer selection, pretzels are a tasty starter and service has been very good most trips. I don't think their "regular" pizza is anything special, but some of the specialties are very unique and delicious.
A great few hours for my 2 & 4 yr. old girls; exponentially more fun with other kids. Go for a week or unlimited day pass and it's well worth the money.
number 1 !
Their service is just like their name A+ walked in with a broken laptop screen came out with a fresh new screen at a great price for the customer not for the store. I went to 3 other computer stores and A+ had the A+ price. Thank you Todd and John for all your help
The only thing I know is that, The girl of my dreams studies here!! And I miss her a lot!!!!!
I have been down here 3 times. This place is awesome. You will learn more then you can remember and the staff here is great!! Love ATI
Pest pizza I've had in Bournemouth so far.. i should know i was a chef for 25 years. very friendly and efficient service, they are always trying there best.
I have rented from this location 3 times thus far. I have been completely satisfied each time. The customer service I have received has been outstanding. They have been a pleasure to do business with, and the cars that I have rented have been clean and reliable. Can't beat the savings, either! I will do all my rental car business with this location.
Through a referral, I decided to see Dr. Buhrman as a result of recurring long-term pain. After just a few visits with a combination of laser, chiropractics and massage, the pain had subsided and I was pain free. As a result, I referred several friends experiencing chronic pain, and had very positive feedback. Thank you Dr. Buhrman for your professionalism, expertise and a new pain free life!
I went here with a decent budget, nothing to brag about, but Jeff helped me out sooo much. I orginally looked at the used inventory online and found a 2011 Civic that I really liked so I scheduled a test drive. Iwent in and Jeff and his "shadow" walked me through everything I needed to know about the car. I left that day feeling good about my choice to come here. I returned a couple days later (due to thanksgiving) after I made an appointment with Jeff and his shadow again and we drove another 2011 Civic that was just a little more than I wanted to spend, but only had a few thousand miles on it. Not once did I feel pressured to buy the more expensive one. I decided to go with the original car I drove. I did have some hiccups with my insurance...well now former insurance company, but after I got that situated I left the lot with a beautiful new car and a great experience. I would highly recommend this dealership to anyone looking for a new car!
Love Love Love!!! Sweet Caramel Corn flavor is the best!
Love the new Dodge Durgango!!! Thank you Mike Lambert.
None
None
I have known Brad for nearly two years. In all of my interactions with Brad I have found him to be incredibly customer centric and ethical. Brad gets things done and is definitely someone you want on your team.
None
None
I have waited for twelve years to buy a new car because I was scared and suspicious of car dealers and salespersons. Eventually I had to do it; I prayed and entered the Toyota dealership in Watertown. The friendly atmosphere of Toyota of Watertown and the outstanding service I received from Felix Rodriguez have pleasantly impressed me and convinced me that I should recommend this dealership to my friends. I, myself, am planning to return in about five years for a new car.
None
I am very comfortable referring my clients to Adam. He is a great source for me. He is very personable and thorough.
As a former college athlete turned weekend warrior, I get banged up from time to time. When the "wait and see method" doesn't work, I call Dr. Alex. He has treated my knee and shoulder so far, with great success. His treatment approach is thorough and comprehensive. He took the time to explain my injuries, answer all of my questions, and he makes workout/training modifications to help me stay active. I have referred my friends and family and I highly recommend Dr. Alex
Absolute Comfort saved the day over my Thanks Giving weekend. We had family in from out of state and the the downstairs toilet over flowed. After trying to plunge it for several minutes it became clear that I needed the help of a professional. I called a friend I could trust who referred me to Absolute Comfort. The owner, himself, came out in the late evening over Thanksgiving weekend and tried to run the rotor through our drain. After successfully clearing our line it became clear that our main line was an old clay line and had collapsed under the roots from the tree above. We bid out replacing the line and after meeting with Chris, the owner, we decided to go with Absolute. Their price was reasonable for the amazing service that was provided. I am impressed with this company and have used them again for HVAC work and received the same quality service.
Dr. Cox is wonderful with my three dogs. I highly recommend both him and his entire staff. They always make it easy for me to visit.....
I've been to about 7 or 8 wingstops from Inglewood to USC to West Covina and by far far this has been one of the best overall.
love it ... work out 12:15 mon- thursday... the best!!!
The best stylist ever!
Pork toffee milkshake. sweet and salty. nom nom.
They take of liitle people with honest services! Quik delivere
I bought the BMW X3 from Alan, The overall experience is good, I told Alan the only thing I care about is the price, and after I chose all the upgrades, I get a decent demo car, Also about the APR, I got decent APR from Tom (financial manager), who's a really nice person also, turns me very happy, Highly recommend buy car from this dealer
Outstanding condition with beautiful views, provided us with everything we needed. Nearby local pubs & Skipton. Owners are always happy to help:)
None
Lovely homely feel with good homecooked food and fabulous service. Will visit again.
None
love this place , thank you sir... saved me so much money and time .....
LOVE IT!
Excellent Museum.
Very easy to due business with, delivered my ATV promptly and courteously. Would due business with them again, would highly recommend them to any of my friends or business contacts.
Fresh tasty food. Friendly staff. Tasteful decor. Reasonably priced
The Farmhouse is a true gem. Great atmosphere and great service. One of the best parts of living in Franklin.
Excellent experience every time we go. Bill and his staff are very attentive to even minor details. Food is great, everything we have tried on the menu has been wonderful. Never greasy or too heavy. You should try it.
There’s just absolute no compromise that I would ever bear on when it comes to my children’s studies. Fortunately, BC Tutors realize this so very well. These guys seriously render a great learning experience – ensure consistent progress in school. As a parent, I have to recommend these guys!
My husband and I used Wendroff & Associates for our tax preparation needs and we are so impressed with their customer service and efficiency! We received an IRS correspondence and they were very helpful in assisting us with all our questions and issues. They also provided us advice for my husband's rental property. We also love getting their newsletter because it contains very insightful and relevant information on taxes and businesses. We will definitely use this company again!
I came to Paula looking for a special Valentine's gift for my husband. She took boudoir photos that took my (and definitely my husband's!) breath away! Paula's boudoir work isn't what she's known for, but let me tell you, ladies, she knows what she's doing. She knew how to pose me in ways that flattered my curvy body, and she made me feel SOOO comfortable that I forgot I was prancing around a near stranger with barely any clothes on! Another thing to consider is that Captured Memories offers spectacular print products at very reasonable prices-- and they look GREAT! Working with Kristen, the very talented designer behind Captured Memories, was a joy. She gave me EXACTLY what I wanted in the layout of the boudoir album I gave to my husband. Captured Memories isn't aiming to be "trendy" in their photo style; they go for classic. If this is what you're looking for, look no further. Two thumbs up! :)
My experiences at La Difference have been nothing short of spectacular. The staff is not only very knowledgeable but very friendly as well. I currently use them for a few different services and my experience each time is always the same....amazing! I know La Difference is known for providing great hair services but if you are like me and have a hard time finding time to relax, I highly recommend checking out their massage services. You won't be disappointed!
Bought a used Yukon XL over the phone with David Low. He was a pleasure to work with and met me in Moses Lake to deliver the car. The SUV was in great condition and just as he described over the phone. We had a couple small maintenance issues that Wendle is taking care of. So far our experience has been very positive.
Knew what they were talking about. Helped us with a few issues setting up our kit the first time. All good. Would shop there again no probs. Works well and did a good job. All happy here.
Been going to this place for years, one of the best sushi places in Toronto, and very reasonable price. I highly recommend the love bento. Service has been great for me over the past 7 years I've been going here.
Excellent service, people and dentistry. I feel my teeth were "really" cleaned for the first time in a long time, even though I had just had a cleaning a year prior. And, I had been to another dentist for a dental "procedure" plan just a month ago, this Dr. at Kool Smiles, found a problem with a front tooth that nobody else had found before. Wow! All I can say, "great place for the whole family"
Everyone is as sweet as can be here. They will work with you to get you the best prices around and they are always so knowledgeable about the current gold prices! Their first offer was $75 more than the 2 previous places I went to earlier that day!! I won't sell my gold to anyone else! A+
None
Awesome place everyone is very friendly and helpful prices are also good
My companion animals have been getting top notch holistic care from Dr. Nancy Curran and Dr. Jordan Nuccio for years. Two Rivers Veterinary Clinic exemplifies excellence in care and gentleness.
We were in today for lunch as we were celebrating two birthdays. As we were also in a rush, the staff was very understanding and accommodating to get us in and out as quickly as possible. Wish we weren't in such a rush because the food was very, very good and the service was very attentive and professional. We will be back...and will plan on spending more time there! Hager and Associates Inc.
I live directly next door to an Edwards Theatre. We go to Majestic in Meridian because they just have a more local feel, its a great facility, kept clean. BUT I mainly go for the FREE popcorn seasonings they always leave out about 8 different fantastic flavors. Every other theatre in the state charges $2 or $3 for a little tiny shake or two of seasoning. This theatre is generous! love love love
Its the best rips ever
OTTIMI E AFFIDABILI
Had a great hamburger at the Squash Blossom last night. It came cooked to order with tomato, onion etc, crispy sweet potato fries, and unlimited iced tea. Love the art work on the walls and the server could not do enough for us.
Came promptly - in fact ahead of time - and quickly diagnosed the problem and sorted it. All done in under 40 minutes. Very good job. I'd recommend Farrell to anyone who requires any type of plumbing work
I purchased the 2014 Buick Verano, the staff was exceptional from beginning to end. All my questions were answered and the service was wonderful. Both Ed and George made the purchase of my dream vehicle a breeze. Ed covered the financial end with true expertise and the same for George in assisting with familiarizing me with my new vehicle and its functions. I would and have highly recommended this dealership to family and friends. I've never experience such service while purchasing a vehicle. I did not have to spend the entire day at the dealership, this was a true PLUS! Keep up the good work Jay Buick.
None
None
Keller Bros is AWESOME! I brought my car in for a simple oil change and they found a very bad leak that they took care of for me in no time! They kept me informed, gave me great customer service, and gave me a great price on all my repairs. I. I am happy to say that I will be taking my Kia back to Keller Bros. from now on. Thanks Guys!!!
Professional care , high quality products all in one place . Excellent , welcome to all :) Best regards Jozef K from Subotica Serbia , lived in Hotel Sonnenberg for 3 month
First time here on Easter Sunday and brunch is awesome. And our server was a Hottie! Def coming back!
My wife and I ended up at David's on a whim. We were out for an anniversary dinner and it couldn't have been better. The server was great, the food was amazing and the atmosphere was modern and relaxing. Can't wait to go back. Thanks for the perfect evening.
None
This place has quality food when it comes to take out. The service was great, friendly, and fast. I recommend it if you're in the mood for some chinese. Also to the guy who complained that they wouldn't deliver to salem, they are located in roanoke. I dont know any food places that would deliver to another city.
Zayna's is the first hookah place I went to outside of someone's house and the atmosphere is great. Ian and John are always helpful whenever you need anything. If you're there and you don't know what to get, all of Ian's recommendations are great. If Ian is busy John is always ready to help so you're never without assistance.
Moving with Garrett's was a great choice. Everyone I talked to and worked with were very nice and super fast and careful about moving my stuff. I was also able to get a great price for all the work! I would definitely recommend Garrett's for help with moving!
Wonderful food, atmosphere and prices! Yeah!
Good place for pizza
Best buffalo chicken pizza anywhere
Excellent. Very helpful staff, who kindly gave me a few (essential) nuts and bolts to fix my pedal with. Great location, right beside Glasgow Uni. Also bought a neat set of lights there 3 years ago and the batteries haven't shown any signs of running out! (Great lights too). Thoroughly recommend the place.
This guy really knows what he is dong! And he doesn't try to sell you things you don't need. We need more people like Matt. Gretchen Jack
Dropped in to eat here based on other's reviews and my wife and I had our best meal of the weekend in Wilmington. We would have come back twice if they weren't closed on Sunday! I had the Black Sea Combo and my wife had the grouper. Service was great, very personable service, food was awesome. Was cool for the chef to come out to collect our dishes and be so genuinely happy that we cleaned our plates! Be sure to save room for the Knefeh desert...I'm still craving that.
Fast and Friendly Service, pulled in and the team went right to work. Very professional even gave refill on all my needed fluid's. The family even said The Mechanic had nice hair
We were married here in late 2012 and really loved the place. Highly recommend.
Classic Collision stayed on top of my car repairs it looks as if it was never hit! Thank you.
I have been going to Mali at Xanadu for 5 years, she has made me look 10 years younger with the right highlights and cut to fit my lifestyle. While you are there get a facial it is amazing, the treatment left my skin moisturized and glowing my friends the next day asked me if I had a botox treatment. I was laughing all the way to the bank....Thanks Mali and staff for a great experience every time I go in....
Small froyo outfit, seats approx 12 inside, great post-movie/pizza option.
Great cleaning experience with Kim. Always have had a relaxing experience. Drs. Opeck and Stanton both are very friendly. Dr. Opeck was willing to come in after hours for an emergency crown repair. I have been going here for about 7 years and have never had a bad experience.
I had an excellent experience at Convenient MD. The waiting room was clean and appealing, the wait was reasonable, and the staff was great! Dartmouth-Hitchcock urgent care couldn't see me until 7:00PM. II was diagnosed, picked up my meds and was on my way home by 7:00PM from ConvenientMD!
Il servizio Express costa caro, non é così veloce e in compenso rallenta la coda "normale" in maniera scandalosa. Rapporto 3a1.
Went there saturday night, great drinks awesome atmosphere , they had a named yohan live on the sax (amazing) and dj gio rocked the crowd . The party goes on till 4 am the best thing is that it's local and a cab is 8 bucks
Great service. My son always enjoys going with me so he can check out all the cool basketball memorabilia and having free popcorn. I enjoy the free wifi :) Makes getting the maintenance done on the car worry free.
My girlfriend and I love this restaurant. Tasty pho and really cheap too. We've tried a few other places but this is our favourite. Awesome service, they greet us and remember our order. We go here as often as we have money.
Best coffee in Nashville. Try the Cuban.
None
The Duke Gardens are gorgeous all the time. I last went in January and was thrilled to see the winter colors. I admired the beautiful and lush winter vegetables. I enjoyed visiting the chickens; they are fun to watch any day. When I need to be rejuvenated, I go there. I can rely on filling my spirit with peace and joy as I am awe-struck by the Gardens' beauty.
We got takeout from this place last weekend, it was really good. I got General Tao chicken with an eggroll and rice. The chicken is actual tenders, not those balls of gloop. The warning, the eggroll was kind of greasy. The rice was great. My girlfriend got shrimp lo mien with crab Rangoon's and fried rice. She like it as well, oddly enough the Rangoon's were not greasy like the eggroll. If you go get the dumplings/potstickers and get them pan seared. They actually pan sear them and not fry. The cost was like 23 for all of this. Like I said get the potstickers, delicious and you get six of them, and they are large. Free delivery to us, we live in college park
Great every time......
It doesn't get any better than these two, folks! You cannot put a price on the service they provide. These two will not only create the most amazing images for you to keep for the rest of your lives, but they will help you relax and have fun during the whole process! Ben & Les make your day so much easier and better because they are there to help you with whatever you need, they make it fun, they help you relax and not stress, all while working some magic behind the lenses. There is no reason for anyone to work with anyone else for their wedding. I feel like that was the best decision we made together as a couple next to deciding to get married: choosing Ben & Les as our photographers. I believe we truly hit the jackpot with them! I feel like, not only did we get the best possible images to create keepsake memories forever, but we made a couple of amazing friends, too! We love Ben & Les--SO HIRE THEM FOR YOUR WEDDING SO YOU CAN SEE WHY YOU ARE GOING TO LOVE THEM TOO! :)
The spring was completely broke on our garage. I called late in the afternoon and they came out the very next day. The 2 gentleman that came out were very courteous and they fixed it in 20 minutes! We will be repeat customers! The price was exactly what the competition quoted!
Moderní a příjemný bar, kde vládne pohodová atmosféra, vynikající obsluha dobré pití...
I came to Dave with lower back pain which had been killing me for months, I have always had this pain on and off since i was a teenager. Not only did Dave sort me out in 2 sessions but he was able to explain what was going on, and give me exercises which have kept me pain free ever since. I wish i had found him years ago and can thoroughly recommend him as the best osteopath i have ever seen, (and have seen a few !!)
I have eaten here 5 times over the past year and never gotten a bad meal or had bad service.
Great fun and inexpensive place to watch the games or just have a beer with quality food in an enjoyable environment!
None
This is the best Mexican in St. Louis period. The tortas are amazing and prices are cheap. Their guacamole is one of a kind and simply mouth watering. I go here often and have been since it was just a small hut that sold only tortas. They also have this green sauce.... not verde but it is the bomb. Try this place out... in the daytime :-)
My daughter loves when I tell her she has an ortho appt. with Dr. Robison! The slushes, the waiting area, and Beach bucks all make the visit fun and inviting!! We are so happy we chose Robison Orthodontics for her treatment!!
Dr Schechter and his entire staff are amazing, very professional and kind. My experiences have been that I am seen in a timely fashion and work is completed appropriately. I am happy to recommend him to others!
I was on the fence about buying a new car because the offers I was getting from other Honda dealerships weren't that great. My sister had recently purchased a car at Moon Honda and said her experience was great and I should check them out. I'm glad I did because they were very willing to work with me and I ended up purchasing a car that I'm excited about and they gave me the best price!!
Great beer, great pizza, and a family-friendly atmosphere.
En el segundo d la final lpb 2013 marinos campeon
Just an overall great and pleasant experience from top to bottom. I Would highly recommend the Irwin Group! Definitely will be back
Dear Alex., my wife and i would like to thank you for the great lessons that we got from you rewarding our first dance at our wedding. Everybody was very impressed by our dance. Thank you very much. We will sign up for your Latino classes. See you in your studio!
Well when I first came here I couldn't walk no more than 500ft and now I could do I leave in a condominium complex like 17 buildings I could walk the complex surround. My goal was to get on the floor and play with my grandchildren and walk a little "further." And have you been able to do that? Yes I am. My future right now I think it's getting better because of the treatment I've been given here. And I'm very happy. The staff is great. They are here to help you. Very concern on your condition when you come in everybody is different but the doctor was concern on mine. And it just great everybody is just totally friendly and helpful and I'm happy. I tell them if they have a back pain check and see Illinois Back Institute. They can help you. And then from there pick up the phone and call Illinois Back Institute.
We used AB Moving to move us out of our house into our temporary rental. Their 3 person team arrived on time, quickly loaded up our house and unloaded everything at the new place. We were truly impressed with the service and quality of the work. When our new house is ready, AB Moving will be the first thing that we schedule to not only get us out of our rental but to unload our storage shed. Nearly 4 months later, we are still impressed with their overall service -- from scheduling to the actual move and everything in between (most notably the one guy who carried a washing machine up 3 flights of stairs on his back).
THANKS CHICO AT NISSAN OF SOUTH HOLLAND FOR MY 2010 MAX IT WAS THE EXACT CAR I WAS LOOKING FOR I WAS REFFERED BY MY DAD CHICO SOLD MY DAD 2 CARS LOOKING FORWARD TO SENDING CHICO ALOT OF CUSTOMERS
The sales associates at this store are super friendly and helpful! I felt very comfortable in this location, unlike some other LV stores I've visited. With smiles on their faces and a willingness to go out of their way for you as a customer, this is how LV associates SHOULD be!! Great service as well as selection! I'm happy :)
best service
I just went for the first time and I am a fan... I had the sesame chicken and hot and sour soup. A good atmosphere and the price is good too.
Best cup of coffee in America. Grab a vanilla latte, you won't be disappointed. This location is a little quieter and has more room to study/work than the Randolph St Intelligentsia.
Love this place so much. 
None
Cole Pest Control is a family-owned, yet professional pest control company. They are prompt and efficient ... when they say they will be there, they will be there ... Trustworthy and knowledgable.
Great Mexican cuisine at reasonable prices. Very different menu with a vast selection of very different dishes. If your looking for more than the plain old TEX MEX, then you've come to the right place. I have been all over Longview looking for great Mexican food and Jalapeno Tree is just the place. Give it a try and you will love it!
Just made our first order last night....guess I should've got the Pizza! haha Got two meals and two sides....my "small" fry was HUGE. Two full meals left over today definitely get a lot for your money! Will be ordering again
JD really went out of his way to help us through the purchasr of our new car. Even working around my wife's schedule.
Very happy with the Hyundai Genesis I purchased last fall. My salesperson Patrick treated me very fairly and I have been happy with the maintenance services I have received so far. I would gladly return to this dealership next time I need a new car.
Very nice location, We stayed at Days Inn in Enterprise, Al and it wasn't this nice...The room could have been dusted better and things wiped off, But we got an upstairs room(that wasn't my choice) Because I have trouble w my legs and knees, So a little inconvience there. But the bed was made up so cute and a little lap desk left on the bed. The location is great, Close to the beach, Fast food places, and Pizza Hut in walking distance right in front of motel :) The light in the bathroom was real dim though and the exhaust fan was extremely loud, This is my first night here giving this review, I prob should have waited to discuss these few probs with the staff to see if they would fix everything. But overall you will sleep like a baby here. The bed is OMGAH sooooo Comfortable, I didn't wanna get up the next morning lol..:)
La pizza era geniale
Great place after a day at the beach. Friendly staff, clean, good product. Lines can be long some days but move quickly and worth the wait!
Great experience, got the online coupon, easily found the location, but mainly, I was able to get a good bike! I'm a very active cyclist and when I don't have access to my road bike or triathlon bike, I'm usually not satisfied with other bikes. I rented a very solid Specialized Allez, perfect size for me (and there was many other sizes available, bigger and smaller". I was able to bike all the way out to Hawk Hill with that bike which I wouldn't have been able to that easily on a regular hybrid or mountain bike. Prices are also competitive or cheaper than other bigger chains of bike rental in the city.
Friendly people that make you feel at home. Great breakfasts. Nice, comfy bed and well-kept rooms. You can 't go wrong by deciding to stay here.
Curtis, and his team at Evan's Automotive have all their ducks in a row and them some! We took our Grand Cherokee in for regular maintenance, and during his inspection one of his tech brought our leaking rear axle to our attention. His tech explained the importance of replacing the seal, and with his information we were able to make a decision to replace the seal before something worse happened. The pricing was very reasonable, and I've paid a lot more for worse service at other shops. The staff at Evan's is some of the best I have ever dealt with and we are happy to take our vehicles in for service because we know we'll be treated with honesty, and intriguing. And don't forget the cleanliness of the shop, everything is spotless!
Great food tried there chicken strips and fries I highly recommend.
None
Step back to a simpler time with an outstanding breakfast our lunch at Louisa's Place. This is not your "Chain Restaurant Experience". Limited seating but worth the wait. This is a true locals favorite. Family owned and operated. Make sure the kids color their place mat for the wall. If you're looking for the same restaurant you can find in any town, this place is not for you.
I've been to four bike shops in the area for anything from service to buy new bikes and Silver Comet Depot is easily the best. The owner is super-nice as is all of his staff. Genuinely helpful and caring towards every customer. They've earned my business from now on!
I love this salon. My stylist is Jess and she always does an awesome job. People always think I just got my hair done even two months after my last appointment. I have worked with other stylists as well throughout the salon and I don't have a bad thing to say about anyone or any of my experiences. Highly recommended!!!
I purchased a one year old soft ail deluxe on May 21, 2012. I now have 2000 miles down and love it. Empire Harley made my purchase extremely easy. I wish buying a car was this easy. All the staff from parts, service and sales are extremely professional and have great personality. Don't hesitate, go buy with ease
A real place of peace
I have been seeing Dr Blankenship for over thirteen tears the staff is amazing , the dental hygeneists are awesome I am very pleased with this dentist they are prompt , patient and show tremendous concern if you are looking for A great dentist and staff Athena Dental is who you need to call !
None
an incredible place, never seen anything like it, the wine varieties that are along the banks of the river are fantastic as well.
This was a fantastic buying experience. I called John on a saturday after seeing the car i wanted to purchase online. John and I discussed the car and any issues i might have. I had to drive four hours to the dealership so i really wanted to make sure this was what i wanted. I arrived at the dealership and everything was in order. Perfect buying experience.
Great place to relax. Great outdoor seating, well set up. Free club rentals. Def worth checking out.
None
None
None
Stopped by for some late afternoon cocktails and I was blown away. The bartenders are incredibly friendly and knowledgeable. I let them know which liquors I preferred and what mood I was in and they created custom cocktails on the spot that were to die for. They only have a handful of "known" liquors (Belvedere, Russian Standard, Goslings, Jameson Aged Reserve) - the rest are all small batch. They even have a rye whiskey that they infuse with chai spices that is spectacular. You can't go wrong here.
None
Best pizza in the Caribbean. Actually it might be the best bar pizza anywhere. And it's my favorite open air bar in the world.
None
Ho avuto modo di provare il ristorante della struttura, e devo dire che il menu proposto garantisce un ottimo rapporto qualità prezzo: infatti al costo fisso di euro 15 si ottiene un pranzo completo dal primo al dolce. La qualità dei piatti è risultata ottima come confermato anche dei miei amici ospiti con i quali ci siamo presentati a sorpresa, senza alcuna prenotazione, alle ore 23 e 30 circa, ottenendo il servizio senza alcun problema. Non sono in grado di fare alcuna recensione in merito alle camere, ma l'impressione globale che dà la struttura nell'insieme, è di ordine e pulizia.
KYLE JOHNSON GREETED ME IN THE SERVICE AREA, TOOK CARE OF MY REQUESTS AND HAD THE CAR BACK TO BE BEFORE THE TIME HE SUGGESSTED. I HAVE BEEN A VERY PLEASED CUSTOMER OF SANDS CHEVROLET FOR OVER 8 YEARS. REV. JAMES F. THOMAS
Bought tires at Cole road..what a great experience. They explained clearly what i need for my truck and my total tire cost (including road hazard warranty) which their competitors failed too mention. Definitely recommending to my family and friends.
Purchased my 2013 Mazda 3 Hatchback with Craig Rupp a few weeks ago. Had an excellent experience sales process—no pressure, easy to work with from driving the cars, to discussing options to finance. Loving my Mazda 3 — Zoom, zoom zoom!
Mr Bernstein was a pleasure to deal with. He took his time and really listened to my problem. I called several personal injury lawyers in Miami and he was the only one that I felt comfortable talking to. Now knowing Mr Bernstein and his track record I strongly feel that he has more experience than most other accident lawyers. The other lawyers just hung up the phone and essentially said that it was too difficult of a case. About a year ago I was injured in a serious accident in Miami FL on South Beach and was rushed to the emergency room. After leaving the hospital I didn't feel comfortable with the prognosis. The doctor said that I would be fine. Many months passed and I still wasn't fine. After talking to Mr Bernstein and consulting him the end result was peace of mind.
Just picked up my new mkz, the whole process was very pleasant and no high pressure sales tactics. I highly recommend Biondi, they will treat you right.
I've been all over the city looking for someone who can cut my hair. I've been to the fancy salons, but I've never found someone as good as Sam. Great price, too.
A truly *delightful* experience for your next night out with friends, family and/or colleagues. An incredible mix of songs filled the air (from Vampire Weekend to Lorde and more), amazing paintings covered the wall before us, and an engaging instructor provided exceptional, laid back guidance as we turned blank canvases into one of a kind paintings which reflected our own unique perspective- all culminating in an atmosphere of constant INSPIRATION and relaxation. To say it was remarkable would be an understatement. This is a MUST try experience for painters, non-painters, travelers and locals alike! I'm definitely looking forward to going back!
Hallo ABC-Scan, ich wollte mich einmal auf diesem Weg für Ihre tolle Arbeit bedanken! Selbst die Menge meiner Fotos hat Sie nicht abgeschreckt und die Qualität ist besser als vorher. So brauche ich nicht mehr fürchten, dass meine Bilder langsam vergilben und unbrauchbar werden. Vielen Dank! Grüße M.Wessel
Great accommodation,service and location
We have been to Venus Sophia Tea Room several times, and we always suggest to our guests that they go there too, it is a wonderful "gem of a place' tucked away in Chinatown, where the decor and atmosphere inside is quiet, comfortable, spacious and totally conducive to the enjoyment of their patrons. The staff and management are welcoming and gracious and the tremendous selection of teas, coffees, baked goods as well as delicious vegetarian dishes, are a pleasure to enjoy. Highly recommended by us, and by many of our guests who have taken the time to go there.
None
Oooooofffff
Very tasty food and friendly staff. A welcome addition to the neighborhood.
None
Lovely food, very fair pricing.
Coffee excellent, baked goods are just ok for their high prices.
Love Spinach Pizza and everything else I've ever had there!
I have been a patient of Germany Dental for several years. I go to the dentist at least twice a year or more as warranted. I have always been treated with the utmost respect by the friendliest people you could ever hope to meet. The doctors and entire staff are very kind, courteous and professional. The office surroundings are very pleasant and extremely clean. I trust Dr. Germany and his staff 110%! I would, and have on numerous occasions, recommended Germany Dental to friends.
Great late night food
None
I've had a very nice experience there. It was very nice and comforting staying at this hotel. The service was good and we have nothing to complain about. Very nice breakfast buffet. and they have a guy working there who looks like Daniel Graig ( the new james bond) he's cool!
Great car buying experience with Kyle and Rich. Knowledgeable, understanding and gave me an awesome deal!
None
This dealership and all the staff offer exceptional service. They really know how to make you feel like the most important customer ever from start to finish.
If you are looking for an online marketing agency I would highly recommend Adster. They do great work and deliver on their word. Their marketing efforts work and you can see the positive impact in your business. Andrew recommended some things I should do to improve my SEO and within a short time I've skyrocketed to the top of Google rankings for a few of my keywords. Thanks Adster!
Awesome bar
I was moving from Boulder to Gunbarrel (not a far move), and consulted a few moving companies. American Moving was one of the only companies that didn't audibly sigh when I mentioned the size of the move. Then, when they arrived for the quote, they were professional, on-time, clear with pricing, and left a physical estimate that I could use to compare other companies. The move was flawless. They took apart the furniture as well as some exercise equipment, and at the new house, reassembled it. I'd highly recommend American Moving to anyone.
fresh food, speedy service, a must chippy in Larkhall, stands out from the rest.
Fantastic restaurant! We had dinner out at Mi Dia this week and were not disappointed in the slightest bit. The restaurant is independently owned and features dishes that go beyond Tex Mex - special entrees have influence from Mexico City and Sante Fe - very nice! If we had one critique, it would be that they do not accept reservations. The wait on Friday around 7:00pm was an hour and a half - so get there early if you don't like the wait.
None
This is my favourite library branch in the entirety of Knox County. Nay, East Tennessee. The catalogue of material is extremely thorough: most any movie you can think of, many popular albums, soundtracks, and classical music recordings, magazines, local newspapers, novels, biographies, et cetera. It's a astounding for a city of fewer than 200,000 people. Then, there's the environment. Tables for study are situated on the first floor, overlooking the traffic on West Church Street. Tall ceilings with circular skylights. Free public access WiFi, computers, scanners, printers, and copiers. A fun haven for children, complete with age-appropriate books. The architecture is very 70s, but I quite like it.
Amazing food!!! Fabulous Kimchi. The staff were extremely friendly and nice. Can't wait to go back and try other menu items.
I have been using PIP printing in Rancho Cucamonga for about 14 years. They always do a good job and serve all my business needs, I am very happy with them
None
A friend of mine introduced me to the outlaw a while back. And I have been going back regularly. It is a great place to hang out and watch the game or visit with friends. You can even make new friends. The only drawback to this place is there are so many choices for cigars that I have a terrible time making a choice on which I want. One great thing is the staff is very knowledgeable on all their products so if you don't know just ask and someone there will help.
Tony V. was quick and timely. He did an excellent job fixing our oven and it was reasonably priced. Would definitely use Ace Appliance again
J'ai passé un super moment. Personnel accueillant Acteurs excellents Salle très sympa Formule "Régal" sympathique Bref, J'y retournerai... et vous ???
Sweet university
This is seriously the best smoke shop I've been to. Great selection and an awesome mixing bar with really great and creative flavors of tobacco. They have a great reward program as well.
Best in the grove by far. Try it!
Awesome location, stellar service, deeee-luscious food! The pasta Pomodoro was perfect, pizzas are a little doughy but so yummy, and the pollo con funghi is so mouth-watering good.
This is a great mansion full of history and stories. I'm so inspired by the place and all that it has to offer. I hope everyone who visits this place find a new inspiration in life and enjoy the place.
I had a great experience with Plumbgood! The workman was very patient with all my questions and expectations! All cost were told upfront, which I was greatfull for! Repairs were done quickly and correctly! He also gave information on preventative maintenance.I would recommend them to anyone!
Jessina was great! I had a terrible back ache and was unable to move much. By the end of the massage I felt much better, and the next day I actually went running!
ที่พักอาศัย
The place offers lots of coffee drinks - ice and hot. The variety is always appreciated but a flat white is more than enough for me. And they know how to prepare one. So, we covered the drinks; the service is also on top level - the guys welcome just from the entrance and pace swiftly to get our order done.
Dr. Simonson is great. She is very thorough and explains things really well. The office staff is very professional and helpful. I would highly recommend their practice!
We just bought a used Steinway Model L from this store. We couldn't be happier with the service. We wanted to upgrade from an upright to a baby grand. Russell spent a lot of time understanding our needs and budget and found a perfect piano for us. I would recommend my friends to shop for a piano here. Thanks, Russell.
Jättebra både i kvalität och pris!
Consider yourself a very lucky person if you live near Princeton BJJ and have the opportunity to train here on a regular basis. Emily and Art are excellent instructors that explain not only moves, but concepts extremely well. The people I have met at this academy were open and honest people, willing to meet me at my level instead of trying to run me over. I never once felt inferior, in fact, I felt that the practitioners here were trying to bring out the best in me and my BJJ.
Very helpful in setting up my account, they even stayed after closing time so I could go get a money order to deposit into my account.
This is the only Fullers pub for miles and it is also a really great local pub, perfect for a quiet pint on the way home or for a night out. I go there whenever I can. It's a very friendly place. I only drink London Pride and they always serve it just right.
I have to say I really LOVE this place! I started going here a couple months ago because another nail tech, named Theresa at a Forum nail studio, completely messed up my nails. The owner of this salon did an AMAZING job on my nails! I couldn't have asked for better service. The owners designs are beautiful and she is a complete perfectionist. I am looking forward to my next visit. Don't go if you are in a hurry because they take their time and do not rush; which, is one of the reason they are so good. The strive to make you happy. I highly recommend going to this salon!!!
Great deal on tacos! 3 for $3. Can't beat it.
Fast Service! GREAT Prices! Everyone has their version of a "Blizzard" and this is the best around. Literally every single candy you can think of! and the PERFECT combination of ice cream and candy! Love it! The only place i go for ice cream!
Jose Wong is the best!! Very through, explained everything he was doing, and was overall a great guy!! I hope he is my tech every time! Thanks!
None
Love this place, good food, good service. Always have the best games on. Whether you live in concord or your just visiting this is a great place to hang out and catch a game!
My spouse works there. Great architecture.
Best place to buy running shoes because they fit you. I always have a really good experience here buying shoes and have fewer aches and injuries since getting fitted for my shoes properly. On this most recent visit, I wanted less "mesh" on my running shoes since it's cold outside. Alex also suggested some socks they had and they are great. I am super picky about socks. OCD about them really. I like the indoor track to test out the shoes. This time the Brooks won over the Asics. But Alex brought out shoes he thought were appropriate and all of them felt great but one pair stood out. They ran great right out of the box.
The best chicken basil in the lowcountry and I've eaten at nearly every tie restaurant in the area that I can find. It's worth every penny. I get the lunch special a lot which gets you an egg roll and chicken basil for < $8. You can't beat it. The dinner portion is fantastic and an excellent buy at right around $10. The staff is extremely friendly and even gave me some tips on how to cook chicken basil at home.
Great food at a great price! If you haven't been here before, stop on by and give it a chance!
Excellent Staff - Awesome Burgers!
"Service with a smile" is certainly the norm here!
e-concierge ist ein geniales Netzwerk, ein gelebtes Empfehlungsnetzwerk. Davon lebt es und dafür lebt es. Wer einen Tipp braucht, wird schnell und unkompliziert bedient. Auf die meisten Fragen gibt es Antworten und dies erstaunlich schnell. Es geht nicht nur um virtuelles Netzwerk. Auch Live-Veranstaltungen werden empfohlen und selbst durchgeführt. Durch das Gastbloggen wird der Bekanntheitsgrad der Beiträge durch hohe Reichweite gesteigert. Von mir eine 5 Sterne-Empfehlung. e-concierge ist ein Muss.
None
The ONLY theater my wife and I go to...we've been spoiled by the ambiance of this place.
Excelente empresa constructora innovadora. Edificación en general. La mejor tecnología.
None
I get a friendly greeting every time I walk in the door, and I usually get a "have a nice day" when I leave. One of the staff members has even gotten to know my name--and I'm not that consistent in going. It's a bit hot inside, but I suppose that makes me sweat more, and they're saving energy. There are definitely some space issues associated with the new construction, but I think they are juggling it fabulously. I can't wait for the completed new Y. I think they take feedback seriously here too. I expressed a desire to see evening aquatics classes since there weren't really any in the spring, and this summer there are a ton of evening options. I'm totally hooked on this Y.
Corey Washington was great and the entire buying experience was without pressure. The entire process was easy and laid back. Thanks.
None
Great experience! No pressure to sell. Ricky was patient with us(we had our two year old with us) as we tested different cars. Everything was good and we will definitely consider buying from here again, though we hope that won't be for a while.
None
I had a FANTASTIC experience with Ryan- the service and selection was excellent- he brought samples to my home in Sandy (serves all of Salt Lake area) and gave me great pricing. The end result is over-the-top- love my new flooring and couldn't be happier!
None
Friendly staff! Fast service.
Good food, good service, reasonable prices. Unfortunately, we discovered this restaurant in our last day in Budapest so were not able to go there more than once.
None
Ive been coming here for years. Best chinese around. Would highly recommend to anymore!
I had an amazing time here! It's very big and fun! I had my quencinara (15th birthday party) here and it was a great time! The staff here are so friendly and amazing. The food is great and the hall is big. The landscaping is beautiful as well!! It's in the country so the music can be as loud as you want it. <3333 love this place!!!!!
None
What can I say about the best burgers in San Antonio? Wait I already said it. The place is clean hence the 3 for decor even though it is simple. The folks inside are friendly, from the owner who will gladly engage you in convo, to the cooks who actually smile at you when you make eye contact! My wife and I are regulars here and never forget to add chili cheese fries to our order. So hungry just thinking about those burgers!
None
None
None
This will be my second time story here at Public Storage am very happy with their service and prices Joann is wonderful. she took me around the propert and showed me th and showed me the units. she up sold me a bunch she up sold me a bunch of boxes and tape
I have taken my vehicles to Rancourt for Auto Repair and Auto Body work for over 5 years. They are a honest, family-run business with outstanding customer service. I personally could not recommend them enough for any of your automotive repair needs.
None
My experience at Sheridan Ford was unlike any Ford Dealer experience I have ever had. On Tuesday, February 25th at 8:30pm, my 2010 Ford Fusion suddenly stalled out on Kirkwood Highway. Panic stricken, I called AAA and had them bring it to Sheridan Ford. At 7:34am the next day, Chuck called me to determine what had happened to my vehicle. Sensing that I was still upset, Chuck reassured me that he would take care of my car and find out what caused this to happen. When I arrived at 8:30am, Tara and Chuck were at the desk and greeted me with a welcoming hello. They took me back to the lounge area and told me that as soon as they knew anything that they'd let me know. About 30 minutes later, Chuck came back and explained to me about the nation-wide recall on the throttle body that affected the Fusions, which was the root of my vehicle's issue. He also explained that my battery and mass air sensor needed to be looked at, which was a HUGE blessing. Once the vehicle was finished, Chuck and Tara told me that if I had any questions or concerns, that they're just a phone call away. They treated me like I was part of their family...how thoughtful was that!? On Thursday, Chuck gave me a follow up call, just to make sure I was okay, as well as the vehicle. The fact that he went the extra mile to make sure that *I* was okay, speaks volumes. Thank you so much for going above and beyond to make my day that much brighter, and to Tara and Chuck for making this process a little less scary.
Love the food, love the service, love the atmosphere! Everyone is extremely friendly & makes you feel like you've known them forever ! My food has always been awesome!
This is 1 of the few places it actually went above my expectations. Friendly service and I can't believe how beautiful the roots of the clone looked.
They were SO helpful, great customer service!
Great Gatherings in Annapolis is a great place to shop and even to just browse with your family. Whenever we visit the store the staff is always welcoming and helpful, yet does not hover over you at all and allows you to just enjoy your visit without being haggled. We recently purchased a propane firepit and worked with sales associate Rick Wang. Rick was extremely helpful and informative. He provided all relevant details and pictures asked for by text message right away and worked with me on the price as well as making the delivery date convenient. Rick's direct feedback, recommendations on different products and information were the key factors to making the purchase.
Excellent friendly customer service
Las Velas Restaurant in this area is excellent The food and atmosphere is really good, and very reasonable.
None
I have nvr taste a better chilli pan mee then here... the place has a long history and when I started to frequent this shop back in 2007... its a place I will drop by when pass KL
I bought my best friend a birthday cake and it was UNBELIEVABLE!!! Just walking in the door was breathtaking... soooooo worth the money
The sushi is fantastic. I've had slow service once during a particularly busy lunch rush, but it's otherwise been great. The food is well worth the price.
None
I have been studying with Rick for a few years. He's really patient and SUPER knowledgable. He's patient and has great energy. I'm in my 40's, so learning the guitar is no easy feat for me. However, I enjoy every one of my lessons with Rick.
I have never learned so much before at a dental visit! Dr. Fedoretz was super fun and explained everything to me in detail. Shweta was great as my hygienist. She set up a plan for me to have optimal dental health. I would highly recommend this office.
Battistella was my first experience with new orlean's cooking. Seafood platter and fried green tomatoes were very very nice.
Ann road animal hospital is probably one of the best places I have taken my pets. The staff was caring and all of my animals seemed to be less afraid here than most places. They checked up on all 3 of my animals after seeing them to make sure they were doing good and they were affordable. I recommend them to everyone I know.
While visiting from FL my husband had a COPD outbreak with cough and fever. We called and found they were in network with our insurance and when we arrived there was only one patient ahead of us. The MD was a great listener and all the staff was very nice. After a thorough exam they did a nebulizer treatment and took an xray. We then got prescriptions to take. Wonderful folks giving wonderful service!!
None
Great food, extremely friendly staff, nice location. The quality of the food is as good now as it was 13 years ago when I first started eating there.
Ever since I put on my first pair of pants from Public Myth, i was hooked! The Bamboo Pockets pants are SO incredibly comfortable to wear at the gym or out and about. I get complements on them EVERY TIME I wear them (ladies, the pockets are magic, i swear because they make your butt look curvy and sexy! Every item that I have bought in the last couple years have fit great and most important, they wash great! The fit doesn't change and the colours don't fade. This makes me happy because some of the colours that items come in are SO GORGEOUS (Purple Haze, Princess, and Sunshine to name a few) and it would be disappointing if they did fade! The customer service response time online has always been less than 24 hours. I have only bought this line from Reflex stores and the staff have been very friendly and helpful. My only complaint is that the Reflex stores don't always carry the sizes that I need - but now that i know what fits I can just get it online. A bit on the pricey side - but worth it! great for the gym, yoga, walking the dog, or hanging with friends... the legging would even be awesome to wear on a date!! If you are a 'Lulu Lover' then i am confident you will fall in love with PM - great quality, unique style and clothing that you can LIVE your life in! gym, grocery shopping, yoga... i heart Public Myth!
The atmosphere was very nice and the food was excellent. Everything was very well cooked and seasoned nicely. I would definitely recommend this place and will be going back.
This is a hidden gem of pampering in downtown Seattle! I regularly get waxings here and every single aesthetician is fantastic! Sonja and Brenna are my favorites for Brazilians. They have a European style waterless manicure/pedicure technique that, once you try it, you will NEVER go back to the other kind. Everyone is super nice and friendly, and there is a relaxing waiting area, too. I tried the collagen bed the other day and it was fun, although I am still not sure what the benefits are. The massage therapists are excellent. I have never had a bad treatment here. I am not a facial person, so can't comment on those, but I highly recommend this place. They offer discounted valet parking while you are there, too.
None
I LOVE all of my wedding photos, which Sally and a team of colleagues shot in October of 2011. Sally has taken many photos for our family and has been a joy to work with! I love her personable shoots and the quality of her photos. There is always a "surprise" photo that showcases the art in her work!
My sister has been working with Sean in order to prepare for college next year. She attended his ACT Prep course after taking the ACT once before. After the course, she signed up and took it again and her score jumped four points! Sean has a way with getting his students to understand how to excel at the ACT. He also does a great job working with students in writing essays and filling out applications for college and scholarship applications. His knowledge is beyond reproach and the students seem to respond to him very well. I would recommend Sean for those considering the daunting task of helping a loved one start their college preparations!
None
We just bought our first ever new car from Sandy Sansing Mazda and we were very pleased with their service. These guys are top-notch, extremely knowledgable and will work with you in any way you need to get you the best car for you.
Wellpoint Dental exceeds all expectations of quality, service, and price. I actually look forward to my dentist visit; regardless of the reason. Dr. Payne genuinely cares about each person individually, and this office (every staff member) sets an example for the entire industry to follow. My son even loves going to the dentist?!
These guys didn't have the tire size that I needed however, they repaired the tire in order for me to get me to the next tire shop safely AND kept it reasonably priced...
So I was looking for a phenomenal group of people in a tattoo parlor. I came across the place because I shop at the Harley Davidson store next door to Top Rocker, and walked in and took a look at the artists, my gut screamed at me about one artist in the shop, Miss Bird. I looked at the portfolios in the shop, there were no names on any of the portfolios. I flipped through the artists and Julie Birds fit the idea of schemes and styles are what I had in mind. I asked who's portfolio it was and it turns it was Miss Birds'. Turns out she is a newly licensed artist but she is beyond amazing. I showed her a picture of what I'd like for a general idea, and said I'd like you to sketch up something similar but have some fun with it. Boy, did she. I was blown away with the finished ink by her. There isn't any flash up in the shop, my impression I got was they like original work. The shop was clean, there wasn't any drama or bad attitude from any of the artists. It was all positive energy, and Julie told me (not a direct quote) “I won't do negative ink, because bad times in life are only temporary.” The whole vibe was positive. I watched a kid come in and get his first tattoo with his mother present, and the artist, Danny, took his mom back and started everything up and explained it to her while he did it and why sanitary practices are performed in the shop. I watched her go from very tense to extremely relaxed, she had not a drop of ink on her body. When a mother can come into a shop and watch her child get his first ink and be at ease speaks volumes about the shop as an entirety. Inside Phoenix area there is only one place I will be getting ink. Matter of fact this is the only shop I will be getting ink at.
Great customer service, very quick, their expertise can be trusted, and they will give you a fair price.
I found this place by accident and have been using them faithfully every since. No hidden fees, For my 21 and up crew, we can use cash or a debit card without the crazy $27 per day fees. I highly recommend Action Car Rental... @itsjamesp
Best coffee in the Coachella Valley! Been coming here since the first day they opened.
This restaurant was amazing! The food was great and had huge proportions. It was very reasonably priced and the service was impeccable. A definite must if you enjoy omelets and friendly smiles!
None
I was in the market for a 2011 7-Series BMW. After very thorough searching I ended up finding ALM Roswell. I called, and the car I asked about was being purchased. BUT, upon my asking if they had any others available, salesman Rand Hopper searched and helped me find another that I ended up preferring to the one I originally had called about! He helped secure it for me, as there were several people looking at it. He really helped and fought for the deal. I know that sounds odd, a salesman fighting for you to help you buy something from him, but as they told me, ALM moves about 450 vehicles a month. My BMW 740Li was white on black, which is one of the reasons it was so sought after. Another salesman had a buyer for the vehicle, and that was not good as I was about 400 miles away and the other buyer had cash in hand. I am so thankful Rand was my salesman, because he fought off the other buyer to get the car for me. Once I agreed to purchase, Rand took me over to the GM, David, to process the deal. Again - great guy. After speaking to both of these guys, all of my trepidations were gone. The drive back to Indiana in my new 740Li was the most at peace I think I have ever been. And it purred all the way home like it was right off the line. Both Rand and David are proud, responsible fathers, and they both spoke about their children with a lot of pride. That is actually one of the most important things to me as to how comfortable I am about working with folks when this type of money is involved. I couldn't recommend them enough. Before I went in, I had read all 56 reviews online, and although most were positive, there were a few negative, which scared me a little. Well, I think the negative ones were mostly from people who don't realize the business model these guys are in. They flip inventory, and it goes quickly. If you don't like that fast-paced process, you should go to the manufacturer's dealership and pay 30% more. These guys MUST clear all of the BS out of the conversation and get things taken care of, as that it there business model. At the end of the day, I got an UNBELIEVABLE car, at an even MORE UNBELIEVABLE price. End of story. Great people - I can't say enough regarding how high quality this experience was.
These guys are great!! I was helped by the manager, Brett, and two other guys They were amazing. Got everything set up for me and even went the extra mile to call me a couple if Times after to make sure everything was working out. This is the one by MRS. Fields, its a corporate store, there's another inside the mall by JMR, they are an authorized dealer and screwed up my plan and added things they shouldn't have. Beware of authorized dealers.
Todd and his team at Shirt Magic are excellent in every way! They will work with you to meet your needs, whether you have a low or high budget to work with. They are fast, reliable and personable. I would recommend them to everyone.
None
Mobility Coast have been my Van rental place for years now,I highly recomend this company to anyone with a need for accessable van. Jim is great, his vans are clean and in good shape. I know that the van will be delivered on time every time I visit San Diego. Thank you Jim for providing an affordable service to the special needs travellers.
It really is a beautiful park.... 650 lush trees, wonderful people.... For now, until Recep Tayyip Erdoğan puts a McDonalds and a Starbucks in. It would be wonderful if the people resisted; you know, just for lulz.
They recently moved to this new location, and it was definitely a move for the better. The inside is much bigger, and everything has more display room. The new place is clean and well organized. There are many more parking spaces. And, you can't beat the fact that the new place is conveniently located to many great eateries.
Made to measure curtains of excellent quality. Thank you all for getting them done before the cold weather.
None
Sarah's service is excellent. She is very attentive, patient and caring. She is also practical and gets you healed and pain free as soon as possible (without notching up a billion return visits).
Best steak tips EVER. Plenty of food, and it's very good. Everyone at our table tried my steak tips and wished they had ordered it. They all loved their own dinners, but the steak tips were so flavorful. A real treat. Good service.
I have been going to Josefs for many many years. The team are A1! I can recommend their Hot Chocolate! Nothing is too much trouble, they certainly go the extra mile, a pleasure to recommend! Well Done to Paul and the Team x
At “Salvador Calvano Hair” in Phoenix, you will get an organic, natural haircut. I know I do. Salvador began cutting my hair in 2007, and I’ve been driving a hundred miles round-trip from Casa Grande ever since. He’s nursed my hair from medium length to long and, most recently, to a chin-length bob. The real test of a great haircut for me is to be able to wash and go without blow-dry, gel, mousse, hairspray, or any other control agent. My haircuts by Salvador inevitably ace the test. Rather than impose a particular style, he pays attention (let’s just say he listens) to hair. The result—whether long, medium, or short—is an excellent style that requires no fuss. Something Salvador does that few are confident—or talented—enough to do is cut hair while it is dry. In so doing, he sees hair as it truly is and can cut and shape accordingly. All wet hair looks pretty much the same, but all dry hair is individually unique. Salvador welcomes—indeed embraces—the challenge of working with hair the way it naturally presents. As for color, the answer is yes, but it is done masterfully, highlighting and enhancing what is already there—or should be. In fact, hair is never over-processed with product at Salvador’s salon. Instead, the goal is vibrant and vigorous hair that not only shines, but breathes. This approach is important at any age, but even more-so when one is over 60 as I am. My hair has never looked healthier than it does now. Salvador can—and has—styled international super-models, and he travels from Phoenix to New York to style hair during spring and fall Fashion Weeks. The bottom line, though, if you want a masterful haircut and/or color, you can get both at Salvador Calvano’s salon in Phoenix.
None
Went in November 2008... one word "amazing" Would love to come back and would recommend Lenny's to EVERYONE who visits New York!
Fantastic customer service! Derek worked and reworked our new business cards until they were just what we were looking for. They even rushed out some of them for us. They are always extremely helpful and have prompt service. I highly recommend using this fantastic printing company!
When I dined here, I ordered a plate of Fettuccini Alfredo. It came with my choice of a free soup or salad. I opted for the side salad and was not disappointed. Their home-made Italian dressing was phenomenal. The fettuccini alfredo was also extremely delicious and consisted of all home made ingredients as well. The food and service here is top notch. This isn't your average pizza shop and I'd highly recommend it to anyone who enjoys quality food and service.
excellent..
Love going here! It has become less family friendly than it was in the past but it is still the best cheap date in Rhode Island or Massachusetts! Parking is not the greatest but definitely able to deal with it for the entertainment value.
This place was great. I needed three tires and an alignment and had been saving up for what I thought was going to be extremely expensive. I spent way less than I expected and they got done in a much shorter time than I expected. I would definitely recommend Tire Discount on Pondella. Don't judge a book by it's cover. The shop was not like a Tire-Chain type of shop. It was a work place. But, let me tell you, the service was quick and inexpensive, and done right.
None
Stvarno dobri rezultati optimizacije i pozicioniranja na Google. Najbolji! SEO agencija Total Dizajn nam je maksimalno pomogla u usponu na Google pozicijama.
I went in to look for something sweet to go along with my black coffee, and lo and behold, I found the perfect spot. The bakery had blueberry lemon cupcakes on sale, so I took the last of the batch. They were wonderful. Before we left Arizona, we took pumpkin cheesecake and lemon cupcakes to our family in Glendale, along with gluten free lunches for my nieces and nephews (one of my nieces has a gluten allergy). Salads and hamburgers were perfect, cheesecake was awesome, and the lemon cupcakes had the perfect amount of lemon flavor.
None
The whole loan process could not have gone any smoother. Casey was there to answer any and all questions (as well as answer questions I didn't know I had) in a very prompt manner. She is very upfront and honest with all fees and timelines. Everything was nothing short of spectacular. Thanks so much Casey!!
Really good food and service.
Scott and Stewart are both great. They took the time to come to my office look at my new business accounting. They instantly found ways to make my accounting easier and more efficient. Their prices are very fair and they are efficient with their time so they don't waste yours. They are both personable and take the time to listen to what makes the most sense for you and your business. I definitely recommend them.
I've been coming into Fujiya for many years now. I love the food and the people here. They're always corteous and the food is always good. If you're sitting at the bar Juan is always willing to to engage you in banter as he produces awesome works of art. I especially recommend the Jalepeno Nigiri, even if you don't like spicy things. It's worth it and I unless you're even more of a heat wimp than me you'll survive it :D
I'm a bass guitar player and have been playing for almost ten years now. I brought my bass into the shop at Taylor's and got a set up done with Elixir strings. Which is different because I have always played on DR strings in the past, but I must say these Elixirs have me sold with there smooth feel and exceptional life span. The set up was done perfectly and made playing much easier with the appropriate action and intonation.The pricing was very fair and they got it done in a very timely manor. I will definitely come back here to get all of my basses set up and any repair work that I will ever need in the future.
Exceptionally professional, very efficient, and an excellent price for our new roof. Troy, the owner, handled any questions or concerns quickly and took his time to explain things. We felt like valued customers and are very happy with the result. Our old roof came off and our brand new roof went on in just 1 day (not a tiny house, 4000 sq feet of roofing)!! Not a nail was left behind. The crew was very thorough and cleaned up after themselves well. I would highly recommend!
Was here for 1 night! Very friendly staff and very nice room! Pool, Spa and Sauna was nice so is exercise room! I will definitely be back! I am a truck driver and was impressed that they have truckers rate and truck parking! Has shuttle and will take you to local restaurants in area and bring you back if you have no transportation!!!
Dr. Slaughter is fantastic. She helped my husband and I with arranging for Lasik at Eye Lasik Austin and is providing the follow-up care after surgery. The entire experience has been outstanding. The doctor and her staff are very friendly and attentive to our needs, answering our many questions and, yes, they do remember us and previous conversations we have had, which is very refreshing. They get to know their patients on a little more of a personal level, not just as a file they pull for annual visits. Lakeline Vision has email and text reminders that patients can sign up for which is very helpful when are all very busy and have full schedules. I really appreciate the extra steps this practice takes to ensure their patients feel comfortable with their care and we that we receive a very high level of attention.
Good reliable service. I use him to fill-up my CO2 tanks and always willing to do it while I wait!
Many choices with some of the best prices you will find. Great customer service and fast secure shipping. I would certainly use them again for any camera needs.
Went for a bridal party. Wonderful people, professional work, especially Stan, who did my pedicure! Recommend!
None
I shop Claudia's frequently. The store is welcoming, clean, and organized. The staff is friendly and knowledgeable and the owner herself is engaging and personable. If I don't find what I am looking for, they can order it or I often find something new to try. The prices are worth it because you can't pay enough for a store that is welcoming, with staff that cares.
The food court is the $#!+. Really is a nice place. I think I can say its my fave mall in the GTA. The best thing must be the attendants in the individual stores. I'm very sensitive to that kind of stuff and I've seen the best here: hence you might spend a lot before you know what's happened... lol
None
I love crepes and these guys do the best. Homemade caramel, Belgian chocolate, yum. Epic smoothies too. I walked 6 blocks to get here, so should you.
I don't understand why there are so many negative reviews. Being a first time parent, it was overwhelming walking into the store. I wasn't sure where to start or what to get. Luckily, the staff was VERY helpful. They explained why I should consider buying certain items and everyone was friendly. The items might be a bit pricey, however, the that goes with the quality and uniqueness of the products.
Great green views!
Cheap food, great taste, and amazing service!!!!!!! I will definitely be coming back over and over.
I have been using Ohio Exterminating for about 10 years. In 4 different home and for everything from spiders, mice and even a bed bug scare. Andrew himself dropped everything and came over to ease my mind within 45 minutes of my call. They never try to upsell and I won't use anyone else.
None
From everything I know about Iozzo's (inside information) this place will be fantastic. Great chef, menu, atmosphere, great wine selection and the nicest people!! Look forward to eating at Iozzo's many times!!
Awesome ice creams and pasta!! Loved'em!! A place must for foodies!!
The staff was incredibly friendly and helpful. The place is beautiful. My boyfriend felt very special and attended to.
It was like walking into a realm full of games and possibilites. Everything was neat and tidy, well organized and welcoming. The staff too had a love and extensive knowledge of board games. You could tell all that were there had a passion for what they did and wanted to show you how much you have the potential to love it too.
Great clean place, Friendly staff - Suggest !
Good eats
I bought a chin strap that was the wrong size The CPAP Shop quickly shipped the size I needed no questions asked. The CPAP Shop also provided free shipping for the item I needed to return. I highly recommend buying from The CPAP Shop. Excellent customer service.
None
None
Called them at 8am about a 17 mile tow and they took my info. They called me back in 45min that a driver was in route. He got there at 9:30. Was very nice and professional. Took my credit card info and towed to my mechanic. One hour later, their office called with the total mileage and verification that the vehicle was delivered.
Fair Wind Inspections was recommended by my insurance agent. I called several Wind Mitigation inspection companies and Fair Wind was the lowest. Kevin arrived on time and completed the inspection in about 15 minutes. A few days later I received a thorough, professional report. I am looking forward to received a discount that will hopefully pay for my inspection. Thanks!
Me ha gustado mucho este hotel, encima es barato, solo 5.000 euros por noche
Took my bike in for a tune up. They helped with that, then with accessories, and encouragement. Couldn't have been nicer. And the bike does better now than when I bought it!!
None
I hadn't been to the dentist in over five years, and I was really nervous for this appointment. However, my fears were quickly eliminated. The office atmosphere was peaceful, and the receptionist was very warm. My dental hygienist was amazing. She was professional yet personable, and I trusted her immediately. Dr. Hogg was very nice as well, and very precise. He didn't overlook anything, and I was very pleased with his care. I can't imagine going anywhere else.
We had a Weimaraner that we would only board at lucky's. He was very nervous and anxious dog and luckys was great with him. He was able to stay in his own room, rather than cage or run (he was returned with a torn up nose from staying with in a chain link fence elsewhere), and he was able to be by himself in a large room with a mat/blanket, rather than have to socialize with other dogs as he was not great in large groups or with certain temperament types. He was always returned in good health and the customer service we experienced was top notch. Our bichon was also boarded there and she was treated wonderfully. I highly recommend luckys pet resort, especially if you have a high needs dog, it was worth our drive for our peace of mind.
None
love this place been going to them since May 2012. Always an excellent job!
Restoration is a dynamic church focused on building relationships and growing as a part of the Arlington community. My wife and I attend church here because of the friendly staff, encouraging community members, and the connection the church has to multiple active outreach organizations in and around Arlington. One important note for people thinking about visiting: The location of our church meetings are at Little Falls Presbyterian Church at 5pm on Sunday for a short time because the address listed here is going to be the home to our new church building.
Just got my family car back from Ravenscroft, "TOP service", Becky was super helpful. Knowing my family is safe means more then anything I've paid. Highly recommend Ravenscroft to every driver in & around fleet. TIP - please give away flyers to your customers asking them to recommend your services to their neighbours.
A very Good Management. Nice infrastructure. Nice Faculties
iyooo
My friend referred this shop. I went there last week. The behavior of the staff was nice. I gave order to frame some of my picnic photos with frames of their own choice. After framing, the photos look great. I am happy with the work done.
Having worked with numerous recruiting companies/staffing agencies, I have got to say I have had the best experience with the Execu search group. My recruiter (Vincent G.) made it clear from the first time I talked to him that he wanted to get me a better position than the one I had. He began applying me for various positions immediately after I met with him and unlike other recruiters, made it a point to keep in touch with me (even when I wasn't offered an interview). When I finally got the interview, he worked with me to make sure he covered every last topic I would need to go over for the interview, and made it a point to make sure that I was completely prepared and gave tips for the interview as well. After the interview, he gave me feedback based on what he was told from the company. Turns out I was offered the position. Even after I started, Vinny has stayed in touch with me to make sure I'm doing well. I would highly recommend anyone looking for a position to meet with him at least once, unlike other recruiters he actually wants his clients to get the position!
None
I received the utmost professionalism when purchasing a vehicle with Paul Valenti and Jeri Joyce. They were very knowledgeable and friendly when I was asking questions. They also made the process of purchasing a vehicle an easy and exciting experience! I plan on recommending them to everyone! I love driving my 2011 Toyota Corolla! Thank you!!
Three years ago, a neighbor suggested I take my ailing older car to Sean. I did, and it's still going strong with 155,000+ miles. Sean and his mechanics have proven to be honest, able, and professional. Highly recommended!
Great pizza. I love it. The price is reasonable too. I had their Gyro a couple of times and it was good also. Not as good as the pizza though.
CANT SAY ENOUGH GOOD THINGS ABOUT THESE GUYS!!! Went in at 5:00 to look around, drove out with our new Journey a little after 7. They will do anything they can to ensure your complete satisfaction. After having such a horrible experience at ECA, these guys are so refreshing! They shoot you straight!
None
Excellent food and the beer selection is impressive! 
Great doughnuts! Friendly service. Get there early for best selection.
As Australians we were reminded of the Aussie pub, with beer garden outside with live band, fire pits and an ice cold beer. A fantastic American experience. Friendly staff and people who were all having a great time! We really enjoyed ourselves.
This place is an amazing hidden gem of the Altoona area, heck Central Pennsylvania. They have a smoke house, they smoke everything. They have amazing meats and cheeses. They make their own bacon and pepperonis. They have this roast beef that is so good, I had just one bite of it and I wanted to swim in a vat of it. They also have - surprisingly - a cajun crab dip that is to die for. It's so delicious, with just the right amount of spice and meaty chunks of crab meat. It's perfection on a whole grain cracker. When I was there with my husband we also got some of their smoked cheddar. I made it later into a smoked chipotle macaroni and cheese...soooo good. No liquid smoke here folks. As soon as you step out of your car you will smell the hickory goodness. Check it out!
Had the opportunity to deal with the manager on several occasions. Vincent is a great guy to deal with, they will take care all of your motorcycle needs. He keeps his word and follows through. Awesome dealership check them out.
Actually had my car tinted at the 22nd and Kolb location, but everyone I spoke with on the phone and met in person - including the wonderful Karol Becerra - were professional, extremely helpful and responsive. My car looks amazing and the tint is perfect. Thank you Star Glass, I'd recommend you above all!
I have bought a lot of cars in my life. About 15-18 to be exact. This was the smoothest, fastest experience I have had so for. My credit was borderline and they got me a low rate and approved in literally minutes. Jorden and Mathew went above and beyond the call of duty. I cannot praise them enough putting me into my dream truck 1794 edition tundra. I went to Fred Haas prior and not only did Gullo beat their price 6,000 they also gave me 2,000 more for my trade in. And! a 1500 rebate!! WHAT A DIFFERENCE! They then went on to tell me I could get my extended warranty refunded. This was another 1800 in my pocket! Fred Haas said I had no warranty. Gullo has got it going on! The entire process was less than an hour.
None
Pretty nice place cashier is meh buy hopefully the food taste good
Beautiful & Breath taking views. So peaceful & calm.
Great Jerk! If your looking for a slice of Caribbean fare in the heart of downtown. I highly recommend it.
I have nothing but great things to say about J Kent Staffing. I had just moved back from Hawaii, and was ready to get out of retail. I found J Kent staffing on another site and decided I'd give them a try. Karen was absolutely amazing. They got me a job interview with a company in less than a week, and I have been with that company for over a year now. J Kent made sure I was placed with a good company, with people that I like. Karen's follow up to make sure everything was going good continues to this day. Great support, and a great company over all. I highly recommend J Kent Staffing to anyone looking for a job!
Nyc place to be
Awesome food, great service, friendly staff. Had a great night and staff were not pushy to get you out. The food was delicious and will definitely go back again!!!
None
Indulge Spa is wonderful!! Always professional the best treatments I have ever had!!! Amazing!! I have been there three times and I am always treated like a princess!!! I love it and will never go anywhere else@ Stephanie does an amazing wax and body wrap and Vicki best massage ever!!!
cozy and romantic, very nice to have seating options from bar, couches, sushi bar and outdoor terrace. sunday drag queen brunch is a must.
The Italian Kitchen is the BEST place to go...they have the best Italian food in Brockton by far. Love going there for lunch or dinner
great shop. smart staff. can't reiterate enough how clean the ranges are. don't find that often.
Our son has been here for over a year now and we have nothing bad to say at all. We love think the staff is great and we LOVE that he comes home with art work every day and is always learning. We had to learn basic sign language to understand him after they taught him a bunch of the basic words. We have another child on the way and have already signed her up and can't wait for her to attend and learn. We have greatly enjoyed being a part of CHLC and look forward to many years with them
Been wanting fresh doughnuts for a while and this place was great. The cookies were outstanding.. Five stars all the way.
I would like to give a HEARTY THANKS to Matt @ Rose City Motors - Fort Wayne on Lima Rd. He and his whole team were very patient over the past few weeks. Bought an older Mazda earlier in the year from a buy here/pay here. It was junk. Things were wrong with from the get go. Engine, suspension, cyclinders, brakes, etc. That car was a mess. Last week, it started making grinding noises. With winter coming, I didn't want to worry about my family's safety. I HAD to get a better car. We went to several other places and filled out credit apps, only to be forgotten or told there wasn't any way they could help. Driving around we saw the new RCM Lima location and looked at few cars. We eventually found a minivan that we loved, a loaded 2010 Chrysler Town & Country. Took it out twice on test drive. Also took out a Volkswagen Routan. Loved bought minivans but the payments were higher than I could afford, especially considering I was upside and backwards on the old Mazda. With each test drive, Matt asked thoughtful questions to see what else he could get for us and how he could help more. I joked "find me a loan and I buy anything except my piece of junk." Unfortunately, we didn't get the minivans. But with a lot of sweat and effort, Matt & his team found deal that would let me ditch the old junk and get into a safer vehicle at a good price. So last week me and my family picked up our 2010 Nissan Rogue AWD. Low miles. Clean. Doesn't feel used. I drive over bumps and barely notice. The other car, I'd be worried about something vital coming off. Other places put lots of pressure to buy road hazards or totally leave you cold. The only thing I kick myself for is not going to Rose City sooner. You see the commercials and get cynical. I did. But Matt & his team are top notch. You do business with them, you'll be treated right. I'm glad I did.
Went for the first time, and the Papaya Salad (Tom Sum) was awesome, as was the Kang Dang. Our server Dawn was very nice, helpful, and we went back again the next night. Nice find!
Amazing. I will be back. Robert took his time and cared about my hair and nails. He is great to talk to as well. We walked in and wefe welcomed by everyone. Just bought the Valentine's day couple's package so will be posting on that soon!! I am new to Tucson and was impressed!!
one of the best places to rent a car.... low rates good upgrade
My husband has purchased several Hondas from Sheehy Honda and Bob Sautter has been his salesperson. He has always gone above and beyond the expected norm of purchasing a new Honda. He has always taken him to the service department to show him around and introduce him to the service writers. Rachel Higgins has always been our service writer. Both employees are top notch and are a credit to Sheehy Honda of Alexandria.
Love this salon! I go to Blake and he is amazing. He has you walking out, every time, feeling beautiful and sexy! Great service, great company, great atmosphere!
Elaina Adeniyi is awesome. I purchased a Volkswagen Farenheit in 2007 from the Evanston Autobarn and it has been one of the best purchases of my life. The car is flat out cool, fun to drive, reliable, and sturdy. Every employee of Autobarn has been good natured and competent. I've worked directly with Elaina Adeniyi on numerous occasions from the casual checkup to the random upgrade and she is excellent at what she does. I highly recommend Autobarn for a great car and an even better experience.
Finally a COMPANY That is helping the community with saving us all a little bit of money! Thank You Pull A Part! I think this was the next best thing since the automobile first came out. Used parts at used prices i love it
We have had nothing but great experiences with Tom Wood. From the initial purchase (with three young children, this is no easy task), to the vehicle orientation, and to the follow up service, my experiences have been great! We live over an hour away from this location, but the drive is worth it. When I bring in my 2013 Pathfinder for maintenance, they do an entire check on the car, fix a few bugs that may have popped up, and recognize me by face/name each time I'm there. I felt like I was working with friends, and not JUST a customer. I also decided to order new floor mats for my car. I was willing to place the order and pick them up another time, but they had them already in stock! And the offered me the online discount I had received when I purchased the car a few months before. Talk about service...I was thrilled! I expect my vehicle will last a long time, but when it's time to swap it for a new car, you can bet it will be a Nissan, and it will come from Tom Wood.
It's awesome !
My son has been going here for a few years now and he loves Dr. Losito and the entire staff. I recently switched to this practice and have been very happy with the service and care I have received. I would highly recommend it!
We purchased a TV stand From Scott at Woodley's. Really love the quality, and Scott was very good to work with, really listened to what we needed. Scott didn't try to "sell us" but took the time to help find the piece that fit our space. We didn't spend a lot of money but were treated as if we did.
I have known Randy for a few years now, and I am still happy with the quality and prices that he charges. I would recommend his services mostly because there is no gimmick. His diagnostics come with accurate descriptions of the problem at hand. Randy is a very likeable person, and genuinely cares about the quality and affordability he provides. Thanks Randy!
Everything is so fresh and yummy! One of my favorite places to go.
Brilliant sushi. Highly recommended.
Every time I call them and make an appointment or need records or whatever. The staff is so helpful and friendly!! They remember me and my dog every time, and even though I live in South City St. Louis, I still choose to keep going back. Keep up the great work!!
Awesome selection here and great service every time I come in! Unique teas, perfect for gifts.
None
Delicious food and homemade catering for any occasion.
I found my new favorite place to eat a burger thank bobby J's
Bhart ka anokha paryatak sthal.
Wonderful food large portions and great atmosphere friendly staff
Best and I mean the Best Auto Repair/Body Shop in CANADA! - do not take your Luxury car anywhere else.
None
Dr Jill Bronz is an amazing veterinarian and our family veterinarian for about 10 years. She recognized a problem my one beagle had with his kidneys and she discovered the cause. The beagle boy was 11 years old and I thought we would lose him. Thanks to her, not only has his kidneys returned to normal he is acting and living a happy puppy life two years later! He has more energy at 13 years old than he did when he was 6 years old. Dr Bronz also performed surgery on one of our other beagles and thank goodness she identified early something we had not noticed. If we had waited just six more months, we could have had a more serious outcome for our beagle. Now he is back to normal and full of energy! Dr Bronz is one of the best in the Valley. She has a caring staff dedicated and focused on the well-being of the animal.
I haven't worked out in years but I tried out BodyBar and LOVED it. I was sore and it felt great. I had a blast. It's a small class and the instructors spend a lot of time making sure your form is correct. It's a full body workout on the Pilates type machine. HIGHLY recommend! It's worth it!
Good food for a descent price. Service was great despite it being crowded.
Absolutely delicious. Had the Texas cowboy burger and I can now die happy.
Best service you will EVER receive!! Hi-tech facility and excellent service!!
If you want the best car buying experience you've ever had and meet staff that will bend over backwards to make you happy, this is the place to go. I cannot say enough good things about this dealership other than they truly care about the customer and will do anything possible to make you happy when you leave the lot. Just bought a 2011 F-150 FX2 which makes our third vehicle from here. Point is this will be the only place I buy period.
Great service, extremely trustworthy and knowledgeable. Would highly recommend Affordable Lock And Key in the future.
Two swimming pools near Ubud center.
Good
Touching the Tampa Bay Area in so many ways! Good work & Good People. Congratulations on your newest venture - Inside The Box - I've had an opportunity to eat there twice and the food is always great and so are the prices. It's amazing how you can do so much with so little!
The best steak in Leeds! With kids now we don't get to eat out as much as we did. On the rare occasion we do get a babysitter we always find ourselves gravitating to La Grillade on Wellington Street beneath the old Wellesley Hotel. This is traditional, fine French dining at its best and I challenge anyone to find a better steak in Leeds, even at one of the new fancy Brazillian or Argentinian places that have recently opened up. Great wine, great menu (boudin noir starter is epic) and nice friendly buzz/atmosp[here. If its a special occasion, try the chateuabriand - you won't be disappointed. I can also safely say you won't find a better cheese board in Leeds either!
None
I found the Cleveland Eye Clinic just by chance, and I'm so happy I did. All the doctors there are the best and truly care about all your concerns, and work hard to resolve any problems with your eyes. The staff are very professional and are really friendly. You'll never regret going to the Cleveland Eye Clinic, it's a number one facility. If I had to rate it from a 1-10, it get a 10 plus! Marlene Conroy
Great service...got me into my dream car even without perfect credit...DK and Angie took real good care of me...they are good people
None
Great sushi, great service, great people!!! Best in Albany.
Excellent place for veg food.
We love Crozet Pediatric Dentistry! Dr. Clifford and his staff were so great with my kids - ages 2 and 6. As parents and professionals, they knew how to make them feel comfortable and keep them happy. The kids didn't want to leave after their check-up!
Nicole is the best massage therapist I have ever visited. She is highly skilled and professional. I would recommend healthy center massage to anyone. They make it easy to schedule appointments and go the extra mile on every visit.
I always have a good experience with the service I receieve at Garcia Kias on lomas. I had to go back yesterday after the oil change but they fixed it right away and had no problems in doing it. They tried to make it right by giving me a free detail next time I go in.
I have been using California Midwifery Services since 2007. I have had 3 of my 4 children with Rosanna Davis and plan on using them again for #5 this fall!! Rosanna and staff are always very professional, yet care about you in a very personal way. We decided to have our first homebirth because we felt is was the safest way to have a VBAC with the highest chance of success. After our first the others were 'no-brainers', the level of care far exceeded my (first) hospital birth (a c-section). I have nothing but great things to say about Rosanna Davis and California Midwifery Services. Angela - Sunnyvale, CA
Excellent find with lake views! Try their delicious Rockefeller Oysters and Southern Fried Chicken. We will be back!
Tune's Service has friendly knowledgeable mechanics who do honest work and don't overcharge you for what needs to be done. I've tried several shops in the area and Tune's is now the only one I trust with my vehicles other then the dealerships. Tune's does good work for a faction of the dealership price and is cheaper than most other places in town which I have been much less satisfied with. If you want the job done right and done by honest professionals who stand behind their work, go to Tunes. You won't be disappointed. I can say with certainty that they stand behind their work and if they make a mistake they will fix it.
None
Charitable
Rarely do I find a doctor that combines Great results with Great customer service. Both of our daughters are patients of Dr. Campbell and after 3 years we feel like family. They are very accomodating for working parents, and school schedules. Any concerns we had about our eldest daughters care, was addressed immediately. When she had to have oral surgery (from forseen circumstances) they assisted us through the entire procedure (additional insurance needs etc) and even told us about the different oral surgeons in the area that specialized in the procedure we needed to have done. I can truly say when my youngest is finished in another year, we will miss the office on Leesville Road.
None
Lugar de esperança, amor e fé
Delicious food and very relaxing atmosphere!
Just switched my moms PCP to Dr Orsak. HE IS AMAZING! Very detailed and remembers EVERYTHING!! If your looking for a doctor in the Pearland area, I highly recommend him!!
Great bar and great food. One of the best stuffed quahogs you will ever have. Stop in during your round of golf or just hang out whenever. Worth it.
Had a fantastic business luncheon at Salute Ristorante. I was in the mood for fettucchini alfredo with shrimp which was not on the menu but the chef did an amazing job. Highly recommended.
Michael Zheng was the sales manager I worked with and he was extremely helpful. Thanks Michael in helping us get this "The Ultimate Driving machine"!!!
This is a very clean, accessible and convenient storage facility. Adrienne answered all our questions and the staff overall is very friendly. This was a short term solution for us and it was as easy to terminate our contract as it was to sign up.
Delicious. Awesome burgers and a big ol plate of fries! Shakes are good too! The have outdoor dining too. Its a toss up between these guys and burger rush but definitely worth a try
I have been with this place for a long time now and really enjoy their service. The staff is friendly and eager to help. Even the few times when it was necessary for me to be late with payment, they only asked I communicate clearly with them. More then fair. My only complaint is that recently the corporation has taken to badgering us for these reviews. I am a big fan of referring business I enjoy, but I don't appreciate being expected. If they quit doing that I will leave my 5 star ratings intact.
John Paul at truck max was great. No pressure sales, everything moved quickly. He was able to answer all my questions onsite and also got back to me quickly when I had additional questions after my purchase. If you are looking for a nice lifted truck I would recommend Truck Max.
None
None
I had a customer service agent that was very hepful. She took her time with me & gave me fast & friendly service. The area is not the best, but the service is great. Service with a smile. A+
Very good doctor. She looks and lessons. When you meet Dr.dellerotti you will just know.
il cibo di alta qualità, il servizio dedicato alla soddisfazione del cliente, ottima pulizia!!!
Mary gave us great service at public storage this is the best public storage I've been to in all Los Angeles
Home Depot is one of my favorite places to shop for all of my home improvement projects.
This is the BEST pizza in town. Great customer service. Will be eating here again the next time I am in Nashville!
None
My wife and I were looking for a used Honda Pilot that was in good condition and reasonably priced. We found many listings in the Boston area but ultimately focused in on one at Honda Village in Newton. We are fortunate to have done so. Honda Village is an excellent choice in local car dealers. The facilities are nice, the staff is friendly and attentive, and there are plenty of distractions for kids while you work out a deal for a car. The vehicle we bought is a gem, and we had the opportunity to work with a great guy - Jim Samson. Jim is knowledgeable, very responsive, honest, and fair. We found Jim to be willing to go the extra mile in negotiating, and he called us back quickly and answered questions even during off hours. An even larger show of his commitment was when he came in to meet us on his day off and delayed his trip to the Topsfield Fair with his fiance for us. It was a sacrifice for him to do so, and we hope she forgave him! All humor aside, we could not be happier with the product we bought in terms of pricing, quality and service, as well as the people we worked with in our relationship with Honda Village in Newton. While, I am glad to be done with the car hunt, I would enjoy working with Jim and his associates at Honda Village again when the time comes. As I said, the Pilot is a gem, and Jim, well he is a gem, too. He really took good care of us and I urge any reader of this review to look him up and give him the opportunity to help you in your car search as he did with us. Best of luck!
None
The oldest restaurant which I remember still survives and thrives in the heart of Kolkata. They have excellent idlis, excellent dosas. No one can beat them in sambhaar. Their delicious hot sambhaar is the best I ever had in Kolkata.
I was looking online for just the right car I wanted. After about 5 minutes, I had the vehicle found exactly at Van Hyundai. I requested information and by the next morning I had an email and a phone call from the business. I set up an appointment to look at the vehicle and was greeted by an excellent sales staff. I told him why I wanted the car I wanted and he showed me another option based on my criteria to compare the two. I still chose my original pick though...But I enjoyed that fact that I was offered choices and could make a more educated decision. The staff worked fast to get my SUV ready and made the necessary detail appointments, first oil change appointment, showed me step by step how to use the technology of the vehicle and did it again when I wasn't so sure. I was introduced to the maintaince and parts department, then the office ladies, and anyone else that was there. Made me feel like I was the only reason they were there. I received weekly follow up calls just to be sure everything was okay with vehicle. It wasn't a "now it's yours, leave us alone" attitude... I would greatly recommend this dealership and also my sales person, Anthony Sollis, to the anyone wanting a great car purchasing experience.
Many Mahalos
No words can explain about how good this place is! Just go and show up, I recommend this place!! Good prices, good service, good people..
I am back in the US for the first time since 1997 and looking to build my credit rating and was in the market for a new car. Stopped by Young Chevrolet and met Jack and things progressed from there. He was informative, not pushy, listened to my needs and was extremely helpful which all together made the experience a complete pleasure.
If you are looking for an IT web specialist who delivers excellent customer service, over and over again in stark contrast to many in this industry then go no further than Innovabiz. Jurgen Strauss has come through yet again to assist me in resolving the potentially very challenging and difficult situation I had managed to get myself into. I suddenly needed access to documents that I couldn't access without specific website and password information that I did not have with me - one call to Jurgen from Innovabiz and the access issues were addressed allowing me to resolve the dispute quickly and with minimum inconvenience - the Innovabiz way! Thank you for your support Joanne Clark
First time here, on a Saturday afternoon. Great service, they operated as a team to make us feel welcome. Answered our questions about the ingredients. Invited us to the Sushi Bar to watch Liki himself make our rolls which was a fun experience and he described what he was doing which was interesting. Decor was very appealing. Food was ample portions and very delicious, and the prices were very reasonable. We will definitely come here again! Thank you Liki and family! -Justin
None
Although the dentist is my least favorite doctor, Dr. Hashim and Assoiciates at Westgate Dental Arts will make you feel comfortable about getting dental work done. Everyone is very nice and easy to talk to. Thank you Dr. Hashim for the great work.
I visited for the first time about two months ago for a color and cut. Carly was my stylist and she did a wonderful job. I have very dark hair and decided after 45 years to go lighter. She advised on the best way to about changing the color gradually. The cut was very cute and the prices compared to other salons in the area was quite reasonable. I am getting ready to make my next appointment.
From giving out free diagnostics. Good price on oil changes good price on used tires and always good service.
None
I am a local and got the opportunity to dine at this lovely place in what I would normally consider a gross tourist trap that is the armpit of the city. Bourbon Street is usually a place you can't drag me to but this was a refreshing spot to enter. Nice people, beautiful on the inside, multilevel space and lots of room. The prices were very reasonable and I ended up getting the alligator bites for appetizer - half fried and half blackened. The blackened were very salty but the fried make me want to return for an alligator poboy. I had the praline duck for an entree and it was amazing, along with the service. Our waitress was very sweet and attentive. A true gem among the flash and trash of Bourbon.
Trezo Mare Restaurante is my new favorite in Kansas City. The cruisine is superb, the deserts are to die for and the service is impeccable. I took my wife there for the first time and she was beside herself through the entire experience. I would like to thank the entire staff of this great dining establishment. Wes Pryor
The staff go above and beyond my expectations for caring for my son who has food allergies. Their extra care goes a long way in making us feel secure that he is well cared for on an everyday basis.
Awesome experience...
Good food
Delicious pad Thai, spicy vegetable roll, Philly roll, and Alaska roll. Great for pick up or dining.
When our beloved golden retriever collapsed from his cancer, I called Armadale. They had warned me to watch for this. The vet and receptionist remembered that I was pregnant, and they sent a technician to my house with a sling. The tech crawled under our porch and carried Dante to the car for me. My husband joined me at the vet's office to bade a final farewell to our dear friend of many years. After the vet gave the first injection, Dante raised his head to lick her nose as if to thank her for all the amazing care over the years before he breathed his last. It's never easy to say goodbye to a member of the family, but Armadale made it bearable. I most highly recommend them to anyone who loves an animal.
Couple of month ago I desperately needed a massage, so I found Sophie - she was available on the day I wanted to get a massage. Since then I have already got a massage from her twice. She is a very good masseuse, strong hands, accommodating. I would definitely recommend her.
I really enjoy going here. TimeOut has karaoke on Tuesdays and Fridays with some really good singers. On Sunday, Monday, and Thursday they have free Texas-hold'em poker. Great prices
excellent!
None
Dr. Sabree at Dartmouth Street Vision Center and his team give excellent service (competence, friendliness) in a most convenient location (Prudential Center in Boston). I have been a customer for almost 10 years and am very happy with this service. Dr. Sabree is excellent, does all the eye exams needed to help correct eyesight impairement AND to evaluate the health status of the eyes (as prevention). He always explains very well what he is doing, how and why. The team is very nice, very helpful with insurance (they call your insurance to determine if/how much your insurance covers). Also, they are very accommodative with appointments.
Great burgers. Friendly service. Good beer selection.
Great Service & Knowledge of Bars & Restaurants in the DT area.
Excellent service. Our server was more than willing to share her insights and yet polished enough to know when to step away. The food was creative and delicious. You must end with chocolate.
None
Eric is a great barber. good guy,nice shop with a relaxed atmosphere. about to go get my hair cut now.in my opinion hes the best barber on delmarva.
None
Buffalo Wings & Rings is where the Locals Hangout. The food is ALWAYS great, the people are ALWAYS fun and if you like to DRINK and CHATTER well, this is THE PLACE TO BE with a Mini Stage, Local Bands playing music, Wrap Around Sports Bar taking you through the building from room to room, Outside Sitting Area, and even Car Shows frequently, just makes this place one of the best locations around in North Port. New Years was great. I go here from time to time to watch sports, eat and hang out. Hope you have the same experience as I did when I first came to North Port and went to Buffalo Wings & Rings. Enjoy.
None
Been living there for past 20 years, best place with so many memories
Good Law firm with offices everywhere. I remember my father hiring them years ago when we lived in San Diego, Now I live in Pasadena and thankfully I was able to find the great lawyers who helped my father before. I was in some trouble after I was accused of some very serious crimes. I knew I needed a good lawyer to prove my innocence, so I looked for Mr. Chesley's office. Just as when my father hired them, their work went above and beyond the call of duty. They proved my innocence and got all charges dropped. I couldn't ask for anything better. If you're looking for the best lawyers, they are right here.
Found this place on the way to UPS of of route2. Just had their cheesesteak sub...best I have had since my last trip to Philly. Family owned, and the food is authentic Italian, with great prices! Met owners....cool people.
My husband and I went to La Bella Italia on a whim because it was near our hotel. I was amazed how good the food was! Being from NYC, it's hard for me to find food I like in other parts of the country, but this place did not disappoint They had all kinds of pizzas with great crusts (which I happen to love). They had a nice beer selection (Peroni is one of my favorites), and the lasagna is great too. The only thing I had there that was bad was their lobster ravioli. It was obviouly not made there in the restaurant. It was tasteless and rubbery. Avoid at all cost. Otherwise I give it an overall very good plus rating.
We have had many alterations done at Krystyna's in the past year, from a bridesmaid dress for my fiancee, and her wedding dress currently which was able to be sized down from a 14 to a 6! Also, the dress shirt I wanted to wear for the wedding was discontinued in the color I wanted. I found one at a store in the triangle on clearance, but it was 2 sizes too large (18 1/2) and the arms looked like they were designed with a gorilla in mind. In less than a week Krystyna had this fitting like a glove, it was amazing. And her prices are always coming in under what I budgeted for the wedding, and the work is a testament to her skill. I hear people say that when you find a good tailor you need to keep them for life, well, this one is a keeper.
It's the second or third time I've used this service and it is absolutely top notch! I'm always rushing to get it through with a incredible speed and each time I've been impressed with the capable staff they have. Props to Michael who worked with me this time and got it to me 6 hours before my scheduled flight. Despite me sending him the wrong documents twice! I can't speak for the non premium service but I'm a very satisfied customer and 100% sure that my application would have been denied without their help. Thank you, Trevor Driscoll P.S. I feel like I have to mention that it is indeed exorbitantly expensive but it's also well worth it if you are on a tight deadline and have a complicated visa like my India employment visa.
My wife and I were staying in Southampton following a week long holiday in Manhattan (We're from Northern Ireland). We stopped off at this aquarium on one of our days touring the North Fork and I'm very glad we did. My wife, who normally hates being dragged to museums etc., thoroughly enjoyed the experience. We spent around 2 hours exploring the various exhibits, learning from the employees and simply relaxing. Well worth a visit if you're in the area. I can only imagine the negative reviews are from people who a) expected too much or b) don't have any particular interest in sea life or animals.
I took a Search and Social Media Marketing Strategy course at Salford Business School last week and I thoroughly enjoyed it and would recommend it to anyone interested in growing their online presence. The balance between learning new practical tools and tricks and setting a big picture strategy was brilliant, just what I needed. Since the course I have implemented many of the things I leant on the day and genuinely can see the results already. Strongly recommended.
Very affordable, friendly staff
Christina very friendly, helpful and honest, highly recommend! God Bless
Great entertainment at a good price.
We first met KPI at one of their SEO training seminars which we found to be extremely helpful and informative. We were very impressed with their knowledge and no nonsense approach to SEO. We have since employed KPI to manage our SEO and adwords campaign and are extremely happy with the work that they have done and are doing to get us ahead in the rankings. Since KPI has been looking after our SEO, online business has increased 22%. We have used several SEO companies since trading online none have been as trustworthy or produced the results that KPI have.
Very friendly service, serving great sushi. I highley recommend it.
This review is for the suit department in the Men's Department. Martin spent about two hours with me revamping my wardrobe. He didn't pressure me into buying expensive suits that I didn't want; he listened to what I wanted to buy and steered me in that direction. After picking out 3 suits and 2 sport jackets, he spent extra time with me and went to the shirt and tie area and helped me coordinate my suits with a few shirts and ties. He also clued me into a few sales Macy's was having and saved me over $800 on my purchases. The combination of spending extra time with me to make sure I was happy with what i was purchasing and saving me money earns Martin and Macy's a page in my book!
None
I had to reach Heathrow Airport in hurry, and at that moment when i contacted Bloomsburycar service, they sent cab in less than 10 min at my door step and i am really very happy to see such quick service, Good Luck and thank you Bloomsburycar.
None
Best place to shop in Chicago. You can find Balenciaga, Givenchy, and Thom Browne... those kind of high quality fashion luxury wear here. People here are nice and willing to help you. Moreover, they also carry some less pricy brand such as T by Alexander Wang and Rag and Bone.
It was the 4 of us that went. 2 adults & 2 kids. Taco Tuesday's! Got 3 street tacos for $3.33. Good...really enjoyed. Got the BBQ Nachos appetizer size a lil smaller than expected. Hubby ordered and I didn't expected them to taste good... didn't sound good to me. But they to were pretty good. Kids got a quesadilla and split it. We were all still a lil hungry. Got a pitcher of Bud Light for $10.95. Wished I had got more food with that money. Total $36 + tip. Place was nice bigger than expected, no lines immediate service, waitress was really nice and manager close by that was courteous.
After seeing Crystal Lee's photographs following several of my friends' weddings, I'm convinced she's definitely the one that my bride and I will have taking our photos. She's top notch, works with only the best equipment and when she's had a "second shooter" along for more coverage of an event, that person is just as qualified and professional as Crystal. You'll be impressed with her eye for "the shot" and you'll be impressed with your album on your coffee table for years to come.
Customer Service here is fantastic. I bought a 2012 jeep liberty and immediately took it to Area 41 to get the windows tinted. Took them a little longer than I expected and I had to go to work, but they volunteered to drive my vehicle to my work and drop it off for me!! THAT is how you get repeat customers. I have had no problem with my tint job, it looks amazing. I plan on getting speaker work done here in the near future!
Love this place so very much. Tasty, inventive vegan/vegetarian food! Awesome staff. Being a vegan living in Columbus can be difficult. This is one of the only restaurants in town (notable exception is Betty's) where I have to look over the menu for quite some time to make a decision. I love it! My first visit there, a very friendly member of the staff gave my boyfriend and me a whole bag of vegan cookies for free, because "everyone needs cookies". I couldn't believe I was ignorant of this place for so long. They really make you feel like an individual and not just a "patron".
We go to Sabai Thai a couple of times each month and the food is always excellent. Everything is extremely fresh, and their spices make the dishes come alive. The staff is very friendly, and the service is fast and proficient. In the 100+ times we've eaten there, we've never had a single bad experience at Sabai Thai. Just thinking about it is making me ridiculously hungry!
Love the Groupons for Vedas Medical Spa. The doctor is very nice and meets every client. Very caring atmosphere.
None
Great experience at the store, however, I have been trying to call the store to get an issue resolved and I can't get anybody to answer. Not sure if their system is set up poorly, but I'm going on an hour now with no answer. The phone rings, it says please wait, then it hangs up. Not good.
Our experience with Prime Mortgage was wonderful. We wanted to refinance our house and some of the rates we were getting from other mortgage companies weren't very good. Kellie looked into our credit report and noticed some errors and got us the best rate possible. We are now saving over $200/month. Thanks Prime Mortgage!
I was not expecting to purchase a car when I went to Livermore Audi but everything about my visit was outstanding and I ended up purchasing a car on my first visit. Everything about the dealership so far has been outstanding, from things like new owner get together s to learn about my car and the attention they pay to the customer. I would definitely recommend them to anyone George H Kulp
Playing LMS cricket tournament there and it's a great ground
None
In the month of August 2013 my family and I visited Church Bay in order to go snorkeling and swimming. We found the experience to be delightful. In comparison to the other beaches on the south side there were very few people at Church Bay. This made the time that we spent there very private and wonderful. The snorkeling was excellent and I would recommend this beach to all. I sincerely hope your experience there will be as wonderful as ours. TTFN
The best ever. When I go here for dinner, I just ask the owner to surprise me; WOW factor everytime :-D
OMG! I love these guys! Oscar has helped move us TWICE. He's amazing and funny to boot. I love the fact that they are SO fast and efficient. THANK YOU MONSTER MOVERS! I LOVE YOU GUYS! Also- to the best mover in the world Oscar (he'll understand...he sang it for my daughter from her favorite movie Happy Feet): Luché, gané Sobresali Lo hice My Waaaay! OH! Hello! I know size can be daunting but dont be afraid!.....I love You!!!
I love this place:) :D
Schöne Hochzeits- und Eventlocation an der Berliner Spree.
My dog Kiowa loves boarding and doggy daycare at The Pawms!! All members of The Pawms staff are very friendly and helpful and truly care about making sure your pet feels at home while they are there. Kiowa has been to stay for several nights as well as just a short visit for daycare and he always has a blast!! The staff always makes you feel as though they care about your pets as much as you do - making it a point to familiarize themselves with your pet's personality and always remembering them by name. Other than just wanting to find a place where Kiowa feels at home, I also chose The Pawms over the other options because they offer competitive pricing for their boarding packages and daycare add-on AND they have larger runs than most competitors (4ft x 12ft compared to the average 4ft x 6ft or 6ft x 6ft). In short - Kiowa and I both highly recommend The Pawms!!
Great homestyle mexican food. Good for the family.
When I needed a new vehicle I shopped around and must say that I felt most comfortable when I was at the Nissan dealership. I felt no pressure and it was easy to come to a good price on my new Nissan Frontier. I am very happy with my experience and new truck.
Best iced cappuccino to be found in Boston!
My visit started out with a very simple coversation on the phone with the Office assistant. She quickly scheduled me when it was convenient for me and emaile me forms that I could fill out in advanced along with a confirmation email on my appointment. This told me that they were up to date with technology. Then when I arrived, I was greeted and assisted very kindly and the waiting area was very clean, modern, and comfortable. They explained everything that was about to go on with my appointment very clearly. Once I was in my appointment, I enjoyed the up to date room with tv's on the ceiling, mostly the caring and friendly Dental Hygentist and Dentist himelf. All very kind and full of compliments. I felt so comfortable and like I oculd talk to them about anything with no rush and that they really cared. What a great place! I was so happy when I left there and look forward to my next clenaing!
I absolutely love this place!
My name is Scott and own a independent retail shipping store, a Customer asked for helping shipping a pkg that needed to be kept secured until her daughter could pick it up, after a quick google search, I found the UPS Store that was close by, I called unsure what response I would get, WELL let me tell you, the voice on the other end was Super Helpful with both Customer Service & Information that they need to help the Customer, even offering to call her when the package arrived. GR8 JOB CHRIS!
House prices are very high in Vancouver and getting a large Mortgage was a scary thought. Our monthly payment are awesome and we love our house. Thanks again Frank!
None
If you need to get in, get out, this is the place...instructors are great...
I have known the Instructors at Victory Martial Arts in McDonough for many years. Being a part of Martial Arts schools and MMA gyms for almost 30 years I understand the needs of people seeking out martial arts lessons and classes. I have visited their Martial Arts School and I can say that they are top notch Instructors and provide excellent MMA training classes and Kids Martial Arts-Karate classes and if you live near McDonough and are looking for the right martial arts school, this is one that you will want to check out for sure!
Best mixer in town, very very nice cocktails! Food is top of the line as well. Worth every visit.
None
The vacation rental we got on Ocean Front Walk was fantastic. Close to downtown so we got to visit the convention we were attending with relative ease, but right next to the beach so we could come home to the relaxing sound of waves every night. The last day we took advantage of the unexpected bikes to go to La Jolla and back, and then we relaxed at the beach right in front of the home. That evening we hung out on the patio as we got to see the sun set over the Pacific. Incredible. I would totally recommend renting from here--everything we in order when we arrived, no keys were necessary because there were number pads, internet worked fine, everything was clean, location was great. All the thumbs up.
Disney for toddlers. Free wifi for adults.
Perry and Pete at this West Elm saved my day. I am a designer from NC who came for a few days to install a house in Jacksonville and needed quite a few things to finish my design. They went above and beyond to help me out. Thank you!
None
Great place, Cool environment and executive services. Just get there!
I love Lion Heart Kombucha! Just started brewing my own booch with a starter kit I bought from the brew shop in Portland. Can’t wait to taste it! My favorite LHK is definitely the ginger fizz. With my first batch I'm going to try and double ferment and add fresh ginger! Wish me luck :) Thanks LHK!
Great food, great value. I love their burgers and bbq, and it's all pretty reasonably priced.
Dr. Gavin is an absolute angel. She is by far the nicest doctor I have ever had and actually takes time to listen to you. She wants to know about any small problem and work out a solution for it with you. I would never think of switching to another doctor.
Been there several times & haven't had a bad meal yet!!! Great place for the area!
I have been to Angeethi multiple times & I can honestly say each and every time, they exceed my expectations (which are very high) in both food and service. The waitstaff is always super attentive, making sure my water glass is never half empty and that I don't need a refill on my rice! The food always comes out fresh and piping hot... Plus, a fabulous vegetarian menu is available :) A must go in Herndon!
Excellent staff and selection of vehicles. They assisted me with selecting the proper vehicle with payments I could afford and getting the proper financial assistance along with guidance throughout the purchasing ordeal. Very understanding and honest personnel to help walk me through the ordeal. Great selection of vehicles and affordable prices giving me the confidence to proceed with the purchase and not regret my decisions. I will be purchasing all my vehicles from this point on due to the assistance given at a time when your very vulnerable due to the huge commitment of buying a new vehicle can be. Great service throughout the purchase and speedy delivery, Friendly Personnel from the general manager assistance, financial division guidance and of Course sales staff (Hector Maldonado) making sure I was satisfied before I left and weeks after. You will not regret working with Mid County Dodge. Sincerely, Freddie Greer
Gregory Da Luz was very helpful in taking care of my truck. I am bringing my other vehicle in so he can take care of it as well.
The food is awesome here.
Outstanding customer service. Every time I go there, I leave very satisfied. Got an inspection done.. they walked right out and asked what I needed. The inspection took 10-15 minutes and another employee talked to me as I waited.. very personable people. He introduced himself and invited me back, letting me know of their services, prices, and online coupons. My car was parked toward the exit, so all i had to do was pull out into the street. Awesome place.. far better than the 10 minute sticker shop, who came out to disrespectfully read the small sign to me that said "we are out of stickers".. as well as 4-M Automotive who again disrespectfully said they were not doing inspections at 5:10pm when they closed at 5:30pm.. and when I pointed it out.. they said they stopped at 5:00pm.
One of the best burgers, if not the best in the USA. You will love every bite. Also try some of the other items on the menu, everything is really good.
The good quality interiors . satisfied with their services . appreciate their professionalism.
None
Everyone is soo sweet! I have always been afraid of the dentist but Dr. Patti has totally cured this fear. Definitely go here. :)
Soooooooooo good. Excellent Chicago deep dish Pizza.
None
I met Kevin at Costco...he was very helpful and answered all of my questions and concerns. Then Daniel came to our home to assess our heating / ac needs. He is a true pro! Daniel also addressed every aspect of my decision. To my further delight, the installation team(Mike & Victor) came as scheduled! They too did an excellent & very timely job. Hats off to Cool Air!!! Scott in Sandy Springs
Excellent staff, service and food.
Good food and good service! The onion soup was AMAZING, I'd go back again just for that!
Very, very, very pleased with our clean carpets. Thank you, Joey, once again for doing such an amazing job. See you in six months!
I have been a client at Paul Joseph's for over 5 years now. My stylist, Christina is amazingly talented and so professional. She is so passionate about hair and is always current on new styles and trends. People always ask me where I get my hair done and I immediately refer them to Christina or Paul Joseph's in general. The atmosphere is great and everyone is so nice and accommodating. Several of my friends and my aunts are now clients. I wouldn't trust anyone else with my hair!
None
Wow! Great job Shannon our house looks and smells so clean. Thank you so much! Pro-Touch cleaning savannah does a awesome job!
I ordered solid hardwood flooring from Parqueteam and i gotta say, im happy with what i got. Good quality wood, and properly done installation, as well as baseboard and quarter round installation. Thank you!
I first went to this restaurant with a few of my friends and I loved the atmosphere from the start and it was a plus that the food was delicious....being from Yonkers and Mexican American I know my mexican food pretty well as well as trying every mexican restaurant/taco shack in the area. I decided to have a dinner party for birthday at Guapo's and I have to say the service was great the food was excellent and all my friends enjoyed themselves. IT WAS GREAT!! My friends and I will deff come back more often to this place in the future. Great Prices Great Food and Great Service and great drinks as well hehehe!
Took my car in to Just Brakes in Frisco yesterday. This is a high-mileage vehicle and some places look at high-mileage as high-profit. Joshua did an excellent job of looking the car over and offering suggestions. No high-pressure sales tactics, just "this is what's broken" and "this is what I'd also think about fixing". Since I use Just Brakes exclusively for my brake work, he was able to pull up the service history and was able to warranty repair some of the work, saving me hundreds. I know a little something about cars and these guys are good. A complete new team hand-picked by the new store manager just a few months ago. Definitely going back.
I own three properties in Twickenham and I always book a cleaning session with these guys when tenants leave. Their cleaners are polite, hard working and really know how to do their job. Highly recommend them.
I had my first visit to this dental office last week a follow up a few days ago and today another check up ( upon my request). I absolutely LOVE the dentist and the staff here. They are such a joy to be around and extremely upbeat and happy. They have taken very good care of me and I recommend going here rather than their office on the east side. I originally made an appointment there, but the receptionist and staff were extremely rude and unhelpful and I am happy to have switched offices for my appointments. They also have very good pricing for those whom are uninsured, the best I found in the area!! <3 <3 <3
very good walking
I was passing through and needed a great breakfast. I found it here. Waitress was cute with her smile and pigtails. Coffee was exceptional. You won't regret your visit to Brothers.
The Best prices and the Best service... that's it, Plain and simple!! I have used several other companies in the area, and finally found one I can trust!!
After a terrible experience with another dealer, and ready to walk away from Cadillac, we walked into to see Peter Tee. He treated us like family, and was completely honest with us, so we bought from him. He made it a great experience for us and I am very happy we came to see him. I would advise anyone to go see Mr. Tee and have the same experience we had.
Great place, great service, great food.
None
Very friendly.
None
This is a spectacular place to spend some time. The resort is beautiful and the staff is superb.
A fantastic hotel in a beautiful location. The restaurant is a real asset, being on the same site but make sure that you book in advance - it's very popular (with good reason)!
On the weekend, a friend bought the Gluten Free Seed Rolls, for me when we went to their place for a meal. They were FANTASTIC, just like real bread. I live on the other side of town, so I will have to wait to sample the cafe. So teh score is just for the rolls
This is where I get my tires. This is where I get my inspection. This is NOT where I get my bullsh!t. If they delivered babies here my wife would have come home w an oily daughter. I would NOT go anywhere else. Some folks may think the place looks sketchy, I think it looks like a garage because that's what it is. The folks here do what folks at garages do and don't F you around. Fast and polite and professional. There's sometimes a line but that's because there's resolution without shifty crap at the the end. I'm not kicking your crotch, if you go here you won't ever go anywhere else. The Manger might even drink a beer w you while you wait. While I was there my first time I saw him send some of his people up on the freeway right above them to rescue a woman in her children who had broken down in the Texas heat. Course it didn't matter if it was in the Texas spring . He had been towed to place for free and did not obligate them to use his services other than that. gave the kids some soft drinks and got her to a phone. Your first visit you'll be waiting for the other shoe to drop because everything seems too easy as most stuff nowadays is not especially when it involves money and services. The only thing that drops are your keys in your hand and your level of anxiety. It's great to have it so close and they're open till midnight. Holy crap, use these guys
וואו אין על הבשר כאן אני אוכל 700 גרם בשר ויש מקום לעוד טעים טעים ומאוד טעים...
I had the best experience at Lynnes. This was the fastest purchase I have ever made. The staff was very friendly and very experience in what they do. DAVE was my sales man and he was great. I love my car and im happy that I chose Lynnes Nissan in Bloomfield.
Villaggio
Loved it!
Si digo que es de mis sitios favoritos de Madrid no exagero ni pizca. Es un local pequeñito con paredes blancas y mesas pequeñas en el que enseguida te sientes en casa. Lo lleva una pareja argentina si no me equivoco y se nota en su carta. Muy rica la tortilla con cebolla confitada, el hummus y las empanadillas criollas. Tienen además menú de mediodía y una tarjetita de fidelización. Lo mejor del sitio es que está todo muy rico, es barato y nunca tendrán prisa porque te vayas. Además traen chuches con la cuenta ;)
Awesum management !!! Loved the way Brian (manager) co- ordinated everything and made move in a pleasure. Good quality construction.
These guys were really professional. It sucks that the most they'll loan is $255 but when you're flat broke, that's better than nothing! Their customer service was excellent and they treated me like they wanted my business. I spoke with the only female in the office that day, she had some star tattoos, but I cant recall her name. She was particularly excellent at her job, and very nice to me. But it wasn't just her though, everyone in the office was extremely helpful. They explained everything completely in a way I could understand, and didn't try to rush me or talk down to me like I sort of thought they would. They were good on the phone by telling me what to bring, then they were good in person and it only took me 30 minutes or so. I highly recommend them for anyone who needs a cash advance. Good people.
None
Excellent cheesecake and their food is so good. Bought extra last night to take back to Wichita, Kansas.
None
There's always something new when I visit Feather Touch these days. First it was the expansion of the practice with the addition of Dr. Neal Shah, then the amazing remodeling of the facilities and space. All for the good, I might add. You are warmly greeted by smiling staff. The attention paid to my teeth by Dr. Ross is what's kept them in my mouth for the past 40 years! And that's why I'll keep coming back.
Glenn Helmstetter was awesome! He was very helpful and nice first thing in the morning which is always a plus. He even bought me the filters I needed replaced to actually SHOW me how dirty they were. Honesty is always a plus with me. I will ask for Glenn from now on. Thanks guys :)
Good service, friendly staff.
Big mosque
None
Awesome food and service. The service was veryyy good!! I will definitely be going back the next time in Orlando! Ordered a beer and food, next thing I have a cold beer and the food right behind. Keep up the great work.
Excellent wings. If you like IPA's give the double IPA from Port Brewing a shot!
This is the only shop that I've been to where I feel I'm not a big dollar sign and my individual needs are carefully discussed and considered. The mechanic was recommended to me as the best in the state and fitted us out for some very specialised physical requirements that he didn't blink an eye at. Everyone I spoke to was very friendly and it was great to be in a store where they clearly love what they do.
Assolutamente da provare!!! Eccezionali i piatti di pesce di ottima qualità e sempre molto fresco...servizio attento e discreto del proprietario che riesce a soddisfare pienamente tutti i desideri.
My husband and I made the switch to Dr. Marc about a year ago and we are very happy. His staff is warm and friendly. The office decore will make you forget you are at the dentist office. Dr. Marc is very professional, friendly, patient, and willing to answer all of your questions. All equipment is state of the art. During my four mollar extraction they had relaxing music and Dr. Marc walked me through it every step of the way to make sure I wasn't in any type of discomfort. Thanks to his bedside manner I was able to keep it together. He even allowed my husband to be present for extra comfort and Dr. Marc called me the next day to make sure I was doing okay. Thank you, Dr. Marc!
They were very friendly, great with communication, and went above and beyond to help me out.
Love there food! They make it fresh for you so I call in my order to go and take it home. So glad we moved right down the road from them.
Hands down. NY style za, in my opinion, is the most delicious type of pizza. Big Lou's, without a doubt, has the best NY style pizza in town. Dunzo.
Perfect place to hang out with co-workers after work and to study with friends. .
I work near here and come by at least once a week. Amazing sandwiches, pizza and baked goods. The staff is super nice and welcoming. I also love that you can pick up fresh pizza dough to go.
Really top facility, if your looking for a no nonsense strength and conditioning facility this place is top draw. Also, the personal training sessions are fantastic, helped me rehabilitate an injured knee and improve my strength no end.
In July of last year, I purchased a used Chevy Tahoe from Crest Cadillac. This was the first time I had ever bought a vehicle from a dealer. It was a wonderful experience. I didn't really know what I was looking for at first. Just something bigger for my growing family. Michelle Corley was the salesperson we worked with. She sent me a list of what they had available in my price range and made suggestions based on my specific needs. The Tahoe she found even had an entertainment package for the kiddos too! :-) Needless to say, I would highly recommend Crest Cadillac to anyone looking to buy a car, whether new or used. It was a no-pressure environment that made it very easy to window shop without being harassed until we were ready to make a move. They gave me absolutely no reason to buy from anywhere else. THANK YOU CREST!
I know that whatever I buy from Grays will be exactly as described. The prices are slightly higher than other places, but largely you get what you pay for, first class service and quick reasonable delivery. I wouldn't hesitate to use them again.
Another good deed of the day recognized!!! An outstanding service should always be appreciated and mentioned... I have dealt with Ryan, via phone order at this location numerous times, it has always been a favorite, and the kindest service makes it just superb. Ryan, keep up the best service, more growth, and personal rewards coming your way! Thanks so much!
Everything I've tried has tasted great. Pizza, mozzarella sticks, stromboli, french fries. The prices are very reasonable. You need to give this place a try. It's the only place I order from.
I got a deal from Capital One which was immensely specific, finding a car within their parameters was harder than finding Waldo or Carmen San Diego! I was losing hope until we tried Flow. Jason Ramsey, Jamie Leggett, and Steve Fuchs were phenomenal! They worked tirelessly to procure a deal for us! They didn't pressure us into anything just to get a sale! They actually listened to us as we talk about our budget & plans and they really came through! They really exceeded my expectations and they demonstrated excellent customer service! Further, they kept us laughing throughout the strenuous process! If you or anyone you know is in or around Greensboro and looking for a car, send them to Flow Volkswagen of Greensboro and ask for Jason Ramsey... make sure you tell him that Shane & Princess sent you!
None
This restaurant was awesome. The hibachi grill was one of the most entertaining things that I've done in rapid City. The lunch prices are significantly better than the dinner prices but it is worth it either way. Their sushi is absolutely wonderful. The chefs will also take their energy from the people at their grill. If the people are your table are energetic and participating then it will be a great show. If most of the people are not interested or seem put off then they will just cook and leave.
After hearing so many positive reviews about CyberpowerPC, I finally decided to give them a try when it came time to purchase my new laptop. The experience has been nothing short of incredible. The site was easy to navigate and I was able to customize my laptop of choice with the parts I wanted (within their options for the model). I was able to choose the parts that I deemed important, graphics card, primary/secondary HDD, RAM, and even the OS. One great thing as well was their low cost when compared to the competition. The system they built for me is just as powerful, if not more so than others in the same class, but the cost was much lower. More bang for your buck as the saying goes. Once I placed the order, their customer service took over and was truly impressive. I received emails every single step of the way, from confirmation of order, to the build in progress, to quality control, and finally to your order has shipped. This may sound simple enough, but not many companies follow up this often on a one to one basis, and I found this to be a great benefit. And when I did have questions, they were immediately available over the phone and replied to emails almost immediately. And now that I have the laptop, I can honestly say that it rounds out a perfect customer experience. The laptop runs great, and for what is under the hood, it stays impressively cool. And there was no bloatware. They only installed the OS and what was essential such as drivers and basic user settings. I was able to use it right out of the box without issue. I would highly recommend CyberpowerPC to anybody looking for a powerful laptop whether it's for photo processing, video editing, or hardcore gaming. I'll definitely turn to them again for my computer purchase.
None
Great breakfast, server was very friendly and gave great advise on food. Reasonable price excellent service even though we showed up near closing. Will eat here again.
Gurban mercure otelin yakınlarında yokmu Selamunaleykum
This store is a fantastic location to look at and purchase patterns, notions and interesting fabric. The staff is knowledgeable, friendly, and helpful and the selection of patterned fabric is fabulous.
Professional, Courteous, and Wonderful are the first words that come to mind to describe my experience with the Octagon. I recently had a massage, and the atmosphere was welcoming and clean, and I felt refreshed and relaxed afterward. I went to the Octagon for years to get my hair done, and always had great experiences. I wish I still lived close and could still have my hair done there regularly. The owner is an amazing woman who I greatly respect. I would highly recommend the Octagon!
I bought a car via email from John Scott. Not having met me nor knowing for sure whether I was a legit buyer or not he treated me as if I was sitting in front of him and was his only customer. He was very responsive, too the point and never pushy. After the deal was done I showed up to get the car, signed a few documents and was out of there in less than 10 minutes. Best car buying experience ever and highly recommend John.
Dr Kimra and her team were able to fix my son's front teeth that got knocked out after his pediatric dentist couldn't fix after 2 tries. Dr Kimra's team did the procedure one time & it looks great & were so friendly that Clay is actually happy to go to the dentist!
Wow, EXCELLENT service. They not only to SELL but also for RENT tuxedos. The tailor at the store is super friendly and treats you like a king. Would definitely recommend and I will most assuredly go back.
It is a shame to see the other reviews posted here. I went to this store and wanted to purchase a cellular phone. The sales person Stanley B was very informative and helpful. He explained how the equipment worked and how it would interact with my other equipment. I went in with very little information, but ended up learning so much and ended up with the exact equipment that I needed for my requirements. I have recommended this sales person to several of my friends and they all seem to report back the same type of experience with this sales person.
None
None
After weeks of frustration trying to refinance through our bank, we contacted the RJ Baxter team. They took care of us quickly and efficiently. Great communication and experience.
Very professional, friendly, honest, and helpful! Went in for a mystery pain through a FREE exam, giving me the prescription that fixed the problem leaving with NO CHARGE. Highly recommend Beaverton Smile Center and Dr. Lampee. Thanks, Dr. Lampee =)
I love this place and have been back over and over because it is awesome!
I go here for lunch sometimes and I love it. The subs are great! The staff is always very nice to me. My food has always been ready faster than the time they gave me. The decor was nice too. I'm not sure why there would be a negative review but I think this place is wonderful.
Simply the best boot camp available in Houston. Intense 45 minute workout will challenge your whole body. And at $40/month there is no better bang for the buck. HIT FIT rocks!
None
None
Compared to carboard box rental/purchase services beetleboxes are reasonably priced and much more practical + environmentally friendly. Beetleboxes saved us on removalist costs - so much faster to pack and stack than cardboard boxes! No mess to deal with afterwards, once the boxes were picked up. Because the beetleboxes are so sturdy, they are easier to pack and we ended up using much less packing material too. Our move ended up going wrong and we had to extend by a week - which also wasn't a problem. I'd highly recommend Beetlebox to anyone moving!
I porked the hell out of the manager and damn it she was good
I'm so glad I came here rather than any other doctor for my rhinoplasty, thank you for the positive experience!! G.H.
None
None
We went on the Entertainment book coupon and had a wonderful lunch. I had a chicken curry dish and Ellen had the F & C. Both excellent.
One of the best transport companies ever in Maui! I was really pleased with their services, strongly suggested them :)
Love the staff! Always so nice and helpful!
The wet spot rocks...for the people that complain about the employees, that is sad. HAVE THEM RING THE BELL so the next person available can help you. I have been shopping there for years and have never had a problem...all you have to do is ask... It's a small business, not a corporate giant. Best fish store I have ever been to. The tanks are super clean, the selection is amazing and the staff knows their stuff...I dare anyone to find a store that can match the selection and understanding of each and every fish in this store...disease free is also a must.
None
I started going to Images about a year ago. Ann does my hair and she is fantastic!! I have never had a bad cut or color. Thank you Ann for keeping my hair up to date and looking fabulous!!!
I've used them and recommended them for many years – they provide excellent service and get the problem solved the first time around.
Kids loved it if your into fish you will want to come here...only downside was that some of the information games didn't work... All in all good day out
Satisfy the taste of Japan ! Fresh sashimi ! Tempura fried in front of you ! Friendly couple owner ! and Clean inn ^0^ 食材にこだわるご夫婦が営む素敵な民宿です。自然に恵まれた土地、海山川の旬を堪能できます。いつも笑顔で気さくなご夫婦＾０＾清潔な宿で本当に本当に美味しい食と時間を過ごます。少し港から離れていますが絶対お奨めの民宿です。海外からのリピーターも多いですよ＾０＾
Eastside Kia gave us amazing customer satification. My wife and I went to go buying a used car at a dealership nearby and no one gave any attention to us and tried to up sell us. We decided to then go to Eastside Kia and then looked around there. We thought all salesmen were like so we ignored everyone for the first 10-15 minutes. Then Terry along with the sales manager Jarrett came to greet us and answered all the questions needed to know. Finally at the end result, we bought a car. Keep up the great work Eastside! The experience with you was definitely different!
I was introduced to the Service Manager, Mike Carl several years ago and have learned to trust him completely. The owner Rich Seals is available and accountable if you want to talk to him. I keep cars till they drop and the crew at Norm's keeps me on the road. Go by and ask for Bonnie at the front desk if you want to feel right at home. My 1999 Chevy Suburban has around 250K miles...
Great place to watch high school football, run the track or challenge you endurance by running the stands
None
My 2 boys and I always enjoy our visits to 50th Street Caboose. They always have great service and good food. A great place for both adults and kids. Its always my boys' first choice when choosing a place to eat. Crissy R.
None
Many times business owners only hear what they want to hear and then when something goes wrong or they don't understand they immediate look to blame others. If no one cared about who got the credit the business world would be so much easier.
2PM ON A Sunday afternoon. Great food. Very clean. Attentive host. I'll certainly go back again.
Gret
Just come in from having dinner with a group and this has been one of my favorite place to eat... I had the Blacked Chicken Alfredo with Mushroom never had Blacked Chicken so I will me making this soon at home when I get a chance.
As always, I was greeted and treated promptly, professionally and efficiently. An impending problem to be checked again in 6 months was noted and explained. The panoramic view over the treetops of Alexandria and Lincolnia is inspiring and calming.
Went shopping for a new car and ultimately decided on a Chevy Volt (which I love). I'm not an impulse buyer and took months to decide and shopped. Everett, was the internet contact I first hooked up with and he provided information for months without the "you must buy now" I kept hearing from other dealerships. They spent a lot of time with me educating me on the car. Still, when it came down to negotiating, I went to several dealers. One claimed to beat any other deal by $750, but they didn't. One gave me a price they didn't honor. One gave me a great price under the condition I complete the GM survey "completely satisfied," which I felt unethical. Al Serra Chevrolet matched the price, let me take the car home overnight, and then honored the price they gave. They made the paperwork easy and then went over the specifics of the Volt. I did something stupid and forgot to apply $456 in GM Mastercard rewards to the car and they couldn't have been nicer about applying the rewards and sending me the check. Bottom line is that Everett and everyone at Al Serra shined way above the other dealers I worked with. My experience with Al Serra Chevrolet (North location) was top notch.
Continually have a good experience. I never have to wait more than a few minutes even when I show up 10 minutes early. Dr. V. is very respectful and clearly cares about his patients' health, not just running them through the system. Receptionists/nurse staff are very polite, nice, and easy to work with.
n.n'' vamonos a la facultad'''
We've seen Doc Durr regularly for about 6 months and really love his services. He has fair prices, is very friendly and applies his knowledge to provide the best care possible. He is really good to communicate changes to our condition and always offers advice improving our condition on our own. Our 2 year-old sees him also and she accepts his care with ease. His office is small but very accommodating with plenty equipment to provide an array of services. We really love seeing Doctor Carson!
When we first moved to Atlanta, we went to a dentist in East Cobb that a friend had recommended. He told my husband and I that we both needed all our fillings replaced and gum grafting, costing thousands of dollars. Being skeptical, we went for a second opinion to Dr Nagode, who another friend had recommended. After examining us, he told us we didn't need any of the things the other dentist told us, and we have been going to Dr Nagode ever since. Dr Nagode is the best, most honest, and kind dentist in Atlanta and we would never go anywhere else. Our family of five has received excellent dental care from his practice. How many people can say their children like going to the dentist? Ours do! His office staff is so friendly and helpful that they feel like family. If you are looking for a dentist you can trust, I would definitely recommend Dr. Nagode. We drive from East Cobb to Sandy Springs to see him, and it's worth the drive.
None
None
Spell your name right... Make Chattanooga look bad.
Mike Vance Is amazing!! Vance was attentive and very helpful. We went over a family budget and a list of needs along with our challenged credit score. Out of all the dealerships we tried Vance and the Big Red Team we're the only ones that saw us through and made us feel like part of the family. Never have we been treated better. Big Red will have all of our business from now as well as our family and friends.
None
Io mi sono sempre trovato bene, probabilmente i voti negativi dipendono anche dai luoghi e dal corriere che vi consegna il pacco.. poi difficilmente se uno si trova bene poi va a fare recensioni positive
The old station being put to a great use...And the coffee is great..
OUR NEXT VEHICLE WILL BE PURCHASED THROUGH THIS DEALER!
I can never get tickets to any good movies from their iPhone app
None
A great find! Ample seating room and good menu selections. Pastries are plentiful.
If you ever go to this dealer, be sure to ask for Mr. Mohammed Ghaffar. This is the second vehicle we have bought from him as he always looks to fulfill our needs. The 2013 Civic I was looking at was a bit out of our range and he showed me a gem they had in the used car lot, a hardly used 2009 EX sedan that had only 13K miles and was more equipped than the new one and it was certified Pre-owned. Needless to say I now own such gem.
Every experience I've ever had at Chocolatier Constance Popp has been exceptional. The staff is extremely friendly and passionate about their product and I've never had a single bite that I haven't declared delightful. It is always a real "treat" to spoil myself or others with something from Constance's shop.
Always clean and good quality machines
Rob is simply THE BEST tattoo artist in Asheville! I've had 3 pieces done by him - each one better than the next! He really listens to what you want and will work with you to give you the *perfect* piece of art!
A better place to visit and purchase Electronics components. Quality products, reasonable pricing.
This is one of the best run operations around. The Owners and Staff treat their guests to a great time and beautiful views. If you ever wanted to be a cowboy or cowgirl for a few hours, be sure to book your trip now.
Great Service -- never an issue with their service either in their office or ours. They make doing business with them easy!
I attended one of the pole dance aerobics and the instructor was well prepared and knowledgeable. I was very impressed with the easiness of the studio and the bustling city feel. The class was harder than expected and arrived home with bruises, but I sensed an after burn and felt accomplished. The concept is innovative and unique. Next time I will try one of the dance workshops!
It's my high school
I love Dirty Don's because I love going in and being surprised by what they have. I always check the expiration dates. For the most part, if a can is not dented, leaking or rusted, the food is good, but the FDA requires a "date" on everything. I have found great deals on paper towels, bath products, I even found the exact sweater that I paid $58 for at Dillards in a different color for $12. I found Chai Tea liquid mix for 69 cents a carton...it's over $5 at HyVee. My suggestion is, if you see something you know you'll use a lot of, buy it when you see it because it won't be there next time. Great fun for a true bargain shopper.
None
None
Go to Burnie's all the time -good prices - great selection, helpful staff
Finally, a repair place I can rave about. First class work, great customer service, fair prices!
This place is SWEET! Where else can I hit indoor jump into a foam pit with a pro skier coaching me? Build confidence at this indoor skiing / snowboarding training facility. Snogression is the perfect place to learn new tricks and then take them to the slopes. You can come practice yourself, but if you really want to progress quickly, pay for a few coaching sessions.
So happy with my purchase and experience here! Aaron Brown was such an easy and friendly guy to work with. Answered all my questions, was very thorough and knowledgeable. Didn't try to sell me anything I didn't want, gave me a great deal, and treated me with respect. I would highly recommend contacting Aaron for anyone who is in the market for a Subaru. His co-worker Frank Aparacio also seemed like a really trustworthy guy. There are a few guys at this dealership who you will definitely want to avoid... you can probably find their names in other reviews at this site or other sites. As for Aaron, however, I have nothing but good things to say about him and the deal he gave me.
None
My husband and I are very low key people so we decided to get married at our local Justice of the Peace in Fullerton We had always wanted to try Chomp, so we took our best (wo)man, my 4 year-old niece and 15 year-old nephew here. They treated us like family! The food was reasonably priced $30 for the most expensive Teppan meal, and they made an unforgettable day even more so!
None
"I have been using MQ tyres for several years now. I have found prices better than the competition and the service is excellent. Tyres are fitted at the location of your choice, normally within a day. Highly recommended - Amax Computers
None
Love this place! Great that this mini golf is outside, I appreciate being in the fresh air surrounded by rocks, trees, and flowers while you beat your friends at mini golf. (they have fish in their pond too!) I like to hit a few tokens of baseballs while I'm there. The cages don't have nets, so you can really see how far you can whack a baseball! I would recommend this family-run, family-friendly business to anyone looking for a great place to spend a Saturday, rain or shine!
Fantastic meals every time. We go as regularly as we can!
I've been a customer of Ron and Eric for many years now, having brought them a variety of cars with a variety of problems. Most notable would be my 1998 Jetta that plagued 911 Washington St all too often. I happened to live around the corner from the shop when I got this car, and would often have this awful car towed to their lot - and stroll in the following morning to let them know what it was doing there yet again. Its not that their repairs ever failed - this was truly a bad car. I've since moved on to a Subaru - and while I am a less frequent visitor now, I still trust only one shop with big jobs like brakes or even those mystery grinding/scraping noises. Ron and Eric are incredibly helpful and honest - it is very hard to find a shop like this - I'm sure glad I found it!
Underground Printing was great! I could not have asked for a better experience. Paul Hoff set up online payments for us to make our order more convenient. We will definitely be ordering from UP in the future.
Dr. Scott is amazing! My 5 year old Yorkie had some major dental issues. I went to one vet in Houston that didn't want to take the case and wanted to send me to a pet dentist - which would have cost $1,500+. Dr. Scott saw my dog and had no worries about doing the surgery and even worked with me to make sure it wasn't crazy expensive. The staff was great and called me immediately after the surgery to update me and to follow up the next day to make sure she was healing ok. She genuinely wants the best for your pets but understands not everyone can afford to an expensive vet bill. I will 100% be going back and telling all my friends to go here.
Prompt, courteous service, professional appearance and quality equipment. They have done an excellent job, I highly recommend them for all your CCTV needs. When they install new equipment, they make sure you know how to use it before they are happy with the install. We had a technical issue and it was resolved within a few short minutes over the phone. Thanks Guys!!!
None
I recently purchased my 3rd Hyundai in 3 years from Hyundai Wesley Chapel. The staff there are super friendly and incredibly helpful. I especially like working with my sales advisor, Bob Z. and would highly recommend him if you are considering purchasing a vehicle from there.
I was shopping for a new 2013 Sonata and emailed 6 different DFW area Hyundai dealers to get their best price. Luis with South Dallas Hyundai came back with the lowest price and it was his best price the first time, no back and forth. The other dealers kept coming down, but they still couldn't beat South Dallas' price. I figured that South Dallas must be running some kind of gimic or hiding the price somewhere else, but when I got out there and had the numbers on paper, they matched exactly what I was told over the phone/email. South Dallas doesn't do any forced dealer add-ons like pin-striping or "paint protectant" like some of the other dealers. They just sell you the car you want at a fair price. I would highly recommend them and will go back to them, even though I drove past 3 other Hyundai dealers to get to them.
Awesome Agent! Great Rates! Couldn't expect more!
None
None
None
I got my first tattoo @62 yrs old. I went to Patrick. He was fantastic. His patients are incredible. Liberty Tattoo is immaculate. I will return there again, as will my friend who told me about Liberty Tattoo and will my Son and Son in Law.
Amazing food and service! Absolutely loved Death by Gumbo, Lobster Gnocchi and the Striped Bass! The cherry on top was the complimentary assortment of desserts that came in a cute little jewelry box.
LOVE! LOVE! LOVE! This place. Everyone is always friendly and the shop always look nice. I just wished I lived closer. I would visit every week.
None
I have never been in this store, but I have ordered many times online. I live in houston Texas and I love Joseph Ribkoff, but it is only sold in one store and I wont go in the store that sells it. Consequently, I found Rose Tree and have had nothing but totally positive experiences. I have had to contact Jess on numerous occassions via email, and she has always gotten back to me right away and was extremely helpful. I also just ordered a mother of the bride dress and was told it would come in late December...sure enough it came in on time, as ordered. As long as I have such good service, I will continue to order from here.
place is now called 21, food was fresh and delicious, service was great. server replaced my sons to go drink after he dropped it outside at no cost. will go again.
They have a great friendly staff an doctors thanks for maken sure my kids are healthy
None
None
I had a crown come unglued recently. Dr. Glennon and his staff were able to work me in on short notice and fix the problem in one visit.
None
Hi I am Rakibul Islam from Bangladesh.I am a graphic & web designer. Please Contract my personal Skype ID : rakibul.islam36 Thanks for _Rakib
These guys are nothing short of professional. I've been buying tires from them for a number of years and will not buy from anyone else.
Casi Maul is an excellant Rick Hendrick Dodge Car Sales Representative in Charleston SC. He lives up to his nick name "Speedy" in that he is highly efficient and timely throughout his part of the vehicle buying experience. He listens to the customer's needs and requests and goes above and beyond to meet them. Casi is extremely knowledgeable of the RAM 1500 series which was very helpful in the decision making process of my past 2 purchases. I would recommend anyone to ask for his assistance and I even sent my son to him when he bought his new truck. I rate him 26 of 30. rks
@nits go suck your balls
None
I really like this place. I have never had rude service, and I am a big soul food fan! In addition this is the best breakfast deal in Cobb County! The train is a great idea, and my wife even likes it. Warning! Don't go here if you are on a diet! The food is too good.
Olivia is not only a talented and skilled photographer, she is also a warm and trustworthy person. If you hire her for your event or location you are guaranteed not only to receive beautiful real estate photography or wedding photos, but also exceptional customer service.
Wow. We first met the manager, who greeted us and brought us over to Andy. He walked us through the brand and models - he was excellent. We decided to buy used, so we were introduced to Angel. He did a very thorough job giving us the various options that he had and went out of his way for us. When we came back to buy, again, he was wonderful, meeting every need we presented. He even beat my credit union's interest rate! He was very fair in dealing with us, especially regarding options that we probably didn't need - he wasn't a typical salesman trying to upsell everything. When he delivered the car, it was perfect; he went through the operation of the car and all its options in a very understandable way. No question was too much; he was very patient. Also, Helen was great in dealing with (all the paperwork, financing, etc.) Knowing most car dealers as we do, we weren't expecting such great service. Overall, we were pleasantly surprised with our excellent experience at Habberstad and couldn't be happier!
None
I am a student at Paul mitchell the school of Austin and I absolutely love my school!! The people and students are awesome!! It's always a fun and uneventful place!!
Hands down best auto shop in South West Florida. Excellent customer service and very knowledgeable. I came in one hour before closing and they took care of me and stayed an hour late to make sure my vehicle was good to go. They not only saved me money but saved me about half of what the competitor wanted two streets over. I will always come to their shop for all my needs. After being taken advantage of by other mechanics in the past, i can truly say they are out to help customers and build future business with them. Curtis is the gentleman that helped me, so ask for him. IF I HAD TO RATE THEM THEY ARE A++++++
David moved me into the 21st century, by helping me film and edit a introductory video for my website. The process was easy, convenient and fast. Best of all it was fun and affordable. One of the best things about working with David is his experience. He knows what will work and what is best left to the amateurs, thus producing a first class product. If you have been thinking about spicing up your website with a video, what are you waiting for? Give Dave a call today.
None
"The temple, is just like an oasis in the desert for the conditioned souls to quench the thirst of their desire for real happiness"....peace of mind, packed with bliss,amazing kirtans, gorgeous arati,powerful Bhagavadgita discourse, most attractive deities of Radha and krishna. Best place to spend time in Bangalore.
Convenient fast service. Everyone does a great job! Fantastic attention to detail! Keep the cords off the car. Everything is rubbed down.
My Wife and a few friends stopped by and met with Charlie. I am very impressed with how warm and welcoming he was to our party (9 of us in total) rolling up on him in our ostentatious stretch hummer like a bachelor party from hell. Not only were we a large group in an absurdly over sized gaudy limo, we were a 1/2 hour late for our appointment and 5/9th's of our group needed to use the restroom as soon as we arrived... (The limo came stocked with cheap champagne, and we brought a bottle or two of our own which was slightly better, but gone nonetheless by the time we arrived at Charlie's a half hour late at 11:30 in the morning.. With a big warm smile and firm handshake, we used the restroom and then sampled the absolutely best wine we had the joy of experiencing in two full days of touring the valleys. the simple fact that he opened one of his 2007 Cooks Flat Reserve for us to sample is a testament to his generosity and confidence in his wine. It is simply amazing. He did not have to do that for our party. We were already blown away. A bit too pricey for me to get a case, I am however, delighted to purchase a full case of his Riesling, and if you know whats good, you will get some too, before its all gone. Thanks Charlie! we all enjoyed your presentation very much, and I am sure we will back! Robert, Melissa, Liat, Ben, Meagan, Nick, Robin, Mark and Christa
I'm very happy that SST is so closed to our house. I feel at home every time I go over there, knowing that they will take special attention to my vehicles!
It was very tasty. Their menu offers a lot of variety. We brought our children, and they loved it too. Portions were good but not too big. The prices were more than reasonable.
I have been very pleased with the service I have received from Elite Pool Services and definitely plan to continue to use this company! Thank you for a job well done!
The sushi is the only good part about the place in my opinion. Sushi is 20% off for students on tuesday! I can get a quality 8 piece eel roll for 4.60 (not including tax), and the sushi chefs are very nice.
I am almost late for work had to watch south beach towing Bernice what csn i say great show please don't sell.
I highly recommend Compass Electric. He responded quickly to my request for a quote, scheduled the work promptly and completed all the work in a professional and timely manner.
Trunk Club completely changed the way I shop for clothes. My Stylist picks out outfits for me, send them to me to try on, an I only keep/pay the ones I like. Shipping is free both ways, and they don't charge you until you return the rejects. I am able to review each trunk online so the quality of the selections in the next trunk are more tailored to my style and fit. On occasion I will visit Trunk Club in person and try on outfits right there. These sessions really help my stylist hone in on my style. Oh and they provide free beer! I haven't bought cloths anywhere else for several years. The service is so convenient, saves time, and I have never looked better. Very highly recommended,
Lisa is so professional! Highly recommend. She is very good at what she does
Me and my partner felt very tensed lately and we thought that a professional therapist could help of get rid of this and relax a little bit. We enjoyed together a session of oil therapy and we were very pleased to see that after this session, we could connect again, like before. The oil relaxing reached its purpose in our case
We have purchased a new VW Golf 2012 during last week. The process was very clear, quick and straight forward. Neal Dossett, the sales manager, explained all the details. The location gives confidence. We were exchanging emails during the last year and without any question Neal replied to all of our emails on time and correctly. He also explained the process for the BMV for plate obtainment. Good to have locations like Mike Raisor and managers like Neal.
Great family spot! Been coming here for years! !
Dr. Casey is a great Dentist. He takes time to manage expectations and is a true professional.
Great drinks! Local feel.
None
I saw many ghosts
Fantastic service, price and bloke, if ever you need tyres, tracking, balancing etc dont go anywhere else, all of the above sets this place apart from the rest, a great find as far as I am concerned and will be using Beesure Tyres from now on
It may not be as hip or cool as other coffee houses but it's comfortable and reliable for WAHMs like me. http://www.wailingsofawham.com/alternative-workspace-wahms-kopiroti-davao/
All you need to do is state the occasion and leave the rest to Aflorum. You will be presented with the most gorgeous bouquet, I have used them numerous times, for birthdays, engagements and funerals and have never been disappointed :)
Very helpful over the phone and in person, wide selection of good products in every ones price range. Staff very friendly and pleasent the layout makes it feel holmy and comfortable not intimidated like larger smoke shoppes
Best MMA Gym in San Jose!
Quickest and most pain free trip to a DMV
World Market was one of the greatest stores in Mazza Gallerie! They had every household accessory, lots of fun, cute knick-knacks and activities, furniture, home goods, kitchen condiments, etc. It was one of the coolest and funnest experiences I have ever had. I highly recommend this store!
Salam be Ogab e Asia va Hooman Jafari
service and food was great, JULIA was awesome, everything good till she left, nobody out of hand, slurring, falling down or drunk but suddenly our group of 25 is now cut off, we have ordered 23 pitchers of beer and that apparently is to many. Our staff have just spent over $800 in booze, food, tax and tip and now told we are cut off, are you F*ing kidding me!!!! section full of adults having great time ruined by DUMB MANAGEMENT !!! guess what, never going there AGAIN or anbody from our workplace, all disappointed in how this turned out,
My experience with Scott and Merchants Auto started when I spoke with him online using their instant messaging tool. We set up an appointment and I agreed to process the on-line credit application. (this made the whole experience painless.) At the time of the appointment, we were welcomed at the door and ushered to Scott's office. He was not pushy at all during the initial phase of our discussion, and agreed to get two of the vehicles we talked about and let us test drive them. We were allowed plenty of time to look them over and poke them, and the test drive was illuminating. We ended up taking home a car that afternoon, and every step of the way, Scott had the next thing ready to go and explain. There is, of course, a lot of paperwork, but Scott made it quick and easy. Truly, working with a professional who knows his business is a rewarding experience.
On time. As described. Knowing that I have a roof over my head that will last, because it was done right, is a blessing.
Wonderful beer Delicious dishes We'll be here again
None
I bought a 2008 Camry from AutosDirectOnline which is not only clean and has a low mileage, but also one of the cheapest cars I found that week in the nation. When I went on person to see the car I found it as was described online so I drove it home from Ohio to Michigan that day. The staff was friendly and the purchasing process was pretty much swift and smooth.
None
None
None
None
Great Service!
The food is always good at Frankie's and I have never been disappointed. I also enjoy stopping in for a inexpensive lunch.
Been going there for a few years, food's always good and the staff is nice. Never got a racist vibe... so I wouldn't trust anonymous reviews by people.
None
Excelente lugar de vacaciones, su Centro de Talasoterapia es fantástico.
None
I always come here for the good food. Their staff is friendly and the wait is usually very short. It's the best tasting Chinese food I've had in the area.
I wanted to quickly share that I had a great experience learning about the Pharmacy program. I am hoping to get into the program at Roseman so that I can stay living here in Utah so fingers crossed. The admissions person (I forget her name) was super helpful with all of the information she sent to me. Great experience.
Summerville's ONLY coffee roaster. One if a kind place. Live music Thurs-Fri. They also have beer, wine, food, and desserts.
None
Andrew Rodecki was our sales person and he did an excellent job in presenting all the attributes of the Honda CR-V and evaluating options to buy or finance the vehicle. He provided excellent customer service and attention to our interests. I was very satisfied for our handling by Andrew and in closing the business arrangements with the business manager. Very good and pleasing atmosphere to do business.
None
Una ciudad muy linda y acogedora.. les recomiendo
This is typically my first stop when I'm looking for an old book. They usually have what I'm looking for and they have an inventory of what they have so I don't have to spend a lot of time looking for it if I am in a rush. The staff have always greeted me as I come in to buy or even to browse the shelves and it is very hard to leave without buying something. There are so many books I always find something I want to read. I saw another review where they were complaining about the prices, but if you take into account shipping it evens out, and I would rather give my money to a small business than a company over the Internet.
Great selection and knowledge of the products!
I got a ticket a while back. When I called David, he was knowledgeable and very responsive. He worked with me over the phone, and we met in person a couple of times. David went to court on my behalf and got everything dismissed. He saved me quite a bit of money and time, while being a pleasure to work with. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
Llevo llendo muxos años y creo que no hay sitio mejor en segovia
I like this hotel
Why aren't there six stars? Louise and the team are exceptionally supportive and helpful I have rented for many years through Brices AND let my own property through them as well. Wicked tenant service and very efficient landlord facilities. Couldn't want for a better service. Look at the number of agents that come and go in Brighton and you'll see Brices stood the test of time and turmoil on more than one occasion - there's a good reason for that!. Recommend them 100%.
We have pretty much lived here all our lives and can tell you that their food is absolutley awesome! Their salsa awesome, their food awesome, their service WONDERFULL!!!! Lol Great place to be! Always very friendly! Stop by anytime your in the mood for Mexican food!
None
Lots of cheap clothes and outlets
Woodbury Dental Care is a very professional, yet friendly and comfortable office. They provide state of the art services and are very careful and understanding to your needs. What I like most about Woodbury Dental Care is the attention you are given the moment you step into the office. It feels like your part of their family. The entire staff is very well informed on all dental services they provide. I referred my sister to this office as well. (She was at her other dentist 20 plus years! ). Thanks for your great services!
A+ selection of shops for everybody. Ice rink is a nice touch. Clean. Parking is very organized with multiple options. Restaurants that open to the outside of the mall are open late.
loving it forever and now have the husband addicted too. the dark buds are my favorites and we both rank the dark chocolate pb cups as fantastic. but the best comment I can make are for the quality of your baking ingredients. both my chocolate chip cookies and a dark chocolate cookie with pb chips get rave reviews when i share with friends and family. my other trick is to put pb chips in a dark chocolate brownie mix. quick dessert with fantastic taste. For a special treat we like to take long weekends in Lititz and the surrounding area that also include a trip to the store. can't say enough ...
This is the best pizza I've ever had in Canada, never mind Vancouver. The quality ingredients are packed with flavour and the crust is baked to perfection. The service was spot on , Mathew at the door was very accommodating. I think its incredible how they call or text your phone when your table is almost ready so you can go have a drink somewhere else without having to wait outside for a table. I've had the Napolitan, margharita, bianca, and proscuitto rucola and they were all equally delicious. The tiramisu is also a must have.
Very considerate and compassionate towards me and my Sadie girl. They got me in right a way with out question. The vets and staff were very nice loving and friendly and the price was reasonable. The establishment is very clean and I look forward to having my Sadie treated there from now on.
this is a great place.nice and peaceful .food good.grounds are great with a woodland walk to the beach.
I took my mother there to get a new pair of eyeglasses. She had an eye exam done and found that she needed a stronger prescription than the one she already had. They filled the prescription for her and she picked out a nice pair of Versace frames as well - everything was done in-house and there was no work needed on our part to get any of it done, that's the kind of service I'm looking for. If you need to get contacts or glasses, Eye Supply has a great in-house service - ask for Mark, he'll take care of you.
I love this restaurant! Great prices and great food. Will definitely be going back.
None
What a fantastic experience! I recently purchased a new Lincoln MKZ Hybrid from Sentry Ford Lincoln in Medford and thoroughly enjoyed the entire process. Enio was was my salesman and I highly recommend him if you are considering purchasing a car. Hat's off to making a usually painful process EASY and ENJOYABLE!
I really enjoy the friendly service I always get from Dave I appreciate the professionalism and knowledge they have about classic cars.
Everyone at Doug's is extremely professional and attentive to their customers needs and budgets. You won't go wrong bring your car here!
I never used to believe in acupuncture. I prefer my doctors and medicine. It took me 2 years after being in pain from my car accident to try acupuncture. Three bus stop moms highly recommended Bella so I gave her a try. I am so thankful I did. She is a kind a gentle person. She's open and genuinely concerned about me. I don't know how it works but I know I definitely feel different. Better. Looser. I'm a believer now. And I believe in Bella.
Very helpful and informative. They will sell you aluminum. If you love aluminum, go there. An infinite variety of aluminum - from doodads to heavy duty widgets. LOTS of aluminum. CASH or CHECK ONLY.
Enjoyed delicious hamburgers at Houston Lodge Restaurant yesterday. New owners, pleasant and competent help, nice atmosphere, clean restrooms, and an enjoyable experience. Food preparation and presentation were fine in this family-owned and operated restaurant. All in all, we were pleased and will be returning.
Il n attire pas de l extérieur mais une fois a l intérieur tout devient beau et agréable. Très belle déco, bonne cuisine et personnel très agréable... je le recommande vivement..
I came in for just a tire balance; when I picked up my vehicle all the fluids had been topped off and the tires rotated!!! Mike and his service team to me when above and beyond my expectations!!!! Thanks so much Ewald Chevy I will be sending as much service your way as I can!!!
I work for The Hotel Telluride in Telluride, Colorado and received a call in May about a 4X4 trip that was being put together by Landrover, Flatirons for their client base. I can't say enough about what an enjoyment their entire team was to work with. I have to say, Fallon Price, their special events planner is a catch for any company. She is one of the most friendly, flexible, and professional individuals have planned an event with in a long time. Landrover Flatiron definitely values their customer relationships! Their attention to detail and pre-planning trips out to see us, gave me confidence that their top customers coming on this 4X4 experience were going to have an excellent time. The program went off flawlessly and there were lots of smiles, mud, and technical driving all weekend long!
None
Great menu!
Wow this place is great. We loved everything we ate.
More than Clearance did my house move for me. Wesley and his team were great: friendly, quick, and really hard working. They were also excellent value for money. Highly recommended - I'd definitely use them again.
None
I've used Pawsitive Steps for over two years with my dog Lincoln. He is walked and cared for by his caregivers; and more than that, I know that he is loved and truly taken care of every day. That's extremely important to me. It gives me tremendous peace of mind to know that Monica and Erin take care of Linc the same way that they would for their own pets. I love Pawsitive Steps.
I had a great experience at The Foundry, the staff were great and were around 24/7 if you needed them. Probably aimed more towards the mature students as the place can be very quiet (which was a godsend during the exam period) Do be warned that some things can come at an extra one-off cost (i.e £50 cost to connect a games console to the network, £30 for wifi) Other than that though the place was awesome, I had a good fresher year there. Having the staff living there and being in the center of town made it well worth the money. I'll seriously consider coming back in later years
Good specials on beer, prompt service. And delicious burger!
None
AMAZING FOOD!! I have had to travel to Des Moines on business several times this year and La Mie knocks lunch out of the park every time! Delicious food that reminds me of my days in France, helpful and kind service, and complimentary iced tea and bread - it's an all around great place. Do yourself a favor and eat here!
Great experience with sales and loved the new service department. Hope future dealings with Diamond are just as pleasant.
After having hit and miss experiences buying used cars over the years, I recently bought my first new car from Gem Mazda. In comparing this experience against my previous dealings with Car Dealerships, I can comfortably say I'll probably ALWAYS be driving a Mazda! (zoom zoom) The sales team is low pressure, accommodating, extremely helpful and they obviosly enjoy their jobs. We took our time, researched vehicles, and were not pursued by the sales team like a hungry pack of honey badgers like we were by other Manufacturer Dealerships. Dave Rohe helped us on our first visit, and Markus closed the deal while Dave was on vacation. Both gentlemen were wonderful. Dave helped me learn how to navigate all the bells and whistles on my car, and I'm a happy camper. Our experience with the finance department was just as enjoyable. (a first!) While we heard the obligatory schpiel about available packages to protect the car, there was none of the playing of games regarding taxation, or fees like I've endured at other dealerships. I was quoted by email an "out the door" price that was fair to all involved. A problem with a vacuum hose in the engine caused the engine light to illuminate our second day of ownership. My first dealing with the Service Deparment was just as pain free as the purchase of the vehicle - they took a hose off another vehicle on the lot, and had me on my merry way feeling confident about my purchase in no time. Keep up the good work, ladies and gentlemen!!
It's been a great couple of months so far, you definitely pay for what you receive though.
None
Great Service. Take a date and get the veggie for two!
Grass fed beef, veggie burgers, vegan burgers plus shakes, malts, grilled cheese, organic milk, oranges and other healthy snacks. Sign up and they give you buy one get one free coupons, free drinks and more!
One of the better post offices I've used. I had a box here for business for a couple decades. Used to be a stand-alone Post Office that sorted mail etc. but now operates more like a branch PO affiliated with CLE and the Cleveland Post Office. Hours are coordinated with the CLE Airmail station. Good service and friendly people on both sides of the counter. A little busy during lunch times and at the end of the business day but most of the customers know how a post office works so the line moves. Easy access to outside boxes and sufficient angle and street parking close to the front door on streets with tolerable traffic are pluses.
I loved the variety of poses. Indoor. Outdoor. Head shots. Full length shots. Flowers. Architectural backgrounds. Beautiful lighting in all.
Margharita pizza is amazing.
The photos Mark took were amazing. It really captured the behind the scenes moments before, during and after our wedding perfectly. We love sharing the DVDs with our family and friends. Not only were the photos perfect, but Mark was so great to work with. He got everyone together for the shots we wanted, without being intrusive. We're so glad we chose him as our photographer for this once in a lifetime event. - Katie & Brian Daggett
Unique and highly professional people. Love you designs.....
We had such a great experience working with Adam. He was extremely professional and responsive to my emails when setting up our appointment. He was so easy to work with. We got our family portraits taken and he made the experience very relaxing and fun! He had our proofs ready for reviews exactly when he said he would. He really made the whole process from start to finish easy, professional and comfortable. Not to mention he is one of the most talented photographers that I have worked with. We are more than happy with the way our pictures turned out. Thanks Adam!
Skip's never disappoints. Great food, great service. Highly recommended.
Must try.
I've been a few times to Cook and Pan for lunch and it has been really good. Although they have a menu, they will mix and match things as everything is made on the spot. The place has improved inside quite considerably. They have redecorated it. If you like Polish or Eastern European food or even if you just like a really good breakfast it is worth a visit. There really isn't much else like it so like a lot of niche restaurants, they probably aren't making much money at it and so it is important to support it less it be lost. Their perogies and cabbage rolls are in a different league to the stuff you get everywhere else.
Print Edge is the definition of good business in the printing and signage industry. I have used them for the past 13 years, ordering countless pieces each month. Coupled with fast friendly service, they always provide finished pieces that get the job done! I will continue to use Print Edge for many, many years to come...
These guys have gone out of there way to help us with everything we have asked, If they have not known something they have gone and found someone who has. If you are planning any garden renovations or just a freshen up this is a great place to start just keep asking them the questions and they will tell you how to do it.
None
None
Someone I know recommended Road Runner. I tried them because the other shop I was taking my automobiles was ripping me off. I've used Road Runner ever since. They are several miles from where I live, but it is worth it. They are honest, priced right, and I've never had a problem with any of the work they have done. I'd hadn't been there in over a year and when I brought one of my automobiles in, the owner was asking me how my other cars are. Odd, maybe, but he remembered! If you want a honest place for auto repairs. I recommend Road Runner.
None
"La Cuisine de Georges" porte parfaitement son nom : vous entrez dans une pièce ouverte directement sur la cuisine où Georges officie, ce dernier vous accueille le torchon à portée de mains et vous demande poliment où vous voulez vous installer. Le maître mot : convivialité ! Une grande table trône au centre de la pièce et invite tous les clients à siéger côte-à-côte ! Ensuite vous dégusterez les plats mijotés aux petits oignons par Georges, passionné de gastronomie et de la "bonne bouffe". Un moment simple qui décoiffe vos papilles ! Merci Georges de nous faire partager ta passion !
Excellent service!
Nice Arrangement, Well Decorated, Nice food, service was good well maintained. All arrangement was very good.
Fast and enjoyable for the whole family. And they were nice to us. IMAX was great and 3D was awesome.
Miller's Ale House is always a favorite of mine. They have great food at a good price. The atmosphere is always up beat and great for any time of sports game. My favorite thing on the menu are the Zingers. The chicken nachos are also awesome! Piled high with tons of toppings! Also their famous Zingers are a great selection too. My wife's favorite food on the menu is the Zinger tacos.
Love the rooftop and love their food. No complaints about the service. Come here a lot. Will drive an hour for this place.
Went there for a wineery visit. It is the most educational and knowledgeable. The process of making wine was explained by staff and they were so friendly. Had 6 kinds of beer tasting. I recommend visit this place if you are in Traverse city.
Great tanning salon, friendly staff, and was very affordable to.
I have had a pressure washing business for 5 years in Nashville, TN. After being in business for 2 years and going through multiple suppliers I was finally introduced to Mike Taylor, owner of Absolute Chemical. I wish I had known Mike from day one! He always has what I need in stock and very fresh. Nothing he has has been sitting on the shelves for weeks or months. He will deliver your supplies to your business or even to a job site. He even does service calls on your machines out on site. Try him out. He's a good guy with great chemicals.
Bed Bath & Beyond offers great customer service! If you ever need help finding something, they have the most helpful sales associates-- including my daughter-- she works in the Ontario Mills Mall....
We had a great experience here buying our Chevy. Low pressure, great salespeople, easy process. Might have helped that we came on a Sunday near the end of the day, but I would recommend this dealership to everyone!
After 20+ years of ALWAYS wanting to own a Tahoe, I finally can say I own one....thanks to Julie Gonzalez and Kenny Beavers. Julie went above and beyond to make sure my needs were met and make sure I got the best deal possible and MOST importantly I drove out of there with the truck of my dreams. I was able to drive out with a 2011 Tahoe with the warranty still in place AND for a VERY low price. I checked around and NO ONE could beat this deal. Kenny Beavers made certain my vehicle was delivered in top notch condition after making sure it was delivered from another Hendrix dealer a few hours away. I can't express how grateful I am to have had this experience and welcome the opportunity to work with you all in the future. Thank you again for such a pleasant experience. Sincerely, Leslie West
None
Great "Twister" boat ride there, but beyond that, this place is perfect. White sugary sand, water as clear as your bath water, free drinks and buffet, if you've been looking for paradise, or wondering which excursion is "the" excursion, ta-da! If you can pull it off, just stay there, forever.
After dealing with Kevin and Mary Francis I have one regret... that I'm not in the market for a mortgage more often! I wish they sold groceries, or gasoline, or something that would allow me to do business with them all the time. Kevin educated my wife and I on the in's and out's of mortgages to an unprecedented degree and instilled us with absolute confidence. I couldn't recommend Kevin and Mary more highly - they are truly spectacular!!
This is the best dog grooming experience in Abbotsford, BC. We really like the special love shown to our dog and the excellent grooming. He always comes home looking his very best.
When you think you need to be physically educated, spiritually relished, YOGA is what you should practice. I heard from great men, Yoga originated from Lord SHIVA. I had a feeling of being among the most busy professionals on earth, when I thought to take a break from the work as it was breaking my focus and concentration on work. I decided to go for Yoga course and started searching online for the same. Got a lot of information but yet was not able to finalize the destination and the best ally. Staying near to Rishikesh, in Delhi, I visited the place and started exploring the places to get my reincarnation what I was expecting. I explored till the last construction made in city near the holy valley and found Mahatmayoga ashram. When I entered i saw no promotion environment for the Yoga courses in fact it was mere attraction for the place forced me to enter. I saw fair colored people and learnt that people from other part of the world has reached before me to be benefited from Yoga. When these people smiled at me even being unknown, made me think of the values this place is associated with. I was roaming in the arena and reached the top floor where it was happening what I was searching for. Yogi ji taking classes for meditation and talking about a lot of things which I should sit and keep listening. It took hardly 10 minutes for me to decide when to start and how to make the required arrangements. I would say the rest here remains with the most beautiful part of my life, feeling happy is what I learnt ultimately. Apart from the Yoga classes there is a lot to learn and practice. The place to live, the surroundings to spend time, the sound of water, the haziness of mountains and absence of any man made creation, made the life for a few days like I was living with nature. I will happily say, the best place to go for Yoga is Mahatmayoga ashram. Once you come you never go from here. You feel like a family.
Screen Graphics offers quality products for a fair and very affordable price. Customer Service is outstanding. Highly recommended.
I have been going to 2 Brothers Pizza for 3 years now and they it is good! I have recently tried the Meatball Pizza and couldn't get enough. I am eager to try the Mushroom, Vegetable, Pepperoni Pizzas. Both the cheese and sauce are excellent! I go there when I am in the area.
Overall great food. Love the firecracker shrimp.
Vraiment ca vaut la peine et c'est pas trop cher!
There are multiple levels of performance. To make sure I adequately describe my experience with Reigan. I'm not sure exceptional is enough. ARS is blessed to have Reigan as an employee. He is not only good at inter-personal relationships but is very good at what he does. I would be happy to have him into my home again should I ever need service from ARS again. Thank you for his service. Sincerely, Ross B Tilton
Sales person very helpful with everything. Thanks
Love the retro look. Incredibly well done from top to bottom.
100% worth it. Gatorland has expanded, so if you were last there 15+ years ago (like me), you'll be pleasantly surprised at all the new stuff. Gators, snakes, birds, gators, goats, and more gators. Gatorland fits nicely into one casually-paced day. Take a break from Disney and enjoy Gatorland!
None
Love the Vortex IPA enough to repeatedly visit. Good food, too.
None
Used this company for 8 months now and love them. They have shipped things a few days early when I was running out of supplies even though insurance wouldn't allow the supplies for several days. Every order has been correct and charges are exactly what I was quoted. Customer service reps are courteous and patient with my many questions.
I just wanted to write to you about the great experience my husband and I had with Closet Factory. From browsing the showroom to installation, everyone was very knowledgeable and helpful. We recently bought a house in CO and needed to optimize space for a study/guest room. We thought that a murphy bed and a built-in desk would do the job...and boy, does it! We upgraded materials and really like the look. The two items use the space very well. Even with the bed down, there is plenty of room to use the desk if necessary, and there's also plenty of room around the bed. The installers were very nice, competent and helpful as well. They took care to keep the path to the room clean and cleaned up everything after they were finished. We are very pleased with the final product and will very likely call on Closet Factory in the future. -MOD
fantastic place, been taking my cars there for 15 years and they always treat customers fairly, do not gouge $$$ you like other places
None
None
My kids loved this place! The staff was friendly and answered all our questions. We started with a tour but it was too long the kids. The staff had no problem with us breaking away from the group and going on our own. The trains were awesome, the short film good and there were Thomas toys to play with upstairs. A nice family friendly museum with some cool history.
I ragazzi dello staff di DotFlorence sono stati molto professionali sia nella realizzazione della grafica del sito sia, soprattutto, nella realizzazione dell'indicizzazione. La consiglierei!
None
None
None
Great food and staff... Our home away from home
None
Office Depot needs to get the hell out of town. Office Max beats the competition hands down and they provide A+ customer service in every way for my business.
Very good food and cheap
These guys over here at The Pit Stop are the best. They are by far the most knoledgeable people in the industry. Being taken care of is what they are all about. They are right in Kearny Mesa and they service just about everything. Justin the Service Manger is Great. The repair center as been around for over 25 years so you know they have been doing it right. Thanks Pit Stop !
Muito boa Marina com excelente atendimento, restaurante Maramangue de 1 categoria com uma vista maravilhosa!
Friendly service. I got a seat!!!
None
None
Love these guys, really excellent job, professional and friendly. Clean, priceless and serious, what else?! Ah yes something else --> the people here aren't just tattoo maker, they are also real artists ;-).
None
Fast. Delicious. Cheap. Best food experience I had in Melbourne and I recommend it to everyone.
The Best and Most Authentic Mexican Food
Great ice cream and great owners. Cindy & Mike truly get it about operating a small business and treating people well. We always tell people to go check out D'lites.
This restaurant is definitely off the beaten path for most tourists, although it's easily walked from the center of Prague. The food here is traditional--mostly Czech with some Slovak and Hungarian specials as well. Our meal was excellent; the atmosphere was quiet, cozy and pleasant; and the service was very good. If you like Central European food, you'll enjoy Posezeni U Chiriny. What you find in the center of Prague in the tourist areas is generally not good Czech food. This is! Here's a small neighborhood restaurant in the best sense of the term.
Amazing car shopping experience.. Vince and Ray were awesome to work with.. Most dealerships the general manager is up high somewhere or behind glass and only comes out when you are ready to walk out. Not Ray.. I went right into his office put my feet up and he plugged in the numbers.. My family and I am going to be a Hendrick Cadillac customers forever. I highly recommend Hendrick Cadillac.
Great food and highly recommended to me by locals
Delicious muesli, great coffee and friendly service.
Angie was a good customer service representative.
Lobster bisque had a great flavor finished with sherry. Sea bass ravioli was delicate and creamy inside with a nice acidity to the creamy tomato sauce. A Grouper special topped with shrimp was moist, tasty and flaky. The thin sliced pineapple with ice cream was so refreshing. A special custard/flan with chunks of chocolate and caramel sauce was fluffy light and delicious. I really liked the caramelized provolone in the Tricolore salad and my dinner date raved over the spinach beet salad (she gave me most of the fried goat cheese = yumm!). I've eaten here twice (lunch and dinner) and the food is of the highest quality. The freshly made bread is so good, I deliberately held back so I would not fill up on bread! My date did not care for the pistachio sorbet but really liked the candied pistachios topping it (she wanted more nuts!). Seating in the back overlooks a quaint pond.
A fast and cheap way to send packages to Romania. You could track the package online. Delivery is right at the door. I recommend the services provided by Cargo Romania.
Hay Trung tam samsung lam ca le tet tay nha
Never been there for anything else, but love Karen's for grooming! I was taking my 2 lb long coat maltese to my vet's office all the way up in Lancaster County to be groomed since she was previously cut at PetCo and required an emergency trip to VRC Malvern for 6 stitches. When I asked the groomer at my vet's office for a different day, she told me that she's only there 2 days per week, but works at some other place "WAY out in Malvern". Ha! Turns out that other place is Karen's... literally a stone's throw away from my own business. I now take Pixel there every Friday. Prices are so wonderful that it's not even worth it to bathe her myself anymore, and Jackie does such a great job with my tiny girl! I highly recommend Jackie and am glad to have found her!
My salesman, Nick S. was determined to get me the car i wanted and he did, and i got a great deal on it too
เนื่องด้วยเมื่อวันที่ 6 กันยายน 2555 กระผม ได้ประสบอุบัติเหตุขับรถไปชนกับผู้มาใช้บริการของทางไปรษณีย์ โดยคู่กรณีของผม ขับรถออกมาจากไปรษณีย์ โดยไม่คำนึงถึงความปลอดภัยของผู้ใช้รถร่วมบนถนน จึงทำให้ทรัพย์สินเสียหายทั้งสองฝ่าย รวมไปถึงตัวกระผมเองก็บาดเจ็บเล็กน้อย.....ดังนั้นที่ผมจะบอกให้ผู้บริหารหรือผู้ที่มีส่วนเกี่ยวข้องได้รับทราบก็คือ อยากให้มีการทำป้ายบอกให้ผู้ที่เข้ามาใช้บริการว่าระมัดระวังการเข้าออกด้วยนะครับ จากการสังเกตุของผมดูแล้วว่าไม่มีป้ายหรือสัญญาณใดๆเลยที่จะเตือนให้ผู้มาใช้บริการไปรษณีย์ได้คำนึงถึงความปลอดภัยในการเข้ามาใช้บริการของไปรษณีย์อีกด้วย จึงเรียนมาเพื่อทราบและแก้ไขเพื่อที่จะไม่เกิดเหตุอย่างที่ผมประสบที่ผ่านมาครับ หรือถ้าเป็นไปได้ควรทำไฟสัญญาณบอกก็ดี ด้วยความเคารพนะครับผมไม่อยากให้เกิดเหตุการแบบนี้ขึ้นกับคนอื่นครับ สุดท้ายหวังว่าคงได้รับการปรับปรุงจากทางไปรษณีย์หาดใหญ่ที่เป็นไปในทางที่ปลอดภัยขึ้นมากกว่านี้
Barnes has high quality products and helpful associates. I go there for pet supplies, so I can't comment to much on garden supplies. Their pet food selection is great and they are great at helping you find what you need. They have samples of most foods and will take food back if your pet won't eat it. Very nice, independent, local store.
I started going to Blush shortly after it was founded by Soheila, my mom's hairdresser. Soheila was very particular about who she hired, so I never really worried about who cut my hair. Now Soheila has sold the company but I still go there. I've settled with Stephanie as my main hairdresser and she does a great job! I highly recommend this place, it's professional, clean and the people who work there are very talented.
Great beer selection! Awesome 25¢ Wings Sunday, killer $2 Burgers Tue & $3 Craft Beer cans Wed! Sit down, shut up & start drankin!
Had the opportunity to meet Steve about getting liquidating my estate. He completely took control of the situation. No fuss, no muss... I highly recommend Four Seasons. Thanks Steve!
Logic is a very professional and well organized company. The staff is very friendly and willing to educate its customers. Not only that but the staffed is educated and well trained leaving the techy challenged able to use the functions of any devises installed in terms even I can understand. :0) Thank You Logic for all your hard work and kindness!! 5+*****
Jednom dobar...
Great place to study or just relax. The employees are friendly and quick to get your order. They have, in my opinion anyway, the best coffee cake anywhere.
None
Wow, great fish tacos! Great place for lunch! Yummy burgers! Terrific service... we'll come back for more! Dinner is next!
A great University
We highly enjoyed our Booze and Bites tour with Morgan. At first we were a little worried about the "touristy" feel of it but that was only for the introduction. We lucked out on having a very small group, meaning the two of us and two additional people, which made our tour even better. Being the foodie of the couple, I need to mention that the food is exceptional and we ended up going back to one of the locations for lunch we were so impressed. The drinks were all great or better. For some reason I thought there would be beer on the tour, but there wasn't. Overall, a really great time and I got to experience food and alcohol that I would of never tried if it hadn't been for this tour. It was such a good experience we tried to fit another tour with Savor Seattle but unfortunately couldn't fit it into our schedule. Chances are, when we come back to Seattle, we will schedule another tour with this company due to the excellence of our Booze and Bites tour.
Dr. Coon and staff are very professional but caring. I have spread the good word about this practice. Thank you guys for helping the public.
I loved the food lots of everything. 1 question though, why would you go to a seafood restaurant and order a steak?!?! All I have to say is... I Love CORKYBELLS!!! WHERE SEAFOOD LOVERS, LOVE THEY'RE SEAFOOD! No beef eaters need apply. Start simple with some great fried pickles, and some fried mushrooms. Then work ya way into their famous fried shrimp. Don't forget about that gator tail now! Try not to eat it all though, save some for the rest of us Florida Crackers! Love you Corkybells, keep it up yur doin' fine!!!!! I <3 shrimp!
I am originally from the northwest ohio area and I have moved from there to maryland and to columbus. And every time I come back to visit family I get a tattoo from Tony touch. His schedule is almost never open but I make sure I get my appointment at least 2 months in advance. He's a busy guy. I understand that. His work is super awesome and I plan on getting many more tattoos from him in the future. On top of that I have never spent more than $200 for a tattoo with him. Not that I get huge back peices or anything. But I do get medium sized tattoos, around 9x5 I would say. I suppose it depends on the job. I do agree with the review that says that the girl at the front desk is not very nice but don't let that deter you from the shop. Also if you come in and you know that artist is there, they might be willing to see you and give you a quote.
This place is fantastic! It's the best Indian place around, hands down. After having a horrible experience at a different restaurant years ago, my family was leery to try Indian food again. Once I finally convinced them we should go, they were in heaven. There lunch buffet is great, there naans are delicious (they have peshwari naan!), and their soups, curries, and other dishes are all fantastic! You can request different spiciness levels, which I greatly appreciate, and their waitstaff is very friendly. They also always have Indian music videos or clips from Bollywood films playing on one of the TVs - which I find quite entertaining to watch. After dinner, if you still have room for any more food, their desserts and chai tea are also very nice. Even living half an hour away, we go here as often as we can, and I cannot recommend it enough.
Associated Glass just fitted some Glass doors at my house. Best quality doors i have seen at a great price ! completed the job within 1 day. A very professional service with very professional and polite staff would recommend to anyone who needs something done glass related. Overall a great company
Great experience. Very friendly environment with a great sense of community and great classes. I love that they have showers and I am able to leave my yoga mat there instead of carrying it around all day.
None
Gostei de alguns posts seu, achei inteligentes, então resolvi add. Porém uso mais face... me add lá...vamos trocando ideias!!!
I could not be happier with our experience w/ Nicole and Behind The Lens Maui. Nicole was so outgoing and really made everyone feel comfortable for our family photo session. The location was fabulous and her talents really shined in our pictures. She was great with the kids and really helped bring out their personalities. Our session had to be rescheduled due to spotty weather and she was flexible with our desires and plans. You will not find a better, more professional, photographer on the island of Maui. I am hopeful our paths will cross again down the road.
None
I love this place, it's no wonder they've made it up here to the Northwest.
Great place for a drop of ancient and medieval History !
Uncle Bill's and their M&M pancakes are a staple of Wildwood for us
One of my favorite places to go. Love their meatballs and find it very relaxing there. I would love to go once a week!
Rome has only one coffeehouse besides Starbucks, and it's better than most of those I visit in Chattanooga and Atlanta. The decor is a step above most coffeehouses I've been to and resists stereotype while still featuring local themes and artists. I recommend ordering a macchiato or one of their slow bar coffees. The service team is always friendly and eager to help. At the end of the bar they have a record player and a collection of vinyls that patrons can get played. There's also a table in the back you can reserve for small groups or events.
This firm has amazing attorneys with superb professionalism and an undoubted respect for clients. Patricia Cooper helped my husband and I through a very difficult case, in which he had taken voluntary departure, was in removal proceedings and the case needed approval to be reopened. We had been working with a different immigration attorney for 2 years and the lack of communication and progress made us uneasy. At this point, we decided to look for other options for representation. We were referred to the Gerstein and Baret office by a colleague, where we met Patricia. She has led us through every step of this process and educated us along the way. She always responded quickly and efficiently. Without her help, we would not have been able to do this with just any immigration lawyer let alone ourselves. With her help, we were able to keep our family together during this trying time and can now rest easy. My husband and I will definitely be coming back to Patricia Cooper in three years when we can file for citizenship. I highly recommend her and associates.
I have been working with amber for several years now and as a hands on single father, running a business I can honestly say that she has added so much to my life. We have worked on all aspects, from being in business with family members to building healthy relationships with my children and my wife to be. My communication skill have improved tremendously as well as my self worth. She gives me perspective on what I am doing and has helped me understand that I am on a journey to be my true self. I am grateful for her and I know that I would not be where I am today without her help and guidance and of course my willingness to try hard.
None
A ne pas rater de passage a Nice
I dont know what they are talking about when they say teachers are bad. I currently go to RidgeView and im a Seventh Grader. Its Actually a really good school. The teachers actually go out of their way to help you. At this school if you fail a grade and have to repeat it then most likey its you not doing what you need to do. The teachers have tourtials for students to go to for extra help. As a student I really recomend this school.
Drs. Paul and Bridget Kozy and the staff run a state-of-the-art practice with a family-like atmosphere. My husband just had a tooth extracted. Both Dr. Paul and Marcia called later to check on him. Soon Dr. Paul will insert an implant to replace the tooth and I'm sure my husband will be handsomer than ever!
Lucy and Leo's cupcakes are crave-worthy. The variety is really extensive, especially for a small, local shop. They have different flavors every day and bake them all fresh daily. I haven't had any cupcake as good as the ones I've had here.
I love Pure Orthodontics within 3 months of getting my braces my teeth were already looking alot better for my sisters wedding. Every time I go to either office all of the staff are always very friendly (Everyone is always smiling). I never see that anywhere else I go to. Dr Hussain is not like your regular doctor or dentist he is very cool and chill. Dr Hussain has always given me very good advise. Thx for the $Million Smile.
Definitely Jamaica's best kept secret. Such amazing food and an outstanding and courteous wait staff. I gain like 5 pounds every time I go because I can't stop eating the delicious food. The specialty cocktails are great and perfectly compliment the food. The prices are more than fair and I love the atmosphere of the whole restaurant. Oh yeah, definitely get the grit sticks!
Prior to walking through the front doors at Bob Rohrman Schaumburg Ford, I dreaded the entire car buying process. I even brought my very informed neighbor and friend for "back up". All those negative thoughts about purchasing a car disappeared instantly when I was introduced to my salesman, Paul Van Duser. He was the most kind, knowledgeable and "non-pressure" salesperson I have ever dealt with, which totally earned not only my respect and trust, but the respect and trust of my friend and my husband. I will highly recommend Paul Van Duser and Schaumburg Ford to my family, friends and acquaintances. Thank you, Paul and Schaumburg Ford! Sincerely, Teresa Colby-Dokubo Schaumburg, IL
None
None
Оставляю свой отзыв, так как считаю нужным сообщить общественности, что хорошего брокера таможенного найти не просто. Сначала проходил по знакомым и пару раз попадался на "качественный сервис", решил найти сам. В гугл Инвекта была на первых местах по запросам, ай думаю обращусь к ним. Слава богу работаем и по сей день, нареканий нет. Всё правильно и ясно, только вот нужно ещё умудриться объяснить нашим иностранным коллегам всю специфику работы механизма таможенного оформления, в частности на территории Украины и РФ, но и в этом консультанты из Инвекты очень помогают. Спасибо вам за поддержку, роста и довольных клиентов.
I've NEVER had a bad experience here. Drive thru always has a line and we are put through very fast. Service has always been excellent and very friendly.
Amazing service! Wonderful sushi! Wow! Go here!
Great pizza!!!
We recently repainted our entire flat, using Perfect Home Painting and decorating. The work was carried out professionally and on time to an extremely high standard. We will be definitely using you again for future decorating work. Thanks again for a wonderful job. Evelyn
Palmer Square is a an excellent resource for the thousands living within walking distance of this wide park. The Square is bordered by small Chicago mansions and is threaded with walking paths and rolling turf, sports a playground, and has plenty of trees for shade. It is a popular running spot and dog walk year-round, but in the spring and summer you'll find dozens of locals lazing in the grass with books or blankets, dozing, picnicking, and enjoying the view. An essential part of the Logan Square living experience.
Excellent food, very friendly staff. I can't wait to go back for dinner.
Watson Chevrolet has the best customer service.
Muy buena
Went in for the first time last night for Jack Daniels birthday...it was great, being someone who loves Jack this place was a great! Vanilla Jack was amazing! I will definitely go back again!
None
Great food for the price. Excellent lunch! I recommend the burgers... They are NOT small. Very filling.
None
This was the most special experience! We had a very awesome time. We came here for my son's special Childrens Wishes & Dreams trip. We chose Doraku from the previous recommendations and we weren't disappointed. Sushi is his favorite food and this rocked his world! After open heart, we choose only the best foods for him. The staff was amazing. Kanoe was awesome and provided him two awesome desserts: Tempura brownie and a hot, sweet banana with ice cream and chocolate drizzle. The emperor, volcano and Doraku rolls as well as the sho toru and uni were as fresh and savory as anything imaginable! Thank you Doraku for everything!
None
Muy buena
Best rolls, always fresh.
We rented a 26' RV for ten days from this company. I cannot say enough about the service we received from this company. They were outstanding. We had a minor issue in the beginning and they compensated us well for the minor glitch (placed in the wrong RV overnight). They went above and beyond for us, we had no issues with the RV and it was very comfortable for three adults. I would rent again should we get another opportunity to visit Alaska.
A growing congregation that is always looking for ways to serve God by serving people.
None
Basically my favorite ramen in Burnaby, possibly all of Vancouver. I love it. The ambiance is weak and the service is OK but if you like good broth, grilled pork, and delicious noodles, this place is great.
Happy to report that Dolphin does what it says – they provided excellent tutors that have helped make a difference in my son’s SAT score. We stuck to their advice and he improved nicely and scored a 1910. I would recommend this company to anyone looking for a SAT tutoring company that can provide results.
None
Couldn't be happier for the second time Excellent work!!! I had an Carrier infinity system installed about a year and a half ago by Comfort Solutions and I was extremely happy with the installation and service, so when it came time for me to have a Mistubushi split system installed in my new 4 season room I didn't hesitate to call them back and again we were impressed by their professionalism and work.....My wife and I couldn't be any happier......Thank you Mike and Ken Couldn't be happier for the second time Excellent work!!! I had an Carrier infinity system installed about a year and a half ago by Comfort Solutions and I was extremely happy with the installation and service, so when it came time for me to have a Mistubushi split system installed in my new 4 season room I didn't hesitate to call them back and again we were impressed by their professionalism and work.....My wife and I couldn't be any happier......Thank you Mike and Ken
The team here is excellent. Fast accurate service. Have never had an issue.
None
Very nice customer service from the Arlington folks, especially on a weekend.
None
Absolutely Delicious!
Only mall I loved in gurgaon. Its got something in it that pulls you to it. You can spend all day inside and still feel like something is missing. Its got all good outlets. Top floor has PVR and food court as well. Gaming zone is also available. They have got a nice bowling court as well. Ground floor has Barista infront of Om Book Shop.
Amazing place to go swimming. Good workout swim out to the island and back and several cliff jumps of different heights.
Excellent Customer service all the way around. Friendly staff - courteous and reasonable rates as well. We highly recommend Road Runner Storage Inc
As someone who wholly enjoys Toro Bravo, I have to say that Noble Rot comes close! This is definitely going to be THE place that I take my next date. Beautiful view, delectable drinks, and good food.
Great bunch of guys, very knowledgeable. Masters of their work. Anything you need, they can make it happen.
Just finished dinner for their opening night. What earnest food and heartfelt service. A great time!
Excellent Indian restaurant - probably one of the best three in Ipswich (Zaika and Maharani) - little bit different menu than most Indian eateries. Quite a few Southern Indian dishes - lots of fish on the menu. Highly recommended.
Responded within the hour and unclogged toilet in less than five minutes. Very courteous and gave us some good tips. Would recommend and hire again.
Great doctors
ottimo rapporto qualità prezzo, a pranzo con 10 € pranzo completo, a cena un po di più ma ci torno sempre volentieri.
Great company. I've been ordering from them since 2004. Excellent customer service. Keep it up!
None
Got to take their four hour Kite Boarding ground school yesterday - well worth the time. They walk you through the basics, teach safety and provide advice. Then we went to the beach and practiced kite flying and setup. The ground school will make the first lesson / attempt at this sport much easier. Best of all - can't beat the price...Free! The whole Team are knowledgable, enthusiastic and a lot of fun. Highly recommend the shop.
Low price for great Threading!
Medford Oregon Kung Fu and Jiu Jitsu is AMAZING! My life was transformed after training with Master John La Tourrette and Master Jack La Tourrette. If you want to learn about loyalty,integrity,honor, gain strength and self discipline as well as the most effective techniques in Martial Arts and Self Defense, THIS IS THE PLACE TO BE! Before I became die-hard committed student, I thought I was strong, I thought I could fight, I thought I was smart.... Now I have been mentored by the BEST and that changed everything. Now I KNOW what my true capabilities are and they keep getting better and better. I don't know of any where else on this earth that you can get the level of training of mind and body that they have to offer.
None
I have know Ryan many years. There is one thing that I can assure anyone about this man...he is a man of integrity that fears God. His dedication to excellence makes him stand out above all. I know that Christ is at the center of his business and there is no way that he would ever lie, cheat or steal from people. His goal is that the work he does for this business will be pleasing in the eyes of God. Call him up, he can hook you up!
I've had the privilege of knowing Bill Peterson, the branch manager for about 5 years now and he has always done a great job for me. Best in the business and a man of integrity. Thanks Bill.
Caperion Computing Solutions has been incredibly impressed with FBPB! They make banking easy on us, from Bill Pay to Remote Deposits. Chris, Dale and Theresa always do a great job on assisting us with any user issues that we come across. The level of customer service is unlike any we have ever experienced with the "big box" banks. You will not regret using FBPB for your personal or business banking!
Nhân viên tư vấn và chất lượng công nghệ rất tốt, , Nha sỷ có chuyên môn cao, chu đáo và ân cần!!!
We thoroughly enjoyed eating here! Spotless, great food and wonderful staff. Will definitely visit again.
I love this bar. It reminds me of Cheers.
In town from Ohio. This place is fantastic. Margaritas were awesome. Guacamole was fresh delicious and made at the table. Buffet had many choices!
I don't care for avocados, this is the most amazing guacamole I've ever tasted! All the food here is fantastic. A must try in palm beach.
Great food, great people.
Beautifully bright and airy cafe with ridiculously large windows for optimum people-watching. Recently started serving an almost inappropriately gourmet breakfast at weekends. The coddled eggs are particularly amazing.
Best Value in Dallas I've had 4 dogs spayed and/or neutered with this amazing clinic. The staff is always friendly and thorough. The office is clean and I'm able to get my dog dropped off and picked up in no time. All 4 of my fur babies have come through surgery in perfect condition. I can't thank the vets and staff here enough for taking care of my precious pups.
Epic Fireworks know their stuff better than anyone, best fireworks combo ever!
None
None
I've lived here a month already and its just about prefect. my apartment is spacious, I feel incredibly safe here, tons of parking and everyone I've met has been friendly. yes maintenance takes time, but that's because there were only two maintenance meant for the entire complex, it's not their fault, it's management. the grounds are beautiful my apartment is so peaceful and my neighbors are quiet, it doesn't feel like an apartment it feels almost like a house or a condo I love it here.
this is the best. a little pricier than others but by far the amount is greater. fresh food. super service. I am talking about experience of all japanese restruants from here to Houston Tx.
I volunteer at this library, it is quiet. staff is nice, respectful, helpful and work very hard to run the library smoothly.
As a model and performer, I can honestly say that Bloom Mobile Makeup and Hair is the best aesthetic service I've ever worked with. They are fun, friendly, creative and professional, which is such a refreshing combination to encounter! I highly recommend Bloom Mobile Makeup and Hair for any and all occasions.
None
I always enjoy going to the Acura Flatirons Dealership in Boulder, Colorado. The salesmen and saleswomen are not "pushy" but thoughtful, kind, honest, friendly, and knowledgable. The service department is fantastic. Sarah Gatton has helped me significantly and has been very patient concerning the questions I have asked her. Sarah is extremely knowledgable, friendly, and helpful, as well as the other people who work in the service area. I know Acura employees are honest; I know the Acura sales and service departments have reasonable prices and provides excellent service. I always recommend the Acura Flatirons Dealership to others and I plan to be a lifetime "fan" of Acura; planning to buy my next vehicle from the Acura Flatirons Dealership and continuing to get my Acura 2005 TSX serviced there as long as I own it. No, one cannot beat the Flatirons Acura Dealership and Sarah Gutton gets an excellent rating from me for her knowledge, patience, friendliness, and honesty in helping me to get my Acura serviced well.
Loved this old church.
Simply Delicious.......Service was Great!!!
None
Um exemplo a ser seguido pelas escolas do Brasil!
So glad I went with Horizon Window Treatments because they were so friendly. They had great customer service and did a fantastic job with my Window Treatments. Thanks again!
Clean, friendly staff that Carries food out to the table. Great high chairs with trays for the little ones. I highly recommend this location
Excellent
Have been to Penelope's twice for sugaring. Absolutely lovely staff, great service and a relaxing/inviting decor. Would highly recommend to anyone looking for a reliable spa!
For a foodie who loves conti cuisine, this restaurant is a must try.
Genie Hookah is different from any other hookah bar. I love it because from the second you walk in the door you are treated like family. If you respect them they will respect you back. Other hookah bars are more concerned about making money than building a solid customer base. I have been coming here the last five years and I refuse to go anywhere else. Genie is the cheapest hookah lounge around and they offer a wide variety of flavors as well as a wide variety of drinks and chips. Rashid the owner is a total sweetheart and a personal friend of mine. Everyone that works here, as well as everyone that comes here are very friendly and make you feel like you are a part of the group. Thursday, Friday and Saturday nights are definitely the most busy so prepare yourself for a fun evening. There is music, dancing, games, and of course HOOKAH! I love you genie hookah.
Dr. Deluke is a home-grown orthodontist that is very active in his community. I have had the pleasure of working with Dr. Deluke in a study club and I am tremendously impressed with his devotion to his patients. He has a high-tech office with a family friendly atmosphere. He is dedicated to giving his patients amazing smiles! I would highly recommend Dr. Deluke and his staff to anyone that needs braces! Dr. Darrin Storms, Orthodontist
Karl picked us up at the Ferry we took from San Fran, this was so convenient for us! Karl did a great job at giving the group tons of interesting information. Not just about the wineries, but about Napa, the history and culture. Having a local, who is loved by all of the people at each winery, made the experience that much better. We had an awesome group and we all ended up going out to dinner afterwards! The wineries that Karl chose for us were all unique, he really gave us a wide variety to taste. Lunch was like a delicious, healthy picnic. I have already recommended Karl and Platypus to friends and if I'm ever back in the area I will be sure to call them.
None
Love the water there. My dogs won'teven drink anything else
I purchased my car from Jason Murray a few years ago and had a great experience. He was honest and straight forward in every step of the process and went out of his way to help me find a car that fit my budget and needs. I was a student at Purdue when I purchased a used Honda Civic that is still running well 3 years later. I had looked at several other car dealerships prior and experienced some of the stereotypical pushiness from salesmen that were clearly more interested in the sale than what I wanted. It is not like this at all at Bob Rohrman Honda. I am so glad that I found this dealership and would absolutely recommend it and Jason Murray to anyone who is looking for a new or used vehicle.
Great spot centrally located in downtown Nashville. A lot of space that can be utilized in different ways (band practice, dance studio, yoga, conference rooms, etc). Great management to work with, super friendly and very accesible. Easy street parking Worth looking into.
None
Most of the time. we get our food to go...Its always great, hot and ready when promised. I dont think I have ever ordered anything that wasnt good, hot and very tasty. I highly recommend Joe's Pizza and Pasta.
I was quite impressed with my purchase. I had to do a trade and was able to get completely out of my old car with no negative equity and into a brand new 2012 Mazda 6 i Sport 6 Speed Manual. Took a little bit of time to find the my car, but it worked out great and they worked with me on the financial side as well. A fantastic group of workers. Special thanks to Mike Marotta and Tony and Zach.
Avete presente i locali a cui ci hanno abituato i cartoni giapponesi degli anni Ottanta? Se e' cosi avete eccovi l'atmosfera che si respira in questo piccolo market giapponese con retro bottega adibito a ristorante. Una ventina di posti in tutto e di fronte a voi il bancone di Shiro, in assoluto uno dei migiori chef giapponesi di Milano. Se assaggerete il suo chirashi difficilmente potrete trovarne altri all'altezza. Da provare ovviamente anche sushi/sashimi. Possibilita' di take away e di tavoli all'esterno nel periodo estivo. Unico limite l'orario: fate in modo di arrivare per le 8 per riuscire a cenare senza problema.
I love eating at Madeline's. They have remarkable food and service. Anyone that hasn't eaten here needs to make a point of doing so. You won't regret it.
Zoup has some super tasty soup and sandwiches for reasonable prices. The store is clean and comfortable, never had any problems from this location. Highly recommended.
Working with Kelly and Nicole is a dream come true for a mortgage broker. They are so organized and efficient and create such a worry free experience for the home buyer. We LOVE working with the happy homes team! Carie and Tammy :)
This place is the best... must try the meatloaf sandwich, it's awesome. (It's not a sandwich, much much more) and Paco rocks, super guy and loves his Galveston.
The girls really know their waxing and laser hair removal in Phoenix. Friends have been there for the past 6 years and just have great results. I used their laser for my chest and arms areas after the 6 sessions they simply gone! Highly recommend Rio Wax Salon in Phoenix Arizona!
Fabulous - Wonderful Pub we highly recommend to our guests and they all love it as much as we do. Delicious food, excellent wines, superbly kept beers/ciders and great staff. Wish we lived opposite!
Awesome movie theatre, one you have to check out if you are near the area. The aesthetic is nothing like your big chain cinema
Finally in Raipur...
Nice and courteous and we even arrived after midnight. Clean rooms and comfy beds.
2nd time visiting this shop and had great experiences both times. Appreciate their integrity.
Excellent service and food quality for a fast food restaurant. Plus: Tyler is a dine in quality server; a real compliment to Fazolis!
I can't speak highly enough about Bad Donkey Tattoo! Particularly Leo, who has inked myself, my husband and even my mom :) The shop is very clean and friendly and we loved Leo's work. We will be back for more ink!
Bought a cake in the shape of a burgers and it looked and tasted great. Will be buying a second cake tomorrow morning. This is my official bake shop.
I love the new attitude! My refinance was very easy!
I entered through the training doors a broken soul with a failing marriage and a broken heart, which today, is a loving, communicative and connected marriage through the tools I learned at Impact. Life is lighter, more productive and full of possibilities. I discovered a way of being that makes each day more joyful and easy. Impact trainings takes 4 days and transforms lives. It is a real opportunity to take an honest look at how you do life and find a new way to create loving and lasting relationships. It was the finest gift I have ever given myself.
Great food, good friends!
Every time we go, I feel me and my son receive the doctor's full attention. They are proactive when it comes to my son an d I feel comfortable with every doctor there. They never make me feel stupid when I ask questions. Both the nurses and the doctors try to help me as much as possible. They have my son on an expensive formula and they give me samples whenever they can to help us out. I love this office and will be sad if we have to move.
nice old lady. as in Oct 2013, wallabies tour and feeding 12NZD/adult, 9/child. unlimited wallabies food supplied.
None
Super duplex. Resto de poisson excellent.
Mummy kitna yummy ;-)
This place is quick, hot and very pleasent. Love it
I am a realtor and often I need to get quotes on my listings to help sell the listings to qualified buyers. Every time I call Keir Jones office, they act immediately to get me the info I need to help me sell my listings. On the flip side, if I have the buyer, I always send them to Keir Jones office. Most recently, I sent him two buyers. One was a lease and the buyer bought renters insurance. The other was a buyer who bought a condo in downtown Long Beach. Both were very satisfied with Keir Jones office. Finally, I personally have switched my business from another office to Keir Jones. What I like is that he keeps me in the forefront of my needs. When I switched my policies to his office. He reviewed my policies and suggested upgrades. And it just so happened this was something I had asked to be done before and was not done. One final note, Keir Jones is involved with our community. He is involved in our community. I like that! His staff is very friendly and quick in answering any questions I may have regarding my clients or my own needs when it comes to insurance. Good job!
I would recommend this typical family style spanish restaurant, For the relaxed atmosphere , good food, wine, service. try the gambas.
Brakes went out and other shops were estimating $400-$500 to replace the master cylinder... I called Action Auto and Joe got my car in, looked at AND fixed in little over 2 hrs with a bill of less than $200! Turns out there was a leak right at the caliper no one else even bothered to look at or mention. I will not be going anywhere else. :-)
"Before coming to Smith Publicity I had worked with two other publicists, but to no avail. They were expensive and I very quickly fell between the cracks. On my own I had reached a dead end with my book, "The Other Side of The Ice". I found Smith and from the moment I got in touch with them I felt the aspect of "family". I have to admit, due to my previous experiences, I was a bit cautious, but after meeting Dina and Sophia face-to-fcae I was greatly relived to see that my feelings were completely justified. Sophia immediately set up a plan by which she would start approaching all angles of the media and start pitching the book. Almost immediately requests for interviews started coming in, I could see that my books sale were improving. I can’t say enough good about Smith; they are indeed family, are open to all of my suggestions and give you that wonderful feeling that you are their only client! I won’t hesitate to use them again for my upcoming projects."
None
Great place! A +
This was the second time having Georges work on my boat. Both times the experience was fantastic, they handled everything with the insurance company and the finished work was, both, quality and timely. I wouldn't hesitate to recommend them to anyone. It would really be nice if all service providers practiced this way. THANKS GEORGES!!
I thought the reviews might be fake, but they are all definitely correct. This is excellent service and minimal wait. (got a birth certificate)
Great service and the owners are super people. The prices are great and the quality of the food is super.
One of the best takeaways in Torbay. Great food great service.
Cornerstone Chevrolet is a great dealership for all of my vehicle needs, whether it be service or in the sales department. Even though I live in St. Cloud because of the treatment I received when I stopped at Cornerstone to have a tire fixed. The professionalism as well as going to work on my vehicle right away. I was in and out in less than 30 minutes. Since that experience I have gone to Cornerstone for a vehicle and all of my service work. Even though it is 20 miles away from my home. Thank you Cornerstone Chevrolet for all that you do for me and my family. Ron Denny
Just returned from a 7 day stay at Seven Gables. This is a WONDERFUL place to stay!!! Our family is use to staying at Embassy Suites & Hilton Gardens Inns so I was a little worried when this was the only hotel that could accomodate our 12 player baseball team and families. It didn't take long for me to realize that we were in good hands with Ms. Alice (the owner) taking care of us. Ms. Alice and Ms. Angie (an employee) go above and beyond what any hotel chain would do for you. The rooms are very clean, the pool area is wonderful for families and kids and we never ran out of hot water showering. The hotel office has a nice living room area with a big screen tv that is very inviting and Ms. Alice or Ms. Angie are aways in the office to greet you with their southern hospitality. If you are in the Somerset area, don't overlook this hotel!! It is a great place for a great price!! Thank You Seven Gables for making our trip to Kentucky so wonderful!!
I tried the Wholly Grail challenge and although I failed the food was superb and their was just too much of it because I had eaten just a few hours before, will go again and get the fries without seasoning this time then I think I can do it. Love this place.
None
I'm usually very skeptical of giving 5 star reviews, but Panda House, OMG, it's amazing. The food is authentic Chinese food, tastes really good, the lady works at the counter is very welcoming and helpful. We ordered two stir fries and one beef noodles; each stir fry includes free soup, (fried) rice and desserts. We only spent 18 bucks and the portion is massive. I definitely recommend it.
I've been having my haircut at this Great Clips for over 2 years now and with few exceptions has the quality been less then excellent. If you have the chance I would suggest you ask for Chris.
Having participated in the Spring Camp this past weekend and the week camp last year, I can easily say it was one of the best experiences of my life. It's very beautiful country and the staff is amazing. They're really enthusiastic and truly great people. I have kept in touch with many of the staff members from last year and one is now one of my very best friends. The food is wonderful. Last year my Venture Crew and I did a schedule with Kayaking, Climbing, Mountain Biking, Bishop's Castle, Hiking and more. Never once do I remember being bored or hungry or anything like that. There is always something to do. This place is ideal for any scouts. The difficulty varies and there are plenty of Merit Badge classes to take and great people running it. I can't wait until this year and (hopefully) working there next year.
None
I had an excellent buying experience at Royal Gate. They went out of their way to help me and answer questions with no pressure, specifically Stan in new car sales. I took up a lot of their time haggling and looking for the perfect vehicle for me but they never made me feel like I was bugging them. In the end, they beat the bottom line prices from other Dodge dealers and won my business about two weeks ago. I have not had a "service experience" yet at Royal Gate, only "new sales experience" -- but I wanted to chime in and offer my favorable opinion. Go to Stan!
They catered the cupcakes for our wedding. While we never got to eat it, it was still a blasty-blast. Give them a shot.
I LOVE THIS PLACE. In my experience, its very hard to find a restaurant that has really good wings. Barleycorns' wings blew off my socks. I highly recommend trying the Doc Style wings! They literally are super hot and super crispy. It's a pet peeve of mine when other places smother their wings with so much sauce that you can't even taste anything else! In my opinion, its a GOOD thing that Barleycorns doesn't do that because they wouldn't have these amazing wings! A++
This was my first Noodle place. The menu is a little hard to figure out, but the servers are very helpful. Happy hour prices on food are amazing. I a hardy eater and the half portion with a couple of steamed buns were more than enough.
Good people with loads of selection and great service. I have bought many vehciles from Ocean Park Ford over the years and I keep going back. These guys are worth talking to if your looking for a new or used vehicle.
Fantastic people. We were in desperate need of a car, and without much in the way of funds. Tugrul, Mike, Phil, and all the guys in finance worked miracles for us. They put us into a great car at an amazing price, with payment terms we could afford. Things are tight for us right now, but against all odds they made it work. I'm completely impressed, and I will buy my next several cars from AutoFair, no question.
I always feel a little overwhelmed and more than a little stressed as I anticipate a major purchase. It was no different when I entered the showroom at Hendrick Hyundai. From the moment I walked in, I was welcomed with warmth, consideration, and competence from every individual I encountered. My Sales Representative, Don Robinson, was friendly, courteous,and very well-versed on the array of features in the 2013 Genesis. He was clearly enthusiastic about this automobile, and that enthusiasm came through as he described some of the "little extras" we don't often think about ... like the auto-dimming of the rear-view mirror, and theatre-style elevation of the back seats (so your back seat passenger has a better view). In Finance, Morgan Sauls was thorough, knowledgable, and reassured me over the concerns I had about credit scores, current interest rates, lenders, etc. He guided me through the process, while providing detailed information on every aspect of the financing, and keeping me appraised of his progress towards completion of my purchase. It is clear that Customer Satisfaction is a priority of everyone at Hendrick Hyundai. These welcoming, enthusiastic, knowledgeable individuals are all dedicated to providing a positive experience now, and to building a relationship that will continue for years to come.
La Rancherita is the best Mexican food joint in town. Great service and the food is jam packed with meat. With a great price and authentic pico de gallo i rate this place 5\5 stars!!!!! MUY BIEN!
Lipply Real Estate is an awesome company; Donna and Bob are true Real Estate professionals that are a pleasure to work with and their experience means that they will provide you with the service that you deserve during your Real Estate transaction. It doesn't matter if you're planning on buying or selling a home in Florida, you owe it to yourself to contact Donna and Bob Lipply because, they will save you time, money and the hassle that can come with Real Estate, especially in a competitive market.
None
Best place to be for a real clubbing experience, really bummed it closed down a year ago. :(
Purchased a bike from Roy two months ago--really excellent customer service before and after the sale. Had a minor issue with an inner tube valve broken in shipping and he sorted it out immediately. It's a great bike at an awesome price, highly recommended to anyone considering a fixie or single-gear bike.
You simply can't ask for better event service. Mr. Brady has once again made the event that we planned a HUGE SUCCESS!!! The lighting was perfect, the sound-amazing. Thanks again Elite!!!
Quality work. Great owner. Personal service. Cares about people and making customers happy! !!!!!!!!!!
Lake Park Swim Club is the best family swim club for the money in the greater Raleigh area! I have been a regular on the volleyball court forever and I love the fun and camaraderie within the family atmosphere here and so will you. Come join us. It's incredibly close to Shelly Lake so if you love taking walks we are right down the trail. This is a great place to relax and enjoy your summers.
Checked out the firing range on ladies night,and had a very enjoyable experience. I went back the following ladies night and the owner let me test fire a cool little Walther .380 He took the time on the range to show me all the features the gun had and how it operates. He took a few shots too and "comp-ted" the ammo. I loved it so much I bought a brand new one in PINK! If you want a great gun buying experience or want to shoot a gun before buying one,this is the place to go.They are open til 9pm so it very convenient any night of the week. Bring your lady on Wednesday and she shoots for free! You'll probably see me there! huge selection,knowledgeable help,great prices.
Collin’s Nissan is an absolutely fantastic dealership. Every time I visit this dealership, I am treated well and the staff is always very helpful. Paul Rankin has been our sales representative, and he has done a terrific job at meeting my needs. He is very informative, professional, friendly and honest! He always answers my questions with a smile and goes the extra mile. If you are looking to purchase a car, I highly recommend this dealership, and Paul. It has been a fantastic experience, that I hope to continue in the future.
Great market, also open on Saturday though this website says it isn't.
This Church is AMAZING!! It is Young and Fresh and Full of Energy! Experience life has changed our life! It has a Fantastic and fun filled kids program! How awesome is it?? Well lets just say that OVER 500 people got Baptized in one single day, between the 3 Campuses, this last Sunday October 6, 2013!!! My Fiance Kelly Etheredge being one of them! I got Baptized at this Church when it was still in the Skating Rink April 14, 2013. Chris Galanos is funny and delivers a passionate and powerful message laced with touches of humor that anyone will enjoy! I Challenge you to try it at least once!! You will not be disappointed! Or your money back!! :-)
None
Very good food and really nice people. I love this place.
Great prices for high quality furniture. They had a large selection, friendly and helpful staff, and were not pushy. I will be going back there for all of my furniture needs.
My experience with AIM all centers around Dr. Dennis Furr, and he is truly a find! He is the best doctor I've ever known. He treats all of his patients with great respect, and is one of the few doctors I know who still believes understanding what a patient is thinking and feeling is crucial to understanding a patient's total wellness. He follows up to see how we are doing after ever visit, no matter how trivial the issue. He has been our family doctor for almost 25 years now, and I can't imagine taking my loved ones anywhere else!
Favorite Barbecue place, and I'm from Texas(moved back to Texas), loved their sides, each one very tasty, the desserts are incredible. no one has the variety of drinks they have.I am glad they don't serve beer.
Dennis and his staff have always gone above and beyond for me and my business, in fact we were so pleased with the business cards he made for me that are entire office got cards from him when we moved to our new location. I would and have recommended Dennis for all types of printing needs.
Adrian, Nick you and your team are amazing. I did not think the client's request for the volume and speed for offset turnaround of such a large project was humanly possible. Could it be that you are all superhuman? For more than 15 years, Print 3 Yonge & Eglinton has been printing projects for my clients - everything from simple single-page fliers, business cards, folded brochures up to more complicated booklets, 2'x3' colour posters (outdoors, mounted, laminated) and 50-page full colour newsletters. You have responded to my clients with speedy service, precision, free delivery, panic turn-arounds, all at excellent rates - always helpful, always with a kind spirit. The staff have years and years of experience working together - this makes a huge difference. And not only do you have the latest high tech machinery - you know how to use it. You have even phoned me to question what looked like setup errors and saved my skin. You work hard and produce excellent results. I couldn't recommend you more highly. Very happy with you work.
None
Going on our 3rd year with Abstract!!! Dr. S (my employer) and myself go once a week and have been more than pleased. I have utilized the synergy service, had facials and have worked out consistently. We have found that we are able to accomplish more being stronger and feeling better then when we forced ourselves to go to other gyms. The trainers and techs have been efficient, caring and professional on every level not to mention fun and understanding. They encourage and motivate without making you feel defeated. I never thought we would be able to stick to something as long as this but are so glad we have and feel we will continue for a long time to come. Thanks Ken and Robin for your vision.
Went here last weekend their food is really good especially their spicy seafood soup well definitely come back again
New to Austin, I am always nervous to go into a place where I don't know if they will be responsive to my needs, etc. When I walked in, I felt like family. They had their family dog available to greet me too, who wouldn't want to support such a wonderful local business! :) They walked me through everything from inspection to how to get my license when they didn't even have to. The service was excellent, outstanding, above and beyond.
None
Your Not going to find another Outfitter like Chorokee Rafting. If you are planning a Ocoee Rafting Trip these are the guys to use, Excellent and Highly Recommended!
None
Best haircut I've gotten in LA. Awesome people and awesome service.
I met Dr. Sherrie Williamson the other day at her office. She was great! She was very nice and shared with me that many different types of services that she offers. I would recommend her to any of my friends or family members.
Kalin was amazing! He understands the athlete's body and is very knowledgeable in Thai-massage and neuromuscular massage therapy; tennis and sports performance; as well as Yoga and Chinese medicine. I've had several massages lately and Kalin's was the best. I highly recommend the Center for Massage Therapy in Denver.
Roger operates a friendly and delicious little restaurant with great BBQ at a great price. This is a must have.
Brandon the host is always welcoming and very good with recommending wine pairings. I especially find their Tempranillo wine selections to be outstanding in flavor and well matched to most dishes on the menu. The chef knows how to prepare lamb and rabbit exceedingly well with subtle flavors which enhance and compliment side dishes. The ambiance provides interesting Russian wall art and the usual clatter and high noise levels of many restaurants is thankfully absent. I love this place.
None
Einer der besten in Dresden, ich kann Ihn nur empfehlen. Ein nettes Team und tolle Ergebnisse. Ich komme bestimmt wieder.
Loved this place. It's not only about the sea lions, as some have complained that they could not see them. The owners gave people a discount for that reason. A great family run business. It is a neat ride down in the elevator and the cave walls are really neat and the views out of the cave were awesome. I took my 10 year old and it is a must-see in that beautiful part of the world. Went to the lighthouse afterwards then Mo's in Florence.
Absolutely great food
Having been in the imprinted sportswear industry since 1996, I tend to have a keen eye for quality and customer service. I have been more than pleased to have discovered both at McKinney Tees. Sarah and Robert personally oversee things from start to finish, and every product and print I've seen go in and out their door has been more than exceptional. I take my custom work to McKinney Tees, and will continue to do so in the years to come.
I came here for breakfast--so it was a bit dead, but the atmosphere was wonderful. Our waitress was incredibly sweet and friendly--she brought us free samples of their homemade orange juice as well as the bakehouse's sourcream coffee cake. The food is delicious, their french toast is made with 3 vanilla liquors and they know how to cook bacon. I can't wait to come for dinner!
None
None
We had a fabulous and special time at the Glass House Tavern. We had a party of six for a pre theater dinner and found out just hours before that it was a VERY early theater curtain, at 7 pm, so the Glass House were great at getting us in earlier and out on time. They were accommodating at setting up a round table and giving us a quiet area, so we could really enjoy conversation. The service was attentive and efficient, getting us the drinks and many course meal in a swift and professional way. And oh yes, the food....very fine, carefully prepared food. Overall, a sweet and lovely pre theater dinner with unusually professional, attentive and kind, welcoming staff. We will definitely book our next theater dinner at the Glass House Tavern and appreciate a job well done!
Patrick has been super helpful throughout this whole process. Right after our building fire (we manage a small apartment complex) other disaster restoration companies were breathing down our necks for the job. Patrick with service master was extremely courteous however, did NOT force his crew on us, just simply popped over and handed us a card - let us know they would love to help us with the clean up and restoration. Needless to say, we picked ServiceMaster and they have been doing a fabulous job handling the cleanup and rebuild. Not only that, after all the other companies talked about how our insurance company was their main partner blah blah blah... turned out, our insurance agent had NO idea who the other companies were, but knew Patrick by NAME! Thanks Service Master!
authentic Sichuan taste and the kitchen listens when you tell 'em to make it extra spicy. recommend the Shichuan cucumbers for appetizer.
Entgegen der anderen Bewertung hat diese "Filiale" sehr wohl geöffnet! Es ist keine Filiale im traditionellen Sinn, sondern eine Eingliederung im Einzelhandel, in diesem Fall die Geschenk-Oase (Andrea Schuler) und die macht einen super Job. Unkompliziert, hilfsbereit und sehr kompetent! Geöffnet Mo-Sa von 8:00 bis 12:00 Uhr sowie Mo/Di/Do von 14:30 bis 18:00 Uhr. Ich bin dort mehrmals die Woche und von der Beratungsleistung und dem Service mehr als überzeugt! Die Öffnungszeiten sind für eine "Dorf-Filiale" mehr als ausreichend.
Hopleaf has amazing beers! If you're a beer lover and like to try new interesting flavors, hopleaf is the place to go. The food is also decent and they have a variety of great seating, whether at the bar, in the restaurant area, and out on the patio. The staff is also friendly and very knowledgeable about beer!
None
THE BEST, HANDS DOWN!!! After visiting nearly 15 CPAP/Durable Equipment Providers in the Birmingham Area, I luckily ended up at Neighborhood CPAP. I don't ever give reviews online, but after my experience with the great people at Neighborhood CPAP, I felt I had to give them the great review they deserve. They are by far the MOST knowledgeable and friendly staff of anywhere I visited and they have all of the latest equipment. If there is a bad review on here, DON'T BELIEVE IT!! They are so far superior to any other provider I visited or even talked to, I will never go anywhere else. Do not buy a CPAP machine without talking to them first. I promise, you will not regret it. ~From the pickiest shopper EVER!!!
Pete is a very knowledgeable Guitar teacher. He really stands out from all the other I have used over the years. He teaches with the utmost patients and care for his students improvement and progress. I definitely would recommend him to anyone, beginner, intermediate or advanced. Scott
This place is sooo much fun! I love going on our girls nights! Had a blast and the men are the sexiest!!!
I have used Park n Jet twice this year, and though it is a ways from the airport, it the rate is the best I could find and I was able to get to the airport in less than 15 minutes. The service has always been excellent and the last time I no sooner got off the phone for pick up and the van pulled up. It is not an elegant service, but it satisfied my need for an economical solution, and I will continue to use Park n Jet.
Iv been doing business with these guys for YEARS and they have never let me down. I even carry around their business cards to hand out.
Excellent customer service!! I came in for repairs on my truck shell (I didn't know what brand it was and there was no brand markings anywhere on it), the guy who helped me out was great. He was able to match me up with a glass door hatch and got me back on the road quickly. Having a locking shell is very important and after making some phone calls, I didn't think I would be able to replace just the glass - everyone else wanted to sell me a whole new truck shell!
In-Depth recently did a COMPLETELY AWESOME wrap of a Nissan Titan Crew Cab for my new business. From conception through design and installation Torri and John explained everything in great detail, were responsive and completely open with price, and made suggestions for ways to both save money and maximize the effectiveness of our wrap. They even went out of their way to re-work some of our existing artwork to make the design perfect. We couldn't be happier with the way it turned out and we whole-heartedly recommend In-Depth Wraps to anyone looking for a cost effective and FUN way of advertising their business or other enterprise.
Proshred is the most trusted, reliable and secure document shredding company. I wouldn't work with any other company, although some have tried to get my business. The employees are personable and efficient. Never a problem in over 5 years of working with them. Thank you for your service.
None
The folks in this store could not be more helpful. Great selection of quality products for your next urban adventure. I have purchased more items from Uncle Dan's than I care to remember, but each was has lasted and been far worth the expense. Plus-- the help in the store is phenomenal and the employees will help you find exactly what you need to fit your budget and plans.
First and foremost--the driver Robert is amazing! He's cheerful and is truly excited to be driving you to DIA. He also provides fun facts along the way. Every driver I've had with Green Ride has been super nice and helpful. They have saved me from getting stuck is Denver when other shuttle services left due to a delayed flight. AND they cost less.
Melhor pizzaria de São Paulo.
We have a 12 week old German Shepherd that we have taken to WPVH for his shots and to check a rash he'd developed on his stomach. The entire staff, from tech to Doctor, were extremely outgoing and knowledgeable. We feel very comfortable bringing Archer here and highly recommend this Vet. I only wish we'd come here sooner with our other animals. :)
Robert was amazing! Everything is simple with them down to the last detail. They are a blessing to me and my family, my mother passed unexpectedly and had no insurance these amazing people stepped right in. No 6-7 THOUSAND dollar bill here. I love you guys so much for everything you've done for my family. Thank you from the bottom of my heart.
My husband Dennis Robinson and I, went down over the week end of June 14th and June 15th of this year to do some research on Billy the Kid. What a wonderful museum and so full of knowledge. We spent several hours visiting with the owner and he was so knowledgeable. I would recommend this museum to anyone who really wants to know about Billy the Kid. The museum was laid out in history form by dates of occurrence and was so clean and well organized. Enjoyed the video about Billy the Kid. Want to know history..go to the source. He's gone but his memory still lives on there in Fort Sumner.
The cakes here are simpy to die for.
Some of the best metal work I've seen. When I moved into my new place I had them do some custom railings that came out better than I could have imagined. They were also very patient and helpful as this was my first time hiring someone for a custom railing, glad I did though!
Went there looking for help. I am a newbie to salt water aquariums. Needed advice on just about everything. The staff was very helpful. They answered my questions and asked some of their own to get a better idea what I had in mind. Never felt any pressure to buy anything. I did end up purchasing a filter system and heater. I can't wait to go back to get the stuff for phase two.
Very comfy, great service. Loved the full kitchen, came in handy when your on a budget. The breakfast was delish. Very quiet. I will be coming back!!
I had a blast! This is the best paintball field in Northern Illinois hands down!
None
Great selection of books and clothing! Always a great place to shop
Friendly staff who are always willing to help, great location, cannot recommend it enough. Kevin was especially helpful when we transferred to a bigger unit. Thank you!
I love the friendlines of the staff you guys rock and I dont feel like another number when I was with geico that is how I felt, these guys treat me like a real person
Great food not greasy, fast nice delivery people
My date and I ate at the Irish Pub attached to this restaurant. Neither of us drink so we were there solely for the food. The food was amazing and the service was great. Especially considering that one bartender was taking care of the whole place. I definitely recommend this place before ALL of the other restaurants in the area.
None
None
I don't love going to the dentist, but I love that clean feeling after I leave. The office was great and they fit me in. They accepted my dental insurance and the hygienist told me about a few areas that might be problems if I don't pay attention to them. The office looks really clean and new and I will update this when I go back.
This shop sets itself apart from others on so many levels that it's hard to list them all. Friendly service is relatively common, but it's rarely followed with competence, understanding and no-BS approach that Tom and his crew provide. I can always rely on their advice and help while being confident they will do an excellent job in a timely manner and for a very reasonable price. They are a busy bunch, but always find time to explore and explain the options and guide their customers towards an optimal solution. I've been riding for over 30 years and do most maintenance myself but never think twice about trusting Cyclewerx with more complicated jobs. My sincere recommendation.
I recently purchased a used Cadillac Escalade from Covert Cadillac in Austin, TX. I live in Houston and I had been looking online for around 3-4 months. I wasn't in any rush to get one as I was replacing an old one, so I was really looking for: a. A good deal. b. One in excellent shape, even though it was a few years old. As someone who has purchased a car online before, I can tell you the biggest obstacle in the process is to get all the "defects" with the car before either flying out to see the car or having it shipped to you. This means you really need to have a person at the dealership go though the car and point out EVERYTHING they see wrong with it. A car a few years old is going to have some issues, its just a matter of determining if these issues are big enough to either kill the deal, or the cost needs to be negotiated down. When I called the dealership I was transferred to Jeff Pray. He sells both new and used cars. In my case he went out to the car, went through it and called back with a report. I explained that before I drove up to Austin, I'd like to know everything wrong with it. He went down to small minor scratches, which are barely noticeable. He then took pictures and text them to me. In addition, I had some questions over the weekend and he responded to every text & call in a very timely manner. Based on his information I decided to move forward with the purchase. He worked with me on a price until I received what I believe to be a fair deal. I drove up the following week and I was actually more impressed with the car than even how he explained it. The items he pointed out were EXTREMELY minor (which is exactly what I had asked for). The only thing we found that he had missed was a small piece of plastic on the sun shade was broken (not something easily found). After the purchase, he followed up and mailed me a replacement to my house! I also noticed a small paint chip on the back bumper. He let me know the next time I'm in Austin, I can come in anytime and they will touch it up for me. Overall it was a very easy experience and I'm very pleased. I would not only recommend Covert Cadillac, but if you are looking to buy I would highly recommend asking for Jeff Pray.
None
None
None
Mare e natura unite... Che meraviglis!
I love that the guys I work with know me by name/voice when I call in, not just by face when I arrive. I love that the work is done right the first time, by or before the estimated completion time.
I've been here on several occasions for local shows, and every visit has been pleasurable. Drink prices aren't over the top, the pool tables and sticks are in good condition, and the sound is amazing. You'd be hard pressed to find a better place in the Winter Park area to attend (or play) a show. Their sound engineer is top notch.
None
Andi is the real deal, she took my corporate head shots and they came out better than I'd hoped. Highly recommended!
This place has great food at a fair price . They keep the buffet well stocked and the owner is the person who seats you . I like that they proud of the service they give and the food that they serve . Stop in and see for yourself
I recently brought my Lexus in for new speakers because my amplifier got fried and when I installed a new one, I noticed many of the speakers were blown. I initially when to a competitor and got the feeling that I was going to be sold something that wasn't quite going to meet my needs. The guys at ME picked out some nice Pioneer speakers that fit my car perfectly. I liked the sound and decided to replace my Nakamichi unit with a new Pioneer that supported Pandora and Blue Tooth so I could play music stored on my phone. The unit was installed but there were issues getting my subwoofer to work with the Pioneer unit. They added a amp for the subwoofer and all I can say is I was blown away by the sound. The combination of the equilizer and the additional amp made a huge difference. I can't express how pleased I am with my purchase. I recommend ME very highly!!!
I have been a client of Jeff's for just over 6 years. I began with tennis lessons and later started using him as my personal trainer. My tennis game is 1000% better than when we began, and I could see a real difference in my muscle tone and flexibility after just a couple of month of personal training. Jeff's a terrific guy and and a great fitness coach - I highly recommend him.
Alex Davis at Newton Nissan was an incredible salesman. He was so nice and helped me get everywhere I needed to be when buying a car. So thank you Alex, you are awesome! Thank you so much Alex, Hannah Anderson
Bar-b-q sandwich and fries for $5 was delicious. Beer is a $ before 7.
They were great, very nice yet professional.
This is a great facility to learn how to sail. Plus they have luxury sailboats to use once you are qualified. Better than owning! No hassles!
The staff and hotel are top notch very home away from home feeling. a pleasure talking to the staff
Our cats are always well-behaved when we visit, so they must like GJVH very much. They take such good care of our fur babies. You can tell that the staff loves animals. There is nowhere else we'd rather go for vet care.
Awesome! My teeth are now so straight. Thanks :D
Their donuts are like a party in my mouth.
Went to Widdoss on the recommendation of a facialist and at a time when I really needed to manage some stress. The hour-long massage was wonderful! He really got the kinks out of some stressed out muscles without the pain that can sometimes accompany that type of work. I thought that I might have to go to a doctor, the strain was so bad. However, since the massage, many of the cricks and kinks have been minimalized. Hope I can go back to him again and soon.
None
None
Imagine waking up every morning in pain, and sick to your stomach, with body aches, a stiff body, severe headaches, and extreme fatigue at age 29. That was me. The funny thing is I believed it was normal, that i was just getting old. I went to neurologists, opthamologists, general MD's, had blood work done, and found out it was all in my head. I thought it was just the menopause from having a hysterectomy when i was 24. My pain finally kept me awake one night, so I called Dr. Edgerton, and made an appointment the same day I called. THey were very accomadating, and caring, they truly wanted to help me. I went in filled out paperwork, paid $30 bucks for an xray (which was right across the street), brought them back to the office the same day as my appointment, and got treated that day. I had never seen a chiropractor before, and they knocked the first impression out of the park. Dr. Edgerton is very knowledgable, personable, and really cares about my health. NOt just my spine, and neck, but my nutrition, my home life. He treats the whole person, and strives to unlock the true potentional of your body's natural ability to heal! This care, and Dynamic Total Health has completely changed my view on being healthy, and has changed my life. I will never see another medical Dr. for as long as i can help it. The staff is awesome, the atmosphere is positive and comfortable. As I am a loving follower of Jesus, i also love the christian music choices on select days! EVerything about this place shouts positivity and true care. I recommend Dynamic Total Health to everyone i get my hands on. Truly a wonderful place!
We have had Campbell Salgado take photos of our family twice - once for maternity photos, and once for our entire family. Both sessions were lots of fun, and the resulting photos were so good, it was difficult to choose! Both Francisco and Kim were great to work with, and we look forward to coming back in the future!
I dropped of a 05 Ford Focus that had never seen any cleaning beyond the 2x a year trip through the auto car wash. I did not have high hopes for the car but wanted it to look nice since it is now my regular driver. I went for the full detail and got more than I expected. The car has 120k miles on it but now looks BETTER than the day I drove it home from the dealer 7 years ago. My wife and I were completely in shock at how good the car turned out. The seats look like brand new and all the small scratches acquired over the years disappeared! Why did I wait so long before having a full detail!?! In addition to the top notch detail work, Jim or his partner were some of the nicest people I have ever met. Very personable, honest and answered the phone when I called! I plan on going back to Jim quarterly from now on to have my cars washed and waxed. Maybe a yearly full detail to keeps things looking as god as new! Book an appointment today. You will not be disappointed!
Excellent. We have been taking our cars there for as long as I can remember.
My fiancee and I were looking for a great sub or deli in town, and we found one. We happened to show up just before they closed. They still invited us in and talked us through the menu. They were knowledgable in what they had, and even offered sandwiches they thought we'd like. The menu is robust enough for anyone. We also liked how they sliced their meats fresh, and even create their roast beef in house. We both got 7 inch subs, and they filled both of us up. Price wasn't bad either. Jersey Shore has been open for 8 years, and this was the first time I've heard of it. I wish Rock Hill City would allow them a sign, because they are hidden away in a corner. We even stayed after they closed, and they allowed us to take our time, and even offered us more fresh sweet tea while my fiancee and I sat and talked. Great place, great food, great service, and great people. I recommend this to everyone. :D
Exelente servicio y la comida rriquisima el ambiete familiar agradable y las carnitas de primera calidad felicidades a el dueno
None
This is by far the nearest to a 5 star Italian Restaurant and in a small town it is fabulous. I recommend that everyone see the charm, wonderful food and the owners are like family.
Norm and Joe are tops! Rescued an old Huffy from the trash, these guys got it in tip top shape! No fuss, no muss and now I have a fun way to implement resolutions! Nice shop, and they are open convenient hours too! Even on Sunday!
Dr. Suzuki is the best optometrist I've ever had. Personable, Technical, Efficient..
None
None
Jestem po korekcie nosa u doktora Witwickiego. Klinika na najwyższym poziomie, kadra lekarska również. Jestem bardzo zadowolona. Polecam
I have been getting my haircut and the occasional shave here for the past four years - the barbers are great, the atmosphere relaxed, and the decor inviting. I have read reviews that say they have had poor experiences with the shaves and honestly think this is most likely due to their lack of experience with traditional wet shaves. Lets be honest, it’s not for everyone.
I have worked at Team Kia of El Cajon since Dec. 2012, and I can say with confidence that this is the best Store I have worked at in 15+ years in the Car Industry. We recently went thru a major remodel that just finished about a month and a half ago and the building looks great! While going thru this remodel, we had to work in a small building with no A/C this entire last summer, but we still did very well because of the hot Kia product and a solid core management team led by our GM Chris George. With that being said, I do firmly and respectfully recommend Team Kia of El Cajon for anyone in the market for a quality product, respect for your time, fair pricing, happy employees and a great service drive (parts too). You can expect a smooth, easy experience here because any manager here, myself included, is empowered to assist you in any way needed to further your satisfaction to a positive conclusion. Our approach to our customers is one of eCommerce rather than that of other Stores that still employ the standards of old that few have the patience for in today's fast paced society. From one happy manager, Danny Schmidt Director of eCommerce
Both of our children ages 17 and 15 loved their experiecnce with Dr. Gray and his Staff (family to us). Each and everytime we entered Dr. Gray's office we felt like we were part of the family. Each member of his staff knew our names and took awesome care of both our children. We were explained what would be done at that visit and before we left what we could expect at our next visit. Scheduling of appointments and even emergencies were easy. The financing options were abundent. We highly recommend Dr. Gray and his staff. Thank you for caring about our children and giving them such beautiful smiles. W.M.
odlicno!!!
Great camping with excellent facilities. Beautifully situated at the lake, with kayak and bike rental. Go here if you're in the area.
From the beginning to the end! I could not be more satisfied, being a Nissan Customer for about 14 years now, I have nothing bad to say about Hudson Nissan, I can honestly say that the entire staff from the minute you enter the lot whether it is for service or to buy a car they are there to help you and to accommodate your needs! As a Service Member I was very demanding!! (jajaja) And they went all the way. Special thanks to Jonathan Huffman, Josh (Internet Sales), Dennis and both Tim's in service, oh nad last but not least the Finance guy!.(sorry can't remember his name...but he'll push later) OOORAHH! These guys are Great and make you feel like you have known them for years therefor they take care of you. Thank You Hudson Nissan! Proud New owner of 2014 Nissan Pathfinder Platinum Premium!!! GySgt Gary J Betancourt USMC, Semper Fidelis!
This place is simply wonderful. Truly unique and special. An oasis in central phoenix. My favorite hotel in Phoenix. Period.
Bell Street is offers excellent service and excellent burritos. The meat is so tender and the beans are filled with flavor. The guac and salsas are excellent as well. Check it out!
My husband, 3 children, and I have been going to Dr. Blackwell's office for more than 7 years now. I have Fibromyalgia, and the adjustments and treatments from Dr. Blackwell help tremendously! His staff is caring and courteous, and are quick to get you in if you need an adjustment. I have recommend many friends and family to their office, and will continue to do so!!!
Esta muy bn este restaurante para ir a comer comida mexicana
Fair prices, fast delivery. Would consider purchasing from here again.
My daughter's birth in February of 2011 was the second time I've used this birth center. Jill was my midwife for the second time! She is awesome. Experienced, compassionate, but very direct when needed, which is awesome when you need focus during labor! I arrived at the birth center at 3 pm just to be checked, discovered I really was going to have a baby that day, ran to get something to eat and was back and delivered my baby at 4:32 pm! Awesome experience. We snuggled and loved our new daughter and then headed home 4 hours after her birth. I could not imagine having to stay in a hospital after delivering a baby. As comfortable and quiet as the birth center is, I wanted to be in my own home, so I couldn't even imagine a busy, noisy hospital with a small bed. It doesn't hurt just to check the center out. It's an option available that every woman should be aware of. They have an open house once a month that is a brief overview of their services. My husband is probably a bigger advocate of the birth center than I am! He is so happy that I made him take a tour when I was 4 months pregnant with our son. He was skeptical at first because it looks nothing like a standard medical facility that society has made us believe is necessary for birth. Birth is not an illness. Unless there are complications, normal birth does not need to be in a hospital.
Just picked up a 2013 Volvo XC60 from International Volvo of Orland Park. What a great experience I had working with Adam the Internet Manager. I negotiated the price with him via email prior to visiting the dealership and once I arrived he had set me up with my salesman Bob C to take a test drive as well as go over the features of the XC60 and then Joe the finance manager finished up the paperwork. Thanks again to all three of you. Keep up the great service.
ฝึกงานโหด
Delicious seafood and excellent service.
Very friendly, very helpful, very knowledgeable. Went out of their way to help me! The sales person, Bob Taylor, was very nice to me and to my family!
Each dog walker truly loves their job and the animals they care for. I know my dog is being cared for and loved. We come home and he is happy and relaxed.
Longevity Graphics is a fantastic web design services and internet marketing company that helped create a website for the firm that I work for, Cinnamon Jang Willoughby. The sleek presentation and easy-to-navigate design of the website has not only impressed me, but my colleagues as well. Moreover, both our new and current clients have found it easy to search for specific services, as well as quickly locate the contact information for our business and staff. As a result, communications with our clients are now faster and more efficient. Overall, Longevity Graphics is highly professional, and provides superb customer service for its clients. On behalf of CJW, I strongly recommend this company to anyone and any business that is in need of a website redesign. Continue the good work!
Jim's the best wing's place in town by far. No other place comes close. They've had the same people working there for the 6 years I've been going there and that says something about the place and service. I personally love mixing the yakitori and hot for my favorite combination.
My wife and I stayed here before moving into town several years ago, and now we stay there as a getaway. Their deluxe jacuzzi tub cottages are adorable, but even their standard rooms are amazing. Newly upgraded rooms with large flatscreen TV's, stylish decor, VERY friendly and accomodating staff, a super cute garden with nice outdoor furniture (even has overhead outdoor fans for the hot summers). Very nice, new and clean linens. And do NOT skip breakfast. They treat you to a nice spread of cold pastries, fruits, yogurts, etc - and then let you order from a menu (eggs made to order, french toast to die for, etc).
Has to be one of the best tea houses around. Really lovely staff, and although often very busy the place feels comfy and airy. A very casual hang-out but genuinely good tea, food, and always service with a smile. Brilliant place!!!!
Best sushi in Brisbane, and my favourite place for a quick affordable lunch. The focus here is on the fresh ingredients - no overwhelmingly sickly sweet rice or overpowering rice wine or sauces. In fact I reckon its the freshest yummiest sushi in Brisbane. They can get busy over lunch but takeaway sushi is quick to order and grab on the go even during the busy periods. After 1pm you need to order sushi in lots of two, and they make them to order, but this means made-on-the-spot yumminess, and the kitchen is usually very quick. Definitely worth a visit.
Dr. Garrett is attentive, pleasant and clearly committed to the well being of his patients. I had a very positive experience with him and he helped to treat my chronic headaches.
None
We have eaten at this resteraunt about 15 times and all of their food is delicious. The servers are great and the food arrives at your table very hot and quick. They also take very large parties so you Can enjoy comany meetings or great family get togethers. Dont forget to sign in at the desk and start recieving your free rewards.
None
The Battle of Little Bighorn is one of the most amazing places I have ever been I suggest anyone who is a history buff or likes it to definitely get there as soon as you can you will not be disappointed it was a memorable experience and shed a few tears so take your Kleenex with you
A great place! Bowling is really good but they also have excellent food, the people are super friendly, and a good sized arcade area for the kids. We love going here!
We initially contacted Forza for a typical last-minute, tight deadline job and since then have gone back to Ivan and his team time and again. We find them responsive and proactive, with really good outputs and would have no hesitation recommending Forza to others for graphic design or other services.
Oman
From both sides of the table, me being an infantryman / infantry instructor in the Marine Corps for years, and my fiance being against guns in the house this class was a great experience. I enjoyed seeing Andy ground the absolute need for safety around firearms, and I heard on the ride back to the house "So...that's why you are always talking about safety rules." It was a learning experience for us both, and now we are both for having as much protection as we can. I would feel comfortable sending anyone I know, no matter their background with firearms, to Andy and trust that they would walk away more comfortable, and much more educated about guns and the correct way to use them. Thank you for an awesome class!
I was extremely pleased with my experience at Blue Lotus. I had the Deep Moisture Package and it was 2.5 hours of relaxation!! Laura was my massage therapist and she was excellent. The entire experience was great! The staff is helpful and very friendly!! I will be back!!
Three years ago, I brought my dog Zeus to Dr. Douglas because he had a bad ear infection in both ears. I had brought Zeus to two other Vet offices and they both gave him the same treatment; needless to say these treatments didn't fix the problem and his ear infection worsened. So, I brought Zeus to Dr. Douglas in hopes that she could fix his ears. Dr. Douglas and her team were very friendly and took time to get to know Zeus’s story and the past treatments that had been done to his ears. She then came up with her own way to treat the problem and it worked! Finally! Dr. Douglas is very kind and is not a 'one size fits all' Dr., she looks at each case differently and will do whatever it takes to get the problem solved. Zeus is now a very happy dog and no longer cries when I pet him or shakes his head constantly because his ears hurt. This past year, Zeus ruptured both of his anal glands. Again, she quickly fixed the problem and Zeus returned to his normal self. I have never felt so sure of a veterinarian before now and will be a lifelong customer of Dr. D’s.
None
I recently started working with Dr. Jamie Siegel and have had a very positive experience. Here office is located in Newton, MA on 53 Langley road. Dr. Siegel provides services in the area of adolescent psychology, couples therapy, and psychotherapy. If you are interested in an effective psychologist, please be sure to look her up online or contact her via phone.
I can't say enough good things about Dr. Wyatt. I hate going to the dentist and Dr. Wyatt and his staff made me feel at home. Dr. Wyatt was able to get me in at a moment notice due to a tooth ache and made me feel at ease. He is by far the best dentist I have found. He takes the time to listen to you and explain everything that he will be doing. He is a very caring and a wonderful dentist.
Tout simplement une de mes places préférés à Montréal !!! À voir, boire et goûter!
None
The employees were courteous and straightforward with me; they were not pushy about anything. I came in for a safety inspection and was in and out of there in about 10 minutes. Great service - everyone there was friendly, and they even opened my door as I was leaving. Thank you!
This place is amazing and always takes care of their customers in a professional manner. I've been using them for many years for tuneup on my gas fireplace and their techs always are professional and courteous. Amazing company.
Good food and service was awesome. Five stars
Beeindruckend großzügige und schick gestaltete neue Räume. Auch die neue Dauerausstellung "Transformation" gefällt mir gut, sie ist weniger streng chronologisch wie in einem Geschichtsmuseum aufgebaut und bietet stattdessen assoziative kunst- und kulturgeschichtliche Cluster rund um die Frage der Geschlechteridentität. In zwei Sonderausstellungen zu wechselnden Themen werden demnächst private Fotoaufnahmen von F.W. Murnau (dem Regisseur von Nosferatu und Tabu) von 1929 gezeigt oder eine verstörende Multimedia-Installation zu "korrigierenden" Vergewaltigungen lesbischer Frauen in Südafrika. ++++++++++++++ All signs are in English too, so the exhibition is very suitable for visitors and tourists from outside Germany.
Great
I've had some sketchy experiences with dealerships in the past and was hesitant to turn to one for a vehicle. After some extensive research, however, I narrowed down a selection of a couple that I felt I would buy from if a decent car turned up. Fortunately for me, a car turned up on Boucher's website so we stopped in. The sales staff was incredibly friendly without being overbearing. While I expected a price inflation, I came away with the Ford Explorer we looked at for a price I can respect. A nice touch was the general manager coming out to meet us before we left and telling us a little about the car (as it was bought and cared for throughout it's lifetime). Would absolutely buy my next car from Boucher Ford!
Stow and Go is a great place for getting stuff out of the house. The cleanest best air conditioned storage facility I have ever seen. Not too mention the great move in specials. Centrally located and secure. You can't miss with Watsons Stow & Go Self Storage.
None
None
LA DIRECCION ESTA MAL.ESTAMOS EN POETA MANUEL ALCANTARA,RINCON DE LA VICTORIA. UN SALUDO
None
After having the most great hair experience at Rodolfo Valentin salon I stop at Nello's restaurant just downstairs from Rodolfo Valentin salon, great atmosphere, food and celebrities!. Value??
None
The Food was great and the look and feel of the place was very welcoming. The Terra-cotta Statues were a nice added touch. All in all, I had a great experience spending time with friends there.
Very nice place.
STAGE is an extraordinary place with warm people and amazing service. I am so glad to have found it. I am really happy with my haircut, it is low-maintenance and long-lasting, Rosario has a great understanding of both people and hair! I also visited Isabella in the beauty salon and was really impressed with the quality of service. I highly recommend and can't wait to go back.
My husband Bill and I have been patients of Dr. Pam's for more than 20 years. We love Dr. Pam and Dr. Stella! (Sorry - I've never met the third partner - I'm sure she's wonderful too!) We started when I worked downtown and could get there easily. After trying other dentists "up the hill" I think it says everything that we choose to drive almost 60 miles round trip to keep coming. And not just for ourselves - we do separate trips for each of our kids. We love you guys!
Great staff. I'm here at almost 2am and everyone is so vibrant. The workers are funny too. Definitely worth stopping for a slice
Been eating here since the 80's. Its worth the drive from the Brownsville to Calumet City. The edges of the burgers are crispy / salty. I love it!!! Must have mayo with it though. Try grilled unions, bacon, ketchup, mustard and mayo. Sometimes crappy tomatoes/lettuce can ruin an expensive burger like "Schoop's" burgers, I don't gamble when I go there. I recommend going ghetto with no veggies. Try putting ketchup on your plate and dunking the burger instead putting the ketchup on the burger and getting your hands all nasty.
I am fairly new to 4-wheeling and Jack-it has been a great help. They always give good advice and are very knowledgeable to answer any technical questions I have. They installed my bumper and they will be the ones to install my lift kit, and any other modifications I intend to put on my vehicle. They are just all around great to work with. Thanks Jack-it!
Great atmosphere, great staff. Dr. O'Neill is very personable and makes you feel at ease. Worth the commute from Murfreesboro!
Last time we were there it was fabulous. This time will be even better.
Great menu, great service, great atmosphere, best restaurant in the town in my opinion , cant wait to go back and book a table when next visiting family.
Respected Bhakthas all, Namaskaram. Guru the great Sri Sri Sri Vittal Das Maharaj swamigal living the time we are also get the janma in this bhoomi, we are all blessed people. Swamigal speeches and Bhajans are taking us very near to God. People all, we take the SANKALPAM or AIM defenitely we will go to dharshan the Lord VITTAL RUKMINI, atleast once a year. RADHE KRISHNA GOD BLESS ALL.
Simply outstanding!
Nothing short of awesomeness! Home cooking was fabulous! Susie Q was strict and to the point with a kool aid smile that will melt your heart, wife and daughter where more than satisfied.
Top Dining Experience... The service was excellent, they were very attentive. The atmosphere was friendly and the food was delicious, a great deal too. I left the restaurant very happy and I will keep enjoying the place and the food as I am planning to frequent the Darbar restaurant. I also would recommend it to all people who prefer to enjoy fine dining. I am looking forward to trying every Vegan dish on the menu.
I've eaten at La Mama's many times and each time the service and food are exactly what I expected. I'm from the US and my standard for service and food is high and they meet this expectation. The price is reasonable, considering I get dinner for 2, wine, desert and some sides for 82 ron, after tip close to 100. In USD this is $22 so very worth it for me.
Nirmal Foundation is a start up social enterprise. Like any other start up , we also have lots of dream but little means to achieve it. We needed someone to work with us with the passion as we do and help us in making our business more efficient and organised. Our search ended with X-Logic who was so quick to understand our need and provided us software solution at a very affordable price. Our operation became much more efficient with new software designed by X-Logic. The executives of X-Logic always made themselves available when ever we needed them to discuss about further upgradation of our software. We were so much satisfied with our first project with X-Logic that we consecutively gave them three more projects. We now feel easy and comfortable for any of our software related works because we have X-Logic as a solution provider.
Born and raised in Rochester, NY and having studied at both the Eastman Community Music School and the Eastman School of Music (B.M. Jazz Guitar Performance and Contemporary), I can say with confidence that the Eastman School of Music is a world-class institution. Its students, educators, and legacy speak for themselves. One can find Eastman graduates touring the world, performing in leading symphony orchestras, composing music for film and television, and filling countless other niches in the world's music community. If you're serious about understanding music on the deepest levels, don't neglect a visit to this historical school (established by George Eastman) and its extraordinary treasure trove that is the Sibley Music Library (one of the largest anywhere).
Dr. Koota is amazing and totally changed the quality of my life. I had the instastem surgery which was a huge success. He is the best!!! Jim
None
Nice nice best Rheinfall
If you love American Diner style food, airplanes and aviation, the Flight Deck is the place to go for lunch. It's a family owned and operated place, so the service is always good and the food is always done right. Best of all, the place embraces its location at the Phoenix-Mesa Gateway Airport (formerly Williams Field Air Force Base). There are tons of well constructed model planes of all vintages hanging from the ceiling, you can have lunch or breakfast and frequently see business jets, military transport planes and fighter and attack jets coming & going on the ramp right outside the restaurant. As a great bonus for aviation, military and history buffs, the north wall is decorated with the unit insignia, slogans and signatures of the pilots stationed at the base. If you haven't been there, especially if you have kids, it's truly the worth the trip.
Делаю у себя дома ремонт и решил заменить старые окна на новые. Много слышал о пластиковых окнах Rehau и решил именно их заказать. Сделали окна быстро по договоренности. Доставили до самого дома и сразу вставили. Большое спасибо компании «БудСтар».
I got world class service from Megan when I purchased my new running shoes today. Fleet Feet Sports Burbank is a first class operation.
Good food, great service, pleasant environment. Continues to be a favorite year after year. Great service and great food. It specializes in a lot of old world cooking which is always comfort food and great for a cold day or night. Give it a try, you will make it a favorite!
Walked in and was immediately given a pleasant welcome. Two people waiting ahead of me and Fox News was on TV so the wait time went quick. $15 haircut and I was satisfied. Apparently the family also owns the Korean restaurant next door so I went in and ordered their special. I suspect Han's wife runs that place. Also good. Plentiful parking and comfortable place. I am new to the area so this was a find for me and I'll go back. I'm not sure the barber (Han?) understood what I said I wanted but he did a good careful job and vacuumed up the hair trimming so they didn't end up inside my collar. Very quick job too.
Sharee's is a Rehoboth Beach shop where I get items that people always compliment me on and ask me where they can get the same things. All it takes is a trip to the beach, and you too can have comfortable, attractive clothes with accessories to match. Sharee is often at the shop herself and has a great eye for putting things together.
I have nothing but good things to say about this Public Storage!! Working with Jason made the process so easy and comfortable! I never wanted to place my belongings in storage, but found myself needing to. I called several places, and finally spoke with Jason. After just 5 minutes on the phone with him, I knew this was the place for me! He totally made both my husband and myself feel as though he "personally" was keeping 24 hour armed watch over our stuff. I tell people every chance I get, to only rent from him! Thank you Jason! Shannon Wells and Henry Correa JR
industry collreary
Real Estate Professionals, Inc. provides an incredible opportunity for me to grow my business. The State of the Art Technology allows me to be productive and efficient with both processing paperwork and communicating to all parties necessary. The Broker is available anytime for questions, support and training and his response time is amazing. Having experience with other large Real Estate Firms I know if other agents knew about how reliable, easy, cost effective Real Estate Professionals, Inc. is they would switch today! Everyday I have the opportunity to focus my business and building my brand and not worrying about office politics.
None
None
Novel cuisine, surly indie waitstaff, and great ambience
Best place in the quarter to get just about anything....they have the best Reuben's on the planet and their hamburgers are to die for. Give them a ring and they are sure to take good care of you 24 hours a day and they deliver!
None
None
My fiance' and I love Andy's. We go here at least once weekly. The food is awesome, well priced, and the customer service is the biggest attraction. Bri, is our personal favorite among the waitresses, but all of the day staff is wonderful. I will say the high school girls that work here in the summer aren't as personable, but overall the BEST fast food around.
None
this place is perfect, free shipping since it's in the states, close to the border, friendly people, yeah maybe i haven't gotten an email every once in a while, but don't be lazy check it yourself with your shipping number.
I have been to Japan five times for a total of nearly 200 days, and the visit and stay at Koya San is an outstanding experience
Local Marketing Suite said they could get my business to dominate the first page of Google, Yahoo and Bing search results. Well, they delivered way above what I expected. I was initially told by a friend in my business networking group that nobody could guarantee that, but after speaking with LMS and them showing me some examples of their work and even allowing me to speak to one of their clients, I was convinced and I hired them. Thank God I did. It has changed my whole business. My business is in a business park and is set in the back, not seen from the street, so I don't get any drive by traffic exposure. Everyone has found me because they found me online. Since initially hiring Local Marketing Suite and having the success I had pretty quick, I haired them to expose me further out in to other coastal cities. I now get business from all the surrounding coastal cities. You must hire Local Marketing Suite if you want to compete for online business.
Sehr geehrter Noeltner, entgegen Ihren Aussagen können wir uns nicht entsinnen, Ihnen jemals ein telefonisches Angebot erstellt zu haben! Ihre Bewertung entspricht somit der Unwahrheit. Wir behandeln unsere Kunden stets freundlich, kompetent und zuvorkommend.
It has been a pleasure to eat at this place, the food is always good never goes wrong. i especially love the Egg Bacon and Cheese Biscuit in the morning. you can never go wrong with this place, always the best.
I came to SF Custom Chiropractic two weeks before running a marathon for a knee injury that was making it very painful to walk, let alone run. I worked mainly with Dr. Gustin, who is awesome! He is very professional, yet also makes you feel relaxed and comfortable. He did a thorough evaluation and really got a sense for my pain and the real cause of it. Both Dr. Gustin and Dr. Jacobs laid out a treatment plan for me keeping in mind my goal of running the marathon and the time frame we had to work with. They did ART on my knee, calves, and hips and gave me some exercises to do on my own, which to my surprise made a huge difference (after actually doing them). After a week and a half of treatment and stretching on my own, the pain was pretty much gone and I was excited about running again. I’m so thankful to these two for being super knowledgeable in their field and really working with you on your specific goals.
I've been to Clairmont Animal Hospital three times with my cat Otto, and have been extremely impressed with the quality of care he received from Dr. Smith. He knows what he's doing, and it shows. Unfortunately, on my last visit, Dr. Smith discovered a baseball sized tumor. I want to sincerely thank Dr. Smith and his staff for the care and compassion given to both Otto and myself. I also want to thank Dr. Smith for doing what he could to make Otto comfortable in his final hours because it gave me time to say goodbye. I will HIGHLY recommend Clairmont Animal Hospital to everyone.
Every time I come, I always have a great experience! The staff is friendly and kind and the doctors are very knowledgeable.
When I first saw their work on my truck, I was literally speechless! I recently purchased a new Dodge Ram and not long after I bought it, I found a large dent/ crease in the passenger rear door. I was told by three or four different automotive professionals that the dent would need to be repaired by a body shop because it was damaged beyond the possibility of paintless dent repair. I was referred to New Visions by a friend who assured me that they could definitely repair it without bodywork, and I have to say I was skeptical, but I figured I'd at least try it in effort to avoid having bondo & paint work done on my new truck. I was AMAZED that Brian was able to completely remove the dent & crease in my truck. I honestly would have been happy even if there was still a small sign of the crease, but when he finished, I couldn't even find where the dent or crease was originally located on the door. He is a master at his trade to say the least!! I will keep New Visions in my contact list for all future dent work, and I will recommend them to anyone and everyone I come across who needs dent work. Thank you, New Visions! Customer for life, James M. Dallas, TX
The Staff are Very Friendly , The Facilities are clean and I had a great time Would recommend this site as I think this is the most entertaining and well maintained site ever Enjoy !
None
El puro caché
Their loaded fries are fantastic. Pizza probably in the upper-tier for the area.
Fast, friendly and thorough. The staff are all very courteous.
None
Great hotel, amazing staff, decent location. If you need a place to crash for the night, or are looking to stay long term, this Marriott property is the place to go. I heard they even have an overnight person specifically to hold down furniture and distract drunk creepy guests. I think they allow cats, because I hear lots of meowing in the lobby area, but I have yet to confirm any actual felines.
Breaking this news to my parents – that I have passed GRE Exam with flying colors gave my parents a sigh of relief. The decision of spending the hard earned money has proven beneficial. The organized approach and exam tips and regular Mock tests in the GRE classes helped me in inculcating habits to avoid silly mistakes, which in turn assisted me in sailing through this examination smoothly.
My family and I have been training with Nico at the Phoenix/Glendale location of Fitness Works since June 2013. We have all had great results! When I signed up for training I wasn't quite sure what to expect but I have been pleasantly surprised nonetheless. Nico is a motivator, without being a drill sergeant. He encourages you to do your best without being condescending. He will even make you laugh in the middle of a set of reps just to keep things light and remind you that working out can (and should) be fun. Nico has the personality that allows him to push you without seeming pushy and encourage you without seeming that he is preaching to you. As much as he tortures us (which is what is seems like during training), we enjoy the sessions and are pleased with the results, not just in weight loss but in building muscle, gaining strength and balance, and just overall improving our health and well-being. I would highly recommend personal training with Nico at the Phoenix/Glendale location of Fitness Works.
The starter in my 2006 BMW went up and I was stranded at Kohl's in newark. I called, they told me what tow company to use and the tow company charged THEM. They fixed my starter and everything was done in a day. They even made a special arrangement so that I could pick my car up after hours. When I paid, they rolled the fix and tow into one payment which made it really easy. I've always gone to the dealership but this place makes me trust the smaller local companies. I'll drop in at Fair Hill Auto next time I need something done next time.
A great place to visit, beautifully designed with high quality shop fits and lovely pop up retailing which provides real differentiation. The customer services team are excellent - my favourite place to shop
We recently had to have work done on our older VW. We landed at Woodward Auto pretty much by chance. But glad we did. They were priced far below other estimates and took great care to ensure that everything was in working order. Appreciate all their patience and care with the car. After this service, we are now taking our BMWs there. It is hard to find a car place you can trust. This is the place.
None
Esta de poca madre extraño mi puerto escondido
I have used this Busy Bee Car Wash location for several years now. I regularly take my VW Rabbit and Toyota Camry into the wash without any issues. You may get unlucky and show up at a time when they are busy but they do a good job of getting people in and out. They have spent several months upgrading their automatic wash and added many more vacuums etc. So give them a try, you may have a different experience. No complaints from me. Of course when I plan on waxing, polishing or using a clay bar I will always wash by hand.
I was referred by a personal friend to come down to Silverline to check out their inventory. I was truly impressed with the high class business and no pressure feeling of Leo and Brad at Silverline. Very relaxed atmosphere compared to any other dealership that I've experienced. They're very thorough with explaining the vehicle and one on one friendly interaction. I'll definitely be coming back for future purchases.
We appreciate the great job Bruno does for us. Today he took the time to answer several questions I had about bug control in Arizona and to set-up rodent traps to deal with our ground squirrel problem. We appreciate his friendly and professional manner.
It was truly a wonderful and fun experience buying my wedding dress at Renee’s. Beautiful store - it is so spacious. We did not feel this at any other bridal store. The sales ladies were very helpful and personable and the dresses are beautiful. "Renee’’s" is a treasured memory for my family and me, and I know it will be for all brides, their mothers, and other family members and friends who go here.
Power Home Remodeling has done a tremendous job from start to finish. The windows are high-quality, the installation process has been fantastic, every Power employee has been professional and very knowledgeable about their products and procedures. Power has followed through on every commitment made. I would highly recommend Power Home Remodeling to anyone looking for a home remodeling project.
Great Experience, had fun and learned how to ride a bike without knowing anything about it. definitely recommend the class for first time bikers. Instructors work with you very well step by step. You get your money's worth.
None
Awesome people, great delivery times, and fantastic pizza! I go whenever I come to Amelia Island
The employees are very friendly & eager to help. The coffee beats Starbucks hands down with eight varieties of drip coffee and a multitude of blends to buy and take home. Apparently they used to sell cheese hence the (outdated) name found on google maps.
None
Priscilla Brown in Sales was awesome. She listened to my concerns and got me the deal I wanted. I highly recommend Airport Marina Honda and asking for Priscilla!
Absolutely the best friend my dogs ever had. I have taken all (3) of my doggies to see Dr. Coghlan and his staff. I have never met another vet that really loves the animals and there parents better. WE LOVE 17th Street Animal Hospital
I called about my gen one EVO screen going dark all of sudden. Greg was very helpful in letting me know that they had the LCD part in stock and that it would take about an hour to repair and that they had some availability that day. I mentioned when I was going to arrive so they could expect me. I came in, and filled out info on a computer as other reviews have stated, but it was relatively painless. Luckily, I still have the insurance and service plan on my phone, so was not out of pocket anything, and the repair was complete in less than 40 minutes. Greg even followed up to check to make sure everything was still working the next day. BTW, since it is close to downtown, I was afraid parking would be an issue, but there is plenty of parking and the store is well maintained.
Ballenberg offers a wonderful variety of old farmhouses from all across Switzerland which can be viewed from top to bottom, in a natural setting which is simply breathtaking. There are culinary options for any budget, ranging from a full three course meal to a quick, tasty snack. The sanitary facilities were very clean and evenly spaced. It is a perfect place to spend a relaxed day with the family.
Bischoffs is the best ice cream!
World Class Education system. Knowledge is currency of 21st century...
"Gimme the usual. Trim up the sides and let's go a lil shorter on top today." I have been going to this barber shop for the last several years. Great barbers who keep it simple and right. If you work in the downtown area (or just live in El Paso) and need a barber, try out this place. These guys will leave you with a good haircut, cleaned up and feeling good. ****4 stars because it can be a difficult process in finding a barber. This place will end your search.
I have had the opportunity to work closely with the staff at St. Barnabas and from what I have seen these people are dedicated and extremely professional. All of the children always appear happy and the campus is absolutely beautiful.
None
My coworkers and I LOVE Johnny's! We eat there almost every week. I love their hamburgers, and their fries are TO DIE FOR. Also, their grilled chicken salad is AMAZING. The staff know us by name and are super friendly.
I'm Hispanic with thick curly hair, it's difficult for me to find anyone who can cut and style my hair to compliment my face and in the style that's easy for me to manage. I had an appointment with Kimora who was on time and fantastic. She immediately asked what I was hoping to do and understood my hair and texture. I had the most wonderful shampoo ever! The woman (who I sadly don't recall her name) washed my hair but before that, she gave me a wonderful scalp massage. Kimora immediately understood what I wanted to do with my hair and the challenges with the particular hairstyle and made it work. She even gave me tips on how to blow dry my hair! It was wonderful, lively and fun (I really never have said that about a hair salon) and I will definitely be returning.
Great staff and clean. What more do you want!
I found out about this business from one of many bad reviews from the officeworks page LOL! I've certainly learnt my lesson, these people definitely know great customer service.
None
Not the place if you are in a hurry. The food is delicious, but the kitchen is slow and the dining room small. Had the Portabella sandwich for lunch, lots of good flavor, well seasoned.
Very good delivery! The food is great and is delivered quickly. A+
I have been going there for over 30 years. The best bread period!
Dr. Brokstein is a passionate, well educated doctor of Chiropractic who has helped many to restore their health. I personally have referred dozens of people over the years to his practice where all were very satisfied with the care received. When referring, it is extremely important the feedback is positive. If you or a loved one is seeking optimal health, look no further then Hometown Family Wellness Center.
I can't even begin to describe how wonderful Dr. Cleveland is! I am suffering from chronic pelvic pain, which has been a problem for years. She has helped take on the daunting task of trying to figure out what is causing this pain and has been incredibly patient with the process. I highly recommend her!
Awesome worship, great friendly fellowship of people who love JESUS! Great place to visit and grow!
I took my car here after an accident and Superior fully accepted the insurance quote and was really helpful along the process. They hooked me up with a local rental car place and fixed my car in a decent amount of time. It was shiny and new looking! Great service and friendly people. Highly recommended.
The challah french toast is amazing!
Awesome food! Great service and great prices. Will return next time we visit MB
Product Development with xellent facilities
Probably the best Mexican food in Buffalo. Definitely a must try if you enjoy Mexican food. I'll be honest, the tables are always sticky and first time I went in I was skeptical but the excellent quality of the food keeps us coming back! Never ordered a bad dish. Prices are low, portions are big, and service is fast fast fast! We joke that they must know what we want before we walk in the door they're so fast!
I have been to a lot of dental practices moving around Atlanta and this one is far the best. They are so personable, the office is very nice, they ALWAYS are on time and they explain to you everything that they are doing. They take detailed notes about everything you discuss with them in the office and remind you of it when you come in for your next visit. The front office coordinates with the back during your appointment so your next appointment is scheduled before you even get out of the chair. I have never had a bad experience there and they don't pressure you about services like a lot of other dentists do.
None
Love there food
Great place! Friendly and knowledgeable staff. Affordable membership.
One of my favorite places in New York City. And I'm born here!!! I love the owners, staff, food, wine and live music. I go there often and always have an amazing time alone or with friends....
Great brunch.
None
went to heather, loved my haircut. she was very personable. cool environment. they took me even though i was late. good price. ill be going back for sure. :)
None
None
I am very grateful for the prompt and courteous service rendered by Doug Kyle who repaired both my toilets which were not flushing properly. I would definitely recommend Pipe Wrench Plumbing.
Everything Excellent..5555
Snookies is a wonderful malt and ice cream parlor in Beaverdale Iowa. It is family owned and has become a very popular place to go after games and various school events. Everyone becomes very sad when it shuts down for the winter after the Beaverdale Fall Fest, and thrilled when it opens again in April.
Absolutely love this place! Great atmosphere & great service!
Excelente servicio! Muy pequeño pero familiar con una carta bastante interesante!
Ottimo!
Enfin un service de cartographie qui donne correctement le nom des rues !!! Surtout pour un petit bout de caillou perdu dans l'Océan Indien comme l'est l'Ile de La Réunion... Merci Google ;-)
The Pad Se Ew Chicken is like crack! I order it once a week and my hands shake as I hand them my credit card. I need my fix! They put a chemical in it that makes you crave it fortnightly!
Very nice, clean Hostel! I stayed twice in Oct 2010 - upon arrival and departure via Narita Airport. The cleanest and best appointed of all the Hostels I stayed at (with my daughter). I will certainly stay again if I get to return to Japan.
Pros: Credits transfer to other Christian colleges; Large selection of food choices; Hands on experience in ministry opportunities. Those opportunities range from one's ministry assignment, Snow Camp, summer camps, local church involvement, and more. Opportunity to mature spiritually, physically, mentally by learning disciplines of daily bible study, initiative, hard work in one's work assignment, living with others in a dorm, time management just to name a few. Be taught by excellent bible teachers. There is more than one campus. They are in Canada, Korea, Hungry, Argentina, Germany and of course New York and Florida. Cons: Not recommended for one who is of the Reformed Theology. Though you are welcome, they teach Dispensationalism. The facilities are a work in progress as with any school. They are not luxurious, but they function for what the student needs. Personal testimony: I went here thinking I knew a lot about the Bible because of my family life. So in studying the Bible, it became clear to me that life was not about me but about God and glorifying Him in every area of my life. I would recommend going here to anyone (Christian or not, Dispensationalist or not), though I realize this school is not for everyone. The point is the spend one year of your life studying the Bible.
I was extremely please with R&R. Mike even put on little booties to protect my floors! He was fast and very thorough. He also told me how to care for my air conditioning unit when winter comes.
I used IMG_191 for a personal photo shoot a while back, and the experience from beginning to end was great. The photographer (Andrew) was very knowledgeable, and he was helpful in giving advice and working with me to get the shots that both of us were looking for. The pictures turned out absolutely fantastic. Very highly recommended.
The staff here was very nice, the room was clean, they went out of their way to give me an end room so me and my dog (Dub) could come and go with ease. My bed was very comfortable and the bathroom was very clean, the whole hotel was quite clean. I enjoyed my stay, a big part was that the hotel was truly pet friendly and clean.
I was there with my colleagues today for a lunch. The place is simply awesome. "King Kong" burger is simply the best! Trust me, they have some beers you have *never* heard of! You can even play retro Pacman and Space Invaders! I honestly can't wait to go there again. Highly recommended!
Venden gas para carros con sistemas híbridos
The staff are always lovely and generous, the place is basically just a shop front for the awesome ice cream with a great selection of deli items in the back. The ice cream is absolutely fantastic - the best I have had in London served in a cone and really only beaten by a few scoops I've had with other things at Michelin starred restaurants. So for £4 you really cannot go wrong. My favourite is the salted caramel and pecan, but I am a sucker for both those things. All the flavours I've tried have been great.
None
Great food, service and eclectic decor. Full bar and great wine list. Outdoor seating and sometimes with entertainment! LOVE THIS PLACE. Under new ownership too...so I highly recommend it!
First time getting a rear window decal for my business. I was very impressed of the high quality and friendly service they have. They believe in True customer care for their clients!
Having dined across North America, Europe, Africa I cannot overstate how good this restaurant is. Sara is a true host and made our evening the most pleasant in years. The food was exceptional - beyond exceptional. "Chef's Choice" is a must! Being served an original creation is something that cannot be described. The Creme Brûlée was as good as what you will have in Paris! An absolute MUST!!!
Better than Louisiana Public Schools. Kids got a great education. Now when I ask them who invented electricity they know hat Kim Jung Un did. Guy has done a lot for this world and apparently I am lazy!
Lovely hotel
None
I had my loafers resoled. When i picked them up I thought i had new shoes. Great service.
I've rented at several storage facilities over the years, and this is one of the nicest I've ever seen. The facility is exceptional, being a converted Kmart store. Security cameras, a locked compound, keyfob entry, clean, air conditioned ... everything you could want in a storage unit, together with very helpful people in the office. Highly recommended!
My nephew went here over a year ago and that is how I found out about La Petite. My son has been attending there for a little less then a year, I love having him here. The staff members are so nice and if I or Tammy have questions/concerns there is no hesitation to speak to each other. I'm glad to have chosen La Petite for childcare for my 10 y/o. The hours are perfect and they are able to transport my son to his school which is really important for my son & I!
Yukon was vibrating when you stepped on the brake. Julie dropped the vehicle off in the morning, was taken to work and was picked back up after work. The truck stops now without any vibration or issues. Thanks Professional Fleet Services for a job well done.
My salesperson David went above and beyond getting me the right vehicle, explaining to my wife the different features on it and getting me the right deal. The general manager Dallas personally made sure that I was taken care of and satisfied. Thank you for a great customer experience to all the Fowler Honda team!! Luis Posada
I LOVE the food here! And, everyone is very nice! Another great place in Tawas 5/5
My car kept having trouble starting and the dealership said it could be hard finding the problem, but they found the problem and fixed it and it was even still covered under my warranty!!! Great service!!!
Country Cable is always working with us so that we can get the best deal and most out of our entertainment experience. They are always prompt and available and have an extremely helpful and personable staff that gets it done for us.
Excellent work, excellent communications. Larry showed us every step of the design and development of our website. Would recommend him to anyone needing a website. He used responsive design so my website looks great on tablets and cell phones. A+ rating.
ya no existe el subway
Excellent hardware store. The staff is always approachable and very helpful. I would highly recommend that anyone in the area go here before checking out a big box hardware store. On two separate occasions I went to home depot/lowes looking for something only to leave empty handed and find it half an hour later at Gelfand's.
Location Voiture Marrakech pas cher chez OYAMA CAR
Have known Zack now for nearly 8 years. He is a leader. Zack is consistent Real Estate Professional with the track record, diligent, and result that is bar none. I believe he will always have his client best interest at heart. I know whatever problem any home buyer or seller is facing during or before the transaction, Zack can help you manage and resolve it. That is his greatest value and asset, solving problem and getting result. I would highly recommend Zack Alber.
Amazing food and great customer service. I will gladly go out of my way to come to this specific pizza joint.
They rebuilt the starter in my 91 minivan, and it cost what they said it was going to cost. They were done less than 2 days after I had it towed there. I'd definitely go there again.
Great place great food.
The Fridge is an Auckland must try. Most important, try a pie! You'll be amazed a pie can taste so great.
Ashu
Love this place. All the workers are friendly, and they also do call orders. I'd recommend it any day!
We hired Sweeney Photography for our wedding pictures & were both VERY IMPRESSED with how Mary Sweeney went way above & beyond any & all of our expectations!!! She was very professional, she met with me 3 months prior to our event to go over all of the details of our contract & to make a shot list detailing all of the various shots we had hoped to get. She also checked in with me at least once a month leading up to the event.The day of Mary showed up to the venue early to take detail shots of the decor, while there she noticed I was running behind & so she took initiative & offered to help me set up a few last minute things (thanks again Mary!). She then came back to the hotel with me & took shots of us getting ready & then throughout the hotel before the event. Her ideas for placements & poses were so unique & fun!! We arrived at the venue & right away we started taking family shots, Mary was so great at mixing & matching the different groups of people, making sure not to leave anyone out! Anytime our guests had asked to take pics with us Mary would kindly step aside to let them take their own pics, however she would be taking the picture as well - which was awesome because now we have all those unexpected pics too!! Mary stayed through the duration of our reception & did not leave until we assured her that we had all the pics of poses & people we could possibly think of. We really enjoyed Mary's personality as well as her professionalism. The picture proofs were ready for us to view 2 weeks early, which was awesome, the only problem now is that they are all so amazing we are having a hard time choosing which to print!!! We'll be sure to keep you posted on how the final prints turn out!!! :)
None
None
None
Not only am I really enjoying the free car washes that came with my Mazda, but on one occasion a month or so ago Charles Whalen went above and beyond. He noticed that I had a great deal of tar on both sides of my 6. When the general wash didn't take care of it he used some special cleaner and elbow grease in an effort to take it off. I greatly appreciate Charles and all the sales team that are always eager to serve me, their customer, after the sale. Monty Pettyjohn
Văn phòng thám tử tốt đấy
This is strictly a FOOD review as I have not had a chance yet to sit down and eat there for a meal and have only had take out. The food is super! I mean, just great, especially for the price! And on Sunday they have a wonderful supper menu for a fixed price that looks scrumptious! I can't wait until Sunday! :-) I had the CUBAN MOJO CHICKEN SKEWERS (w/mojo sauce + cilantro + platanos maduros) and the MARINATED BEET SALAD (w/ toasted walnuts + valdeon + olive oil + chives) and was pleasantly surprised at how tasty everything was! I'm also pleased to find a place that offers such a wide variety of items that are affordable when eating alone. I would definitely recommend this spot!
Francois is an incredibly gifted human being. His kindness and love radiates out of him like rays of sunshine. He is able to see beyond what most people can see and help with his deep wisdom and guidance. I am truly grateful for the support he provided me in helping me see such a bigger vision of who I am and my life's purpose and to gain clarity on my direction as well as helping me release what no longer serves me. Thank you Francois for the infusion of love and light - you are a gift and I am grateful for you :)!!
None
None
I live in Philly and close to a Hyundai dealership where I live but I choose to go to the LV dealership, an hour and thirty minute drive. Its worth it
None
This is gym lives up to it's name! I joined in September 2013 and I am Reclaiming My Life! As someone who has spent 30 years going to various gyms Crossfit Reclamation is what I desperately needed to get serious about my fitness. Kathy owns the gym and coaches most classes. She fosters a unique gym community that supports each other and great friendships emerge. She is strict about doing daily mobility and having proper form so you don't injure yourself. She helps us set goals and caters our pre-workout and post workout exercises to help each individual. I am addicted and look forward to being there and when I miss a class it bums me out. Worth every penny! ~ Matt Grazier
None
I love Trader Joe's, This location does have great prices on the majority of their food items,the employees are always helpful and very upbeat and polite and always ready to help you find an item,if out of stock,recommend a similar item,the only problems I have with the store is that the meat prices are very high and their parking lot,it is a nightmare,but all in all,this is a great place to shop,I highly recommend.
Very friendly employee onsite.
Casa Goyo es un Restaurante que te atiende muy bien un buen servicio muy buenas tapas un sitio muy agradable
We got in a relatively minor accident, and the rear door of the wagon was buckled in badly (ruined). Governor's Auto body replaced the door, repainted remaining scratches, and did a fantastic job. The car looks great. Very professional, quick and did excellent work.
Awesome deli!
We have been customers of Great White for many years. Vince and his staff are knowledgeable and helpful. Their selection of salt water corals can't be beat.
It's awesum...!!
None
Very friendly to me and my son!
I've had two tattoos done here (at least, so far). The first one, done a couple of months ago, was simple, an addition to an existing one that turned it from "ok" to fabulous! The second one, finished barely a week ago, is absolutely breathtaking. I am SO looking forward to showing it off once it finishes healing. I HIGHLY recommend this place to anyone. They are professional, thorough, and do beautiful work. Trust me, you will be glad you came here. This is THE place to go.
Jack's bakery did an EXCELLENT job on my wedding cake! It was very beautiful and very yummy! My fiance and I met with her months before our wedding to taste cake samples and to tell her what we were looking for in our wedding cake. Not only is she a great listener, she could recall every single detail of that conversation months later! She did a great job with the gum paste flowers! My guests thought our cake was cool and delicious!!
Very professional service, Anna & Scott explain the process of their initial diagnosis, then keep you in the loop with what treatment regiment they decide is best for you. Highly recommended.
I went to see Katz Law Office for an employment case and my experience was great. I especially like attorney Pirri, she is the best and has been professional the whole time also the staff accommodated me beyond satisfaction. I was very pleased and I would recommend them to friends looking for and attorney.
مطعم دندن للمأكولات الاندنوسية
It has been a pleasure using Building Knowledge. As a REALTOR with Trobaugh Group, BK has been a preferred company, so when a client chooses them I know the inspection will be thorough, fair and straight forward. I believe a good inspection reduces liability for the seller and risk for the purchaser. Doesn't get better than that!
The staff in here is always great. No need to worry about crowds yelling or talking though the movie.
None
It's all about the crust. Chewy and buttery. My favorites are Spicy Tai, BBQ Chicken, Margherita, and the different vegi-dominant pizzas. Service has always been great and had no problems with getting my orders out quickly. They do heat up each slice which takes about 5 minutes. Other than that never had a problem. Slices are huge, 1/6th of an 18" pizza. Two slices and you're done. Happy hour prices are even better. The only "custom made gourmet pizza" in Auburn. Judging by the crowds I would guess not too many others have a problem. Best pizza in Auburn!
My son started karate when he was 5 years old and shortly thereafter I began training with him. Together we learned about karate, improved our physical conditioning and bonded as father and son. Faust's USA Karate is a family oriented dojo with flexible training hours and supportive instructors that inspire and encourage karateka of all levels. The training environment enables students to learn and progress at their own rate earning their way to a Black Belt. Additional seminars are often held that feature guest sensei who train in multiple styles. In addition to training students engage in community service and work to maintain high academic standards. My son is now a focused, confident, mature, high school senior. Several years ago we earned our Black Belts and continue to train to maintain our physical fitness and focus. Practicing martial arts provides a holistic approach to mental and physical training (cardio, strength, flexibility). I highly recommend Faust's USA Karate for people of all ages and abilities.
Good search
A friendly restaurant for horse steak Tartar and other horse related food. It is a small restaurant located in the heart of Belgrade near the Vukov spomenik park. It consists of a charming yard, open in season and a etno-stable like interior. The staff consists of two brothers(owners sons I think) and two cooks, the atmosphere is very hospitable and private. Since most of the tables are arranged like stable boxes it is very private, there are a few tables on the first floor that are even more private. They do not work on Sunday, as per Serbian custom. The food :-) The main dish here is steak Tartar made from fresh horse steak, its made in french style-5 ingredients. The restaurant and this dish were praised several times in Serbian newspapers and on Monde and some other EU newspapers. One dish is ok for two people(especially if one is a girl) Besides tartar stake there is a regular horse stake, beef stake, homemade Serbian horse sausages and pate, and some other dishes, the menu is not big but all the things I ate were great. There is a nice selection of regional vines(Serbian, Montenegrin, Macedonian etc) and the vine of the house is ok also. Every day there are a few homemade sweets, usually traditional-baklava, urmasice, fruit cake or similar. The prices are average for Belgrade and for 20-25 euros two people can eat. I go there often, hope you enjoy and if it is winter time ask for the Horseman's salad! Beware the pepers, prepared in Serbian way- in oil with garlic are HOT :-)
Charlie is one of the gems of the East End, a great character and just as important a great barber. You will not be disappointed with the service and the cut. Best still is the price which knocks spots off the barbers at Canary Wharf! I always jump on the DLR and slide over during a break. A word to the wise, cuts are by appointment only, so book or you may miss out.
At first I wasn't too sure about this place because I love places with red doors. But you know, orange being a relative of red I decided to give this place a shot. The Orange Door Dental Team seems to be well balance and knowledgable. Walking in there for the first time, I felt this positive energy which led to comfortability. Kayla was the one that clean my teeth, and my teeth feel pretty clean. She's very knowledgable, keep up the good work. It's been some time, so i know i got alot of fixing to do. I believe the ODD team could do it. So if your looking for a great place to get your teeth done, this is the spot to do it. ^^v
Hal did a great job. Our carpets look better than they have in years. My wife says they feel better to walk on. Now she takes her shoes off every time she comes in so she can feel the softness on her feet.
I went to Dr. Lin with a toothache. He took an X-ray and thought that it might have been sinus pressure from an undiagnosed sinus infection. He prescribed a course of antibiotics. He said that he wanted to do a little "detective work" before he did any expensive dental work. My toothache cleared up almost immediately. Dr. Lin is quite a detective! I suspect that many dentists might have taken this opportunity to sell me a crown but Dr. Lin cured my problem very inexpensively. I highly recommend him.
Hello Sir/ madem My Name Mr Rakesh Ram.Works at Eco ElectricalnyAttends Eco Electrical Services Nimbus Academy provides the best guidance to the IAS, PCS, CSAT, Training Institute in Chandigarh and are always ready for the support and advice that is available to us from all quarters including the faculty members, the administrative team and the students.
None
It was An Owsome Exp over their @ 6 months :) WoW!! Lil Cool Nice FC(Food Court Pyramid) Fountains Nice Time pass in the mean tim! ;)
$40 for access to such equipment is absolutely awesome. And classes are offered in the evenings, weekend and lunch time for those who like a group thing. Locker room area (for guys) is pretty clean, but the bathroom stalls are gross and really need to be replaced. Showers look fine, but I don't really use them. They have a racquetball court, fitness studio (with sparingly offered yoga) and boxing classes, so variety is great here.
I had been to this skydiving yesterday with my wife to perform first time dive into the air..it was mind blowing experience. ...everybody should do in their life time...simply WOOOW...Camera Guy and Trainer were very enthusiastic throughout the journey which pleased us very well
these guys do what i ask, tell me what I need to know and are very transparent on costs. why would you use anybody else
Liked the andouille po' boy with spicy slaw on it! Good sandwich, seemed to be very fresh. Even better were the hush puppies, my gosh they were amazing! I'll definitely be eating there again.
Rini is voor ons al vele, vele jaren het vertrouwde adres voor goede snacks. We weten net beter of we halen het bij hem. Gelijk even bijpraten. Goede porties en nette prijs.
Thank you to the gentleman working there who let me in to use the facilities.
None
Great car wash
Spruce service is absolutely top of it's class. I took my wife there for our anniversary and they gave us a big cushy booth for just the 2 of us and even gave us a beautiful card. A card!!!!
Great Hot dog and service! I would suggest the Rueben Dog it is out of this world good! The only dog I wasn't impressed with is the Bruschetta Dog, because the bruschetta is cold and it doesn't compliment the hot frank. Other than that you will not be disappointed.
ma house
Dan has been repairing my Volvo for close to 10years. He has been able to help me talk to Volvo corporate when there is a warranty or recall issue and has secured parts for me quickly and at reasonable cost. I can call or stop by anytime and he and his crew are there to help if I have a quick question or problem. When I was considering selling my Volvo, instead of making money on all the continued repairs, he was honest and said i should move on, helping me select my next vehicle. It is all about service at High Line..I wouldn't go anywhere else..!
I first met your artist Michael when he drew caricatures of the guests at a Professional Women's event. He made everyone look so fun and happy. So I hired him for a special birthday celebration at my home. Michael was terrific! He worked constantly and all my guests loved the result. Everyone went home with a "party favor" of a delightful caricature of themselves as a single, couple, or small group. Please tell him thanks so much for his hard work and his amazingly cheerful self.
Excellent job! Quick and friendly. Fair price! I will definitely be back!
This place was so much fun! The bartender was great, and the clientele was awesome. The kids from Oz hope to come back there soon!
Great lunch choice. Fast courteous service, delicious chicken & broccoli! Thanks.
場地大，好玩
Great Workout, Very Helpfull, If your looking for a challenge.
Great service, great food, nice staff. Enough said!
Bill was very easy to work with. He has a customer-centric, no-pressure technique that makes buying a new vehicle a pleasant experience. When we are ready to buy my wife's jeep, he's our guy. The dealership had great incentives and financing options to make buying a new Ram affordable. Brandon did a wonderful job explaining our financing options and really worked with us to make getting an extended warranty worth our while. Overall, we found the dealership easy to get to, had a friendly and professional staff, a good selection of vehicles, a clean and inviting showroom and great service after the sale features. Sincerely, Charles and Lauri Weber
One of my favorite Ethiopian restaurants. Home cooked food. I always get the veggie special and it has some unique and awesome morsels. The coffee is good too, but it is not a Starbucks. They make a macchiato as good as any I've had in Addis.
I have been to a lot of congregations, and this is the friendliest congregation, I have ever been a part of, the leadership is sound, and has an open door policy, so if you need to talk, just tell them and you will usually sit down right then to talk. If you are looking for the truth to be preached in love, then this is the place. The Bible is preached with a book chapter and verse to back up what is said, in context but in a spirit of love, by Michael Grooms the pulpit minister.
I absolutelly loved my tan. Andressa was very through and very informative. It was rainning when I left and I got drips of water on my chest and arms. I went back inside and Andressa without any problem fixed it for me. The next day nobody could even tell I had water drips. I came to work and everyone noticed my tan and I received lots of compliment! Now I even have few friends that want a tan too!
awesome service! my fav: vanilla latte w/ whip cream! 
Only stayed for one night but area and room was very clean and tidy, rooms 37 inch HDTV made a great value for being able too hook up portable media center. PPV and WebTV web browsing was enjoyable. Will stay again
Part way through my pre-broker class and have enjoyed the flexibility and ease of learner they provide. Everything is straight forward and the instructors/staff are helpful and prompt.
Love the place. Had dinner there Saturday before the Sarasota Half marathon to load up on some carb and it was the best experience. The place was packed and the service was relatively fast! 2 minutes!! Wine was good, food was delicious and atmosphere was great!
The employees at Hampton Inn went above and beyond for our visit. It was by far the best hotel experience we've had, as far as guest service is concerned. Thanks for paying attention to the small things and making our stay absolutely great!
Krash fixed an old HTC Android phone for me. Fair prices and great service!
Great gym, lots of equipment and great trainers!
None
Wow, I feel so much better now!! thanks so much Les & Pear, you guys are fantastic, I highly recommend you :-)
Filet Mignon Oscar style cooked perfectly. So good. 1/2 # Crab was scrumptious. Great Service.
None
Some of the best Greek food I've had anywhere (including Greece). They use only fresh local ingredients, and it shows in the crisp taste of all the dishes. We had the houloumi (grilled slices of Cypriot cheese) appetizer, which was very flavorful and filling. I had the moussaka with horta (wilted greens with lemon-oil dressing), and the flavor and texture of both were excellent (lots of nutmeg). My wife had the pork souvlaki with spanakorizo (spinach rice), and both were amazing as well. The portions are large, the prices are reasonable (seriously, I would expect to pay that much or more for the same quality of food at home in TN, and this is NYC), and our server was friendly and attentive. If you like Greek/Mediterranean food and you're anywhere close to Brooklyn, this place will not disappoint you.
Great food, pretty good value, attentive and friendly service without a hint of pestering from Robertas. Great evening.
None
None
None
Hands down the best bike shop in logan. Great service, the staff is very knowledgable and quick. I've never had any issues with there work.
I love going to this location. Everyone knows me there and they know exactly how I like my hair to be cut. Howard is funny and I enjoying talking to him. Everyone there has good customer service skills. I recomend this location to others
Melhor restaurante do norte. Super aconselhável
All I can say is that Joe Cotter and John Potter took care of a problem, the best they could have. I have nothing bad to say at all.
None
Visited recently for my daughter's bithday and found the food to be excellent, service second to none and the atmosphere superb. Loved it. Would definitely recommend it to friends and family.
Saccone's is the best pizza in the area. All of these nasty fast food pizza places don't have a prey against this place. Toppings with amazing flavor, nasty cheeses, and awesome Jersey style. Not something you find in Texas all that often. ORDER PIZZA FROM HERE! Oh.. and all their non-pizza items are great as well. Not a one of them are bad.
Knowledgeable, helpful people...had everything I needed. Best source for dry ice in Sullivan Co....simply call them 1/2 hr. before you get there, and your dry ice will be ready for you. Perfect.
Best pizza around. True italian owned and operated. Friendly staff, great value and great dinners too. Awesome cheesesteaks aswell
Best belt place for the money, hands down. Especially when you go for happy hour. Can't beat buy one get one.
Pretty sure the 1 star reviews were all left by the same person... As someone who grew up eating Indian every night, I can confidently say this place has the best Indian food in London. Only place my Dad will eat when he comes to visit me. Highly recommend.
None
A beautiful venue and not a bad seat in the house! Saw Joan Rivers here and had an awesome time. All the ushers were incredible helpful and it was a great experience.
My roof was inspected by a representative of ASAP Roofing. They showed me photos of the damage and explained everything completely. They handled the insurance company for me. They handled everything in a very professional and timely manner. I had a new roof much sooner than expected, and it looks great!
All people in the office are very friendly. Typical wait time in the office lobby is short and the doctor tries to keep an appointment time. Dental equipment is modern. X-rays are shown on computer screen and the doctor clearly explains what problems are visible and possible procedures available to correct them. The doctor is not just an ordinary dentist. He is also a dental surgeon so there is no need to go to another office for extractions, implants, etc. Everything can be done in the same office. The doctor is an excellent surgeon; quick, precise, knowledgable. He is very nice and friendly person. The office is highly recommended.
Buena estructura, la atencion medica excelente. El trato de el personal muy bueno
Excellent food, owner's always there, excellent service (guaranteed your water will always be full haha) and place is nice and welcoming. I live 2 blocks away from this place and i already decided to make Libertad my regular dining place. Food is affordable and they have an EXCELLENT choice of alcohol beverages. If you're thinking you can get a budlight or millerlite then might as well go to the pizzeria down the block. Everything is top notch here only wished i could've been there out on the patio during the summertime. FIVE STARS ***** in my book for sure.
The lady at the desk was super cool and joked around with us but where I was impressed was the piercer. I am embarrassed to say I passed out, that aside I was told that the man caught me by cupping the back of my head, gently set me down so I didn't hurt myself and after making sure I was alive he finished my piercing. When I woke up he joked with me and told me it has happened to him before and it was nothing to be embarrassed about. Super amazing, if I wanted anything else done I would go here.
The staff and doctors there are wonderful. They take the time to explain diagnosis to you as well as help the kids feel comfortable and taken care of. We, as parents, love them!
Ken Thompson made the car buying experience for my family a great one! We will definitely be recommending him and Doxon Toyota to all of our family and friends! :)
None
I had such a great experience here! I came in on a random Saturday just to kill time and found myself test driving a 2014 Jeep Cherokee Sport. I was looking for a few things in particular and Sean was more than helpful!!! My credit score is rated as "poor" and I wasn't looking at a vehicle from Lee Credit now, so i was ver hesitant to try to apply for a brand new car. At first things weren't looking too good, but the whole time Sean did a fantastic job communicating with me and giving me every option he could to keep me within my budget. This is not the first time this year I have tried to purchase a new car, but this is the only time a sales representative has stuck things out with me all the way. In the end it was I that sold myself a bit out of my budget, but i can honestly say that I couldn't be happier. Though I had to give up a few amenities I was originally looking at I ended up with the car I wanted for almost the price I wanted to spend!
Fantastic staff, polite, friendly and educated. The carpet cleaning was fast and thorough. My carpet dried within hours and looks amazing. I will definitely use them again!
Friendly, and the euro was by far the biggest and best tasting euro I have ever eaten. Highly recommend.
I need to install 2 Ethernet outlets (home office and living room), to wire my PC directly to the router to maximize my speed. The job was kind of difficult for a DIY project cable wiring through the wall was required, wall perforation and also running the cable through the wall and the attic. I called Mister Sparky, and Jeremy came to my home in time before the estimate arrival time, I was able to get the service the same day I called. The electrician worked promptly and fast, he analyzed the job that needed to be done and then calculate the cost of the job, It was a little high but the end result was very good, Jeremy setup my wired network connection within 4 hours, he went to get all the materials required. He run into some issues with the signal but he called his boss and he was very supportive, He came with a device and add the final touches to the wiring process. The electrician perform some cleaning after the job was done and he was very courteous and polite, he explained the requirements to get the job done and also he warned of possible issues that might occur. The job was well done and the end result was good, everything worked as expected.
The food here is always great. Our entire office eats here at least once a week if not twice. Always fresh and fast
None
None
None
Amazing company they did my sidewalks and basketball court slab the work was outstanding i would use them again
La salle est sympa et les plats de qualité
They got it right at this place. Customer service is excellent. Joseph and his staff are approachable, helpful, and knowledgeable. They carry great brands and have a great selection of gear in their store. The fitting studio is the best I have been to and the services they provide are comprehensive. Joseph went above and beyond on a frame warranty issue I had and then when I got hit on my bike, was extremely responsive in getting me a quote for the insurance company and helping me get my bike and I back on the road. This shop has everything you see lacking in many shops. Although I live over an hour from this place, I will gladly drive over to get what I need from them. I would drive even further if I had to.
I lovee how your employees keep you entertained and don't bore you, they have humor!(: thanks for everything. Justin was awesome
I have been going to this salon for about 4 years. Lani is the best tech. She spends an hour massaging my feet and legs and my pedicures last a long time. I highly recommend this nail salon and Lani
None
The folk at Stillinger's were beyond helpful. When my father died, our finances were very limited. Judy, Shawn, Jeannine and all the rest of the staff couldn't have been more compassionate in our time of need. Judy Fuller even went out of her way some weeks before my father's passing to help me through a number of legal documents to ensure that Dad had the best care and that his wishes were met. These are some truly wonderful people. They have even stuck with us for almost a year after Dad's funeral to help get his grave marker and other burial logistics handled with care. I will always be grateful to the good people at Stillinger's.
This restaurant is so good! The food for dinner is exquisite, and the brunch vibe is hoppin'. On top of that, the wait staff serves as some serious eye candy for those of us that enjoy a good lookin man. Romantic ambiance for a date.
Great service. Everyone is very friendly. Food is great also. The spinach quesidilla is delicious.
Kathryn's crew is always thorough and professional. It's a pleasure to come home after they've been cleaning. They're also great with my anxious, neurotic 14 year old dog. Price is very reasonable.
None
Simply AWESOME. the food, wine and atmosphere was great. nice and friendly staff who explained everything very well. the food was one of the BEST foods I've ever tasted at a restaurant and staff made our visit very delightful.
This week, I had an appointment for crown work on THREE molars. Normally, this is a 2-3 hour appointment. Not only did Dr. Brown and her team do a wonderful job on my teeth - they accommodated my tight work schedule and had me out in short order and to my job on time. I never felt any pain and Dr. Brown made absolutely sure I was comfortable. This team is awesome!
One of the best grills I have eaten at in a long while. I have eaten asset plenty of fancy restaurants and this restaurants surroundings feel homey and comfortable. The service was outstanding and the lemonade was very good to. I enjoyed my mixed grill plate, the blackened quail was too die for.
Highly recommend for those waiting to close on a purchase of a house.
None
What a great theatre. Really great spaces which are large enough but not too intimidating. There is the ability to split some of the spaces in half which is great for having more intimate performances for reviews and previews. The bar is relaxed and comfortable.
They are a hometown bank who had a miscue that was blown tremendously out of proportion! The service has always been excellent this speaking from my 20+ years as an actual real person and account holder there! It is so funny to hear all of these stories especially considering I have lived in this town my whole life and none of the names who have posted reviews actually live here! When you were reading the news stories, before you post a negative comment and review of a place maybe check the makeup of the community! We all know one another don't put your nose where it doesn't belong. Long tenure of employees that care for the people of our community, they didn't shut the doors when the business was going to other locations they modified the way they did business and worked to provide even better service! Keep up the good work!
Outstanding food!! Everything on the menu is delicious!! Owners, servers & cooks provide excellent service!! Small town restaurant that makes you feel welcome & want to come back....again & again!! HIGH FIVE TO HIGH PLAINS DINER!!! :-D
I went there today, literally the only store in the entire city that has Davidoff cigars. I was helped right through the door. A very large and respectable selection of cigars are really nice accessories so I picked up a nice butane lighter as well! Forget sheffields or your corner store. This store is absolutely amazing
None
None
None
i wanted to thank everybody for their help and for letting me walk out of nissan with a smile and satified. i got what i wanted i love my new car. thanyou
None
I will always take a class with Robert, over and over again. He keeps up to date with technology and you can always learn something new...he knows the newest and latest and the bad and the good. He is a great source of information and he is always available to help you. Thanks to him, I am totally paperless !
La compañía especializada en mostos y concentrados CRA Juice ha aprobado un proyecto que le permitirá continuar con su plan de expansión, que le ha llevado, en sus apenas tres años de vida (se constituyó en 2010) a casi duplicar su volumen de negocio. Buen trabajo!
bestest muglai in the area
I've brought a few bikes from here and always received excellent service. Really good bike servicing, including major work done on my Brompton. Highly recommended.
I had a great stylist for years in WA, and then I moved to AK. I had real trouble finding a good stylist that knew how to deal with my hair. I have natural wave and good volume...guess what happens if someone cuts my hair wet? As it dries, it shrinks up and looks like crap. Nearly dry cuts are a must for me and I called all over trying to schedule someone that knew what I was asking for. I branched out and got a rocking asymmetrical cut. I even splurged on professional color for the first time. The best hair and customer service I've ever had.
None
We went here, my sister and I -- pleasantly surprised! We sat at the "counter" with old time stools and a beautiful blue iridescent counter. We ordered the omelet with hash browns and a beverage. VERY GOOD, service was good also. I would recommend and I would go back. The pies looked great, prices were all reasonable.
Best burger on planet earth.
We had a fantastic massage experience, a relaxing massage for me and a remedial massage from John for my husband. John and Pamela were very friendly and caring and catered very well for our individual needs. A great, personal service.
Absolutely THE best Chinese food restaurant in the Athens area. Golden Sun has great food, great portion sizes, helpful and friendly staff, and quick delivery. When others crave Chinese food, I crave Golden Sun.
Thank you so much for the great service my kiddos and I received. Everyone working at Prosper Smiles is so friendly and happy to see us. I'm glad we found our family dentist.
I bought a 2009 VW Jetta at Huffines. Jerry was very helpful and I highly recommend him. A problem was discovered after I took the Jetta home and Edwin Homan worked with me to solve the problem and make sure that I was happy. Thanks guys for such great service!
None
None
None
None
Let me start by stating the fact that Grubbs will take the test drive to you. I called in during my lunch break and was too busy to go in for a test drive to the dealership. Tim Roberts informed me that he could bring the car to my workplace to test drive. I cannot emphasize how important this was to me, especially with a full schedule. Once I decided to purchase the car, I was given all the information I asked for and more. Since this was my first car buying experience, I was guided by Tim and others in the Grubbs Infiniti team (Pete Hankins and Nick Amandelaro) through the process. I was given a great deal on the car and got numerous options on warranties and financing options. The people at Grubbs Infiniti do an outstanding job of making you feel like family and are some of the nicest and most customer service oriented people I have had the pleasure of dealing with. I definitely recommend the dealership if you're thinking about leasing/buying a new or used Infiniti.
Cute little hipster coffee shop. Good food and a nice patio. Bonus points for usually great music.
Love it. Favorite noodles!
All I can say is Nathan is THE BOMB! I had shopped at a few used car lots and felt like the majority of the salesmen were "lying creepers" that just were basically hungry to take advantage of women. Well to make a long story short, I found Nathan online, called him and he made me feel so comfortable on the phone, from the beginning, that I knew I was in good hands. Nathan really listened to what I wanted. So I decided to see what he could do for me, considering I had bad credit, no $ down and my car was in such bad shape that I couldn't even drive it to look for another vehicle. So Nathan was so amazing, he arranged to have the car I was interested in, brought to me. I test drove it, and told him I loved it! About 90% of the entire process was completed before I actually went to the dealership. Time was really important to me, because I didn't have much of it and Nathan completely understood. Once I arrived at the dealership, I was greeted with a HUGE hug and complete efficiency. I was nervous about this purchase until I met Nathan. He was confidant that I could get this car and made me feel comfortable and happy with my decision. I am know that if I need anything, Nathan will be there to help. Thank you, Nathan for making this car buying experience a positive, smooth and successful one. P.S. Will you marry me?
Friend invited me December 2013 for New Years Eve gathering at KHOP. Wow! Was a wonderful time of unity, worship and encountering the creator and his love! The worship leaders at KHOP are amazing! Try to go as often as I can now.
Truly the best professional interior and exterior house painters in Birmingham AL! A+
I love Dotty's work! Her web designs are beautiful, creative and capture just what I hope to convey. She's also taught me to navigate the social-network highway the fast way. She's so easy to work with, too...absolutely the best!
great feeling of god good place to visit love it and the pastor is so friendly.
Kenny was wonderful. He tried to help our family although we had a bit of credit trouble. He was extremely professional and very kind. We came home with a brand new 2014 Chrysler town and country for our new baby boy. Thank you Kenny.
Charlie is very friendly, knowledgeable, hardworking & honest. He replaced 5 windows in the home I am selling that had broken seals, did an excellent job at a fair cost that was a bit cheaper than the other quotes I received. Would absolutely use him again.
I feel comfortable bringing my pets here because the staff is fantastic! They are cheerful, helpful, and go above and beyond my expectations to pet care. The prices are comparable to other clinics I've visited in the past, and I feel that for the level of care my pets receive, it's a real bargain. In the future, I hope to utilize their boarding services - I know the staff will take excellent care of my pets while I'm away. I'd definitely recommend the Burlington Animal Hospital to anyone, out of the places I've taken my pets to, this place is by far the best!
This is my absolute favorite restaurant in the Boston area. Delicious, comfort food that's always excellent. Great menu that has changed every time I've been. Their house cocktails are great and their cornbread with sorghum butter is always a good side. It is a very cute, friendly place with great service and a great atmosphere. A bit pricey, but the food is always great!
I don't think I'd ever take the time to write a review unless a business was either amazing or terrible. I've had nothing but good experiences with Luther Brookdale Honda. Also, the coffee in the waiting room isn't half bad. 10/10, would drive into it and drink coffee again.
Called Berkeys for a tankless water heater and they did a great job. Also got some good tips and recommendations for other plumbing issues discovered while on site which we're going to be following up with.
Hi guys this is Aashish i m learing guitar from Guru ji (SUNIL SIR) from last one year, my learing experince is fantastic just cause of sunil sir i came to know the right way to play and perform these days i have Formed a band named Dhvani the musical sounds and i m really very happy thnx to Guru ji a lot keep blessing :-)
An organization with the strength of more than 500 employees providing Customer Care service to several companies. I worked here as Sr. Executive (MIS) and I love the work environment here...
This place is OPEN! The service is great, the coffee strong and hot! The bagels are large with a great selection!
None
I've been eating at this restaurant on a weekly basis for almost two years. Never had a bad experience. One of the best Thai places I've ever been to. Great location with a lake view, really friendly and proficient staff, and extremely delicious food!
HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!! Excellent service. We had a great experience. Great prices, fast delivery. We went to other places in town and they couldn't get a mattress until the next week. Kurtis delivered ours that evening. I don't usually rate places on websites but the Mattress Center deserves a fantastic rating!!!
We recently bought a used Honda Accord at Victory Honda, the sales people made the buying experience painless and quick, and delivered on every word they promised. We financed through our credit union and the dealer had no issues working with them. We were in and out in around 2hrs, and even let us drive the Accord home and to the bank before handing them the check. The entire experience felt like we were buying a new car. The Accord had several scratches and dents, so my wife took it into the service department and they were able to repair all the issues, even a large dent on the trunk. She said the service department wasn't as friendly as the sales department, and she had to carry our daughter, plus a large car seat to the parking lot while looking for her car, and no one offered to help. However they did an exceptional work on the repairs, the car looks brand new.
great experience. it was so comfortable that I slept the entire time.
The sales staff at Prestige Dodge was very helpful in answering my questions, they were very knowledgeable. I would recommend this dealership to anyone looking to purchase a vehicle.
Amazing!
I'm a small business owner in the service, a/c-refrigeration, industry. My 10 year old service truck gave out and I needed to get a new service vehicle quickly. My sales person, Jerry Rhodes, was extremely helpful in finding the right vehicle to get me back on the road to success. Jerry found me a van, got it in to the store, had it detailed and I was on my way in just two days. I came in on Saturday afternoon and was completely finished on Monday. With the vehicle coming from another location, I am very pleased with the turn around time. Pricing was right, financing was better than I could have obtained on my own and everyone was pleasant to deal with. I would definitely recommend Jerry and Levis to my friends.
one of the finest indian restaurant in southern California location,food perfect AAA
Great shakes.
The staff at The Drink Station are friendly and knowledgeable about their menu. It's surprising different in its wide selection of world teas unlike most tapioca and smoothie shops.
Unit 2 Fitness is absolutely the best gym in Atlanta. From the Crossfit program to the kickboxing program to the Roberto Traven Bazilian jiu jitsu program, Unit 2 provides elite-level training that is accessible by everyone. I can't say enough good things about the entire staff at Unit 2.
-
I have been using chiropractors to help manage back pain for 27 years. Dr. Haugen is the most effective practitioner I've encountered in all that time. In the past, my goal was to manage the pain. With Dr. Haugen, we have set a goal of being pain-free, despite spinal and neck fusions, arthritis, and several other problems. This is because she set a goal, made a plan, and we're systematically executing the plan, step by step. I've been seeing her for six months now. She's introduced me to her massage therapists, something I was unwilling to try in the past. The combination of chiropractic treatments and massage has been a real game-changer for me. We started with traditional massage. The two Kirstens showed me that my body was wound up like a snare drum. I had one area where the pain just wouldn't stay away, though, so Dr. Haugen recommended that I try Cranial-Sacral massage, which I'd never heard of. Tonya is the in-house practitioner of Cranial-Sacral. It's a very different approach, kind of counter-intuitive, but it really works. She combines it with other techniques to address specific complaints, at least in my case. Tonya is very experienced, and is a master of her craft. She is working on something that I never imagined could be corrected - I clench my jaw very hard, waking and sleeping. We've only started on that recently, but I have several days between sessions when my face doesn't hurt at the end of the day. The only word I have for it is - awesome! Dr. Haugen will be my chiropractor for as long as she practices where I live.
The best hotels of Kampala, specious rooms
If you are looking for great BBQ, then you need to find the Carolina Barbecue Shack. It is hidden behind the University Grill. Take the road beside M&M Tire and find the sign. Take a right and drive on back to the building. They offer pulled pork, hash, beef brisket, and smoked turkey. You will want to add a baked Potato and barbecue beans to that plate with a roll. They have a Shack Sauce, which is a ranch/sour cream based sauce with a hint of garlic that is so good you could probably use it to eat a rock. It tastes great on everything. You will be hard pressed to decide which BBQ sauce to go with, their signature Carolina Barbecue Shack Barbecue sauce or their Carolina Gold sauce, which is a mustard based sauce. They have lots of sides to choose from but the baked potato with the Shack Sauce and barbecue beans are my favorite. Don't want to cook supper, go by and get a Family pack. When they first opened there were picnic tables outside. Then they added an awning for the tables to be under. Over the last couple of years they build a nice building with beautiful tables, air conditioning, and a big screen TV.
I found the course very interesting. Inventateq has good faculty with industry experience of more than 6 years. My Informatica trainer was very professional and covered almost all the concepts and topics. It helped me a lot in understanding the basic concepts and I can proudly say that I have got a confidence to work in Informatica.
None
None
Olga Rodgers (Sales Rep) & Jeff Catanese (Financing Manager) gave my husband & I nothing but exceptional service. They've made our car buying experience easy & comfortable. We highly recommend Lynnes Nissan East and hope to do business with this dealership again.
Love this course. Challenging but a good risk/reward setup. The fairways and greens are immaculate. However, the best part may be the large outdoor patio, open air dining room, fire pits, great food and drinks that await you after the round.
Awesome breakfast and just loved the ambience!
o melhor sítio para se comer carne grelhada em fátima
Héérlijk gegeten bij De Kern afgelopen donderdag. Verse Texelse producten van de steeds wisselende kaart. Vis eten van mensen op het eiland die je kent. Aardbeien van de Zelfpluktuin. Te lekker voor woorden.
i participated in a bikram class tonight and i really enjoyed it. i had been abit nervous about the heat but Robert managed it so well and with such sensitivity that i was able to stay in the practice and not fell overwhelmed. i am so glad that i went, it is not my usual style yet circumstances conspired to lead me to that class tonight, and i was rewarded, i was freed from my own mind restrictions about habitual practices and my body and energy system was strengthened from a different point of view! lucky me!!!Thanks Robert for teaching such an awsume class, and thankyou Andrea, for being you to me. i love you guys. xx Dana
i have been a member there for 3 years and i completely love this gym. i cant stand LAFITNESS and it simply cant be beat! it has a sooo many machines its huge a lot of classes (all the instructors are super nice) and it has a daycare, boutique, car wash, barbershop, salon, chiropractor's office, nutritionist, and a restaurant i love it! BY THE WAY ITS NOT A HEALTH CLUB ITS A REAL GYM!!!
<3 Prime Sirloin's Buffet
VGSOM, IIT KHARAGPUR B-SCHOOL..
None
None
None
I randomly went to this place a few months ago just driving by and have been back close to ten times since. Great food with the Buffalo favorites and a variety of other options you can't get elsewhere. The beer selection is solid too. Specifically wanted to write this review for the fish fry though - its fresh and well prepared. Went with my family last week and everyone couldn't stop talking about the fish fry.
Wonderful memories of this park while I lived in Nashville. Brought my dogs, now long gone, to run and keep me company while I ran and mediated during a tough time in my life. Floating on raft at the end of a run was a big treat.I remember those days fondly
None
I recently moved to the area and was in dire need of a tune up. I found my local Chevy dealer, at Fairway Chevrolet, and was thoroughly impressed by my entire experience. At first I was told to expect at most an hour for the work I needed; the Service Dept. had me in and out the door in 30 minutes! All of the staff I interacted with were courteous and the waiting area was comfortable and clean. Very happy to know I have a reliable Chevy service dept close by. :)
Delish Very good buffet
Brookdale provides great dental care, the practice has a family feel to it!
Easy to register and the class was helpful.
The baby back ribs are the best I have had in South FL... the pulled pork is also very good! You won't be dissappointed
I had my catalytic converter stolen right in front of my home. I am really picky with my baby(car). I general stick to one mechanic. Unfortunately, my mechanic does not work on exhaust. He recommended Select Automotive. I was skeptical, I called and the receptionist was so nice.( I later found out that it was a family owned business) That put me to ease right away. I needed my car done the next day. she informed me it could be done. That night I received a call from the owner informing my car was on his premise. I was shocked. Before any work was done to my car I was called and was asked if they should proceed, you never get that anymore. To make a long story short. My car was done by 12 in the afternoon the next day, I paid pennies compared to any other place. The service was awesome. I would definitively recommend anyone to this shop.
Elizabeth helped draft a contractor agreement for my web design business. She was very thorough putting together an agreement that would protect me and my business in case of troubles. I appreciated her professionalism throughout the process. And I found her very personable, too.
My husband and I have been working with Lynn Raade State Farm for many years now and have been happy with all levels of service! Highly recommend!
Found Beautiful Me through Group on. I live in Oregon and was looking to get someone a message as a gift who goes to school in Malibu. They were very helpful in getting it set up long distance. When I went to visit Malibu I ended up getting a message there as well. It was a great message for a great price!
These are the greatest group of people I've ever worked with. They make you feel right at home.
literally the best food in the world
Good food, nice people!
Thanks so much to Paul and John from Morgan Removals for making my move EASY.... and for taking such great care of all my loved possessions. Much appreciated! Esther
Probably the best kept secret for Chinese food in Knoxville. We have never had a bad meal or experience. You owe it to yourself to check it out!
Best damn pizza in NEPA, closest if not better than most NY pizza...people up here rave about Angelo's Pizza which isn't that good, this is the real deal.
They are awesome and Mike always takes car of my car when I go. They are on time and very honest with what work needs to be done versus should be done. They do not just say work needs to be done for the money and as a woman taking my car for work done that makes a huge difference!!
i used to be a regular customer with Elston Auto when i was a student at Purdue University, and moved to the west coast of Florida the day after I graduated...i recently had car issues and to get the car (2001 Dodge Stratus R/T) looked at by a Chrysler dealership alone was $110, which was not feasible and did not work well with my budget. I called Elston Auto and talked with Jay, describing the symptoms of my car, and he was able to advise me what to do and how to fix it, and low-and-behold, the car runs and sounds great again! even a 16-hour drive away, Elston Auto is reliable, and Bless everyone that works within the company!
Jerome Edwards made buying my 2008 Ford F150 FX2 amazingly easy. He was super friendly and very professional. I would recommend Town & Country (and already have) to everyone I know.
I had a fabulous experience ad bodybar Studios Plano. They were extremely welcoming and informative, and made my first time trying bodybar a fabulous experience. I highly recommend trying this work out - as it can be tailored to all skill levels and body types! Try the Juice on your way out too!
The infrastructure is very good. The support staff is great! and very helpful, but we need to consider that the hospital is new and currently running under capacity. Hope they continue to provide the same quality of service when they are running full. Cafeteria is very good, prices are reasonable and apart from the cafeteria they have a coffee day, subway and fresco kitchen.
If you are in the market to buy a Ford, this is the place to go! Ask for Shane Robertson. He made the entire car buying process seem like we were shopping with an extremely knowledgeable friend. He never pushed us on our budget, and he found EXACTLY the car we wanted at just the right price! The finance staff was also very helpful in explaining each deal that was available to us, and we really felt like they were working FOR us to get us the car we wanted at the best possible price. We're now driving around town in our new 2014 Ford Escape as happy as can be (without any of that dreaded buyer's remorse after big purchases). Thanks Galpin and Shane!
EXCELLENT AUTO REPAIR SHOP!!! Terry and crew are by far the most knowledgeable and friendly group of mechanics I have ever worked with! I can't say enough about how impressed I am with All Star Automotive Services. Go see them for yourself, it won't take long for you to see why these guys are now my preferred repair shop.
Best hand car wash in the city, my truck looking good!!
ทำงานเหนื่อยแล้ว ก็แวะมาทำสปา พักผ่อนแบบสปา ของเราใกล้ๆกัน
Sehr schön, Stefan! 1+ :)
I been going to this place for over10 years and would never get tired of it, it's service, food and their awesome beer.
My mother and I went in on 2/14/13 and got a tragus piercing in each ear. Richard performed the piercing, he was very patient and explained everything he was going to do before doing it. Everything was clean and well taken care of. If I decide to get another piercing, I will go back to MOLA and request Richard again!
I stopped in here yesterday to get my first piercing (excluding my ears) and was pleasantly surprised. I was a bit nervous but both the lady at the front as well as the piercer himself were very friendly and helped me to relax. It was very cheap, which worried me at first, but it certainly doesn't seem to show in the work. It was done very quickly and without pain. Everything he used came out of its own fresh unopened wrap, and he took his time ensuring proper placement. I'm very happy about the service, quality, and price of this place, and would definitely go back if I ever desire another piercing.
None
I just want to tell EVERYONE how awesome Emily Parks is- she really is excellent at her job.... she is friendly, understanding and listens and she really goes the extra mile when it comes to the specifics on what your looking for..... She was so patient with me when I changed something or wanted details in another area or just needed some time... unlike a lot of the other Promove agents (I have dealt with a few in the past!) she was not annoying and borderline stalker when trying to close in on her referral.... she was courteous and appropriate every single correspondence. Everyone should use her- she makes the process so easy!!!!! she is so awesome, I even referred my boyfriend to her when he was looking too!!!! --- thanks Emily!!!
Needed a microwave part fast! Ordered by phone Monday Feb 17 , part arrived Fri Feb 22 @ noon as Jasmine promised. Service like that is rare these days. Thank You !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Skeezix-in-FL
It's a small place but very good food and the owner is a mess!! You'll love it!!
None
I have been to this hookah lounge a handful of times and it is awesome. I will keep coming back over and over because the owner is very knowledgeable and proud of his business. Definite recommend!
Scott Magnuson, a Coulter Cadillac staff member, alerted the sales team on my behalf about the fact that I was looking for a car and the basic terms I was looking for in a deal. I had pre-approved financing through USAA and it was my goal to get a car out the door for less than my bank said it was worth, which would allow me to fiance the car 100% with no money down. A trade-in came in over a subsequent weekend that was a perfect match, and Bill Jurczak gave me a call. So confident was I in Scott's recommendation of me to Bill, and Bill's efforts in finding a perfect deal, that I basically bought the car sight unseen, went in the next day to finalize everything, and drove out one happy camper. By the end of the day, 110 of my Facebook friends agreed, I got a fantastic deal on a dependable used car, worth more than I paid for it. Yay for me! Hip Hip Hoorary for Bill, Scott and the Coulter Cadillac gang!
Fu-wa is just what a little neighborhood market should be. They've got the usual suspects of milk, newspapers and toilet paper. But they've got a small selection of fruits and vegetables as well. In addition, they've got a decent selection of Asian food products given the small size of the store. But the standout is the food - specifically the Vietnamese hoagies. Where they're chicken of tofu, these are hands down one of the tastiest and unique hoagies around. And the owners are nice to boot.
Great experiences here. Have been eating here almost once a week for over a year and have never been disappointed. We normally get take out but have eaten in several times, too. Service is great and if you order the same thing every week, like we do, they will start to remember you by name when you call. The V1 and V2 are great vegetarian dishes. Mmmmm. The spring rolls are great appetizers!
I had back, neck, and head injuries from a car accident, but after my sessions at Dr. Park Acupuncture, I no longer had those injuries. Dr. Park also helped with my chronic migraines, stomach pains, and knee/ankle pains/sprains from sporting injuries in the past. I would look forward to my 30 minute sessions every week--gives me an excuse to have some "me-time" while getting better during the process. The staff is very friendly, the facility is relaxing, inviting, and clean. Dr. Park knows his stuff, explains the process and everything you need to know without all those complicated medical terms. I would highly recommend Dr. Park Acupuncture.
I often drive by here on way home from work to get a family pack of boneless wings. These guys are always quick and the food is consistently good. Good value.
None
Took my 1997 Mastercraft Wakeboard boat there for some well need love. The sound system, interior and exterior were shot. They gave me a tour of their portfolio and HUGE shop and I was sold. The expert crew gave me many ideas and suggestions and allowed me to work with them through the whole upgrade process. We ended up completely vinyl wrapping the exterior of the boat, reupholstering the interior, replacing the carpet and sound system. They turned a boat that was weathered, old and tired into a work of art and I’m STOKED! I’ve had 10 people ask me when I got my new boat, it looks that good. Do yourself a favor and check this place.
None
Without question the lunch myself and my friends had at Atithi today was the best Indian food I have experienced in over twenty years. Which, speaking as someone fortunate enough to have eaten at some of the best restaurants the world over during my travels as a touring musician…is truly saying something. The entire experience was exactly as it should be, from start to finish. The waiting staff were attentive yet subtly non-intrusive, the food exquisitely presented by Chef and tasted sublime. Truly a central London gourmet Indian meal but with half the price-tag. If this is the shape and taste of 21-st century Indian dining then look no further than dear old Twickenham…really,really! I urge you to go along and try it for yourselves.
Great..never get lost..
This is a great barber with classic barber chair and hospitality. All barbers are really good at what they do. Of course my personal favorite was Sergio.
Bright and enthusiastic staff are always ready to help and assist us with our continuing need for the complimentary services on offer from this ever so useful and very local business, run by a delightful and helpful post mistress .
Paul does great work,making me feel young and strong again!
I am a dental student and i have shadowed many dentists. Dr. White was the very best. great staff and office. Really clean and very respectful of his patient's time. Since I am also a patient of his, it was comforting to see behind the curtains and find out that they really care about the patients. I would recommend White Smiles to anyone.
Chuck (owner) really took care of me and my vehicle! One stop fixed all my car's problems. I highly recommend Columbia auto repair. The thing I liked most about Columbia Auto Repair is that they took the time to explain everything that was wrong with my vehicle to me in a way I’d be able to understand. I highly recommend this shop to anybody looking for great customer service, honest prices, and fast but quality work. Mike F.
Excelente, muy confortable, el personal muy atento, las habitaciones amplias comodas, luminosas. Recomendable 100%
Thanks Michael, You made everything smooth and without stress. I can't express how grateful I am for your services. Great Job! Dan
I've always found these folks to be knowledgeable, courteous and very responsive. They work on our home and commercial properties. I've worked with them for nearly 20 years and recommend them often.
I love the service. and when I'm in a hurry they provide me a complementary car to drive around.
None
None
Love coming here. I'm a graphic designer and work from home most days. I do enjoy it, but I really like the change of scenery and connecting with other business professionals. I can get work done and it also helps to be able to get some feedback on my designs. In the interest of full disclosure, I do most of the design work for Coworking Connection and trade the work for my membership dues.
None
Dr. Bell has been my Chiropractor now for 2 years and he has helped me to be able to get closer to my health potential. Under his guidance I have been able to achieve new heights of physical fitness.
Greatest restaurant on the South Island! Great food, terrific wine, and fantastic service. They treated us like family.
Wow - a rare (for me) 5 star review. My son has been taking guitar lessons at Rokk Skoool for over a year now and I have to say I am thoroughly pleased with his progress and with Rokk Skoool in general. The Guitar 101 classes were 12 weeks and got him off to a good start and I could see steady progress from week to week. Now he is in a Rokk Band and performs live every few weeks or so. I don't know of any other music instruction system that will give a beginning musician that kind of experience at any price. Rokk Skoool is a group instruction system that, to be honest, I was a bit skeptical about initially. But as time progressed I began to see the value in this method. Now that he is in a Rokk Band he practices weekly with his band learning new songs. I never imagined that my son, now 11 YO, would be performing live in such a short time. Eric (the owner/instructor) is a talented musician and capable instructor and it shows just how much he cares about his students. I can think of no better start for your budding Rock Star to get started.
The whole experience is awesome. The food is amazing. For breakfast, get the hippie omeletteand buy extra tomato jam. Yes, tomato jam.
I searched high and low for a FJ Cruiser in Tampa that I felt was a fair deal. After dealing with private owners for over a month with no success, I called David Keller at Stadium Toyota and was surprised at the deal that was given to me on the first call. I sold cars for over 5 years and am very aware of the games some dealerships will play. But Stadium Toyota is a five star dealership, they cut straight to a fair number on a great FJ Cruiser that I was happy with. Thank You David Keller and Stadium.
None
Great scones
I've attended countless classes and also gone for massage at Soma Center. This place goes well beyond fitness to address the whole person and the effects have been life changing. Just walking in the door has a soothing, comforting effect. You'll find unique classes and wonderful healing services here. I can't even find words to describe the benefits I've reaped from frequenting this healing oasis... I recommend it wholeheartedly!
i have lived in englewood oved 30 years and have enjoyed eating here for the same. the food is always great, owners greet you with a smile.
this is one of the best shops ive been to in awhile they had thousands of parts in stock for your do it your self type people sometimes like me.they're turn around time on repairs was excellent only took two or three days tops unless parts needed to be ordered even then it was very fast service.The lady in front was very helpful and knowable about what she sells...good job guys keep up the good work the would recommend this shop to anyone
Excelente lugar para los salseros
Air Bird Charters is Best Air Service, Air Craft, and Air Ambulance, Private Corporate, and Helicopter Service Provider Company in India.
today March 23 2014 i went to public storage and this man was so friendly and nice to me. he helped me me to find right unit with seconds. Thank you for the best costumer service i ever had:)
Super cool diner with an LA vibe. The maple bacon doughnut is a must try!
Stupenda da nn perdere
Great Service. Good Food.
Listen here FOODIES: You will want to try this place. It is really--really--really good. That is three reallys from someone who feels so very strongly about high quality food. SO strong do I feel about this place that I unwittingly swore in earlier part of this review and decided to go back and edit out the explicative in order tone it down and keep it G rated. But I am telling you I feel that kind of passion about this place. I love their pork loin white bean special and went back for it 3 times in a week. I am a busy working mom and that level of obsession can only come with something this delectable. I loved their paella. I love their guacamole. I love their agua fresco which is not your typical fruits, they mix it up with guava for instance. Tacos, fresh tortilla chips, even the sangria has no rival. I am looking forward to my next stop here-maybe tomorrow….
None
I ran a training course here recently for a small group of Excel users from a national retail chain. The pre- sales support from Dan was excellent and his team were very helpful in ensuring all PCs were set up & ready for us. Lunch arrangements were very efficient & attention to detail was superb. Can't hesitate to recommend Mike Glaire (MD) & his whole team for a fabulous end-to-end experience. Looking forward to returning there soon.
Loved it
Fantastic service, incredible atmosphere, pretty decent food. The staff was incredibly helpful and our experience was entirely fulfilling. The brisket was a little dry but it's clear that they don't necessarily specialize in that. Their pulled pork was fantastic and the sauces tasted great. Love this place and will definitely return when we head north again. Keep up the good work!
Divine! This is where my hubby & son took me, when I got to go home from the hospital! Staff, food and atmosphere are fantastic! Thank you Grimaldi's!
I couldn't have had a better experience. The staff was super friendly, attentive and helpful. I was also very impressed with a hand-written letter I received a week or so after buying my wedding dress. I've never received something like that from a business, especially after already making a purchase. It made me feel great that they took the time and effort to write a letter like that. I highly recommend this store!
This is my favorite Mexican restaurant of all time, the service is awesome I go as much as I can, a place where they treat u just like family...
Great coffee, especially iced coffee, for relatively low prices. Friendly and prompt service.
Great value for all you can eat. Dont know what people are complaining about. Rolls are so out of this world delicious.
I have been coming in to see Hyejung to manage my stress/anxiety for 5 weeks now. After 10 sessions I have over 50% improvement overall! The way I perceive the stressors in my life and the way I react to them are a lot different. I feel more relaxed and calm :)
Monster cookies gluten-free
None
For the past few years I've been living in a condo managed by Jonathan Beck of Rancho Management and thus far am more than happy with their service. He has been excellent at addressing any concerns or questions I have in timely and reliable manner, even outside of regular business hours. Both he and Rancho have been a pleasure to deal with. Highly recommended if you're looking for a professional management service.
None
Super nice and so quick to fix the broken glass on my Michael Kors watch. They also replaced it with a higher quality one and put in a new water resistant band. I've been here previously to get links removed off my watches and I've always had a great experience. They're friendly and fix things on the spot. Definitely recommend this place to anyone in the downtown Toronto area!
Lo Comedores Del Mercado Se Come Muy Rico 👍👌
Jerry, Rebecca and the guys at JL Hearn are a joy to work with! They are "Johnny on the spot" when we call and they do it right the first time! Thanks for your help to keep our remodeling business running smoothly
None
I just purchased my first new car from Townsend Brothers Chevrolet. They were extremely helpful to me! I had tons of questions and they were able to answer everything and were happy to help me. I'm so thankful that I went there and I'm very happy with my purchase!
My experience at Castle Pines Family Dentistry was fabulous! They were friendly, took enough time to see me, didn't rush, and made me feel comfortable. The facility is easily located in Castle Pines and is clean and has a great energy. I go back for a cleaning this month and I wouldn't choose anywhere else to go!
None
Brilliant! It has all the comics I needed the first time I visited. I have now become a regular customer. The service is great, even when the shop is busy. Higly recommend this shop if you are interested in comics and things of that nature.
None
The food, service, and prices are excellent. The beef is locally farm raised by the owner, very economic, and the burgers are out of this world! Super Burger blows these fast food chains out of the water with their quality and variety of food. An excellent hometown burger joint for locals and those just passing thru.
None
The Well wants nothing more than to be Jesus to people. They are genuine people who want to meet you where you're at and engage in real life with you.
I first came across Zephoria when I worked at Varsity Spirit Fashions, a renown cheerleading and dance company, in Memphis, TN. Zephoria assisted me in brainstorming, creating, tracking and programming a state of the art Wordpress blog, The Varsity Sideline, for Varsity. After working at Varsity, I started a non-profit organization called Be Free Revolution. Because of the incredible work ethic, customer service, efficiency, innovative mindsets and superb team oriented staff, I knew I only wanted to work with Zephoria with my non-profit. When I told Dan Noyes, who we worked with from Zephoria, about my wanting to start BFR, an organization working to help others help themselves globally (specifically in Africa), he instantly supported me and wanted to see how he could help! This just shows how they cared about us as people and not just as a client. At BFR, they helped us brainstorm, host and program our website befreerevolution.org. I do not have enough words of praise for this company. I worked closely with Dan Noyes, and I always felt he had our organization's very best interest at heart. He treated us like family and not just a client. We trust him and, therefore, Zephoria implicitly and they never steered us wrong. The communication level was impeccable and I felt they really listened to our ideas and innovated our technology, based on our needs and wants for our brand. Their company exudes high character and integrity, which is worth more than money can buy. If you are considering Zephoria you will not be let down and I can guarantee they will exceed all your expectations. Lacey Stluka Co-Founder Be Free Revolution
None
I really had an efficient and fast closing in March 2011 with Pacific when I did a slightly complex simultaneous transaction - the sale of my existing sailboat and the purchase of my powerboat. People's bank did all the financing - great folks. The sailboat was sold by Ryan at Swiftsure Yachts and the powerboat broker was Dan Wood of Crow's Nest. Everyone did a great job (lender, brokers and escrow closer) and I was very pleased. Like riding the magic carpet, it went so smooth. Sorry it took a while to get around to writing the review. Good jobs folks! J. MaGee, Tacoma, WA.
Best Fish & Chips on the Beach!
None
my life was here
None
This place deserves 5 stars every time because every dish I've had here has bowled me over!! The people are great, their commitment to the community is unparalleled and the food couldn't be more delicious!!
BR Softech is a fastest IT growing company in jaipur, and providing custom software development, web development, SEO services, Mobile Application Services of all over the world.
Lee Ho helps me to get the great space for me. Thank you!!! You are so nice :-)
Xtreme Services Unlimited did a great job for us. We were really pleased with the quality of their work and I would recommend them in the future.
None
My experience with Autoway Toyota has been nothing but excellent. I have had 2 Highlanders, 1 Corolla and now a brand new 2013 Toyota Camry. The car is awesome and my sales rep Scott Tanke was fantastic at helping me with all questions I had. He also took the time to explain the radio and show me how to use it, as it appeared complicated at first glance, but it's not. He connected my cell to the Bluetooth for me and off I go. It was a great experience and they are wonderful to work with.
Ocliff thats wasdup best burgers evev x-)
Girls are friendly, coffee is the best in town have tried the others S&J's is always consistent and the best. Go here!
It's a nice place for hanging out with friends! Their best includes Steak, Buffalo Wings and Italian Lasagna! Sheesha is also available so avoid bringing kids with yourself.
Have been using All Car Express for years now and have never had any issues with them, There service only becomes more reliable and more efficient, I will continue to use All Car Express in my next service and years to come.
I bought a car from these guys even though I live six hours away. They were able to get me the truck I wanted and the payment I wanted. Rob P. was fantastic as a salesman, and the finance staff were also excellent. In fact, the truck only came with one key, and so they sorted out a key at a local dealership for me. Then, almost a month after I bought the truck, out of the blue I found a package from them in my post box! Rob had sent me the missing key! How awesome is that!?
I had created a t-shirt design for our school's program and submitted it to CreateMyTee thinking the design was going to be too complicated. To our surprise, the t-shirt artist was able to make the design work perfectly and in no time at all. Seeing that the design would work, over the next two months our program fussed over design details, shirt colors and styles. The representative and artist I worked with were both extremely helpful, polite, patient and understanding throughout the entire process. They were also very quick to respond to any questions and were able to come up with great recommendations and sample artwork. We just received the shirts today and we couldn't be more pleased with how they turned out! Many thanks!
I love to go there to have my haircut done. You always have a good talk and leave being sure that you look excellent.
None
I needed a Rowlett Electrician for my home. I got quotes from other electrical companies in Rowlett but Affiliated gave me the best prices. They also came out immediately where the others said it would be a couple of days. I will use them again for sure. If you need a good electrician service in Rowlett, then I recommend you call Affiliated.
Everything is awesome about this place
El Porton is a festive restaurant. The service was excellent. The menu offers many entrees, beverage and desserts. The food is very tasty and good, the chips are exceptional, homemade. The draw back with the salsa is for me, the one served is hot and i need a mild to mix them. The appearance of the exterior is deceiving. I recommend this for good mexican style and food!
None
Best chicken tikka masala I have ever had!
Excelente lugar para comer y escuchar folclore.
Had no problems with the service or other staff. Food was prompt and delicious. The ceviche is absolutely the best item on the menu. Camarones Borrachos are a fantastic shrimp dish with a chipolte pepper and sauce. Only problem was that we had the peel the shrimp. Definitely not your run of the mill Mexican Restaurant. We enjoyed it so much the first day we came back the next.
Your Philadelphia steak and cheese sandwiches were like being in Philly
Always a cheerful smile waiting at HS-1. My favourite dish - the HS-1 Burger.
Sehr gutes Essen ( Pizza, Tortillas, Lasagne, Nudl, Backhendl, Thai-Küche ) Freundliches Personal Guter Wein Besonderes Ambiente
I love Parkwood Meadows! This is the best job that I have ever had. The staff is amazing and we are more like one big family. I think we have the best residents, they are all so cool and I have enjoyed getting to know them on a more personal level. I love to hear their stories and meet their families. There are many assisted livings' in Idaho Falls, but none quite like Parkwood. After seeing the internal workings and the integrity of our company, I would not have my loved ones anywhere else! Alana Ward
Cheap, clean and huge. The perfect place to take an hour from work for "lunch."
This place is amazing! EVERYTHING tasted extremely fresh. The service was fast and the food was outstanding! I would recommend it to all!
None
BEST CUPCAKES EVER!!!!!!!!!!
Great Food! Love the Pepper Steak.....
Honestly, we love it here. Everyone in the office goes above and beyond whenever we need something, maintenance is usually very prompt. The landscaping is beautiful, and they do an excellent job keeping it that way. The location is excellent - being able to walk to Ybor is a definite bonus - and the neighborhood isn't as bad as some reviewers have made it out to be. The pool is well maintained and resident access only ( no worries about neighborhood kids jumping in) and there is on site security at night and on the weekends. We rented here sight unseen from out of state, and I'm glad we did!
Ich mag das Hotel Viktoria. Die viktorianische Großvilla, in der früher mal ein Musikmuseum beheimatet war, ist ein architektonisch sehr interessantes Haus. Wer ein Hotel abseits der Ketten sucht, direkt am Rhein in einem sehr ruhigen Viertel gelegen, der bekommt hier etwas besonderes. Die Service-Mitarbeiter sind sehr kompetent und zuvorkommend, die Zimmer groß und einladend. Das Hotel Viktoria ist ein Tip für einen Gast, der etwas besonderes in Köln sucht.
Dr. Ron Vaselenko, D.C. is the best of the best of chiropractors in Orange County. As Director of Business Development for iNet Realty I work with Real Estate Agents every day. An agent spends their day, driving, showing property and a lot of computer work. In short they do every thing that they should not do to protect their back and neck. When not talking about homes they talk about Chiropractors. On the advise of many of my agents I went to Dr. Vaselenko with my neck and back problems. I found Dr. Vaselenko exceptional with his care. He took his time. Dr. Vaselenko told me what he was doing and most important why. I would recommend Dr. Ron Vaselenko to any one that needs great chiropractic help. Jim Forde - Tustin, CA
I brought a new girlfriend here and it was so romantic with the sun going down over the sea and marsh. The staff were relaxed, but attentive, confident, friendly and accommodating. I was surprised in a positive way when the bill came, so left a generous, tip, which was totally justified. The food, which appeared to be simple and uncomplicated had lots of subtle touches and was cooked to perfection (my steak was spot on and with the Red peppercorns in the sause/garnish made the dish interesting and exciting to the palette). Thank you for helping the date to go well, I am very impressed and "we'll be back" as Arnie would say.
All of the doctors at Spring Ridge Chiropractic are excellent! They literally keep me going! I wok in marketing and PR, and spend way too many hours at the computer. Dr. Ortiz has given me valuable tips on posture and how to align my arms and back at the computer, along with stretches for stiff muscles. Their staff is also very friendly and professional. Thanks to all of you!!
None
Good eating. If you can call in first. Great food.
The best haircut I've ever gotten. I look so swag. All thanks to this business. Request Amber Moody you won't regret it
Started this gym today after never having been to any gym, and I was surprised by how lovely it was. Staff are amazingly helpful and so polite and caring. The equipment is awesome and it's just a really lovely place to achieve your goals.
I have been a client of Eye Care of Iowa for several years. My insurance changed and Diane worked very hard to find a way for me to continue seeing Dr Lee. It took a lot on her part, but she was able to get it done. I would highly recoomend this group!
We were just there a couple days ago and I must say we were very impressed with the professional and super friendly quality service we received there. Transmissions problems are a real headache, but these guys make good on their promise to provide the quick service we have come to rely on. Honestly I would have found a way to do some sort of review anyway, they deserve it. Thanks guys:)
Beautiful dining experience. Asked to be seated by the window facing Central to enjoy the Holiday hustle and bustle. Fabulous Spinach salad, eggplant was divine. Love the decor. Will be back!
Because I can...
Amei!
For those who are looking for help with undergroung plumbing problems look no further. The Trenchless Co is your answer. On time as scheduled a tech was sent out to give me an estimate. Brendan Wood was the tech sent, and his professional and personal opinion were greatly appreciated. Brenden was extreamly helpfull. He represents his company well with clear communication,professionalism and customer service. We all know customer service is almost a thing of the past but you will still find it at The Trenchless Co.
None
A comprehensive high school which consist of three curicculums namely : GENERAl, SCIENCE, and the newest program, whereas SPECIAL PROGRAM FOR JOURNALISM. An eco-friendly places and conducive for learning activities, sport activities and others. MY ALMA MATER :)
None
None
None
None
Casada cake!
Mi hanno ripristinato un alimentatore della Asus per soli 3,64 Euro! Hanno cambiato il connettore da inserire a lato pc e si sono preoccupati anche di saldarmelo sul posto. 10 minuti ed un risparmio di ben 27 Euro, dato che avevano in vendita l'alimentatore sostitutivo per 30 Euro... Ho 20 anni di esperienza in Customer Care per l'ambito I.T.: RFL è un caso esemplare di professionalità. Complimenti. Gabriele Dorfmann
Fast and friendly service. Will definitely be my place to go for auto repair.
Exceptional service as always. Customer for 8 years and counting.
None
Spent 2 nights here with dinner and loved it so much! Wonderful Inn, great food, and excellent hosts.
Cena ottima e cameriere gentilissime!!!
Unbeatable customer service.
This place is awesome. Great selection of all sorts of meat products. Can't wait to see what this place grows into. So much potential.
just came back..Very very smooth business. place cleaner than most italian restaurants, took a seat, super nice lady asked me clearly what i wanted before proceeding, i had no idea..she popped a few, best haircut ever! very affordable..5 star recommendation!
great
Friendly and Thorough Everyone there is very friendly and patient (even with all four of our kids there). Dr Yin communicates very well with us what she is doing and what is going on, not like other eye doctors that forget that they are dealing with actual human beings. Her staff is also very knowledgeable, they were able to happily answer all our questions.
Had a great first visit fixed one rattle, next week we will get the other rattle fixed. 2004 trailblazer muffler / compressor
I agree with the comment made about old fashioned store and that is why I love Weather's TV! I had researched washers and dryers for 10 days. I visited the chain stores, Hahn's Appliance. Sears and Metro Appliance. Although I experienced pleasant customer service from all these places, the price was not right. As a last ditch effort, I called Weather's to see what they had. I was assisted by Jake and he offered me a deal I couldn't refuse! To my delight, I received an excellent price on a Whirlpool set with all the features I wanted. I was thrilled to find out they threw in the hoses plus delivery and set up for free!. The only thing I paid for was the washer and dryer; there were no hidden fees, no "oh by the ways" just the price and tax. On top of all that, the delivery was scheduled for just a few days after the purchase. I didn't have to wait a week which was the going delivery time for the chain stores. I would recommend Weather's to anyone in the market for TV's or appliances; they are willing to deal and that is a rarity these days.
Very helpful staff. Steve always gets back to me in a timely manner with repair updates and quotes. Everything is explained clearly and my questions are answered.
Excellent college in terms of academics and placements, love working here..... very good infrastructure... good opportunity for students to raise their potentials..... future of education lies here....
Always great food and service. The O'Malley Mac is incredible and they have great pizza (you need to ask for it at lunch as it's not on the menu).
None
None
None
Me and my girlfriend went to Incredible Pizza for Valentine's day and had a lot of fun. The weekly specials are great and the price for food and drinks is one of the best in the area. Great food at a great price is even better when you get to enjoy one of the many themed dining areas, one which is set up as a theater room and another with several tv's that allow kids to watch shows they like and adults to watch sports or news etc. All of that combined with the game area where there are lots of fun games to play and you no longer have to worry about keeping track of tickets as they are stored directly on your card. There is also a side area for younger children to play while the older kids can enjoy go karts, bumber cars, lazer tag, and just about any arcade game you could want.
Very clean hotel, very friendly staff and a great room.
None
I have a lot of memories with this place,once i visited with my friend, enjoy and learnt alot about great history of our country. Everyone should visit the the first wonder of the world at least once in their life.thanks..to...ijdream vacations pvt. ltd.
I went into this very friendly, up-scale, store in NYC about a week ago to sell some old gold jewelry I no longer had use for. I had been too many other jewelry stores, gold buyers and even some pawn shops and wasn't getting near what I wanted. My salesperson at DD Buyers was so knowledgeable and welcoming, not only did I sell them my jewelry (for the best amount I found anywhere), but I also ended up selling them my old Cartier watch (cash was too good). They made a normally unpleasant experience very enjoyable. Thanks, DD Buyers for your great, fair business and great people!
Just bought a Ford F-150 from AutoNation Ford of Bradenton. Can not say enough about how kind and helpful Tim Betts was from the greeting on the lot, the test drive to answering of all our questions. Tim was very easy to talk to and I never felt any pressure during the whole transaction. After the deal, Tim does a Great job of following up to make sure all is going well with your new auto. All the staff was very friendly. If your looking for a new auto give Tim a call. Thanks again!!!
Showed up two and a half weeks early and was in an out in less than 30 min. It was a simple fix really and took no time at all.
Opening 23 at 8 pm.
None
I gave it 5 stars, but the phrase "loved it" isn't quite appropriate. The Memorial was the most moving and emotional place - so well done and such a tribute to those who died. I can't encourage people enough to go - and to remember.
None
First Bank of the Palm Beaches has done me a great service in so many ways. I was always battling these big banks phone systems just to try to get a live person on the phone. I spoke to Chris one day and he said that everyone at the bank is always attended too promptly, so I decided to try them. Ever since then, my banking has been so much easier! Definitely try First Bank of the Palm Beaches to give you the local community bank service.
Jaye fogholadei bud...
None
best sicilian slice out there
A classic theatre that skips the crazy found at a megaplex. Few choices due to the three screens, but it's the perfect pairing with a date night is amazing ballard.
None
None
Far from being a typical rice and noodle slop shop, The Nelson Tavern’s palatial eatery is haute Thai to the hilt. With a relaxing atmosphere, welcoming staff and fair prices it can only be recommended highly.
None
Everything right on time !!! Thanks to Jeff and Govi for providing exceptional customer service from order to installation.. love it and my project was done with every little details and perfect measurements..no time for fuss. Thank you all for great team efforts. From, Nisha Tailor Interior Design, LLC
Awesome BBQ has great flavor did not need sauce the pulled pork was moist and has a deep juicy flavor. We are looking forward to eating here again.
None
How have I managed to visit Lincoln a squillion times & fail to miss this place ?? Awesome burgers, a relaxed and friendly atmosphere & great service.
None
Best college
If you live in LA and take your car anywhere else to get an alignment or any work for that matter, you are an idiot. They have state of the art equipment and are good people. You're not going to get swindled or pressured into repairs you don't need. It's too bad I can only rate them 5 stars.
La mejor barbacoa!!! De todo el metro plex
iPhone Doctor sure knows about iPhones. He can fix them all, even water damage phones. He can unlock them, change colors, and he's got so many iPhone cases. Price wise, he is the cheapest and also warranty his work and parts. Check him out.
Excellent Nepalese food and friendly service
Great experience at this sweet little hotel. Unbeatable location, friendly and competent staff, really thoughtful and unique amenities. My room was clean, comfortable, and so many useful touches, such as a full-length mirror, iPod doc with sleep sounds, and a closet just down the hall with extra pillows, blankets, toothbrushes, etc. I strongly suggest avoiding the hotel restaurant - my herb omelette was terribly overcooked, completely unseasoned, and swimming in vegetable oil next to some potato crumbles and the service was well below what I encountered in the hotel itself.
I had a great visit to this location. I recieved great customer service from Brittany.. she was very helpful with everything and had a great personality...I would definitely recommend this place! thanks brittany.!.
My daughter and I took our cars in for a Living Social oil change deal we purchased. The team at High Tech were extremely pleasant and easy to work with. I'll go back!
Love the chilli chicken and the wonton soup!
None
Just go! Awesome food.
I love this place! Wonderful selection of libations, cheese, and meats. There are always great economy options (for the day to day), as well as reasonably priced fine wines and beers for gifts and special occasions. I've been shopping here for years, and they are always well stocked. The staff are very knowledgeable and friendly as well. #reviewsday
Some of the best Cuban food of my life!
يتميز بحسن الضيافة .. الغرف الجميلة .. الراحة و الرفاهية .. الخدمة المميزة
So many people have come here, literally from around the world. Most will never be the same.
Favorite place in tha whole wide world! (in my lil kid voice) LOL.
None
Fuimos 5 personas. El servicio muy amable, nos trataron muy bien. Pedimos un arroz que nos llegó en su punto y en una cantidad abundante, casi todos repetimos. Los postres una maravilla. Dos vinos, dos entrantes, un arroz y postre por 30€ por cabeza. Teniendo en cuenta el servicio, la comida y que esta en pleno centro de Valencia el precio resulta muy ajustado, relativamente barato.
M.Zain a tech of computer in this school
None
Had several things done on different occasions including a strut that needed more work after the fact and they took care of it free of charge. Honest, efficient, and they stand behind their work. Maybe a bit more expensive than some places but worth it. Highly recommended.
We lost most of the grass in our backyard in the summer of 2011. Jeremy and his crew were able to replace the sod with a specific grade of grass that will be more resistant to the weather deviations we have in this part of SE Texas. They also were able to match the sod to go along with the other vegetation in our back yard. The best part, the price was a lot less than we expected.
Once again great service, in and out in a hour. Prices as good as anything online. Discount Tire is a far better choice that their competition (rhymes with Les Bob). As the lead tech at a local dealership, I highly recommend this and any Discount Tire location!
Great presentation and most incredible bread while you wait. Terrific service and great dining experience.
This Lady is not only a fine doctor. But one of the most laid back and coolest ladies I have ever met. I will be referring her to everyone I know. She will be my doctor for LiFe!
I LOVE Touch Healing Wellness and Spa! I've been in pain since the early 90's and in my first visit with Dr. Mike Rivers, I was relieved of a pain that has kept me awake most every night! After visiting with Dr. River, I unwind in the "relaxation room" with soothing, tranquil music to calm your soul after a busy day while waiting for my fantastic message therapist, Jackie, who's hands are like no other message I've ever had! Touch Healing Wellness and Spa is the total package with the services and skin care treatment they offer! It's an incredible experience!
A fantastic pub with great food and accommodation. The great staff are the cherry on the top. Highly recommend!
None
I have a great time going. Staff is friendly. I love the different kind of wings.
Ótima Pizzaria! Massa fininha e saborosa, bom atendimento, ambiente familiar, decoração rústica muito criativa, possui um pequeno acervo histórico de objetos antigos(Câmeras fotográficas, rádios, máquinas de calcular de teclado múltiplo, moinho, etc..), preço dentro dos padrões de maringá. Ah.. Além das pizzas, as esfihas são uma delicia! Adoro as de abóbora com côco e goiabada com catupiry!
I went for the first time in 2012/13 and had so much fun that I bought a season pass this year. The drive from Minneapolis is worth it. It has to be on your bucket list, right next to Snowbird and Jackson Hole. Thought the vertical is shorter than most amazing ski resorts, this one is up there with the best of them. It has to be experienced!
Visiting the area on vacation and found this place by chance. Loved it! It was the perfect size slice and it tasted great and it was very well priced!
this is by far the best place to get a massage hands down!! no other place in town can hold a candle to them!
One week of comfort! From the facilities to the food, which comes highly recommended and very delicious, and affordable, and the customer service, this is a to-go place for anyone wanting to stay in Addis, and needing a place that is walking distance to the UN Economic Commission for Africa. 9/10
Super bon, t'es obliger d'y revenir!
None
We had brunch today after mass and it was great. We will return.
Good Service Hotel Drona Hotel Thanks Gaurav Sharma
None
My childhood time, s best restaurant... best samosas...vineet asthana
Danny Atienza has been someone we've gone to for cars for over 15 years. Not saying we haven't purchased other brands, but over 80% of our purchases with cars have been with Honda and that's mainly because of Danny. He has been honest and respectful of our time, money and choice. He is never shy to tell us not to take the deal if he thought the deal will hurt us long term. Besides, Danny has been so good that he does not wait outside for customers. Long time clients look for Danny inside the building. That tells you A LOT. Our family bought a Honda Odyssey in Oct 2012, another Odysse in Nov 2012, Pilot in Feb 2013, a Civic in June 2013, and an Insight in Oct 2013
We try and eat at the slanted door every time we are in SF. the food is great and so are the staff. The views of the Bay bridge is hard to beat
Best catered food around. Prices for cold cuts are lowest in area and the pizza is terrific.
I lived in a Lobos Owned property in Avalon (Queensbury) for almost 2 years. Never had a problem at all. The heat was included in the rent, which was very nice, especially when budgeting expenses. My electric bill was usually less than $50 and a water bill ran about $20ish. Very reasonable. Off street parking. Nice neighborhood, too. While I was there, they replaced all the hallway carpets and the hallway wall coverings. We got new washing machines and dryers in the second year. I had one issue with a leaking faucet and an entire new faucet was put in a few hours after I called the office. One thing I liked about the building was that it had cement ceilings... I never heard anything from my neighbors, not even a footstep, unless we were both on our decks at the same time. Kuhns grocery was 3 blocks away. Ohio River Blvd another 3 blocks away in a different direction. I was only 3 miles from the stadiums and casino. The cost savings to live outside the city as opposed to downtown, Mt. Washington, Shadyside, etc...far outweighed the inconvenience of driving a few extra miles.
Суперское кофе
Great venue, easy to get too, well staffed, all seats have great views. Drinks and food rather expensive !!! Stella tallboy was $10.25 (each)
When I bought my first property at 20, I used Mortgage Success to help me navigate through the seemingly scary process of securing a mortgage. Roberta and Tara were always there when I needed them and educated me along the way. I greatly appreciated their attention to detail and wide-range of experience with many different lenders. When the time came for me to renew, Mortgage Success was there to help me again in renegotiating my amortization and rate. I don't think I will ever get a mortgage directly from a bank when I know already that Roberta and Tara will search high and low to get me the best rate possible.
Getting LASIK done with Dr Mazaheri was great. I was slightly nervous about the procedure going in, but it was done quickly and painlessly, and I went from being unable to read my alarm clock to vision that is 20/20, and might even end up better. The followups have also been quick, easy, and thorough. If you have ever wondered if LASIK is right for you, just go see Dr Mazaheri, and you will be scheduling the time off work (a Thursday and Friday) for the procedure before you know it.
Best gyros in Milwaukee. Reasonable prices with generous portions. If you are going there with a friend, I recommend ordering a gyro with an extra pita cause there is enough meat to make 2.
Nejlepší káva v Opavě
I like it!!!
Great steak subs.
We just moved to the Greenbelt area and have already tried a few other repair shops. We've been trying to fix our repair engine light so we can pass the emissions test. We've received varying opinions about the repair and large estimates. I decided to go to Meineke because they specialize in exhaust systems and we had a couple coupons. My experience with these chain places has varied greatly depending on the management, but overall, I am very pleased with this particular experience. Making an appointment is a little weird. You either have to make one on the internet or walk in -- you can't really call and make an appointment. Once I was there, though, the service was great and the building was clean. Waiting was not an unpleasant experience. They quoted me the lowest price yet for my catalytic converter and finished the repair in just over an hour. I'll definitely be back.
The best place to blow bowling in abudhabi
A beautiful place for a spiritual experience.
Outstanding! Best Yakiniku I've had in the US. As good or better than the Yakiniku in Japan. A perfect meal.
None
None
Love this little place.....great pedicures where the polish stays on forever!!!! never chips!!! and lovely nails i haven't ever broken one here!!! love it!!!!!
I love this place. I always have. Their delicious Pizza is even better than 95% of the Pizza sold "down the road in" New York City. The Sandwiches are always fresh & delicious, and I swear they weigh about five lbs. each; unlike a place like 'Subway', where their Sandwiches are mostly made of (all) Bread. But there's also something else about Lodi Pizza that I love. That is, that some of the same people have owned and ran it-for what has to be at least the past 40 or so years-are still there. Mainly, the two Guys with the graying hair who (now) run Lodi Pizza, who are the Sons of the original Owners. I remember them when they were Kids, doing their Homework while they helped their Mom & Dad run this very special family business. There's something about that old School kind of tradition that goes far beyond how great their Pizza or Sandwiches are. It's a reminder of how no matter how much things change, that there are still a few things left in this world that never change. And one of those few things that never changed is Lodi Pizza. May it stay a part of Lodi forever. -Ronnie Giles
Excellent service.. very cooperative staff.. location is good as well.. highly recommended..
Probably the best food of its type in all Ventura county. Omar is a master, and very friendly. Fantastic food. Never had a bad meal. Shwarmas are all great. You'lbe back, once you've gone once
Great Experience. I was impressed with the overall respect and care provided by Infiniti Downtown. My Salesperson Kyle Burgess directed me towards several vehicles that fit my needs, efficiently addressing my questions about each vehicle and taking the time to point out the features/details. Would definitely recommend this dealership.
None
# สวยกว่านี้ไม่มีอีกแล้ว :) สวยมากๆครับ :D บริการดีเยี่ยม บรรยากาศดี ร่มรื่น สงบ ^ ^
Got me everything I needed to get a chess club started on one stop!
Great place to work out! All of the equipment is brand new and they have the latest technology. There is always equipment available and the gym is never packed. If you get the Premium membership (only $10/month more), you get to use the aqua massage, tanning bed, and the reACT system (kind of hard to describe, but a killer quick workout).
We eat in Cafe Breizh traditional French restaurant on a regular basis and recommend it to all our self catering guests who visit Perth. Try the Italian style pizza...its the best we have tasted outside of Italy. Never had a bad meal here.
Playing on one of their Dominator hoops is amazing! They are super solid, and look spectacular. I can't believe how different and amazing the experience is playing on the Dominator versus other hoops I've played on.
Fantastic service from the minute we walked in to our final departure. Check-in was fast and smooth. I stopped back by the front desk an hour after checking on a busy Saturday afternoon and Jeanne addressed me by my name! Our jacuzzi suite was very clean and roomy. At breakfast, we were asked three different times how our food was. I have to say it was delicious. Loved the location close to the Arch and Laclede's Landing. The beds were softer than we were used to but still slept well. We also liked how secure the hotel was. You could not leave the main floor, lobby area, or access the parking garage without swiping your room key. We are looking forward to making this our permanent resting place for our frequent travels to STL.
None
Savory cupcakes you will crave long after they are gone.
I stumbled across Pappadeaux Sunday Brunch a few months ago and I am addicted! If I keep this up I will weigh 300 lbs but I love it! LOL Everything on the brunch is delish...with no "tasteless filler" items like at so many other brunches/buffetts. I have found it to be one of the very best in town and well worth every penny. The service is great and I just dont think you can beat it anywhere. Enjoy!
When one of my clients needs a great website built in a short time period and on a tight budget, Twistlab is who I turn to.
My wife and I have been leasing vehicles from Varsity Lincoln ever since the dealership first opened. The sales staff and the service advisors have been no less than excellent throughout the years. I recently leased a Lincoln MKZ from Varsity Lincoln and the process was streamlined and hassle free as usual. We consider ourselves customers for life and I would encourage anyone looking for a quality vehicle from a dealership that is courteous and caring throughout to stop by Varsity Lincoln for an enjoyable no pressure shopping experience.
Pricey, but totally worth it! I saw Con-Air at a movie theater. That alone impresses me. I saw "Master Pancake" (like Mystery Science Theater, if you've heard of it) and it was hilarious. Food was actually pretty good, too.
Excellent professional!
This is a great facility to take the family to learn about archery. The people are friendly and the indoor facility makes shooting in the summer heat very enjoyable. Your kids will have a great time and be taught by very knowledgeable archery professionals.
It doesnt get any better for local pubs. Great food, service.
None
None
I've been looking for a good facialist for years! I've been to a few facialist at dermatoligists and spas but havent found one that wowed me and my skin. Finally after searching through Google I found Universal Laser Center located in Coral Gables. They have Hydrafacial therapy a nice microdermabrasion with hydratation right after the old skin is taken off. my fines lines are totally gone and I am having the last of 6 session next week, with greats results, I recommended to anyone. the value is 150 per session if you buy multiples session they do a generous discount, they also had the sun block from Clayton 50% off.
None
York IT Services have looked after our business's computers and network for a number of years now. We have always been very satisfied by their service and can recommend them to businesses and individuals looking for an efficient, reliable and personable IT company
Salut has been one of my staples for years. Ze Salut Steak Sandwich has always been a go to meal and my only complaint is that the sandwich's steak changed a few years back and the sandwich is now smaller than it was years ago.
None
I don't' know why is there so many crybabies reviewing . Over the years they serviced clutch, brakes, belts and did a collision repair on my Audi... Ford dealership wanted 3950$ for collision but Alex and Sergey did it for 1800$. They are good and they get the job done at a reasonable price. Not too cheap not too expensive. I take my wife's car to these guys and I recommend it to my friends. regards nick
None
One of the most beautiful fall in Sri lanka... Superb view.. an adventurous journey..... 5*
The staff at Hide Away are amazing ! I was under a lot of stress the day I went in to rent a unit and the staff put me right at ease. I would highly recommend this place to anyone with storage needs. The facility is really clean, too .
Extremely friendly staff. Felt really like welcomed there. Food/Drink were excellent! Beautiful view of the water. My new favorite place. I plan on telling all my friends and family. Can't wait until my next day off to go back.
Can be loud and echo-y but the poutine is delicious
Excelente
Heute hatten wir zu Fünft als Vorspeise Jakobsmuscheln und dann den weltzartesten Hirschbraten. Mittlerweile ein professioneller Service und der Chef und Koch, Heinz-Josef Hegers, ist sowieso klasse!
None
I purchased a 2014 Kia Sorrento. This is the most amazing dealership I have ever experienced! They walked you through every detail of the vehicle, inside and out. They also showed us how to use every feature the vehicle offered. They even walked us through the dealership and explained every detail to us regarding bringing my new vehicle in for service, free car washes, and introduced us to the Service Manager. Every single person we encountered was friendly, helpful, and very upbeat and fun!
Me and my mother were going to see a performance of Les Mis and set about Google-ing the best restaurants within walking distance of Shaftesbury avenue. Well I happened to stumble across this one and what luck, it was better than either of us could have imagined. I'll admit that we were worried due a few bad reviews but I'm so so glad that we stuck with it. The staff were extremely friendly and attentive, glasses were always full. I will recommend the salmon starter, although all the food was heavenly. The best meal I have ever had, genuinely. The bathroom was stunning although extremely hot for some reason. Go. Soon. You won't regret it, a beautiful evening of class and fine dining.
None
None
Great place. Eat here and swoon.
These guys are AWESOME!! good food and ice cream!! Price cant be beat!!
Very good place to taste hot chocolate served in a very special way. Highly recommended :)
So far I am extremely impressed with the advice and help I have been given from this company, specifically Angela Tooch, from Victorian finance. She has gone above and beyond in helping me with my home buying experience and answering my questions very quickly. I'd highly recommend this group to anyone! A++
Stop in for Sunday breakfast and ate out on the deck. Was allowed to have our dog outside with us, which is huge! Had the crab omlet, which was yummy. Will be coming back to eat dinner.
Great place..try it you'll like it.
Kevin was on time, courteous, informative, and very friendly. This was the second time he has been to our house and I would highly recommend him to anyone who asked.
What a bike shop should be!
Absolutely my favorite Dentist. Dr LoParo delivers on every aspect of the we need in a dentist; he's highly skilled, explains in detail what's going on with your teeth & gums, what your options are and how much each option is going to cost (factoring in your insurance coverage). That works for me plus, it's a pain-free experience in every aspect and just a great guy on top of all that. Dr LoParo's staff and dental assistants and techs are a reflection the standards he has set & maintains completing the whole dental experience. Remember how you use to hate to go to the dentist? Those days are over for Dr LoParo's patients so if you're looking for a dentist because your doesn't quite fit the bill or if you're new to the Charlotte (like I was) don't look any further.
Excellent food at a good price, but as others have mentioned, the service is slow, so be sure you're not in a rush if you decide to go here.
Everything here is delicious. I especially love getting their tofu yellow curry with vegetables, pho and spring rolls. So good and so well priced!
My family and I have been going to this practice since 1989. I would never go anywhere else. They are the best. Kind, and caring and I have never had any problems with any types of billing issues. Not sure what the other person was talking about. I wouldn't go anywhere else.
We have been going to the Tomato Factory for 20 years and have never been disappointed. The food is always delicious. Frank, the owner, is very personable and remembers your name! The Tomato Factory has the best calamari we have ever tasted. This place is a gem of a restaurant. Our younger son even proposed at the Tomato Factory!
Best place in the whole of peckham. God really used this place to save me and it looks beautiful inside. Totally worth checking out! :-)
Really good. Booked a private room upstairs - under a very reasonable arrangement - for our engagement party and for gatherings of 30-40 people cannot recommend this place enough. Friendly helpful and welcoming staff. Nice garden too. Didn't get to check out the food but it looked great. Would def use again.
Trop top j ' y étais
If you are between Georgetown and Charleston on Hwy 17 Sewee Outpost is an experience that you do not want to miss. The food and beverage, gear selection and warm local hospitality and knowledge are a slice of the Lowcountry that make me wish I still lived nearby so I could visit more often. GREAT SPOT!
Ik ben niet zo'n reviewschrijver, maar kreeg mijn bestelling zo onwijs netjes verpakt binnen mét handgeschreven kaart erbij, dat ik wel een goede recensie over deze webshop moest schrijven. Beste online shopervaring ever.
None
This place is amazing!
I've been dealing with Barrett for three years and two cars. The sales staff and service staff have always been the epitome of courtesy and professionalism. The service writer goes out off her way to see that I'm satisfied. My next car, if it is a Jag, will be bought at Barrett.
لا اله الا الله، محمد رسول الله
i am hoshi i am vary happy to work with sheraton udaipur.this is vary nice property,
None
Great college. Awesome campus! The small size is perfect. They give each person individual attention. They really do give each student full attention and make you feel at home, here. They are extremely helpful and ensure that each student has the best experience with classes and everything. I'm doing all online classes and it helps so much with flexibility and is really nice. I am able to get help from the campus whenever needed, whether it be with classes, tutoring, financial or scheduling questions. They do it all and are great at their jobs! I definitely reccommend this college.
I had a nail in my tire that could not be fixed. They sold me a replacement tire at a great price. This was all within 45 minutes before closing on Christmas Eve! Thanks again guys for going the extra mile!
Perfect,I go there when I get a lot of time.
None
Well where to begin? First the Folks there are great... A Team... My sales Rep was Justin Patrissi he was Outstanding. Covered all aspects of my deal handily and made the purchase fun... I like this in a dealership. Financing was more than I expected with a very competent staff Lead by Scott Brown. Brian Lolly is the internet Guru there and was very helpful when asked anything. As for personnal touches I found all my contacts with this dealership helpful and always preceded with a smile. Smiling is contagious there. My wife and I were extremely satisfied with all aspects of this sale. We love you Guys Semper Fi David And Sharon Bennett
Travelling solo and looking for a bite to eat, I saw all the cars outside and decided the locals must know something. Ordered the Tomato Bacon Bruchetta Omelette and was not disappointed...delicious! Coffee was respectable as well.
Excellent place for eye care. The staff is extremely knowledgeable, friendly, professional, and caring. The office is equipped with the up to date technology and the exams are the most thorough I have ever had. There is a great vibe among the staff and it is contagious. Thanks for your great work!
Un sitio unico. Ideal para tomarse un vermouth de grifo y una patatas o aceitunas.
None
My experiences at this particular Genghis Grill has always been during a lighter part of the day when there may have been only a handful of customers. Xochil, the hostess\wait staffer, was nice. When I asked about off-menu drinks, she described something that she likes to make for herself and offered me to try. What sets apart G.G. as a whole is the bowl creations. I can literally make whatever dish suits my palate. Spicy, tangy, subtle, bold, rich, etc. They have everything to keep it new ... and to keep it just the way you like it.
My first time renting a storage facility and Chris, the manager, was wonderful! He made the whole process very fast, easy to understand, comfortable, welcoming and safe! I would recommend Extra Storage to everyone.
My family and I were out looking for food and as we looked in the window, one of the people who worked there came out to give us a menu and answer questions. The guy was hlpful and they clearly were interested in geting our business. Inside the place, the service was equally eager, polite, and helpful. I actually don't eat pork, but I miss Pork BBQ sandwiches. This place serves Pulled Chicken and Beef BBQ as well, though. Turns out that not a lot of BBQ places serve that. I've looked. In any case, the Chicken BBQ Sandwich was well done. The sauce and cooking were perfect and my wife's Beef Brisket was solid as well. They offer a great selection of sides, and a decent set of kid's meals also. The food came out quickly and the staff was constantly cleaning and helping customers. These people were hustling to make it a good place to eat. Overall, I thought it was a great BBQ place and would recommend it to anyone in that area looking to support a local small business.
I took a few lessons with them. The instructors were knowledgeable and friendly. I felt totally prepared for my road test and passed on the first try. Now my brother is learning to drive there.
This place is awesome. The food is fantastic, and the service is just as great. They are always super friendly. I highly suggest the tacos, and the Mexican corn chowder on Tuesdays.
The Dairy Treat is a phenomenal little establishment. I was drawn in by the cheap, filling frozen treats, but the delicious 69 cent coney dogs keep me coming back. Try it out!
I came to the Foundry to have a meeting with one of the owners. Apon my arrival, a lovely girl met me at the door and greeted me warmly. Afer explaining why I was there, she showed me to the new bistro area to wait on a big couch. After advising the owner I had arrived, she came immeadiately back, offered me a coffee and updated me on what was happening. I was really impressed with the service standard and effeciency, the attention to detail and the comfort of the venue. Every thing is clean and brand new. Very impressive.
Correct location
La pizza è ottima, indipendentemente dal fatto che sia cotta con forno elettrico o a legna! La pizza bisogna saperla fare e loro a mio avviso sono i migliori della zona!
My four years at Bellarmine from 2006 - 2010 have been nothing short of phenomenal. The teachers were all dedicated to making my experience very enjoyable while setting high expectations and standards for my own intellectual engagement and growth. The campus has been managed very well from a student's perspective and has provided me with the tools to succeed at the university level. In short, I loved every minute of my experience here and still keep in touch with a few beloved teachers and peers.
James, the manager, is awesome! He is very friendly, but professional. I just secured three storage units today after having them on hold for a few days. James emailed me a reminder and also gave me a call as a reminder as well. He wasn't pushy, but just plain helpful. When we walked in today he couldn't have been nicer. He knew who we were and helped us right away. I couldn't be happier and am really happy with our transaction with James. Two big thumbs up!
None
I had to replace my window on my car call best for less an they help me with my problem. very profesional service on time i am happy with the service.
Super excellent food! Family friendly atmosphere. Superior customer service!
None
Great place to be. Fantastic staff and owners.
My work colleague recommended me this place. Their Thai Food is the best in town! The servant was very helpful with helping us to pick the right amount of hotness. Also had once a salad from them. Was very tasty, too. Can't wait to go back!
I work here and I enjoy it !
I went into this with low expectations, not because I don't believe but because I really wanted to hear from family. The experience starts with a walk through a beautiful and edgy building up to an area where you are given a background on spirits and the like. Then they go over how to use your equipment and put you into groups. Lucky for us we had 4 in our family group and were able to stay together. After this explanation of everything they show you the difference between electronic interference and true energy changes Then you are off to the basement, which is said to be very active. As soon as we made it to the basement and were being told where to go and where to avoid for safety, my k2 meter and someone in the other groups went off as well. We made slight contact with that spirit but decided to move on. Our group was drawn to one room, this would end up being the room we spent the rest of the night in. We met a spirit who took a liking to my younger cousin and answered quickly and off the charts to her questions. Our guide noticed this and knowing that we were hoping to contact family or BYOG (Bring your own ghosts as they call it) she suggested we ask our spirit if he were willing to do this. He was willing and withing seconds it was confirmed through questions that she was there and she had passed almost 9 years ago. We were able to get answers to yes or no questions through the diving rods (I went home and immediately purchased my own). When the first spirit answered he just crossed or straightened out the rods. When my grandmother answered so crossed them until they touched my arms. The guide called this a hug and it really felt like that to me. We were also able to contact a cousin, a grandfather and lastly my great grandfather. It was interesting to feel the different energies move the rods, each of the ones we encountered had a distinct difference. I left that night feeling happy in my soul over my experience. Please come with an open mind and give this a chance you may walk away happier than you can ever imagine.
C3 is a well managed and professionally organized martial arts & fitness center. The balanced mix of cardio and technique is a great way to keep fit while improving coordination, strength and flexibility. The staff is courteous and well versed in their respective fields - including some world class professionals. The facility is neat, clean and even smells unlike a gym.
A pleasure to work with them. Got my order done quickly and professionally. Will definitely come back again!
I have done neurofeedback consistently for 10 months and it's been a life-changing experience. In the beginning I went once per week and noticed slight shifts for each time. After about 15 times I went twice per month. Now I feel more at ease, not as anxious when obstacles arises and am more focused. I'd highly recommend it.
I came here to get a pedicure with my friend for my birthday. I had a great experience. The staff was very nice and professional and did a great job on the pedicure. I would recommend Balance Day Spa to anyone.
Hele grote frikadellen
i LOVE there mac and chili! soooooo good :)
Results Unlimited Family Fitness is TRULY ALL THAT and MORE! My husband and I joined the Results Family in July of 2012. Since then, our lives and our health have changed for the better. We are focused on a healthy, natural lifestyle change that David is helping us accomplish. Results Unlimited is not just an ordinary, every-day gym.... it is our home. Along with building a better body we build a better mind, we meet with other members and friends, we encourage each other to accomplish our goals and to work hard. It’s physical, it’s therapy, it's fun, it's hard work, it gets RESULTS and IT IS THE BEST!!!
Always goes well
None
None
I seriously cannot say enough wonderful things about Genesis Diamonds. We are organizing a charity event and they were one of the first businesses to jump in line and make an EXTREMELY generous donation to help out. What an awesome addition to the Louisville community. We are just overwhelmed by our interactions with them and are converted customers for life!! And the store and inventory are to die for!! Thank you Genesis!! :)
Always consistent with their prompt service and quality of their food! Lovely employees!
I love this place...it's a thrift store but it's nice and organized like a Marshalls or H&M (much better than Ross!). I got a lot of stuff (including boots, a sweater, a cute purse, and an amazing bracelet) for less than $23. I saw some brands there like Prada and Guess...I had to make myself leave the store! Definitely one of the better Thrift stores I've been to.
Five star service, food, and decor. Yana at the front desk is so accomodating and its such a wonderful pleasure greeting her every time we pass the front desk. Enrico in the night shift is a encyclopedia of information about All of Venice ranging from architecture, engineering and history. Our new family and home in Venice right smack in the center but on a quiet side street away from the noisy turists
None
I took a chance going here, especially with previous review mentioning misbillings and other issues. Glad I went! Note that I visited for lunch during a weekday. __Food__ Damn good! I got a soup, chicken parmesian sandwich (+fries), coke, and coffee. Chicken parmesian sandwich was a tad bland, but would have been awesome with tomatoes/other veggies, which I forgot to order. __Cost__ They have a lunch special for $11 bucks. Best deal I've seen in months. Soup, sandwich, fries, unlimited soda -- all standard menu. Coffee was a couple more dollars, but was well worth it at the end of the meal. I was not misbilled like others, and have no complaints. __Ambience__ This place is as close as you can get to a real European cafe. Quiet, relatively small, and an emphasis on comfort. I would avoid if it was busy, but if you come during the week it seems to be pretty busy. Noise travels, and can be warm, so come with these in mind. If you come at the right time, you will be in for a real treat. And definitely get a coffee before you go!
None
The beer was so cold and the potato salad was AWESOME. Will definitely come here again.
This restaurant is a great choice for those who look for great fish and paellas near the sea side (Por Vell).
There is more than one thing that sets Primrose apart. Curriculum, the friendly and caring staff. They are truly special facility that cares about the kids and the families and the health of our children. And there are always new and improved things. Which means they want to exceed and continue to be leaders in the early childhood education area.
None
Great place! !
We are very happy with the service from BMW Houston North. Nicolae Branzei went above and beyond our expectations and helped us find exactly what we wanted. I enjoy my new 335D on the road and a the pump. Dont go anywhere else until you have talked to Nicolae Branzei .
Great place. Clean, fast; they always offer me a military discount. Good people, great service.
Todo muy bueno... buena presentación, personal agradable y muy buenas vistas... Lo recomiendo...
I was delighted with the professionalism of everyone at Amici Style. The salon has a very relaxing atmosphere. Lesley spent time with me and did an amazing job with the color and cut.
I have a few tattoos. The largest and most precious to me is the one created by Miguel Prada. His work is AMAZING. He is extremely professional, artistic and has fantastic 'chair side manners'. The work he did is on my back: its all words, BACKWARDS (mirror image), the of a portion of a poem. The font, placement and artistry he did makes it look beautiful, elegant and sexy. It could have looked 'ghetto' and tacky, easily. My boyfriend, when I told him what I was going to get, was terrified at the final result. He pleaded I change my mind! When he saw the result he was very impressed. I get compliments on it ALL the time...Oh, my BF eventually ended up getting his very first tattoo fr Miguel. He loves as I do. The shop itself is clean and has really wonderful energy. The staff is really great too. It has such a great vibe that you'd want to just hang out there and chill out with the guys! I highly recommend this place to everyone.
None
Karsa marble .sanitary and tiles store
I took advantage of their 250 free business cards offer (because I was looking around for a new printer and I'm tight like that) and I have to say that I was impressed with both the quality and the speed. Not only that, but I made a mistake with the artwork and they corrected free of charge (twice). I will certainly use them again.
Lynda and the whole group at EMACC do a great job bending over backward to help you and your business thrive in the community. I have nothing but positive things to say about them.
None
The service I received at Schaumburg Automedics was incredible. The staff was friendly and knowledgeable. My car was running(and stopping after my new brakes) like it was new. I world recommend Schaumburg Automedics to anyone looking for dependable vehicle service. Thank you Schaumburg Automedics!
I love to go to the High Tide Cafe' and have their clam chowder. HONESTLY, it has a unique and wonderful flavor. The ONLY clam chowder with it's flavor around here and it does NOT have a floury taste. My daughters and I treat our selves off and on throughout the year. We've had some of their other dishes and they are good, it's just that the clam chowder is our favorite. We love to sit at the windows over looking the water...and on warmish days, at their outside tables. NOT once have we had bad service. It is not the cheapest cafe' but it is moderately priced and not too expensive. It's a place you can go into from work as well as dress up a bit as the decor is not fancy but warm and cozy. One of my favorite places to go in the local area!
We had a great experience at Capital Toyota. They spent an great deal of time helping to make sure we had just the right vehicle for us when we found ourselves back and forth between a couple of models and even arranged for a rather extended test drive since we were going to use this vehicle for a good bit of Interstate driving. There was no pressure to buy one "off the lot" with many offers to find exactly the right combination of features & colors if the perfect one was not on the lot. They did have many on the lot though. The pricing was good. We'd recommend this dealer.
The food is unexplainable and it is always a banquet palace for my family
I love the upgrades that have been made to the office. Cold refreshments and TV's in the rooms. The patients can sit back and watch their favorite shows while getting excellent, pain-free dentistry. Dr K. is an amazing dentist. He is very friendly and excited to help you get your perfect smile.
Ok so the presentation was a little long for the windows when i met with the sales person. Don't get me wrong he did a great job. Was jsut a long day for me that day. But could not be happier with the product on the 2 windows they installed. I had 2 windows replaced in a house that was built in 1952. windows fit perfect first time look like orginal but with all the advancements of todays windows. The installer who put them in was great hard worker and very very clean when he was done all i had to do was put everything back. Highly recommend this company will be using them in the not to far future for some other replacement projects. Again THANK YOU
Cosy, cute little place, ideal for a peaceful snack and coffee!
Vincent at My Tax Doc Inc. has been a great help to me and my company. He's very responsive, and offers great advice for keeping my business on the right track.
We've been members of the Y and particularily coming to the Mt. Trashmore facility for almost two years now. I highly recommend it to anyone. We initially decided to check out the Y because of the child care. Not many gyms in Hampton Roads have child care included in the membership. That said, the staff in the Stay and Play area are amazing. The facility for the children is so great. Even while my wife and I are working out, I know that they are taken care of and even have acitivities that get them moving. It's not a simply babysitting service. It's an exceptional program that embodies the Spirit, Mind, and Body approach. As for my wife and I, we have a blast! This facility has a Cardio Theatre that we frequent. It's just that. A room full of cardio equipment situated so that everyone is in view of the big screen playing movies all day long. FITQUEST. If you have never been trained on how to effectively use a gym, or had a personal trainer, that's what you get with this. Everyday we go in, we have a new workout ready to go. What's best is that it is tailored to each individual. No one size fits all workouts here. The Staff. They are simply great people. They actually care about the health and welness of the patrons. Not just the money that is flowing in every month. Programs. There are more programs that I have time for. They truly have something for everyone. The swimming classes(extra cost) are great. For my now 4 year old, we have been incredibly pleased. The patience and ability to teach these young swimmers is incredible. If you are looking for a place to work out, check out the Y, especially the Mt. Trashmore Y.
Exceptional food and service, from start to finish. Highly recommended for every food-lover in San Antonio to check out Minnie's.
Great Experience..... Very considerate and caring doctor... Never felt nervous, which I have at many other dentist offices... Best and easiest root canal Ive ever had due to Dr. Haglund.
This place is the greatest halal cart in NYC. There are a lot of new carts that have opened up all over but this cart is the best. The white sauce is awesome, that red sauce will blister your mouth on the way in and your hind end on the way out.
Today my wife had a screw puncture the rear right tire on her Mini Cooper. I had never gone to any tire shop, Googled the nearest one, phoned this Kal Tire. The lady offered to either leave the car today at their location and they would take care of it before 6pm, or an appointment tomorrow at 9:30am. With me not having bought any tire from them in the past, I was quoted $20-$30 for the repair. I drove it there today. About 1 hr later it was done, much faster than what I expected. And the sales person made it at no charge as a gesture to thank me for waiting on site! Great service, nice people. I'll definitely go there next time I need anything about tires!
None
Very reasonably priced. You write down on an order card what you would like to order. My brother and I both ordered a pork vermicelli bowl. They are huge and absolutely delicious. We got 2 giant bowls of food, an appetizer and 2 soups each for $27 and were stuffed when we were finished. An amazing find in guelph!
I have known Karen for nearly 40 years and she has always been a empathetic person, and is truly a genuine friend! Karen has a superior eductional background, with undergraduate and graduate degrees from Washington University in Saint Louis - her graduate degree (MSW) was also followed by her licensure in Clinical Social Work. If I had to recommend someone who needs professional counseling, I would not hesitate to direct that person(s) to Karen.
This is a fantastic place on a number of different reasons. I went there for a business lunch last Friday. The food was great and the wait staff attentive and pleasant. They were obviously well trained and they all seemed to really enjoy working there. After lunch my car had issues in their parking garage and before I knew it the general manager, Mike Gray, was standing next to me asking if he could do anything to help me. He suggested a great mechanic in the area if I needed one. I had to go to a meeting just up the road so I walked. Upon my return I hear that David Racine himself took a look at the car to see if he could get it going. Amazing. These people really went the extra mile. Keep in mind this all happened during lunch rush. They certainly know how to treat their patrons well and it's because they truly care. No wonder it’s a local landmark. I will be back!
Really can't go wrong here. Whether your coming for Pizza or dining its a home run. Lot of options to choose from between specialty pizza's and I would probably prefer ordering a pasta or Italian dish here to most Italian restaurants. Its a well run family business that puts extra special love into what they do.
Unfortunately it was bad news after they checked out the car. I appreciated their concern for my safety and the removing of planned service after finding the critical problem. Saved me a couple bucks and my livelihood.
Questo negozio ha dei tappeti stupendi, spero un giorno di avere i soldi e lo spazio per poterli avere nella mia casa ^_^
None
CASH ONLY!!! That being said, this place is awesome if you are a guy. Quick and neat, I was extremely happy with the service overall. I tried this place out because my last hair CUTTERY place botched up the most basic of haircut and charged me $17 for it.
Great People and Friendly Service. They take the time to help you care for and maintain your vapor equipment. Great Selection!!!
Great place to enjoy a cold beer while you watch your favorite team play. Food is good as well. The servers are all enthusiast to make sure your visit is enjoyable.
OMG. The beds here are so heavenly, I usually didn't manage to make it to the free breakfast because it felt too good to want to move. The pool was warm and clean and the whirlpool was divine. Too bad they don't allow pets. One of the best places I've ever stayed. Can't say enough good things.
This place was phenomenal. The service was excellent, the food was fantastic, and the atmosphere inviting. The sushi was the best I've had in Eugene. Would definitely recommend eating here
None
Excellent
None
Stacy takes the most amazing pictures, and is very easy to work with. The quality of her stuff is great, and the value is good too! She's really flexible and helpful for all the other stuff that crops up too. We just happened to need a picture from the wedding for the following weekend, and she got it too us no problem. We'll recommend her to all our friends.
Great selection of records and helpful employees. I buy all my records here.
My husband ordered these on our first visit. We are used to Maryland Crab Cakes, made and enjoyed in Maryland. These rank right up there with the best we have had, and save the expense of the trip. Enjoy.
I came to Plaudit with the need for a fresh website that would present a strong professional image with cohesive aesthetics to increase our customer engagement and really show off our experience. Equally as important, the site needed to be easy to update. The Plaudit team delivered above and beyond my expectations. We love our new site, it’s very user friendly to update, and the entire process was extremely smooth and timely. From introduction to design to development, I enjoyed working with every Plaudit team member involved. I will definitely be back for future needs!
None
Quite possibly the best fish & chips in Seattle these days, and great po'boys and (I hear but have not tested) burgers. Wonderful cole slaw and remoulade as the default substitute for tartar saŭce.
Excellent service and excellent authentic food
Had a great experience at this practice. The doctor really took his time and was very patient with me (I had to bring an infant to the appointment with me). My infant son even got a free eye exam! The staff was very helpful when I needed to choose new frames.
Our National Unsung Hero
None
Dr Harper and his team are very professional and will work on an individual basis with care and concern customized to your needs. You should check them out.
Excellent Deal!! Nathan Fultz did a spectacular job with his customer service.
None
None
None
Perfect. The 4th Rome-a 5th there shall not be.
Stopped in for a wonderful Sunday morning cappuccino. Everything was just as I hoped it would be.
Eric and the guys are great. The work is fast and they will surprise you on the quality of the craftsmanship. I would suggest should you ever need their services you'll love the work, timeframe and prices
None
POTSTICKERS ARE THE BEST !!!!
I used to have my home owners insurance with another insurance agency, until they made it feel like I had to jump through a dozen hoops to be able to do business with them. After filling out a form online with Lock to get a quote, Lucy was very proactive with me to make sure that all of my needs were met and that all of my questions were answered. I actually felt like a valued customer, which was very refreshing!
che bello le bionde rendono e la carne arriva!!!
Beautiful clean space, friendly staff offering hot coffee while you wait. And the best part is my stylist Steven. He's a master at razor cuts and short hair! He has great personality and knows what hes doing. As for the other stylist, they all seam to do great work but I don't know from experience. But give them a shot. :)
Great Food.
In reply to Nathen's Review - Thank you so much for this review. It's helped me choose a fine place too lose my virginity for the 17th time. You are my savior, without you i'd be left to Parks in Fleetwood. I have tried sexual intercourse here and I have to say it's the best and most safe place ever. Last time I had sex at a park in Fleetwood I ended up in a pit of needles, and just as you've said here, the park was clean of them! Would loose my virginity again there soon! 10/10
Dale and the guys really look after you. Not just selling you the Bike, but continually. After not going in for close to a year, the staff still knew me by name. Very happy with the service here.
Great worship (contemporary-style), diverse group of people, all centered on the Bible. Friendly atmosphere!
The moment we toured this facility we knew this was the best place for our child! Our daughter started going here at 3 months and we are constantly reminded of the excellent decision we made every time we drop her off! The front desk if very inviting and remembers you to make you feel welcomed and the staff are amazing with the kids! Our daughter has the biggest smile on her face every time I drop her off. As a parent it brings peace to your heart to know your child is happy and enjoys her time there. We recommend this for any parent looking for a place that offers more than just a daycare !
None
Every one should visit this temple
Found this place because of a Living Social deal and it has turned into my go to shop now. The owner was extremely nice and personable, he explained everything they were doing and helped me get reasonable price on parts. I highly recommend Euro American Auto
Amazing boutique handmade designer clothes shop. Ordered a Totty Rocks mac for my wife and Holly went though the details with me about faourite colours, designs etc. Excellent customer service. My wife loves her new mac and it is now a popular talking point with her friends. Many thanks Totty Rocks you are awesome!
Trail Transmission saved me alot of money. They were able to fix my transmission leak and get 2nd gear working again without having to rebuild the transmission. Dropped my truck off at noon and am back on the road at 3:30 same day
None
Great KC Barbeque!
Agent Image and The Design People count among the best Web Design firms I’ve known. The best part is that they understand the field of Real Estate business perfectly. I hired them to design Website for my client. I was worried because of my lack of domain knowledge. They gave me a perfect website with aesthetic designs and nice functionality. Well when you order, be clear and don’t give any ambiguous requirements. Their expertise in this niche will serve you well.
None
None
This is the only place that I come to do my hair now in the Pensacola area. Jessica Speedy has a gift for turning my hair into a beautiful work of art. She won't let you leave until you are beyond satisfied.
Working with Dr. Wahl was a fantastic experience! I highly recommend anyone with back or neck pain/issues to use Dr. Wahl and Chiropractic Care and Sports Rehab. I had lower back pain for 12 years from sports injuries in High School. A small fender bender aggravated the pain to beyond belief. After an initial consultation Dr. Wahl, he put me on a program to address the chronic pain, and then he set up a maintenance program afterwards. This was the best money I ever spent. I am back to normal and my back doesn't have any lingering issues. Considering that it used to hurt just to roll out of bed in the morning I am eternally grateful to Dr. Wahl and his professional and courteous staff. Keep up the great work and thanks for helping me get back to normal!!!!
A "Bucket List" experience. Jumped on my 40th. Again with my wife on my 41st.
None
A true gem of a bike shop! The guys in there are truly an awesome bunch! No matter what you need from a old bike needing some love to the most high end race equipment, they can and will help you out.
From Marina Johnson at ClearLine Communications Ltd: Tinstar Design has a sixth sense of what our clients require and an exceptional skill in creating effective communication materials. Their attention to detail, their accuracy and their ability to find a solution to every challenge inspires our trust in Tinstar.
The doctors at Accident and Pain Relief of St. Louis are excellent doctors. Both Dr. Holland and Dr. Howard are great listeners and are very professional, yet caring. They are very thorough with my care and I am very pleased with them and would highly recommend them to anyone looking for a team of chiropractors.
None
This is absolutely the BEST veterinary hospital!!! The staff are all polite and is very affordable. Both of the veterinarians are EXCELLENT and very knowledgeable. They are all gentle with my cat and more important, my cat loves them. I ABSOLUTELY recommend this place!!!!!
Chanti was professional and fantastic! I needed a box to ship something to a person on Ebay. She went above and beyond to help me pack, tape and safely box my guitar. It is is so refreshing where someone actually HELPS YOU! It is so rare. She is the model for all workers everywhere!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Thank you Chanti and thank you Public Storage for hiring her!!
None
None
None
best gunsmith in Lancaster, KY
We had a great experience recently at Galpin Honda. The facilities are top of the line, very comfortable for the hours that we spent there. Gee was professional, friendly, not pushy, and got the job done for us. We are happy in our Honda Pilot and plan to continue to go to Galpin for our car needs.
Bão demais...
Very pleasant experience. Honest sales and financing personnel. Salesperson was very knowledgeable. An inadvertent error was made in the leasing money factor. However, the team was able to modify the price of auto so that my lease payment stayed almost the same. All in all very happy with the expeience.
None
None
What's not to love? My most recent samplings included Chargrilled Caesar Salad, Fried Green Tomato BL, & Catfish Fingers - who knew catfish had fingers?! Great southern food, wide selection of draught and bottled beer, wine, full liquor bar, and all in a welcoming atmosphere. My last dinner visit we listened the local band "One Street Over" and they were awesome! Lots of music, friendly staff, kids' menu too!
It's an excellent place for fix your car. A little expensive, but so good.
Excellent food and service and reasonably priced. Definitely worth another visit.
Great instruction, friendly club members are very welcoming to new fencers. My son who is 9 loves it and so at 38, so do I! If you're an adult, Friday is adult night, well worth the membership and introductory training lessons fee!
Out of all the 24 Hour Fitness gyms I have visited, I love North Hollywood the most. It's very roomy, and you don't feel claustrophobic. The equipment is spread out, it doesn't smell like sweat when you walk through the door, it's very clean and the staff are friendly. I live in Eagle Rock, and I drive to North Hollywood to work out. Lastly, I love their Aqua Zumba and Aqua Aerobic classes. They are awesome. Like I said before, I love this gym!
None
Chris is very knowledgable with Search Engine Optimization and Web Design. Not only did he Redesign our website, Chris got our page to #1 on over 50 keywords in our industry.
one time i went their and it was a very busy night and we ordered it from the phone and then when we got their one of the waitresses asked me and my bro "would you guys like something to drink?" while we were waiting for the pizza and she was sooo nice. well anyways we payed them for the pizza then waited for about half an hour and they said what pizza are you looking for and we told them and they said "uhhh i dont see that order on the list" and so it was more than a half hour so they gave us a refund! then we finally got the pizza went home DEATHLY hungry all of us and the pizza was AMAZING and while we were waiting for the pizza you could get to see the chefs throw the pizza into the air and press the dough down VERY fast. #iloveD'Bronx
I have been a patient of Dr. Zare's for over a year. I originally visited for a pain in my back but have moved on to other issues. Dr. Zare has helped me control my acid reflux as well as helped me improve my diet. I find the idea of health maintenance very helpful. Like any machine, our body needs regular maintenance, Dr. Zare has helped improve my quality of life by helping me maintain my body. It is worth the time to visit her.
Peut-être la meilleure crêperie de Grenoble! Des crêpes excellentes, plutôt copieuses, un large choix et un service super le tout dans une agréable petite salle.
I've used Cafe Courier many times and always had good experiences with them. Love the variety and the ease of ordering online.
Zorbaz is a definite DON'T miss place! Great food & amazing atmosphere!!!
Great tour of the place and interesting how the whiskey is made, but the stuff still tastes rotten. Sorry :-)
A Seattle Landmark- Seamonster is a fun place to Groove, get a drink and eat some amazing sushi. Service was excellent- the atmosphere is fun.
Not focused on greeting every customer with a smile, BUT great work. If they can't fix it they'll tell you. If they can they'll do it quickly, well and affordably. I love having a neighborhood cobbler!
Staff is super friendly, facilities nice and new with latest technology. Very cool to view pictures of your teeth on overhead monitor and watch movies from an extensive DVD library while getting work done. The work plan estimates are great as well to give an overview of procedure and insurance coverage as well as out-of-pocket cost estimate before beginning operations. Referral system is great as well, my whole family goes now.
Lika nöjd nu som alla de andra gångerna jag ätit där. Kul med en indisk restaurang i Varberg som dessutom är riktigt bra! En huvudrätt kostar runt 130:- och då får man mycket för pengarna.
We love it, it is fresh and fairly inexpensive.
I highly recommend Breathe Salon to anyone looking for great service, wonderful location and most of all a fabulous haircut! Dennis does a wonderful job every time I go in!
I had thought the little blob of gunk in the middle of the living room carpet was a forever stain. Nope. The high traffic area in front of the door which connects to the garage? Clean as a bell. How about the hallway, the only path to the bedrooms and bathroom?Like new. Friendly, fast and effective.
Great food, any drink, cool people
Bueno q hayan abierto una sucursal en Lambare. Felicitaciones
One of the most efficiently ran restaurants you'll visit anywhere. Fast, friendly, and great food. Makes you wonder why other can't do the same.
Beautiful place to go and enjoy. Even though only members of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints can enter, even the grounds are a beautiful place with a special tranquility around them. I recommend that anyone visit.
wow, super awesome theatre! such a cool way to view a movie
Maggiore Inspections gets it done! From the first phone call to the completed inspection, Paul did a great job of answering questions, explaining the inspection process and providing a thorough home inspection. Great Job!
This is a wonderful little market filled with surprises and owner Jimmy is a wealth of information which he'll gladly share if you ask. He educated me on balsamic vinegars, for instance, did you know you can easily spend say, 150.00 on a bottle of balsamic vinegar? Jimmy says they're priced much like wines. He also pointed my girlfriend to a fabulous bottle of balsamic vinegar for an even more fabulous price stating it was probably the best for your money. Jimmy, you're the best!
None
None
I ordered a used bass guitar from Guitar Center's website, the bass was at this location (Ft. Wayne, IN) and was shipping to my local GC in Austin, TX. On the second day after my bass had shipped UPS's website showed that it had been delivered back to the store in Ft. Wayne. I contacted customer service from the GC website to see what was going on and if I could just go ahead and get the bass shipped directly to my home instead of the local store. The representative told me that he contacted the store and they got it back because there were two labels on the box and that it had been sent out again already so they could not ship it directly to me. He also told me that they'd email me a new tracking number right away. Well, no one ever emailed me the tracking number so I decided to call the store directly. The guy that answered the phone was cool, he grabbed the warehouse manager who located my bass still at their store. I asked if they could ship it directly to me, and not only did they ship it directly to me but they sent it in 1 day express delivery. Thanks GC of Ft. Wayne!
been looking for this for long time. lots of comets lots of calls lot more business.took me to top of page one at google
Gerard P Smith Agency in Rochester, NY has taken care of my family's insurance needs for years! We would never dream of switching. Gerard P Smith agency always works for us, to make sure we have the right coverage at the right price! Their service is 2nd to none! Thank you for always taking stellar care of my family!!!
These guys take care of the pest control at our properties in Charlotte. High Recommend!
Wir hatten spät am Abend noch Hunger und Lust auf ne leckere Pizza. Ob wohl der Ofen schon abgeschalten war, durften wir noch ne Pizza zum Abholen bestellen. Kompliment super gemacht!!
I've used Doree Bonner's services twice now and on both occasions the service has been friendly and professional. Thanks again.
Awesome people, good product, good price.
Great Service I got my cut from Rosie, and it was fantastic. First time anyone's gotten my haircut the way I've wanted it. I've been to a lot of other expensive places, and this place beats them all with value, service, and execution
Unfortunately a serious accident with a family pet required we come to the Veterinary Training School at WSU there in Pullman, WA. The Cougar Land Motel was on the school's list of recommended hotels/motels in the area. I saw some earlier poor reviews but more recent reviews of the Cougar Land looked better. I chose the Cougar Land because of its proximity to the WSU Campus (we actually walked all the way to the WSU Creamery and back one day - Brrr!) Upon arrival (07January 2013) there was no need to have reserved a room - things are slow in Pullman in January! We checked into our room & though the construction of the facility is older the room was clean. We thought we'd be there only two or three nights but ended up staying 7 nights for the recovery of our animal. The only thing I would recommend is that you bring an outlet-multilpier or power-strip if you've many low-wattage devices to charge, like smart phones, etc. Since the building is older there isn't the frequency of plug-ins a more contemporary building would need for newer electrical code. The best thing about the room was the beds. Fantastic pillow-top mattresses! The TV in the room is an older CRT type (no flat-screen) but it was perfectly adequate for what we watched. We also liked the amount of control we had over the temperature of the room (We like it colder at night!) Also, our animal was able to stay with us Monday & Tuesday night before the surgery. This was only a $10.00 per night additional fee and our $50.00 pet-cleaning/damage deposit was returned after the room check-out inspection. (No "accidents", scratches, etc.!) Almost every morning my wife & I would drive or walk to the local coffee venues for a coffee and a bagel. If we wanted to do more shopping Moscow, Idaho is only about 9 miles away and there is a nice Mall for indoor (Winter time!) strolling. There were several restaurants distributed between Pullman and Moscow. When I went to pay the last two nights for our stay (we were paying day-by-day as we weren't sure about the progress of recovery for our animal.) the young lady at the desk offered me the Weekly rate (paid 6 nights for 7!) as we had been there the entire week. Despite the sign on the wall stating that weekly rates must be coordinated before-hand she said they would do the weekly rate for us anyway! Talk about customer care and service! Thanks! We were pleasantly surprised at the amount of things there were to do in the area and enjoyed the aforementioned restaurants, the excellent local brewery (Paradise Springs) only a short walk away & the WSU Creamery & a Veterinary Anatomy Museum on the WSU Campus. On a final note, due to poor weather & the unsure nature of our animal's status we hurriedly checked out Monday the 14th of January. However, I forgot to wait for my $50.00 Pet Damage Deposit. This was mailed me by the motel the following week. Thanks again! :)
None
None
YES,
Best Cocktails I've ever taste. A bit pricey but definitely worth it!
None
My cat gets sick, alot. I do my best to clean up between the furballs but its a losing battle. I dont have the carpet cleaned often enough, but when the cat has left its mark many, many times, I need to call in a pro. Before the cleaning I feel like I need to rip out the old and start over. Once the cleaning is done, MY CARPET LOOKS NEW! Great job!
None
These are, beyond a doubt, the best burgers in San Antonio. I have been getting hamburgers here for almost 20 years and the same great taste has always remained. I always get a plain cheeseburger, but it's definitely anything but plain!
The Service here was great. Brad was super helpful and informative
يا رب اولنا يا رب انت تعلم ما في قلبي يا الله يا رب
Nicole the esthetician at Sanda Gane is the BEST! Be sure to ask for Nicole!
Great Pool, Amazing Schools they are very highly ranked with great teachers. The park is nice but needs updating. The pool is the real highlight. It's heated and great for young and old. The football field is nice with a good quality track
This place is pretty good. It is enormous. Has a very big outside too. Server was always checking on our drinks. Drink prices are not too bad. Had live music when we went.
I had LASIK surgery on November 28, 2013 and traveled from Washington, D.C. to have the surgery completed. The Whiting Clinic is truly world class and from every step of the way you know that you are in good hands. My one month follow up appointment was with Dr. Whiting himself and I could not ask for a better Health Care Provider. I now have 20/10 vision in both eyes and have had zero issues. I tell all of my Midwest and East Coast friends that if they are interested in having LASIK the trip to Minnesota to see Dr. Whiting is 100% worth the travel expense.
The staff is very friendly and helpful! There are many storage options available as well, including wine storage. I recommend them!
Saat nya tes kesehatan....................
Le birre sono ottime il servizio pure.i proprietari sono più unici che rari. Lo consiglio vivamente. P.s astenersi simpatizzanti Berlusconiani Ahahahah
A very nice restaurant...
The pizza was super special awesome and the service was great I cant complain.
My experience at the perfect dress was AMAZING!!! Robyn helped me find a BEAUTIFUL wedding gown in my budget a month before my wedding. Because of the time crunch, I was shocked that she was able to fit me in with a great seamstress and got my dress finished in 1 week!!! I am so happy with my dress and had excellent service! I would recommend anyone looking for a wedding, prom or special event dress to check with The Perfect Dress! =)
I went here and lived here and my baby at that time he was 2 went to the UCR child development center and I would not trade the experience for anything! My 20k loan has been worth every cent!
Nice Rock Garden
Both vets are highly knowledgeable and don't mind explaining the details to those who are interested. They always manage to squeeze me in when there's an unforeseen issue that needs addressing. They have vaccine clinic days so that people who struggle financially can still afford basic care. They have a relationship with at least two Orange County rescue groups, which makes me very happy. I need to know that the vet I give my business to really cares. Dr. Wiatt and Dr. Rossi have proven to me that they do. Another reviewer mentioned the' revolving staff', but I've always been impressed by how quickly the new staff members learn the ropes. I won't name names, but one of their more recent additions is now one of my favorites. I had been to six other vets in the immediate area before determining that Pet Hospital was the right choice for me. If you're looking for a new vet, give them a try. You won't be disappointed.
Living in Barcelona for over 12 yrs now, 2 corners away from my fav wine bar. Best sorted wine from Spanish regions (also organic) and perfect, fresh and delicious little tapas to go with it. Try the salmon carpaccio or the rucola salad, etc.
Great front desk staff and (as the other reviewer noted) a really lovely location. Impressed all the way around--esp for the price.
Restaurant was clean, Service was attentive and very polite. food was served fast and with a smile. Likes :Service- food- cleanliness of the restaurant. Dislikes: can't think of any
Badgerland printing always does a great job! The level of service they provide makes me feel like I am the only customer they have. The quality of work is excellent and the delivery time meets or exceeds my expectations. Give Kevin and Karla a call today for your printing needs!
Great staff and apartment layout. Would recommend this place to anyone in the SLC area.
None
None
My husband and I came to the New Nevins for a couple of drinks and wanted to thank the wonderful bartenders, Dominique & Nicole. We had a wonderful time and great service! They were quick and efficient. We can't wait to go back...and we will!
The place is just awesome! The quality of food / meat is always amazing and I haven't had a bad experience since they opened it. I go there at least once a week for a delicious curry or other meals. Just everything is super tasty.
they always have what i need here.. too bad there arent enough locations
Had a slight mishap with the food, but it was quickly rectified, and the manager came out to personally apologize. I got my meal for free as a token ^.^ Great Customer Service and my food both times was prepared quickly while also looking amazing!
Very nice park that includes the International Disc Golf Center with 3 lovely courses.
Bring on the Gunn! The Gunn Firm is caring, compassionate yet down to the point and they know how to get the job done. No matter if you are lost and don't know the next step, or if you just need help, The Gunn Firm is the right choice. I went to them with little to no options. They opened doors for me and just a year later my life is returning to a stable place. If your looking for an attorney that will do the very best and be there when you need them, you need to call these guys. From the bottom of my heart all I can say to them is Thank You!
Gezellige brasserie in een enorm rustige omgeving. Zeker de salade Caesar eens proberen!
I recently contacted this shop looking for the BLAKROC album on vinyl. While the other stores (3) around town only checked their physical inventory, Eric (learned the owners name via email exchanges) took the extra step and contacted his distributor to see if they could locate a copy of this 2009 album at that higher level. Even though we did not have any luck with that route either I was still impressed that they even made the inquiry. They will be my first call next time I am on the hunt for a piece. They get a five star rating for customer service!
Haskell Valley Veterinary Clinic is the only place for my 5 precious fur babies. Dr. Payne and the whole staff are just fantastic.
I am very happy with Medifast. My counselor Danielle is very supportive even if I have a bad week. I put on 60 pounds in the last ten years and I have taken off more than half in six months. I would recommend Medifast to all my friends.
I recently returned from an overseas job assignment in China and needed a car when I arrived. My father had bought a car previously from Steve Lewis Subaru and helped me by finding a car that matched what I needed. Everything was all set so that the day after I arrived I picked up the car the next morning. The sales consultant was very helpful to make the process smooth and fast.
Great food. Great service. Reasonable prices. Convenient parking.
Zerorez did a great job cleaning our carpets. They were more than prompt. They actually arrived 2 hours early, which worked out great for me. The carpets look great. This was the second time we used Zerorez to clean our carpets; we will definately use them again. Thanks Zerorez.
I have been using Fuzzy Wuzzy for years for both commercial and residential properties. Always helpful and knowledgeable staff with a generous selection of fairly priced quality flooring products. Very positive install experiences with tile, sheet vinyl and various carpets including custom bound runners. Always timely, clean, friendly and detail oriented I have yet to be disappointed and highly doubt I ever will.
I always have a pleasant experience with the staff. A little pricy but never have to return with problems. You get what you pay for...
Tony is an amazing mechanic! He is always willing to go above and beyond-He doesn't try and sell you repairs that your car doesn't need AND most importantly, he is an honorable man. I highly recommend Tony and I will never take my vehicles anywhere else!
Great hotel!
There is no hill, quite like Hill 88. Out of all the hills I have been too, and I am quite the hill enthusiast, this hill ranks in my top 10. It could easily be among the top 5 even, maybe even outranking Hill 345 in southern North Carolina. The point is, this is one hill you cannot miss.
Okey oynanabilir
None
Staff took care of everything with the insurance claims. Worked well with my 6 year old, who was very comfortable with staff and doctor. Dr. Bozic explains everything clearly and answers all questions. Selection of frames for my older son was the best we'd found around town.
The experience began as soon as you walked into the hotel! I was there for a business trip and stayed 6 nights. The staff was always professional and extremely friendly. Bethany, in particular, went out of her way to ensure the customers had what they needed to make the stay comfortable. The quality, facilities and service was amazing. The rooms were very clean and extremely nice and comfortable. I will stay here again if in the area and would definately recommend this hotel to others.
None
Best. Breakfasts. In. Silicon Valley.
The best japanese food I've tasted in London - freshly prepared, authentic, good quality, and nicely presented. Highly recommend!
Good service. Good prices. Best!
None
None
Wow, I am really suprised on all the bad reviews, but again I think repairs always make people mad. I bought my Nissan Sentra here in 2007 and have had absolutely no problems at all with them. They have a loyalty program which helps with the costs of service and everything. I took my niece here to get her new car and the service has been excellent. I just called them now for my 90,000 mile checkup and they hooked me up with a loaner car which means no Avis for the road trip. Anyway, I give them very high marks and I have nothing at all to gain by praising them. just my 2 cents.
Went there on a Wednesday night with my wife to celebrate a belated Valentines day dinner. Despite the fact that there was only one other table occupied that night we were treated with an excellent meal and very good service. We ordered the Bistro for Two which was generous and arrived at our table sizzling We were concerned that we were holding up their closing but we're never rushed but instead treated to some free dessert. We will definitely be back on a day we can expect a larger crowd of people and perhaps some live music.
Doctor Dawson LOVES our dog, Caprice, and I am sure that is the case with all his animal patients. The front desk staff is kind and helpful. When Dr. Dawson is not around there is always another doctor on hand. Of course you are #1!
Bought a used tire for 40$ 195/50/15. Pretty good deal considering brand new they're 120
None
About two years ago my mother wanted to send a 12 place setting of antique china to her grand-daughter in North Carolina. I took it to this UPS Store. They packaged it for shipping and then sent it on its way. Not one piece was broken. Recently I sent a large cedar chest to my nice. It had been my mother's hope chest and is over 70 years old. I took it to the same store and, again, they packaged it and sent it on its way via UPS freight. It arrived in excellent condition. The sentimental value of these items far outweighed the actual value. It is nice to know you can trust a business with such irreplaceable items.
Ashley cut my hair at Aziz a few weeks ago. What an experience! Flawless execution and a great cut. And the conversation! Gotta be the best hair salon in Texas without a doubt! Recommended without reservations!
Your morning show is wonderful. I like Opanyin Agyekum. He is wise and deep thinker. Kwame Sefa-Kayi please repeat the sound bite of the man who was complaining about his cat. He sounded so passionate.
Worship services begin at 9am and 1pm. Initially I felt warmly received by the congregation and have since grown to love the Latter-day Saints in Birmingham. Come and see for yourself how good it is.
Focus on community AND getting stuff done. No sharks here, just pure love for making awesome.
This Toys R Us is the same as all the others. I write this review because I avoided this Toys R Us for years because of its location. I usually drove out to Mississauga - which is significantly further but Google Maps said it was a shorter drive to this one from downtown. It was right. But I'm writing this mostly to point out that it has a surprisingly huge 2 level parking garage (that is free) making it easy to park. And there is a really nice park across the street. So, my wife and I took our son there to get some toys but then stayed for a few hours to enjoy the park across the street - all with free parking - which is rare in Toronto.
Food and service was out of this world! I must confess I never had vegetables that tastes so good not to mention the main course!
Friendly staff, great breakfast with lots of choices and clean rooms.
None
Jackson and Zoomer do amazing work. We are in the process of having Zoomer Display do an acrylic retail sign to hang in our office. Then Zoomer is going to help us set up custom packaging for our sales staff. In fact I'm buying a little interior design sign for my daugher they had laying around. Very happy with how things are going for us.
Without question, this is the best medical practice group. All doctors in one place who work together to coordinate health issues specifically tailored to women's issues. The staff is always pleasant, professional and prompt. Doctors actually call you back, even when they aren't in the office! The level of care on a scale of 1-10 is a 12!!! I can't recommend this office enough. The acupuncture by board certified Internal Medicine MD is an added plus. Muscle issues that used to send me to physical therapy for weeks now take 2 sessions, and stress is alleviated through tiny needles better than any pill I could ever take. This is a real gem of a find.
None
zamindar college grt
After a huge storm several trees fell over and one was on our house. Trees of GA came out on the weekend to help clear the debris and did an amazing job. Thanks for the extra effort!
It's cool
Needed to get to the post office, they offered their shuttle. That was nice! Buffet breakfast in lobby open past supposed closing so had some. Very good!
My family has been seeing Dr Kimberly's since she took over the practice. The entire staff are very friendly and attentive. Dr Kimberly always takes time to explain any issues found and various remedy options. You always feel your teeth are in good hands.
Super place with great family focus. Take your crew and take them them often. The food is pretty darn good too!
CtrlS is the Best Hosting Provider I have ever met. I'm the proprietor of Pinnacle Pixel, just incase you folks want to confirm.
Ambiance was perfect. Food was fresh and well prepared. Service was professional and attentive. A wonderful place that I will visit again.
Nearly all of the clothing I ride with was purchased at Westside and they have always been helpful to me and the prices reasonable. It started with buying a jacket at the Motorcycle show back in 2010 and has continued since then. My favorite helper, Todd Ellsworth, finished school and moved on, but whether it was ordering parts, service, or dealing with clothing, I've never had a bad experience dealing with the people at Westside.
Great place for Sushi. The place is quaint and charming
Excellent service. And extremely fast and efficient home delivery service too.
None
best coffee
Best Mexican food in Utah! From Smothered burritos to chili relleno's, I've never had anything that wasn't amazing.
None
This is the go-to sandwich shop if you need something delicious. Scott uses the best organic ingredients and is hilarious. Its not too big inside so we usually bring it back to the office. Make sure you call ahead during lunch time. It gets busy.
The best pizza in WNY.
Sheree has been cutting my hair for five years, and I was very happy to learn that she has opened a barbershop with her brother Jeff. Sheree is the only person that consistently cuts my hair right every time. She never rushes, even when she is fully booked and takes her time to get it right. Add in that shop is really clean and comfortable, there is really no reason to go anywhere else. I highly recommend it to anyone that is tired of the cliché, faux-manly barbershops that sprinkle Chicago (and charge an arm and a leg for a cut).
Love The City Tavern, under new management its a completely new place with great people and great prices. One of Birminghams hidden gems.
Tres Tres Tres Bien!!!
A straightforward and loving presentation of God’s Word is delivered by an enthusiastic pastor. The Spirit of God is evident in the praise and worship. Pastors Ken and Valencia genuinely care about people. What more could you ask for in a church.
Mark and Wayne are THE GUYS to go to for ink. They are unpretentious, fun and very talented. I love 510 and I won't go anywhere else for ink. See you soon, lads! (PS: they are the only ones I let pierce me, too!)
Awesome dentists! Thanx for being so great with my. Difficult kids
Excellent food all the time. Best in town for sure.
None
None
感谢国家感谢党
Love this gym! I have been to a few. This was the only franchise gym that wanted me there and wanted me to stay. Everyone at Retro Edison are friendly, courteous, helpful and talkative. The place is clean, bright and not loud. Love this place. I am there everyday. I enjoy my work outs more. I see other members that look like me and struggle like me. Love this place.
Very good. I stopped in by chance on my way through from Florida to Chicago. Well I'm glad I checked yelp. Excellent food and great people!
Things went very smoothly and Great experience form start to finish.
Jus nxt to my house...... Noisy during wedding season....
Cartridge World is amazing. They sell high quality ink and toner for the lowest price. The staff is very friendly and extremely knowledgeable. I highly recommend them!
None
None
We used 4FunFotos for a corporate party at the Microsoft Store. They did a fantastic job, were set up on time, and the guests had a great time. Thanks so much!
Always have had a great experience here and I have been coming for the last 3 years pretty regularly. Keep up the good work.
We bought a new Chevy Cruze at Jeff Wyler Eastgate Auto Mall on Saturday with the help of Logan Fenton. Logan did everything he could to help me with a Great Purchace.
One of the best places in Arlington. Fresh food, a lot of light and air
Sienna Plantation Animal Hospital is a great place! During their Pet Fest back in June, I found the perfect little dog to take home with me :) Everyone is very helpful there, and the doctors are amazing, so I recommend them to everyone :)
None
None
Hiring Ed with E. Curtis Designs to work on our website has been one of the wisest choices our business has made. He has done everything we asked for and more. He rescued our website after it was hacked into and since then has transformed it into a very useful site. He is very dependable even when we want to make small changes. We will definitely use him for all of our website needs.
Jan Berlage is a pleasure to work with. He takes the challenging experience of Bankruptcy and irons out all the bumps. I highly recommend him !
Wonderful place. Would love to be part of it.
Without a doubt some of the best sandwiches in the City Bowl. Fresh produce, made to order, or pre-prepared, YoursTruly delivers every time. And if you do have to wait a few minutes, don't fret, the coffee is phenomenal too.
If you have not been in Gold's Gym Tampa in a while then you need to come back and check this place out. The owner of Gold's Gym Tampa totally renovated this gym last year. They have added all new machines, free weights, spin bikes. They now offer cross fit cage classes as well as Les Mills Group Exercise classes. They remodeled all of the locker rooms, they even have a sauna in the locker room. They put in all new flooring throughout the gym and painted the entire facility. I love working out here during the week when I train with Edgar, who is a Fantastic personal trainer. However Saturday mornings are my favorite workout day. I like to start with Boot Camp training 1st thing in the morning to get my blood pumping, then I like to do Jessica's Yoga Class, then Shari's Les Mills Body Combat class and end the day with an Awesome Massage with Sierra. (YES they have massage here 7 days a week too!) GOLD'S GYM TAMPA ROCKS!!!!!
My trip to the pyramids and the Sphinx was amazing! The best $6 I've ever spent was spent for entry into one of burial chamber inside one of the pyramids. My wife and I were bombarded by local "entertainers" I guess you could call them, but we were warned about them ahead of time. TIP: DO NOT give your camera to any of the local people to take your picture of the pyramids. A couple of people who were traveling with us made this mistake and had to give up $50 or their watch to get their cameras back. The "police" did nothing as the person taking the picture was "performing a service" and it was the traveler's fault for not stipulating a payment for the service ahead of time. So yeah, ignore the local "entertainers" and just have a great time talking in the wonder.
None
Best quality McDonald's I've ever had. And I eat McDonald's several times a week.
I bought my Sony NEX Camera from Leederville Camera House a few weeks ago and I was so impressed with the service from Lidio and staff. Walked in to a smiling array of staff all happy to help, but never pushy! I will certainly return for Photo Printing services and am currently saving for my waterproof casing for the camera mentioned above. Highly suggest this camera store for all your camera needs, be it just for accessories, or a camera itself. Great range too!
We have our company Christmas party at Noah's every year and love it. The facilities are beautiful, but more importantly, the service is fantastic. They are there to help you with anything you need and are very pleasant. We will be returning next year!
F'n awsome. this place freakin rocks. Turf n Turf was Grrrreat!
I was so lucky when I found Dr. Mike's information on the internet! I have always been embarrassed of my gummy smile and crooked teeth. But now, thanks to Dr. Mike, I feel confident because I know my smile is beautiful. Whenever I go to Dr. Mike's office, everyone is so kind and anxious to make my visit comfortable and pleasant. Offering me a blanket or a radio headset is a normal occurrence whenever I visit. I fully recommend The Columbus Center for Family & Cosmetic Dentistry to everyone I meet.
None
I have been seen at the ChiroCenter for 4 months and have a wonderful experience with treatment and staff. I have increased range of motion in my neck and arm systems have depleted. The massages has really helped my tight shoulder muscles.
Yesterday I purchased my 6th vehicle from this dealership. I couldn t have been more pleased with my experience. Every person was knowledgeable, friendly, super helpful & eager to answer my questions. I test drove 3 cars with Leo. He was patient with me & explained the different trim lines. I chose a Prius Persona and next met with Carlos Sunsin. Carlos & I worked out the financing, price, options, etc. Now off to the paperwork with Holly Lambert. Holly explained every piece of paper I was signing & went beyond to point out some coverages I wasn t aware I had. I am very impressed with these three young people. Professional & courteous beyond compare. Lastly, I took delivery of my car. The trade in was parked next to the new car making the transfer of personal items easy. Before I drove away, I was congratulated by General Manager Paul Kramer. Paul always remembers my name, asks about my daughter and is a delight. I am loyal to this dealership because they have earned my loyalty! Check them out.
I bought second hand car from this dealer. I have a very great experience. Good sales person, the price is great, car has been cleaned up very well before hand over, decent fuel given and 3 years warranty included.
None
Love Love Love this location
None
None
e bellissimo e si mangia bene
I love the staff at Highland. They are very friendly and informative! I wouldn't make it to an appointment if it wasn't for their reminders! I'm so forgetful with things like that so it's great that they check in first.
Sapor is a diamond in the rough. It is completely unassuming, sitting on a hill off Washington Ave. The dining room is dimly lit -- perfect for a romantic night out. The menu is diverse, with a ban mi sandwich, falafel salad, traditional burger+fries & ethiopian stew listed side by side. Definitely something for everyone. We tried the brussel sprouts appetizer (buttery goodness), the falafel salad (by far the healthiest way to eat falafel...and the falafel had some great flavor) and the pancetta burger with fried egg and lemon+herb fries (delicious). For dessert we went with the molten chocolate cake with mint whipped cream -- it tasted like a thin mint...a high end thin mint. The specialty drinks (we tried the North Loop) was well crafted. Our server was really great, going above & beyond to make our date night special. I'm looking forward to going back because there are so many good items on the menu -- and also for their small chocolates that they serve when they bring the check. Made in house, melt in your mouth...can't stop thinking about them!
None
Lovely heritage hotel, nice old architecture, comfort, 10-15 minutes to go to any downtown yogyakarta destination
Great Venue. Enjoyed my experience there during several concerts.
Great place to store extra clutter from around the house and I LOVE the low prices!
None
Molt bé les instal·lacions i sobre tot la terrassa d'estiu Da-moon recent estrenada.
We ordered some flowers for a very dear friends funeral from cream and browns florist in Darlington, and they were just beautiful, we did pay a bit extra but they really was breathe taking. The service and staff were nothing but very professional. Would highly recommend them and would use them again.
None
None
Toujours aussi bien.
We are indians ....none can break us ..
La ultima vez que viajamos a cancún alquilamos un jeep por 6 días, el precio que nos dieron fue muy bajo y el jeep estaba muy limpio, se los recomendamos, la pasamos genial en cancún saludos de buenos aires
The only place in bloomington with superb indian food. Paneer like home, chicken is terrific. Pav bhaji is also nice. All in all my favorite for this town.
I survived and 18 Wheeler collision in my 3 month old Tundra from AutoNation. After my now 4th purchase from them, I'm proud to be a loyal customer! Walter Rozier and Nick Drake were awesome. Laid back, no pressure, and can beat the pants off any other Toyota dealer in the area. Lifetime oil changes? Good Bye RR Toyota! AutoNation is my continued preferred provider, and Toyota's are the most safe cars on the road. I know, I was smashed safely between a concrete barrier wall and that trailer in bumper to bumper traffic with concrete barriers on both lanes of I35E South! Can't beat AutonNation's customer service or price!
None
Eyal and company provide great service and great work. I've definitely got a guy!
Sierra Vista Review from Jay Kemmer: Jay had his mother and brother in our community at the same time for a period of two years. Both passed away within two months of each other. Jay stated that Sierra Vista would call at the drop of a hat and he always knew what was going on with them. Jay felt that the people at Sierra Vista were, "Always positive", "Compassionate", and "Gave lots of love to both of them". The Kemmer's were dearly loved at Sierra Vista and they will be greatly missed by residents and staff alike.
None
None
None
Their staff has a vast array of knowledge rarely seen and customer service that is above and beyond:a lifetime warranty on all gun sales(new or used), WOW! The range is fully climate controlled, why shoot outside when you can shoot inside 7 days a week? Hands down the best gun range in the ATL area. They even have a frequent ammo purchase card and great prices on everything! Not in stock? They will order it. When you go here, you're family. Can't ask for better: be sure to go check them out!
Kelly is the quickest, most efficient aesthetician that I have ever encountered. She's amazing, friendly, and extremely fast. I highly recommend her! What an excellent wax parlor.
Very expensive
None
This review is a long time coming. We hired Canine Dimensions to help us with some behavior problems in our one year old spaniel. (I had a woman tell me at a dog show when she saw me having troubles with him that this dog didn't have an obedience problem but a behavioral problem!) He is a show dog and has obedience titles but we were having difficulties with food aggression and dominance issues. We realized that we didn't have the knowledge to deal with these issues and would have to learn them from a professional. That is when our research began to bring someone into our home to teach US what to do for our beloved pet. We chose Canine Dimensions and Mike was our teacher. They weren't the cheapest nor the most expensive but after researching and speaking to folk on the phone, we decided they were the most knowledgeable and fairly priced. To say we are so pleased with the service is an understatement. We now have a wonderful dog--still full of vinegar--but now so much more manageable ever since we had Mike teach us how to deal with such a dominant, powerful dog. We cannot thank them enough and it was worth every penny!!!
This ramen is indeed different from other ramen places. They serve really high quality ramen, it is not expensive. Try also the kara-age.
I have an iPad 2 that was damaged by both a fall down 20 marble steps and a complete shattering of the glass. The great folks at JCD Repair fixed the glass in a jiffy and in the process, removed some of the dents and fixed the volume toggle (which was damaged front he first fall down the stairs). Excellent work done quickly - will repair any of my devices with them without hesitation.
This is the 2nd summer I've used Joel's Lawn Care and without a doubt I could not be more pleased. Not only is he reasonable in his pricing structure, but the quality of his work and the detail of his trimming the yard are first class!! Actually, I've recently had neighbors in the area comment that our yard "looks like a well-maintained park". Others have indicated that it is the "show home" of the neighborhood. I couldn't thank Joel more and would highly recommend him to others that need their yard maintained. You clearly won't be disappointed! In fact, you'll be impressed and greatly satisfied by the improvement he will bring to your yard!!
Very good environment to work
The AMC Washington Square 12 crew of polite faces manages to offer superb customer service despite sometimes dealing with rowdy crowds. They also have one of the most super attractive Managers this reviewer has seen in all his years at the theatres! Make sure after you see your movie to say "Hey! My experience was AMC amazing!
Fran is the most pleasant cashier and the pharmacy staff is wonderful, especially Betcy & Hae and Gina. Thank you ladies for your kindness and professionalism
None
I have purchased three vehicles from Noble Ford. They all have been very well prepped and the people have been great to work with. I am currently considering purchasing another vehicle.
Professional & nice staff
None
really great pub food where even the sausage meat is made on the premises...
Great sandwiches and desserts so glad to have D'Amici's in Melrose! The pizza is my favorite cannot resist getting a slice every time I'm there.
None
Best breakfast in town
None
Buying a new or used car can be a stressful experience. I knew what I wanted, I know the year, make, model and options & features. I simply searched for the car and found it a Johnstons Toyota. I drove about and hour and 10 minutes to get there from my home in Hopatcong NJ. It was worth the trip. The entire staff was friendly and attentive, the dealership was clean and orderly and the price of the vehicle was fair. What more could a person ask for in a Car buying experience. I will return to Johnstons for service and another vehicle when the time comes.
None
None
Josh Lehmann actually picked up the phone at 7:25 am when i called. I was expecting to just leave a message, head to work, and maybe receive a call back from them later that day. The service has been top notch. My wife and I are optometrists and understand service is key to loyal patients/customers. I have been very pleased with their response time and matt faughnder has been great on the job at our house. Definitely will recommend!!
This past week I had the wonderful experience of staying in the Historic B&B's Heritage House! I stayed in the Rose Room which is a beautifully appointed and elegantly decorated gold and red bedroom with an adjacent sitting room. The bed was super comfy and I greatly appreciated the fact that each bedroom is individually climate controlled. Each of the four breakfasts I enjoyed were bountiful and delicious. I feasted on fresh fruit, amazing organic egg dishes, crisp bacon and sumptuous pancakes. But best of all, I loved the warm reception and attention I received from the Grant family! I look forward to returning to Albuquerque and this charming exceptionally well run B&B!
This is a great place for anyone to come and hang out and or study. There is abundant space including small and large tables available for use. They do play Christian music quietly over the sound system, but that is to be expected since they are a Christian based company. If Christian music is not your thing, then earphones and an iPod would be a super simple solution for you. The coffee is great and so is the food and atmosphere and the service is super friendly. I love spending time here.
I've always had top-notch service brought with top-notch professionalism and at an affordable price from 1-800-GOT-JUNK. My first call to them enabled me to get rid of quite a bit of obsolete electronic equipment. This year, due to logistical problems on my part in getting some bookshelves built and set up, I had to call them twice when I would've preferred to call them once, but that's what it took to get rid of more equipment, shipping boxes and other items and both crews were up to their usual A-game standard.
I absolutely loved my stay at Kingsgate. I can't get over how friendly the staff was- like everyone (the front desk was so helpful, my shuttle driver told us about some awesome spots in the city, such fun bartenders!, and I had fun conversations with my housekeeper daily). I stayed for 9 days for my residency and the food and service was amazing at every event. Everything was always so clean, they have great food options, and a lovely outdoor area outback. Great workout facility too! (with passes to the UofCincy gyms as well) I highly recommend your stay here!
Dr. Harbin and his staff are wonderful. I'm a bit of a dental-phobe and have always been very comfortable at Hendersonville Family Dentistry. Definitely worth the short drive from downtown! Great dentist, and wonderful staff.
I highly recommend this resort to those who are looking for a very reasonably priced beach resort in Bohol. The beach resort is very tastefully designed, a fusion of art and substance in every corner. I can stay here for a month because there's just so many things to do and to see. I highly recommend this resort to families, tourists, and even honeymooners. The owners really spent to give guests an exceptional experience they'll never forget.
An amazing place to go with the kids
All Season Tree Service did an amazing job on the tree removal service. I’d recommend them to any person looking for removal services in the Stoughton, Massachusetts area. All Season came equipped with all the right tools, a great team, and did the exact job they were asked to do, flawlessly.
Nice temple
This place exceeded my expectations. A restaraunt in a house? I was shocked. REALLY NICE! The food was excellent. I give it five huge stars.
quaint tasting room. David & his wife are always a treat & make you feel like your visiting old friends. His flair for wine creation is amazing to me.. Ive NEVER found a better chocolate wine. Infact, I haven't tasted a bad wine from him. Even when he was testing out a new creation (he called project X) at the time.. & by all means go visit the sister winery maison de pagette.
I have been seeing Dr. Mumford and her staff for over a year and they are excellent. Dr. Mumford is very kind, clear, and informative. I had an issue with my left eye. She treated it properly, and today, a year later, both of my eyes are in better condition.
I'm a vegetarian, and this place was haven !! All the items in their menu are delicious and surprisingly unique !
Excellent experience. Reception very warm and friendly. Feels like family on first visit. Dr. Anway is professional and is interested in helping his patients. I transferred my dental files to his office after one visit in which he took care of a very painful condition and charged far less than I expected. Highly recommend Dr. Anway.
My servers name was Danielle is did good handling the group i was with Which was all a bunch of military guys.
None
I had the pleasure of meeting Chris and sitting in on his full day session this week in Moncton with First National & The Mortgage Centre. Chris is passionate about his business. It is conveyed through his knowledge and energy. The information he provided was invaluable. I've been using social media for a few years in my business and "thought" I knew quite a bit. He showed me so much more I can do to build my business and get leads. Thank you Chris & I hope to see you again soon in Halifax.
Home sweet home :)
Wonderful introduction on how to invest in gold and silver, local in location and service, but offers everything national companies do; made this so much easier than online, thanks Kurt
What a fabulous experience. Generally, I hate shopping but in about an hour, Jill sketched out the design of an outfit for one son's wedding. And because there's a second wedding in a month, she figured out how to adjust that first suit to be different for the second event. What great fun! A perfect fit. I may never shop in a regular store again!
Of ciurse the nain reason i cone here is all da HOT BOYS
I'm not sure why some people are having issues. I've been in there several times and the owners have always been helpful to me. The last time I went in there to get help removing a site screw that was stripped and he did it for free. I have purchased one gun from them and looked up others and their prices are around the same as others that I've seen. It's not like we live in an area with a huge population and a lot of competition.
I stayed at the Bayhouse Hostel Penghu for a few days in late December 2012. I felt very much at home and taken care of from start to finish, starting with Damon picking me up from the airport and telling me how to use the eco-friendly scooter. Due to such services, the distance to the center does not matter at all and in fact the location lends itself to more out-of-the-way adventures than simply living in the city centre. I will definitely go back one day.
I first visited Jacob Neal Salon as a new client in September 2012 and I had a wonderful experience. The salon atmosphere, staff and quality of my cut & color were amazing. I highly recommend going to Garrett if you're blonde and want an awesome haircut as well as a fun conversation. While it is pricy, you get what you pay for and at Jacob Neal you get excellence! I am going back for my second appointment in early April.
Rousseau's is the antidote to the franchise music stores that search your bags on the way in, and check off your purchases against your receipt on the way out. Great place to buy instruments, strings, accessories, you name it. Competitive prices and great service!
If anyone is in a market for a Mercedes, I will not hesitate referring them to Ian P. at Knauz Mercedes in Lake Bluff. Even after making a sale, Ian P. still has interest in me as a customer. Anytime I have questions about my car or warranty, Ian is very prompt in getting me answers. His knowledge and willingness to help will bring me back for future purchases.
Sarah is an awesome pilates instructor and massage therapist. The best in Brevard County!
Very helpful! Always honest and on time! Very nice people to work with! GREAT PRICES!
Best place I've ever been ever. My son has autism and had a 105 fever all weekend sweating crying coughing you name it, I brought him in and I kid you not of the 100s of drs ive seen for my sons autism The nurse Laurie and the other 2 women on staff were AMAZING with him. They acted like it was their kid and got him to do things no DR could get him to do without a huge fight. They even gave him the medicine on the spot and had us stay to see if he had a reaction and I cannot tell you what that feels like for a mother of child with Austim. So pleased.
Okay, I admit it. I purchase "seasoned" vehicles. I only purchase vehicle brands that I know are serviced by Franklin Automotive. Over the past 14 years, we have purchased 3 Volvo sedans, 1 Toyota and a Lexus. Franklin Techs have pampered them all. Because I trust Frank and the guys, I am not afraid to drive my cars well past the 100,000 mile mark. Their prices are fair and the service is beyond exceptional. I recommended Franklin to my mom. Now, no one but a Franklin technician touches her Avalon. She is more of a Franklin fan than I am.
I absolutely love Isabela Milan's gowns! Each one is unlike the other, all with unique styles and exquisite details.. Just looking at them you can see how much work and "blood and tears" went into each dress. Isabela is truly a passionate woman when is comes to her work. The whole family at the store are very friendly and nice and will make you feel welcome anytime and no matter the occasion. I highly recommend visiting them whether you're in search of a bridal gown or an extremely beautiful evening dress.. Your expectations will not be let down! :)
Great Customer Service & Friendly Drive Thru in Evening!
None
None
I have had many different types of pets and lived in many places and found that Banfield is in general very convenient, they can get your records anywhere in the country in a matter of minutes with just your name. I have mostly only gone to the Eagan location but i can tell you that they know me and my pets by name and genuinely care. The doctor is always firm and honest with me, which I need seeing as how I know how to keep a dog happy but not healthy. When my little guy got sick I called in a panic the front desk staff asked me to hold, after about 10 seconds my dog's primary Doctor picked up and was ready to listen as if I was the only person in the world. He took the time to listen to my probably unrelated worries. He researched and contacted specialists to make sure my dog got the best care. I decided to wait with my dog for the day even though they probably would have preferred I not watch over their shoulder all day they let me. The front desk girl checked in on me periodically to make sure me and my dog were okay. I recommend this Vet Clinic to everyone I know with a pet!
I support Liberty. Good tasting food, good service (just like Ben and Jerry's Ice cream).
This is one of my favorite restaurants. Your steak and baked potatoes are delicious. I hope my husband is bringing me to you for my birthday. If any one ask what is my favorite restauranrt I say Rosebuds. Everything is perfect when we come. Thank you and your staff for making our dinner experience wonderful! As my younger neice would say YOU ARE THE BOMB!
What a great experience! I have shopped a five state region for months, in order to find the perfect 'Vette at the right price, and when I found it at Cable-Dahmer, my concern shifted to whether or not the dealership or salesman would get in the way of a sale. Isn't that typically the case?? Not so with Joe! He "read me" over the phone, knew I was a serious buyer and dealt with me in a highly professional way. He quickly responded to my every need, was respectful of my time constraints and circumstances, and worked hard to get to the bottom line. Very surprisingly, he was even able to beat my credit union rates on the financing. All said, I picked up my 427 yesterday, and Joe made it one of the easiest deals of my life! A special car deserves first rate knowledge, detail and attention, and that is exactly what Joe provided. Though I don't expect to purchase another 'Vette, if I do, I will look no further than Joe in KC! Gary Oklahoma City, OK
None
The locksmith was timely, friendly and helpful. I appreciate your professional service. When arranging the service call, I was given all the costs upfront that may be associated with the service call. they made it easy to have locks changed and keys made on site.
None
Everything was very clean and well kept. We were seated right away on a busy Friday night. We got what we paid for.
very good asian fusion food, portions for appetizers could be bigger other than that the food was outstanding. the decor is pleasant and modern. the service could have done a better job communicating clearly but other than that it was a great meal.
Bill Shirley was an excellent salesman through the process - he was patient and communicated clearly and effectively. He answered all our questions and made the experience the best car buying experience we have had.
Comodisima suite ejecutiva. Lo mejor es que tenian practicuna para el bebe también
Started the buying process online. Compared to other Ford dealers in the area I have purchased from, Jarrett Ford was simple and pleasure to work with. My sales person was Paul Gomez whom I would recommend to others. Paul was friendly and went out of his way to close the deal. He even drove 30 miles out of his way to have paperwork signed by my wife. His e-mail responses were prompt and helpful. After coming to terms on a price, the rest of the sales process was easy and fast. No pressure to purchase additional products after I was asked and declined. I will purchase from Jarrett Ford again.
helped us to decide what we wanted from what we told them we were looking for and went above and beyond to help us feel comfortable and at ease with our decision. very happy with our choice.
My favorite frozen yogurt place. Ever!
Great services, even better staff. Thanks guys for all your help. Highly recommended :)
Awesome tasty pizza better than most local fare including the other tasty fare they offer. They may not look like much but comes with huge appeal and personality. The service is great you would be hard pressed to find better service and a smile. Staff even remember your name. If you want some dame good pizza hit them up.
Great pastries, especially the strawberry croissants.
House of Virgin Mary - Selcuk EphesusThe Virgin Mary’s house is set high in the hills of Selcuk surrounded by miles and miles of green shrubbery and trees. Once you get there, the beauty continues to amaze you as will the aura and atmosphere of this place which is said to be Mary’s last resting place. The House of Virgin Mary holds an important place in the Christian belief, but is also visited by many visitors from other religions as well.
I've purchased three cars from Bits at Chapman BMW and have always been treated fairly. Mark O has been my service advisor for years. Mark and the service department are top notch. He's always responsive and always does what he says he will do.
Brad Killen is simply lying. There is TONS O MEAT ON DEM WINGS.. delicious.
Best pizza by the slice in Edina. Tacos and gyros too!
I ordered a Fender Mustang amp and Fender Mustang floor, each was $25.00 less than anywhere else(including the lowest price from a seller on amazon who would not match the price after i order from them, i had to refused delivery) I received the Fender Mustang Floor the next day( a Saturday with free shipping). I didn't see a delivery date on the amp, emailed customer service and received a response within 12 hours. The Amp was delivered 5 days later, which was still within reason for free shipping. GREAT PRICES( i was able to use the online coupon, most music sites have a ton of restrictions on name brand items) GREAT CUSTOMER SERVICE, and GREAT DELIVERY TIME. I will use again and again.
A great car buying experience. Staff was knowledgeable and friendly without being pushy. I'd buy another car here with no hesitation.
I bought a 2013 Honda Accord from this dealership. Since then, I've taken it back for basic routine maintenance. Every time I came here, the staff made me feel welcome, treating me with courtesy. The salespeople aren't paid on commission, unlike most dealerships. Therefore, they go out of their way to help you find the best car according to your needs. Even better, they are knowledgeable about the products they sell, unlike some dealers, where it seems like they have nothing but canned information from a website. The service department is fast and efficient. Plus, they have a nice waiting room with free coffee. Never had any complaints - they are professionals. If you want a great car, possibly the best car for the price, get a Honda. And if you're going to buy a Honda, go to Planet Honda. Truly among the best.
None
If Biryani reminds you of Hyderabad, then that is partially because of this restaurant.
Some of the best pizza you can get in this area!
I disagree with the reviews that claim Dr. Davis overcharges. Definitely is worth the fees that he does charge. He and his staff are very knowledgeable and take great care of their patients.
None
great with kids! finally found a dentist that my kids can go to without fear!
None
Overall great experience, car had a tire pressure light on and no spare key but I got good deal and a lower payment. They were able to get me financing through a credit union too even though my credit isn't perfect and my own bank denied me! Thanks guys A+++++++
Loved it, American Diner style Milkshake Bar. Good quality burgers, well cooked still pink in the middle. Good messy finger food, quickly prepared and filling.
Shopped at the West Side location. Service was excellent and pan dulce was delicious as always!
Pleased with both the service and availability. They were able to work around my schedule, and fix the situation within 15 minutes. The price seemed a little steep for the limited amount of time and effort that was necessary, however the repair-man was very professional and knowledgeable. I would definitely use them again in the future should the need occur and I would recommend them to my friends / family.
This is a great place to get work done. Come early on the weekends to get a spot by the windows.
None
None
Really takes me back to when I was a kid. The service we received and the experience was wonderfully nostalgic! From the low cost, ample selection of concessions(also reasonably priced), and the ticket number drawings for prizes done by the owners themselves... DEFINITELY was a very fun, happy mood, always welcome here type of feeling that you could never experience at the big theaters. Not only was I excited to see the movie on my way there, I also felt very happy to be where I was while I was there! 10 out of 10 guys! Thanks so much for making the movie going experience as exciting as it was when I was a child! :-)
We love the Scoops atmosphere, food, ice cream and service. It's a great place to hang out with friends & family.
Awesome food. Some of the best in Butler!
Nice!!!
None
We've had three kids go to WCP and we absolutely love everything about it. In total our kids have gone to 5 daycare/preschools in CA and MA, and this place can't be beat.
a really great casual place. Food is really good, especially chicken, they have a lot of dishes to offer. dessert tip: try the chocolate bouche, this is a 5-star one ! the price is of for what you get and if you eat outside, you have a great view on chapel hill and franklin street
OK, this isn't the most up-to-date review, but I can confirm that the TVs aren't a new addition. I was watching the rugby autumn internationals there in 1997, when I was living over the road. Admittedly they were only on for the rugby and final score on a saturday. Back then it was an awesome pub, with a proper welcome. They were most sympathetic to me when I came back to town after 3 weeks away at Christmas, and couldn't remember the number to get into my apartment block. They even lent me a couple of pints while I tried to remember it, sitting with my suitcase. Happy days :-)
Very informative. Always happy with the classes I take here. I highly recommend this business.
None
None
I took my car into their shop as it was blowing only hot air from my air conditioning. Anthony and the guys took a look at what was wrong and informed me that it was the pressure switch wires that were the issue. I appreciated them being honest about it and actually showing me the problem instead of guessing at it and/or selling me on things I don't need in order to fix the problem. I enjoyed the shop and would take my car back there again.
Beautiful view and a great happy hour!!
None
tropical in
Thank you again for the wonderful photos! I am so happy with them! I am very impressed with your company...I love you guys even more now :) The customer service, studio, organization, the quality of the photos to the detail in the delivery of the final product is quite exceptional! I hope to do another photoshoot in the near future! I'm hooked :) Kissed by Light Studio is by far the most professional and well run studio I have every dealt with....I had an amazing experience right from the get go. The studio is so beautiful that I could live in it...it is very nicely setup to accommodate a range of setups. They have amazing props, are very aware of lighting and how to use it for best effect, and they definitely know how to direct and position you to ensure you get the best results. I even loved the lipstick looking USB my photos came in! Such attention to detail! And the final pictures? WOW! I cannot even believe it. I will definitely be using them again and again!
Swapping propane tanks at Home Depot costs twice as much as re-filling tanks at Expo Propane. And you lose money when you do the swaps! I do not know of any place cheaper than $1.99 per gallon and Mike was a great help educating me about the tank expiration. I will also be bringing in my rv! They have me as a lifetime customer!
Awesome addition to Guthrie. Especially painting there with Tiffany AKA The Tipsy Artist! So much fun. Keep up the great work and atmosphere!
Best wings in the area. Customer service is awesome also.
Came in looking for advice and a map on my first off road trail and the people couldn't have been friendlier. Set me on my way to a wonderful time off reading at Uwharrie. Great selection of snacks and other outdoor gear based on a cursory walk around the store. Seemed to be pretty busy but I was helped quickly.
None
I was extremely impressed by the service. Not only was our waitress prompt and polite, she kept a smile on her face the entire time and was funny. Also, a mark of good service is when waitstaff who aren't waiting on your table stop to check and see if there is anything they can do for you, which happened at least 3 times. My steak was perfect! Will definitely go again.
Bonne bouffe, le service est très courtois... je recommande ! L'Italie à QC :-)
None
None
The sales people are superb. My wife and I bought a car last week from Kyle Defreze, and went back this weekend to buy another vehicle - this time with Jane Button. On both occasions we worked with their Sales Manager, Josh, who was very easy-going and worked hard to get us to where we needed to be. On both occasions we also worked with their Finance representative, Greg Perrotti, who got us a great rate for financing on my Wife's car and did a fantastic job with getting me out of my previous lease and into a new lease! This team is definitely worth meeting, and buying a car from. I would strongly recommend this experience to my family and friends!
Diana is simply the best!!! I've had plenty of facials in my day but never have i had such consistent and lasting results as I do now! I get so many compliments on my skin now, you would never guess I was once a zitty mess! I originally came to Diana because she shares my concerns for conventional beauty products! She is dedicated to using only ethically produced, organic products during all her services and never uses products with the harmful or toxic ingredients that other spa's will use! She is incredibly knowledgeable on many health and beauty related subjects and is an absolute pleasure to be around as well! I wouldn't trust anyone else with my skin, love her!!
None
None
This place was awesome to visit! I would recommend you take your time so that you can enjoy it to the fullest! I would recommend this to anyone heading to Charlotte or make it a special trip if heading near the area. You will not be disappointed!
None
This was the best service I've ever had... It was weird because I was not expecting IHOP to have this kind of service. Our waiter was Devon. It was simply amazing.
Don't take your vehicle anywhere else but Master Tech! Duke and his team are very trustworthy and dependable, and will get you the best deal to fix your car right. You will not be let down!
Abbiamo scoperto Giulio per caso su Internet e abbiamo lavorato con lui per la prima volta per l'evento di un importante cliente a Roma. Siamo stati così soddisfatti che lo abbiamo ricontattato per un grande evento, che si è tenuto a Milano a inizio giugno e ancora una volta ha fatto un lavoro eccezionale e di grande soddisfazione per i nostri clienti. In entrambi i casi i clienti erano importanti brand internazionali, molto esigenti in termini di qualità. Se cercate un professionista in grado di realizzare foto diverse dal solito e di grande impatto emozionale, Giulio è la scelta vincente. Se poi si aggiungono professionalità cortesia, rapidità nella consegna, direi che non serve cercare altrove! :-)
None
Judy and Dori create absolutely beautiful arrangements; I have delivered for them several times and every time I am impressed with the quality of the flowers and the artistry of the bouquet. (I usually exclaim "Oooo, pretty!" when I pick them up.) The flowers also last well. They make every effort to confirm deliveries speedily, so if you order from out of town, you know when your flowers were delivered, and they always maintain a very courteous and professional demeanor, even with cross customers. I will always order flowers from Heaven Essence for people in the Boise area!
None
None
I really recommend Emergency Web Aid because they Deliver exactly i was looking for, A great Job Done by Emergency Web Aid
None
I cannot express enough how much your support mentally, physically and emotionally has helped me. Your strength is definitely an inspiration to me and all of your personal advice has helped tremendously. You are definitely in the right profession because you actually do care.
Great service--I was very impressed with the company. I found them to be very informative & professional. They found a banging noise in the front of my car which I had forgot to mention when I dropped off my car. I did most of the work that they recomended and they told me that the rest of the service could wait until the spring, when I plan to come back for my next oil change.
Called Josh on a Wednesday to receive a quote. He got me a quote within 3-hours, the price was by far the best and he came to service my house the very next day. Josh is meticulous with his work. He takes his time and does it right! My house is all white hardie plank, located in the woods and was covered in green mold! He made it look brand new again! I will definitely use Josh again and refer him to all of my friends!
None
After finding camping in March isn't a good option around Cortez(KOA closed, NP closed) I started calling motels late Saturday night trying to find something that fit into our "camping" vacation budget. White Eagle was $45 which was almost half of the other chain motels around here. It was out of town a bit so I thought the GPS was lost but what a gem when we got here. It is VERY well kept and the lady at the desk treated me like family. I don't remember when I have stayed in a place that is this clean. By-pass the big name places...this is the place to stay!!
My family has been going to see the wonderful staff of Grand Central Therapy for well over a decade now. Both David Ricci and Hector Mayo take the time not only to help heal their clients but get to know them on a personal level. They are the best and brightest and my first stop or call for any ache or pain. The staff at Grand Central Therapy is always there to help and accommodate to whatever works best for the client to ensure a quick and painless(as painless as possible) recovery.
None
We had a Christmas Party at the Toad n Turtle in Airdrie and the food was absolutely amazing. Best prime rib we have had in a long time. That night the food was comparable to something you would eat at the Fairmont Hotel in Banff. Top notch food. Definitely the best place in Airdrie to have a Party!
This is our 3rd purchase from Morries Chippewa Valley Mazda and I was as pleased as always. I was very excited to drive away in my BRAND NEW Mazda 2. Chris Dunn was a pleasure to work with as well as all of the other employees who helped me throughout the day. Thanks everyone!
Just purchased my 5th Honda from Roush. Outstanding staff. "My" salesperson, Leigh Daniels, is outstanding. He is the person you want to work with when you purchase a vehicle. The Service department is also top-notch. I have appreciated the amenities in the waiting area as well, large screen TV, coffee, vending machines, computers with internet access, play area for kids. It is very family-oriented. I would also recommend getting the rental car added to your purchase. They make it very easy to drop off your car for one of the bigger services and pick up a rental to use instead of bumming a ride, or waiting around for the service to finish. It is obvious to their customers why they earn the Presidential award. Highly recommended.
Cib bank
Docked in with our Coast Guard Vessel and had assistant with tying to dock. Great Staffs. Wonderful food. Loved the Soft Shelled Crab Sandwich. The credit card machine wasn't working today so that sucked. Other than that all else was well! Just a warning. LOW TIDE Don't go if you have a big vessel.. lol
Been going to Twelve Oaks Mall since a younging and will continue to hold this place as a top spot in my places I love. From the wide variety of shops and restaurants, to the continual updates, knowledgable emplyees, clean environment, and security- I hold this mall as my favorite. Taubman malls are the best.
The customer service, professionalism and attention to detail is phenomenal. I am definitely recommending them to my friends and family.
My experience at Fred Anderson was exceptionally great. They worked very hard to get me in my new 2014 Toyota. It was no pressure at all. They were professional (Brent, and Alicia). They made sure I was completed satisfied. Every detail was covered with no room for error. They took their time and treated me with great care and concern. I would highly recommend them.
Fantastic food from the Chef who ran the Trouble House near Tetbury
First of all I would like to thanks the whole QACampus team for their support in achieving my goals. There Job guarantee program has not only cleared all my concepts of software testing but has also helped me in getting placed in a reputed company.
My girlfriend already goes to Hair Kandi, and recommended it. What more can a lad want than good banter, a beer, and a decent hair cut. I always get what I ask for, couldn't rate them highly enough. Recommend Lawrence and Mike everytime.
We've only had the pleasure of Cheap Shots taking our photos once because it is difficult for me to get my son and husband to do photos lol. But our photographer was amazing. She even managed to win the favor of our family dog, who did everything she asked of her lol. We absolutely ADORE our photos and look forward to our next family pictures that we'll only trust Cheap Shots to take from now on!
David's entrepreneurial outlook about his practice makes his firm able to tailor its services to its clients' needs, and his professional ethic ensures that those needs are met. He approaches client problems through a wider lens that reaches further into the future than other young attorneys.
I must've been to more than hundred hostels all around the world, but i must say - I absolutely LOVED staying in Pacific Tradewinds Backpacker Hostel. I stayed there for 10 day, and i think It's the best hostel in San Francisco! The place was really clean and comfortable, the location was great, close to BART, MUNI, and to buses and trams, but what's more important - the staff there is quite amazing! Everyone is really friendly and goes out of their way to make sure you have a great time in San Francisco. They have special discounts for tours, bikes, etc, and will suggest you where and how to spend a day; they'll pretty much share with you all they know about SF. Also, their central "hanging-out" space is really cosy and friendly. If you are traveling by yourself and don't know many people in SF, definitely stay in this hostel, and you'll make a lot of new friends and have a good time! :) Last but not least, they have a free WiFi there, and even two desktops where you can check your email.
Someone slammed their door into my wife's Highlander and dented the front fender. Man that made me mad plus now the truck looked lousy. Well I decided to take the vehicle over to Mister Dent. I spoke to Robert who agreed to meet me on a Saturday which was great. I made an appointment for the following weekend and he took care of it. He did a great job. You could not tell there was ever any damage there!!! I also brought him my Lexus that had a couple of door dings and he took care of those as well. I highly recommend Mister Dent he does excellent work! In the future, Robert will get all of the work my cars may need.
Chevere esta estacion por la zona comercial que la rodea
None
None
The entire team at All Creatures is amazing. I would highly recommend them, we bring both our cat and dog and they love it there. Dr. Burba is great.
If done right you can see faces of supposed spirits in the trees around the cemetery in your picture i must not be doign something right yet or maybe cyz I usually o by myself maybe if i got some friends thats hard to find for me and go explore one such place is outside loiusville ky called waverly hills sanatarium
We had a fantastic experience at Henderson Chevrolet. Eric did an excellent job for us, getting us into what we wanted. As a general rule, I don't care for car salesmen, but Eric was the exception. It was a thoroughly enjoyable experience and I would definitely buy another car from him.
Great Game Store. Great Selection. Great prices (competitive with online). Always helpful and cater to all clients including families.
This is a magical shrine embedded within a small slice of ancient forest. I lived in Maebashi as an English teacher and coming here was by far the most amazing experience I had during my time here. By the way, the website given above links to a different Akagi Shrine; this one is often called the Miyosawa Akagi Shrine to differentiate from the more well known one on top of Mt. Akagi.
None
Kathleen provided us great customer service. She ensured that we received the exact blinds we wanted and more importantly needed for our remodeled master bedroom. She followed up with us through the entire process from measuring to install. The installers were just as competent. Mike and Brent ensured that everything was professionally installed and that we were satisfied before they left the home. We will use 3 Blind Mice Window Coverings for our future needs.
Deron Singh is an excellent trainer and motivator. His classes are never the same and target all areas of the body. I have been going since December and notice a definite increase in strength, flexibility and endurance! First time I haven't gotten discouraged when training.
Gluten Free Pancakes and Belgium Waffles...need I say more? :)
I live on the west side and decided to stop by Jolly's. In being out of Aquariums for over ? 25 yrs. I started up a 55gal Saltwater so Mom will have something else to watch ( other then the TV ). Upon entering, I was greeted by Fay and Steve came over and helped me out. He was very knowledgeable. Though I have not purchased any fish yet and he suggested I start with just a live rock and let my tank cycle. So for now, looking good ! After I purchase some fish, I'll update with another review.
None
Quick, honest, complete. Went for inspection and oil change. Their stated prices are a little higher because the price they give you is what you pay. Didn't have a bunch of additional fees like labor, disposal, parts - just the price I was given. Didn't pressure me on additional services, just gave me prices for future reference on the work order. Will go to there again.
We got a wonderful studio apartment with private bathroom for one night at a very low price. Location also was great. When we went to check out we met the owner and he offered us a free breakfast in the hostel. They do seem to care about their customers here. Would book again if stopping in Dublin another time.
Good one
None
Found out this place existed today and I'm in love! vegan food with vegetarian options. And vegan desserts!
Hands down the best jewelry store I've ever been in. They have great products to hit every single price point and everything is amazingly nice. From the minute I walked in the door I was treated like a life long customer and friend. Don't waste your time at the "chain/franchise" jewelry stores - this is a family run business with a huge network and a plethora of connections in the industry. Shop here first - you won't want to go anywhere else.
Job well done. Very pleased former client.
Most successful private oil & gas E&P in India.
None
Food was excellent! My fiance and I went there and it was our first visit..we loved it. We got the mozzarella sticks as an appetizer and both got salads. I got the lasagna and my fiance got the Chicken parm...they were both huge portions and very delicious!!! Our service was great as well...overall a great experience and was very reasonably priced. We will be going there for Italian from now on.
I feel like my baby is cared for... a really clean facility and nice curriculum. I feel like I am leaving my child at grandmas
Great small park they always have something going on there ex rib festival, summer bands and much more!
After my car was totaled, I looked at many different vehicles trying to decide whether to buy new or used or to lease. I narrowed it down to a Hyundai Elantra Limited and decided to lease. After visiting several dealerships in and around Nashville I was not impressed with any of them. Even after I told them I had sold cars for 12 years and Hyundais for 6 years, most still tried to give me a sales pitch that I knew was not true. The owner of the dealership where I had retired from told me to go to Southeast Signature in Murfreesboro and they would take care of me. I went there and I am happy to say it was the best car purchasing experience I have had. From the salesman Josh, the sales manager Tony, the finance person Rob to the owner Dave Harris, my wife and I were treated like close friends or family. There was no pressure to buy what was on the lot(they did not have the color I wanted). They did a search and found me one. It was the easiest purchase I have made, There was no haggling back and forth. they asked some questions to find out what my needs were and came back with their best price, which much lower than any of the competition and included more miles per year. I would highly recommend anyone looking to buy a car, especially a Hyundai or Volkswagon to go to Southeast Signature in Murfreesboro and give them a chance to show you how an automobile dealership can take you through a car buying experience and win your business the RIGHT way.
None
None
Very accurate
Great customer service! Stopped by with my sister to have her take a look to see if she even cared for Subarus....she didn't care much for style, The gentleman (Hameed) who helped us was very knowledgeable and kind and answered all of her questions...he wasn't pushy at all which we appreciated. Would recommend this dealership if you are thinking about purchasing a Subaru.
i got my industrial piercing last week.the looks of the place is like anyother tattoo and piercing place.however,i disliked the wait time on the saturday but what can i do...they have a deal on saturdays on piercing and people love to come to places that give deals on these expensive interests.
Calo has the best deep dish pizza in Chicago. I live down in Old Town but we still travel up to Andersonville to get this pizza!
LOVE crossfit frequency! I actually look forward to working out for once in my life! Normally after a long day at work I would have to drag myself to the gym and most days I ended up opting for wheel of fortune and the couch. I NEVER feel this way about going to CFF and I noticed results almost immediately. Coaches are awesome, people are friendly and welcoming and it really feels like a big family! Do yourself a favor and try it out!
My wife and I moved into the community 8 years ago. We had been members of a Conservative synogogue for 30 years in the old neighborhood. Being contrarians wew bought a house 2 1/2 times larger than the old one even though are children were grown and out of our home. Our first item on our agenda was to find a synogogue to join. So we went synogogue shopping in our new community. Our needs were met by Shelter Rock Jewish Center. While keeping traditional values and Jewish Law it is also egtalitarian and constantly looking to apply these two valures to modernity and to the meet the needs of every member and to the community at large. I have studies with the rabbi of our synagogue for several years now and am constantly learning not just Jewish Law and Responsa but, Jewish history both ancient and modern. Our cantor and Rabbi make services a pleasure and the congregation actually sings rather than just observe. If you are looking for a place that will fulfill your needs for ruach and also teach and help you teach your children where they came from and where they are going as Jews, Shelter Rock is that place. P.S. I am not a member of the board and I am in no way affliated with the synogogue other than being a member
Bonne sélection, personnel extrêmement sympathique. Et gaufres belges délicieuses le dimanche!
Excellent service quality, room was spacious, it was included buffet breakfast everyday. Highly recommend to travelers.
Very laid back and knowledgeable crew! Great prices and variety!
Lots of new and used metal stock to peruse and interesting pieces from old boat propellers to ball bearings.
Pomeriggio passato nella SPA dell'Hotel... accolta e coccolata nel migliore dei modi! Ottimo!
Special thanks to Giau Luong of Herb Chambers Toyota of Boston for making the purchase of our 2014 Sienna easy and enjoyable! My wife and I are very impressed with Giau's honesty and his way of doing business. We strongly recommend Herb Chambers business and Giau Luong as your next car dealer. Svetlana and Nisan Maklin Newton, MA
None
Great food. Great atmosphere.
"When working with clients, it is important for me have samples to show them. I always have a few samples of different textures in my office. I have worked with David for a few years now and only have good things to say about him" From Carina Ibsen Interior Designer (Corona Del Mar)
i loved the food, it was great, especially love the bubble tea!!!
ప్రతి రోజు ఇక్కడ స్వామి వారి ఆధ్వర్యం లో సేవ చేయ బడును ఇది సాక్షాతూ ఉచిత సేవ మోకాళ్ళ నొప్పులు, నడుము నొప్పులు, కీళ్ళ నొప్పులు అన్ని చెయ్యబడును ఇంకా ఉచితంగా మందులు కూడా ఇవ్వబడును
None
chuzo!
I have been in the VZW store in Monument on several occasions and have never had anything but great customer service. All of the employees have been very helpful and knowledgeable.
I am glad that I tried a new rental agency. Sixt was a great deal, just as close/convenient as anybody else and with a smooth hassle-free check-in and check-out. I'll look to Sixt for future rentals.
This boutique is always filled with sparkle and fun baubles. You can really tell the owners heart and soul is in this shop. She is a true artisan and you can always find something to covet in this amazing little shop. If you are in Evanston or the Chicagoland area, it is worth a trip! :)
I'm rather surprised to see the vitriolic reviews. I've been a patient Dr. Suddath since 2005 and have found him to be a very competent compassionate doctor. I agree with Pine Forrest, he is one of the best doctors I've had and the best psychiatrist. When I initially consulted him I had tried on my own to withdraw from antidepressant drugs with disastrous results. Dr. Suddath helped me find a medication regime that works for me and that gives me no side effects at all. He was the first doctor I'd ever seen that pushed for me to get my vitamin levels checked and it was this way that I discovered I had a vitamin b-12 deficiency and anemia. I would recommend him highly.
I have gotten help from both Katie and Victoria. They are both very professional, knowledgeable, and work to get your body aligned and working properly. I am on my way to book another visit.
the salon is adorable. it deserves all the five stars it gets and more.
Lily launders my linens for my busy massage therapy practice and offers wonderful and efficient service.
Best clg
Dr. Braithwaite and his staff are very nice. I feel like they were very honest with me. I didn't have any cavities. I am looking at becoming a dentist so he even offered to let me shadow him. Great dentist.
I sprained my knee and Steve and his staff were very helpful to get me back to normal again. They taught me exercises which gradually built strength and used laser and other therapies to stimulate healing. I highly recommend!
Hand made dough! Great service! Polite helpful and flexible with a complex topping issue. Love this place.
Extremely helpful management..knowledgeable..safe location for storage.
None
Best pizza in town, hands down.
None
None
Velmi příjemné prostředí s milou obsluhou :)
None
I am the owner of CrossFit Relentless in West Hartford. As owner and head coach of a gym that practices high intensity workouts I have come to know both Dr Jessica and John Tagliarini well. I personally go to Dr John and recommend them to all my clients. They have helped keep us healthy and strong to pursue of workouts with intensity. I trust in them completely. I would highly recommend them to anyone who is in need of their service.
Sarris sold me a car and serviced it the whole time I had it. I have never gone to any other mechanic since I found these guys about seven years ago. Never a hassle, always wonderful to deal with. I highly recommend these folks for sales and/or service.
Was referred 2 Henry's by Jiffy Lube staff that did my oil change....Had 11am appointment...got there at 1045 & they greeted me & took me right in! Staff was excellent & professional! Showed me exactly what was wrong....explained work price & I was out the door n 45 minutes! A def A+ service
The chicken dishes were excellent, their mole sauce I wish the bottled so I could bring back home. Their salsa and green chili sauce were very spicy which I liked but might be too hot for us Gringos. Only criticism is the chips are very hard.
Great stone-oven pizza. Great service too.
None
Murray and the Team at Hirepool are the best. I would highly recommend them
I love how they decorated the place for christmas... :)
A fantastic place for anyone and everyone (including families) to enjoy the gardens, grounds, conservatory and cafe during the warm weather. Also the perfect place to marvel at the museum, aquarium and exhibits. No matter how many times you visit, you will never get bored!
What a professional dealership, Leonard has sold us many cars and does a wonderful job. He makes sure we are informed on every aspect of the car and opportunities the dealer may be offering. We look forward to next years new purchase.! Thank you everyone for taking care of us.!
I would like to thank everyone at Voltaire and especially Sarah for the wonderful engagement ring I bought recently. My fiancee loves it, she even said herself she couldn't of picked a better ring. Sarah made the engagement ring search very easy, from start to finish she put me at ease and couldn't of been more helpful. I would highly recommend them to people on the look out for engagement rings.
N'hésitez pas à visiter notre site Internet et à nous contacter quelque soit votre projet sportif. Sportivement, ABC coachs sportifs.
I continue to visit Naomi at Hands on Health for regular adjustments having suffered for a number of years with tension headaches which prevented me from working when at their worst, and never going anywhere without migraine tablets in my handbag, I am now pain free and very rarely experience headaches at all. Would highly recommend.
My wife randomly picked this dentist from the list our insurance gave us, and it turned out to be very good. I had a previous dentist in town that was more like a used car dealer than a dentist. This place though was laid back and very relaxed, but very professional. I still don't like going to see the dentist, but as I told the office when I left, I enjoyed my visit about as much as a trip to the dentist could be.
None
Is the original Juarez park n the best if u wanna have a good time for your kids that's the target right there.I promise
None
Housed in the former Pif building, this is one of the reasons Philly restaurant culture is one of the best in the country.
woow it was a great learning environment and i can not say anything bad about this experience it was a good 3 days of learning of driving imparied and the choices i make that can make a difference to me and the people around me but other than that school was good i ill make sure to never go back to learn what i know is all common sense thanks for a great learning environment A-1 driving school
Druk wykonany profesjonalnie. Bardzo rzetelna i uczciwa firma, polecam każdemu!
None
Shopped around the Utah county area looking for a good deal on tires. Called AG and very helpful in finding me some "used" tires. They were practically brand new, great service and Miguel was awesome and very helpful. Best price in town! I recommend to anyone who needs tires or brakes.
I originally discovered Ex Libris at Renegade Craft Fair's store in Chicago. I love, love, love their journals, especially the ones made from vintage craft books. I love that the pages are unlined and that some of the original pages from the books are often interspersed among the blank pages. They're what I use to brainstorm DIY ideas. The unlined pages are the perfect canvas for it. :)
Great service! Great staff! Easy to schedule appointments and work with. I would recommend them for all your Chiropractic needs.
I have had the opportunity/pleasure to work with Dickson Law Group. The entire staff is very knowledgable and congenial. They are very competent when it comes to all facets of their business. I would highly recommend them to anyone inquiring about their services and look forward to a continuing successful relationship with this highly trained and professional group of people. Please contact me if you would like more details but be rest assured when you work with Dickson Law Group you can expect nothing but the best service, highest form of expertise and continued support throughout the process. Thank you Dickson Law Group!
None
I went to see Janet for a prenatal massage. She was excellent and really helped my sore lower back, neck and shoulders. She even showed me stretches that I should be doing during pregnancy and beyond. I booked my next appointment for next month! Would definitely reccomend :)
None
We had a great experience as we were shopping and got to talk w/ and laugh w/ alot of the staff, they did a great deal and took great care of us when we came to pick up our Dyna Wide Glide. My hubby is so happy. Nice job, Rawhide!
Gotta love Art
Proud to represent Mujeza Trading Company in Canada. Mujeza.ca
A glass pane from our hutch broke just before Christmas. Packerland had already closed, but one man was still in the office. He saw me and quickly came to unlock the door. Then he took the broken parts, measured them and cut me a new piece right there. He didn't take my name for someone else to handle when the shop was open again. That is great service.
The restaurant was empty but supertasty food! Low price for superfood. I had salad, very big, and after it Tuna. Delicious!
Don'tfor go tenderloin toP. all others are second To none. Awesome job chef and everyone there.
I would highly recommend this driving school for anyone looking for a driving school in Scarbrough .
Very Friendly service, Hard working, Great experience!
Excellent gym. It has nice equipment and friendly staff.
None
This is the best movie theater in town. I'm really not sure why more people don't go to it. It's very reasonably priced, and there is plenty of parking in the garage. They validate parking, and if you are there for dinner and a movie you only end up paying about $2 for parking. I've rarely been to a movie that was more than half full so you are always able to get good seats. The seats are large and comfortable. There is about a foot between each seat so you have plenty of room and don't feel like the person next to you is breathing down your neck. They have a full menu and bar that is reasonably priced.
Truly delicious!!...allergies, of course, stick to what you know ;)
Marsha and Machail were very professional in helping us find the right car at the right price. No salesman hassle. We are very satisfied with the 2014 Honda CR-V EX we bought. We'd recommend them to our friends.
Awesome Thai food, the best little takeaway we've tried! The ladies are always lovely and the food is super tasty.
None
These guys are top notch! The perfect combination of quality work and excellent customer service.
We shopped many different models of cars this time around before finally settling on a Nissan Pathfinder. From the beginning our salesperson, Campbell Lovett, went absolutely out of his way to make sure he was there for us. My specs had to be shipped from out of town and he was on top of the process the entire time. And even though the car wasn't on their lot, we got our target price for it and the negotiation was simple and smooth. They even gave me a very fair price on a 10-year-old trade-in, better than CarMax and Auction Direct. Everyone we dealt with was absolutely great and have still been there for all of my questions even AFTER the purchase. I couldn't be more pleased with the dealership, our salesperson, our car or the transaction. Thank you Leith!
Sehr nette und rasche Bedienung. Ausgezeichnete Pizzen. Außerdem gibt es Pizzen, Pasta und auch gewisse Nachspeisen auf Nachfrage glutenfrei.
Wszystko prima sort.
Fleming Meadows is my favorite place to camp when visiting Lake Don Pedro. Many of my summers were spent there as a child and they have done an amazing job of keeping the place beautiful. The camping facilities are well groomed and spaced out fairly well. The general store and marina although somewhat expensive are well stocked with most anything you might need, including ice when you inevitably run out! The boat launch is well maintained and they keep it running smoothly. The swimming lagoon (oversized mud puddle) is a great place to go cool off when you aren't out in the boat. The Lake is enormous and gorgeous. There are so many little coves to explore. But, I especially like (after a day of fun in the sun) to wander around in the evenings a bit to listen to the crickets and watch the bats and owls fly around. Mystical. There are several great places to camp, I won't tell you my favorite though because I want to keep it for myself! You will just have to go there and find your own little piece of California gold.
None
Recently Channel 7, ABC did a piece on Neighborhood Eats and I was fortunate enough to be interviewed. I meant everything I said...the food, service, and the people are great. I totally agree with the other comment about the best Beef Patties in The Bronx! Everything is good! It will be worth the trip!
Very Friendly. Service great and the stories the people there tell about each painting is great I could just sit there and listen to each story all day. I also own some of his Art and love it
AAla hotel haaaaaaaaaaaaaa
None
None
They generally have everything we require for Indian groceries. The service is quick and the unavailable items can be put up into a board which I feel they try to get the items. Over the phone too we can check beforehand whether we can get the required item. I love the ambiance.
None
My dog was hit by a car today and this was the closest animal hospital to me that offered emergency services. They told me to come in and saw me immediately as I walked in the door holding my dog. They were extremely nice and helpful, gave me good prices beforehand, cared for her and assured me that she would be ok. This will now be my home vet office even after she recovers.
Much like his Father, Peter Manka Jr. has a great ability to make everyone who walks through the doors of Ben Garelick Jewelers feels like family. With a business founded on hard work and integrity, Ben Garelick Jewelers is the gold standard of service in the fine jewelry industry. My most recent purchase was an engagement ring that I ordered sight unseen from across the country. It was delivered overnight from Buffalo to San Diego, on-time with a hand written thank you note. I am so grateful to Peter and his wonderful family for providing such genuine service through the years! Salute!
Mozingo Photography is the way to go! When it came time to selecting a photographer for our wedding we knew that the Mozingo team would be fabulous. Competitively priced and such a great value. Both Meriah and Michael have a keen photographers eye and can really capture all those special moments that might have been easily missed. Their process from start to finish is flawless and so professional. They take their time to sit down and get to know you and the event that you're having and what you want. Their day of event presence is calming in the way that you fully trust what they are doing. My wedding contained some spirited characters who sometimes are hard to reign in for photos but the Mozingo's were champs. They are the kind of husband and wife team that would you want at your event regardless if they were photographing it or not! We were so happy with the outcome of our photos. The photos' were so excellent that our wedding was chosen to be featured in a bridal guide for our area. The best thing about using Mozingo Photography is not only do you end up with awesome photos that last but you will end up with a friendship that lasts as well! I'd say that that is money well spent!
None
Great food, big portions. Nice atmosphere.
منزلنا في تفرغ زينه
None
Excelente lugar de compras!
The condos are great - we like the Summit building the best, the staff are amazing, and the location can't be beat. In the winter these are true ski-in/out condos, and in the summer the stunning beauty of the area combined with the serene location make it unforgettable. LOVE. LOVE. LOVE.
None
Amazing place to get a delicious sandwich. Super fast delivery as well
Found Game Repair on a Google search. They took only 2 days to fix a Red Ring of Death on my 360. I would have no hesitation taking a console to Game Repair again for repair.
The facility is very clean, the equipment modern and the staff has always treated me with professionalism and courtesy.
From the moment we pulled up to the office, we felt special. They had a personalized parking spot for our daughter. The staff is friendly and the office is so inviting. They take such great care of us and my daughter's teeth are gorgeous! Thank you Dr. Robison and Staff for everything you have done!
Fabulous service! I had my hair cut and I'm really happy with it. My hair is curly and can be really nice with the right style and Ed completely nailed! Well done Ed, I will certainly be back again!
5 stars... I have been there 3 times already and have loved my hair sylist, CHRIS.. he did such an awsome job with my hair color and cut. I recomend you go to see him if your looking for great color or a great hair cut!!!
None
I called Rich from Auto Connections to install my subwoofer into my truck, not knowing that he operates well over 45 minutes away from where I live, he still drove out to the middle of nowhere to help me out. After arriving we both realized that the previous owner of the truck did a remarkably crappy job on practically all the wiring throughout the truck. Without a thought he jumped right in and started fixing the previous work that was done under the dash and installed the subwoofer. Rich really seemed like he knew exactly what he was doing at all times. It was quick and easy and I would definitely recommend him to anyone who needs work done on there cars. -Not Tim.
None
WOW! CALL DERWIN FIRST! I had about 12 very tall pines to cut...which were around my house. I think I called and filled out literally twenty tree service companies. A large number never even responded to their web forms. Some never called back or had a full voicemail. Then the ones that said they would come "take a look" (are they running a business or a hobby?) never came by. The ones that came by literally wanted double the price. One company even said it would be a MONTH before they could even come and estimate it (not do the job...but estimate it) Also some really talk about how they use cranes to get the trees. Derwin uses cranes as part of getting the job done...and really most use cranes to make sure they can safely take down a tree...but also they can cut the logs in larger sections to sell to the lumber mill (which is good business sense and a common practice) Anyway...I came across Youngs Tree Tech on city-data forums. I'm very grateful I did. Derwin personally called me within an hour of filling out his web form. Came out that Sat. to give an estimate...and like I said did it for half of what the others that did come estimate it did. I set up an appointment for 7:30-8am one Monday....and let me tell you they came in....literally taking up a street of equipment (but positioning it to be polite to the neighbors/neighborhood) and his crew cut down, ground the stumps, and cleaned up 12 tall pines in four hours. My parents were here and were just watching in awe...they then professed how they wished Derwin was in Salisbury to do work for them. Derwin comes in tells you what he is going to do...for how much...and comes in with his people and they work their butts off to get it done...and done right. In fact...a week later I saw his crew in front of my house cutting my neighbors trees. Call Derwin first...and I really don't think you will need to waste time trying to get others to help you with your project. If another tree is taken down on my property Derwin will be the one I call to do it.
None
As someone who has traveled North America and other countries, I am always looking for spa experiences that will allow me to shift my mind to relaxing and finding my center. I was grateful to find that Koru Touch has mastered what it means to sensually be taken to a peaceful place, which in turn allows one to just pleasantly be. From the steam room, sauna and hot tub to the exquisite services of massaging, grooming and facials, one finds the sense of touch, scent, sight, taste and hearing pleasurable through the entirety of the experience. Summing up: If you are looking for an escape - go. If you are looking for a spa service - go. If you are looking for day of beauty - go. The only question you should ask is, why aren't you there yet?
Nathan did my wedding photos about 4 years ago! He was so amazing to work with, and I am so glad that I was able to hire him. We had a very very small budget, but being an art major at the time, I knew that the one thing that I would not and could not skimp on was photography! We still got an amazing deal with Nathan compared to other artists in his field. He offered an included an engagement shoot and the wedsnaps idea was a hit with our guests! Some of them even still have the photos that he took at our wedding as their profile pictures on FB! Not only are the photos amazing, but he also was so helpful and reassuring on the day of. I had planned an outdoor garden party for my reception in the Bonita, CA area following my ceremony at a church in La Jolla. It decided to rain, for the first time on that date in over 10 years in San Diego. Being a super perfectionist, and a little bit of a Bridezilla, there were several times that I broke down crying during the time that we were supposed to be taking our portrait photos. My new husband did his best to calm me down about the fact that my outdoor reception that I had dreamed of my whole life was being moved indoors to a rec room basketball court, my worst nightmare! But it was Nathan that was able to reassure me that if our beach portrait photos didn't turn out the way I wanted that he would be more than happy to reshoot on a different date. He also explained that he would pull out all the tricks in the book to make the photos of the reception not look like they were taken on a basketball court, and he did! I still don't know how, but there is only one image out of hundreds that you can (only kind of) make out the lines on the floor! Since my wedding, and all that I learned from the mistakes I made in planning it, I have become a wedding planner here in San Diego. I look back on that day with the knowledge that I have gained in the past few years and laugh at my naive self! But one thing is for sure, Nathan saved my wedding from being a disaster in my mind with his organization and willingness to take control of a messy situation! You never know what will happen on the day of your wedding, so having a professional like Nathan already hired to assist with what ever may arise is just a smart idea! As a former bride I absolutely recommend him! And as a wedding professional I endorse him 100%!
I have been visiting Chili several times, the food is really good, one of the best burgers in Copenhagen - i love the fries, the place is really cosy and the staff is always nice, fast and sweet
I was new to the car buying experience but Chris Nadig along with Brad H answered all of my questions throughly and helped me walk away very happily with a new Jetta, stress free. Both of these men were very knowledgeable and showed enthusiasm for their their work.
V&V YOU GET AN A+ IN MY BOOK,[],5 STARS ALL THE WAY, I WOULD RECOMMEND V& V TO ANY ONE IN LAS VEGAS ,[], FROM ANTHONY THE HAWAIIAN IN LAS VEGAS
Servcorp provides an excellent service. Its a great thing to be able to have an office location in a prestigious building like Westpac house, and be able to use it only when we need it. The views from level 30 are sensational, and the offices are well equipped and quiet, allowing you to work most effectively. The boardroom offers a fantastic meeting space to meet clients and hold small seminars.
I first ate at grazie almost 18yrs ago. the food was amazing, its even better today. always fresh, hot and delicious. i have sent hundreds of people to grazie on my recommendation and have always received back amazing feedback. i strongly recommend grazie as the best Italian food gastronomic experience in the city and in Richmond Hill now too. Evan Back VP Sales AvidLifeMedia
J'ai la chance d'aller déjeuner quotidiennement dans ce restaurant. La terrasse ombragée est fort agréable. Ne vous attendez pas à un choix plétorique de plats (qui serait cage de cuisine surgelé ...) , un menu du jour qui change en permanence avec choix de poisson ou viande , une carte notamment de viande (vive le tartare) très attirante ! Bref pour les amateurs de restaurant cuisnant encore du frais , c'est la bonne adresse. Les grandes salle permettent les repas de groupes et de fêtes. A consommer sans modération !
It was pretty fun, but like usual, it was super crowded and just waiting in the long lines made me tired before the end of the day. However, if you can look beyond that, it is a great experincefor everyone, including the little ones.
I love this office. The dentist that I see is Dr. Heidenreich . This is the first time I have had a dentist that puts me completely at ease ... He talks me through all procedures and does not hurt!!! I love the way the dentist works with and respects all members of the team. The atmosphere in the office is professional but at the same time warm. OUTSTANDING CUSTOMER SERVICE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
None
Great pizza, subs, and Italian food. Best buy!
Excellent website...Too good Really Puneproperties is a miracle & believable real estate solution center for me. They had provided us great services.
We recently had a wonderful weekend at Magic Mountain. The unit we stayed in (D27) had recently been renovated and was in fabulous condition. It had plenty of everything in the kitchen and was very clean. The view for the balcony was spectacular and you could see for the ocean in front around through the Surfers Paradise skyline (really good at night) to the sunset over the range. It has obviously had some money spent on the unit recently. Great place, we will be back, soon.
Service was good and the food was yummy.
Just had new tires put on my SUV. I received good service at fair price with no attempt to up-sell.
Chill, not too crowded, good beer & game selection
nice masjid quite like this place.
I used Margaret Emms to order some flowers for valentines day and was unsure what to order other than traditional red roses. However i was expertly advised as to the different options available and so selected a bouquet which matched my budget. The flowers were delivered on time and looked absolutely fabulous and amazingly lasted for over two weeks! I will definitely be using Margaret Emms again.
good
Worth the wait; it can be 15 min to 1 hour even. Photo booth is super fun. The menu is simple with high quality ingredients. Side veggies or salads are seasonal and locally inspired. The wood fired oven flavor and thin crust are magical. Home run. Not even the slightest bit uppity or over priced. Go here.
Beautiful Place
Bella Cochabamba
None
Excellent food and service!
None
This is a great little studio just a quick drive south of the center of Indianapolis. Great classes and instructors, and wonderful members to learn with!
Great garden centre, friendly staff and a really nice cafe
The sweetest people run this store---everything from gourmet chocolates to "penny" candy by the pound. And they were selling Bonomo Turkish Taffy which I have not seen in 40 years! Great gourmet selection of nuts and dried fruit--great hostess gifts too.
If your shopping mendwear, ask for Sam. He knows products and is well versed in customer service.
Justs gets better. I was able to get a great deal on a closeout Bosch Washer and Dryer. I would have had to buy something of lesser quality if I hadn't found these people. Learned their family has been in business since 1914.
Looking to lease a new car, I made sure I knew everything that was available to me out there. In Civic Motors Honda I got the best deal I could get! I am very please with my overall buying experience and the follow up services I've had for my car there. I highly recomend this dealership!
i have experienced massage therapy for over 20 years and omega is a tremendously talented and gifted therapist. she doesn't work off a script but tunes her focus on the unspoken areas the client's body presents. i recently attended my 1st crystal bowl session. not knowing what to expect, i was a tad skeptical. the outcome was remarkable! symptoms of finger tip, foot arch and toe numbness was eliminated by the next day. additionally finger joint swelling and other daily processes were also restored. i am a big fan of omega's gifts and her wise use of them - and encourage everyone to take the time for yourself and make an appointment, take a chance, you wont be disappointed
None
Wow! Best breakfast I've had in a long time. Sparse menu but delicious. Pancakes and sourdough toast were exceptional.
I love the 3 meat pizza a customer for life!!!
I personally know Lynn Brewer and Tom Marquardt the owners and several of their customers. They give great service before and after the sales. They are continually on call to assist their clients. They are extremely knowledgable in all areas of HR and workers compensation issues.
None
Best learning destination
Dentist...or Spa? I love this place! I used to fear the dentist as a child but now I look forward to visiting the friendly staff at Horizon Dental. They always remember me and things I've told them in past visits, they never take too long on procedures or cleanings, and they are very accommodating to every issue a patient may have. Even better is that they encourage me to take care of my teeth and gums and give me praise when I have done so! All of my friends are openly jealous that my visit comes with a paraffin wax hand-dip and chair massage, which I also find to be a major perk of my experience at Horizon Dental. I've been a patient since 2008 and I'll continue to be as long as I'm a resident of the City of Trees!
Order your turkey now
As a green industry professional, I frequently use CTF as a source for quality trees and shrubs, for both my clients and my own use. The owners and staff are knowledgeable, helpful, timely, and trustworthy. Their prices are competitive, the nursery stock is reliably healthy, and their customer service and attention to detail are noteworthy. As a small, family-owed business, my experience has been that they respond to every customer with individual attention. The retail display is beautiful and shopping there is a pleasure! In addition, Levi's commitment to supporting worthwhile non-profit organizations throughout our community is greatly appreciated!
As a technical expert in computer science, I'm proud to be a repeat customer of this business. The technicians are incredibly precise, incredibly professional, and they REALLY know what they are doing. Their hardware repair solutions are incredibly efficient, and they know how to look for problems that even I wasn't aware of. I've been here 3 times so far for different computers, and every time their service had great value, speed, and professionalism.
i went there long time back but the ambience and the food and the service were spectacular, i do recomend it for romantic dinners is just great place!!!
Great service.... Roger took care of it all, I was an out of state buyer, arranged for airport pick up. Car was as described and even better, with a price that cant be beat.
This is some of the very best Thai food I've had. Period. The restaurant isn't much to look at from the outside, as it's in a dinky strip mall in a concrete wasteland on the outskirts of Ypsilanti, MI. They did recently expand however, taking over the computer store next door. As you could reasonably be expected to wait 20-30 minutes for food once seated previously, the additional wait staff (well, one person currently) and much larger space is very welcome. But everything aside from the food is extraneous if the the former delivers, and by god, it does. The large and fairly varied menu stretches on for 40+ entrees, and after trying quite a few I can wholeheartedly recommend: -All 3 curries (red, yellow, green). They are all incredible; if spice is an issue, the green is by far the spiciest of the lot. -both fish dishes (choo chee, thai thai special). Fish always makes me nervous when its cooked and smothered in sauce, but the fish here is ALWAYS cooked perfectly and crispy, never soggy. delicious. -Tom Kha Gai, a coconut milk/lemongrass brothy soup with chicken. -Gai Kra Tiem Prig Thai - an irresistible chicken dish made with copious amounts of garlic and thai chili paste. amazing. -pretty much EVERYTHING else on the menu. I haven't been disappointed yet (though I've stayed pretty far from the dishes I consider boring, like pad thai and mongolian beef). check it out and support a great local business!
We bought a rainbow 3 years ago and our kids love it! The staff made it easy for us to choose a playset within our price range and size restrictions. We recently added some monkey bars to our set. They had them installed within the week! Overall, I have been very pleased with the level of customer service and durability of the set. I would recommend rainbow to any family looking to purchase a high quality play system.
The food only gets better here. Order usually once a month at least. Every time I go in it seems they only add more to the menu and I'm looking forward to what they will grow into :)
Una de mis salas favoritas tanto por la calidad de sus films como por el entorno
Great food (especially the shaking beef) in an inviting and open atmosphere. Can be a bit loud, but worth it. Try the blooming tea too!
I took advantage of their Groupon offer, and stuck around even after the promotion was over. Tara has been a great instructor. She's very patient and she knows how to cut a rug. This is a great place to learn how to stop dancing like an awkward white suburbanite.
Awesome as usual, still wish they fried everything in peanut oil though....
None
Excellent staff buy all your wines and merriment needs from here! don't be fooled by the one silly comment about the staff it's totally untrue!
Delicious! Great menu and ok price. And even at this deal with a few nice in between dishes. Thumps up
None
My husband & I love this restaurant. Great menu and a nice selection of beer & wine. It definitely has a neighborhood tavern vibe with live music fairly often. Service is always impeccable and we've never had to wait for a table.
Needed Arlington specific housing and had an easy time setting up & a good property. Experience was friendly, knowledgeable, and prompt - would recommend to anyone needing DC accommodations
I've been going to Marietta for 2 years now. She keeps on top of changing technology and is able to cater to your individual needs. The atmosphere is relaxing at it's best! Highly recommended!
I eat here regularly because the food is so good and the staff are so friendly. They know me by name and what I will order. Service can be a little slow, because they prepare everything fresh right in front of the counter while you are watching, but it's well worth the wait. The "Sushi Boy with Yellowfin" Sushi platter is my favorite, but I also like the hibachi ($5 for a huge plate!).
I would recommend them to anyone out there looking for a new dentist! I heard about them through a friend at work and have been a patient for 5 or 6 months.
Best choice of seafood I've seen locally (Lobster tails with Honey and Mustard sauce was stunning). Also plenty of other choices including grills and vegeterian. Generous portions, nicely presented (proper chips) and helpful, friendly service. Will definately be going back.
A lovely lunch destination after a morning kayaking on the water. The staff was very friendly and the Reuben sandwich was absolutely delicious! Great historic location and building too.
Excellent serivce, they just setup internet at my house in just half hour after my call,[],[], amazing service. No issue of speed yet in three months..... Highly recommended.....
Awesome, chilled bikers! Rented a little Duke from these guys while visiting Bangalore and they were ace. Everyone warned me not to ride in India because I wouldn't cope with the roads or the rental shop would invent bike damage or a bunch of other nonsense. These guys are straight up, no-bs, bikers full of good practical advice, decent bikes, a greasy bike garage and an honest business approach. Prices are transparent and fair. They even let me have a play with one of the Enfields. What more could I have wanted?
Excelente helado artesanal. Muy buena atencion y servicio.
Fast, helpful, personable. The owner is knowledgeable and did a great job repairing my laptop. I'm a bit of a geek but she did some things I couldn't do myself. She did in 2 days what the other guys quoted me 3 weeks to do.
None
The service was great and reliable. They made the real estate transaction go smoothly. The fees all made sense. Very friendly staff.
I was a bit apprehensive at first. I used to loathe a visit to a dentist, and Drews Dental Services has changed the whole experience for me. It is the same story for my family members who are patients at DDS. Dr. Drews will take care of your dental needs. You need not look further for a professional dentist in the Lewiston Auburn area. DDS is it.
всё гуд, молодцы, упехов
If you want good down home cookin', this is the place. Southern hospitality at it's best. They do it right! Not a better value for the dollar. They have a slogan that "it's so good it will make you want to slap your mama". Pretty close.
Great atmosphere and super cool staff, this is my go to spot for breakfast and also my hideout when I'm working from home. Excellent coffee varieties, this place is a "must" if your in alphabet city.
I was shopping around for antiques,jewerly, and some electronics. I wanted a bargain for anything if I decided to buy it. Well I was immediately suprised by the comfortable atmosphere. Most pawn shops a customer does not get that feel right at home feeling, buy dynasty pawn definately did. The store inventory was great quality for an extremely good price. Carlos and Miguel were great at helping me decide on what I'm going to buy, and also educate me on how and to get gem stones for a custom design piece of jewlery. I could not believe how low the prices were. A long term buisness relationship is going to develope after my first time in there shop. On the loan portion of the buisness I could tell these guys would definately give a more than good offer on anything brought in for a loan. They would because it would make the customer happy, and they would want to come back for future purchasing and loans. I plan on bringing some items that I want to sell, and I would absolutely trust there offer. Best pawn shop I have ever been too
Lindo teatro
Mampf
Commercial Tire is the one place I take my vehicle that I never worry if they are going to take advantage of me because I am female. I have had expensive repairs I thought needed to be done & they have always taken the high road & found a cheaper option for me. They are amazing & I highly recommend them!
Seasons is a wonderful place to eat at! The staff are excellent and the food is great!
None
The Leather Satchel Co. officially has the best bags I've ever seen. The quality of the leather is out of this world and the small business feel of the company is truly refreshing. I was hesitant to order because I hadn't heard of them before and it had to ship all the way to the U.S., but it was a great experience. I won't ruin all the fun, but when you get the package it's an exciting experience :) It delivered BEFORE it was scheduled, which was perfect timing for me. Great company, great product, I will definitely be buying from them again!
None
Great cafe and some of the nices cakes I have ever eaten!
None
Bacon Happy Hour. That is all.
VERY GOOD NICU NURSES
Si quieres viajar con comodidad y seguridad te recomiendo esta agencia de Viajes.
My favorite museum ever.
Brandee has been working on my cars for many years. Being a women, it is scary taking your car in for repairs. Brandee has always been honest and affordable. Never selling me what I don't need. If you want an honest mechanic, Wilcox's & Son Automotive is your place.
We just went to Centennial Auto Repair today for the first time and I was very impressed. Dana and Jasper were extremely helpful and honest. I will now be taking each of my vehicles here and recommending them to all of my family and friends~ Great job!
None
This is the best park in the bay area. So many nationalities (families) come to this park with their children. It is clean and maintained by the city weekly. It has one side for the older kids (play structures) and the other side of the park for smaller children. Both ends of the park have dog doodie dispensers with glove bags for those walking their dogs. It also has a BBQ area with picnic table. Huge grass area for frisbee or throwing a ball. I cannot say enough good things about this park. Good job to the city of mountain view for keeping up this park for our children/grandchildren and so on to play!
None
My family eats here at least once a week and has since they opened.
None
Best pizza EVER!! We used to get pizza there in the 70's 80's and till today, long after we moved back to Europe, we still talk about IL CASTELLO!
Great food with a family atmosphere.
Service was performed within more-than-reasonable time, and I always appreciate the explanation (and visual demo) of work performed. I also appreciated "heads-up" explanations of work that may come up in the near future as the car ages. Above all, the kind and caring attention they gave me since I was there with a newborn!!! GREAT work everyone. Thanks, I'll always return to this dealership, EVEN for oil changes, etc.
None
None
Sono stata al Bed... vado spesso al Bed soprattutto in estate e mi trovo bene Lì al Bed posso riposare lontana dallo stress...c'è pace e tranquillità....ospitalità e pulizia.... Se non siete ancora andati vi consiglio di andare....
Great local shop, good selection of comics, games & cards. Staff is very friendly and knowledgeable. Tournaments are ran well, and good sportsmanship is the standard
Le Voyeur is a restaurant unlike any I've ever been to. The have so many options for vegetarians, vegans and omnivores alike. Always a different experience, interesting music, interesting wait staff, and absolutely amazing food until all hours of the night. As for the people saying it smells or is dirty are full of it. Its definitely got character. But I've never observed it to be unhygienic or smelly. Also garlic fries are a must!
Spall was amazing in helping this northerner pick out some very unique western wear for a gift to my fiance on my trip. The staff even stayed late to help! I could not thank them enough.
Best chiropractor in Utah! I have known Dr. Baker for several years now and am always impressed with his friendly personality and professional care. Baker Chiropractic in Provo takes care of it all. They do massage therapy, electrical stim, acupuncture, adjustments, and even have a small exercise room. If you've been in an auto accident I definitely recommend Dr. Baker and the best part is your insurance will cover it all!
Best. Cocktails. Ever.
For years I have driven by this place, glad I decided to go in. Best authentic Mexican food I have ever had! Definitely the best in Gainesville. Didn't realize what I've been missing out on!! A must go if in Gainesville!!!
Great service, and very knowledgeable about their products. I own a pro-development football team. And recommend them to all my players for their equipment
Good food but can get a bit busy in the evening on the weekends.
Keith and crew at Rising Sun are fantastic. Honest, quality work, friendly. Highly recommended!
We have been staying with Ocean Reef since 1984 and have always had great service.
There is a reason why this shop has been around for 25+ years: Mark, the owner, know his stuff. When I started collecting comics I went to different stores, but this is the one I liked most. Been going there for 10 years now. The staff of this store is made up of only one: Mark. I see the other reviews regarding his bad attitude or bad tone of voice, but that's the way he speaks. You don't like it, go somewhere else. He won't be able to change his vocal chords for you. If you bring kids, just use "common sense" and keep your kids close, make sure they don't move or break something. Any store owner who deals collectibles will get pissy if you let your kids loose in the store. In my experience, he knows all about comics, sports, cars, collectibles in general, so it's fun to talk to him about any of this when going to pick up my stuff, it makes the trip more worthwhile. He has a lot of back issues dating decades back, a nice stash of CGC comics for sale, plus if you have a pull bag, he'll call you to ask if you want some variant coming out for a comic you might be collecting. That's personalized service. Give this store a chance. If not, no need to whine, there's plenty of places to get your comics fix in town. -OY
We have used the services of Plumbquick several times, the latest being for blocked kitchen waste pipes. Their attendance was prompt, professional and educational as well. The serviceman was excellent, clearing the obstruction and providing some guidance in pipe maintenance to prevent future issues. I would recommend their service completely.
One of the best stadiums I'm the country. Great place the watch more only Canadian football, but soccer concerts and whatever else may be happening there.
Mike Coffee make our descision to buy from Hendrick Dodge an easy one! He worked with us every step of the way and we got the perfect Dodge for us. Also as a first time buyer, Mike made the process as pain free as possible! I would most certainly recommend Hendrick Dodge in Cary to anyone looking to buy a new Dodge and I would highly recommend seeing Mike Coffee when you get there!
Steve was recommended to me by a colleague and lived up to the high expectations. He was patient and thoroghly knowledgeable about the vehicle and demonstrated great pride in his product. He was very respectful during our negotiation and left me feeling very good about my purchase decision while instilling confidence in my expectations for ongoing quality service. I wouldn't hesitate to recommend him.
Our first time eating here and it was amazing! Great Burger I had in a long time! Worth every penny!
I always order 2-3 Mother's Day hanging baskets from here.They have beautiful,long lasting flowers at a great price and lots of colorful options.They'll deliver for a small fee.The staff is very courteous and friendly.The local places are the best to get fresh fowers and I will continue to use them for many years to come.
yahoo!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! eta amar bari proud feel korchi.
house hold shifting service,goyal packers and movers,best movers and packers,cargo movers,car carriers services,packers & movers,movers & packers house goods relocation services all india
Phenomenal service and care for our pets! My wife and I couldn't be happier with the service we receive and the loving care our pets receive. Whether walking our dog, feeding our cat, or pet sitting for a long weekend we have always been blown away by the consistently amazing service that NYC Pooch provides. They have always been responsive to shifting walk schedules, training requirements we have asked for the walker to support, and any other one-off questions/requests we have raised. Best of all is receiving a 'pup report' whenever they visit our pets. It is always so comforting knowing what - and how - they are doing in the middle of the day. After 2.5 years of using NYC Pooch, we can't think of a better company to trust with walking and caring for our pets while we are at work or out of town.
Just the other day a friend of mine took me here. The rolls are SSOO good! I honestly thought Panda Express was the best thing around but I am so wrong. The food is really fresh, plus it came to us in under 20 mins. Talk about fast! The only drawback is that its very small.
Started off with Rib appetizers. They fell of the bone. Really good and tender. Also tried the caldo soup. This has a lot of flavor and was really more appealing than I thought of at first. Definitely worth a try. I had the chicken fried rib-eye which was good and tender. Wife had shepherds pie which she could not finish. My son had the pork and beans. The pork tenderloin was worth it for a ten year old. Service was prompt and helpful.
None
Like Anton's with a salad bar, unlimited popovers, and items that are appropriately priced.
This place is awesome, great crowd, good food, great bartenders, the best night crowd in town. Plus the bartender Chris is a real gem, give it a shot!
None
I confess to my guilty indulgence going to 4Rivers BBQ for not only BBQ but great mouthwatering slices of cakes. The food is awesome, the staff is extremely friendly and patient and I absolutely love going to any of their locations. For the folks who are impatient New Yorkers like me who hate to wait in lines, simply order in advance and pick up at the takeout window! That's my little secret for you! I must also add that the Founder of 4Rivers, John Rivers, is an awesome Entrepreneur and Businessman. I had a chance to hear him speak at a business event and he is definitely worth investigating with regards to his practical business wisdom and savvy about financing and management Four Rivers is one of the best kept secrets in Orlando for not just great food but also great BBQ!
None
I HAVE BEEN HERE AND THATS WHY ID RETURN, DUALIES RULL
It has history about 1000 years
Our recent stay at the Kilmarnock Inn was very nice! We especially liked the court yard which sits in the middle of all the house-like buildings where the guest rooms are. It is a big garden patio with a little pond and tables and chairs. The guest houses and rooms are about 4 years old, except for the main building which is 127 years old! So the rooms are all really nice and new. The staff there are super nice and the dinner and breakfast were top notch. I only wish check-out was not at 10 because we would like to have had a little more time for the nice breakfast! I definitely recommend this Inn. The owner told us where to find a small public beach close by and it was beautiful and the water was warm for swimming.
Cosy French bistro. Excellent food and affordable prices.
really DLF Hyde Park is Chandigarh's great project...
None
None
Luogo ideale per far stare i bambini a contatto con la natura e gli animali, i miei bambini si sono divertiti un mondo provando a fare il pane e facendo il giro sul cavallo!
My experience was very relaxing! I've been twice to see Matt. He listens to your concerns and areas needing attention. He pays special attention to key areas and uses the right amount of pressure. My muscles felt relaxed for weeks after my massage. I highly recommend this facility.
Good food,very nice wait staff,fast service from order time to table.Great chips &salsa very good polo with the peppers
It was so fun i just went there to check up on my gran-dad and i explored every bit of it i also got a good shrimp cocktail
I love Dayton Toyota. Great service, great people, great customer care.
Amazing! Great service and a great product!
Un lugar donde suceden milagros. Todos bienvenidos. Horarios 7:30 10:30 17:30
None
Great doctors and great care.
Always pleasant to deal with, A+ service.
I love Monument Chevrolet. They are so thorough and so caring. I have driven a Chevrolet from these people for over 30 years. I would go no where else. The service department now calls when my vehicle is in for maintenance and will send me photos online to show me the progress. The repair facility is top notch. When the chips are down, I want Monument in my corner.
None
I had the privilege to meet Bo during a recent product photo session. I was immediately impressed with the kindness and professionalism of both Bo and her husband Brian. They were extremely helpful and accommodating during the entire session. It was so easy to capture beautiful photos of their products. Bo graciously gave me a few samples after the shoot to bring home to try with my family. Not usually being an Organic product user I was interested to try out the products. I usually use strong scents, which are obviously more artificial and full of chemicals. After one month of using Bo’s cream and underarm stick I fell in love with the products. Penny Lane’s products completely changed my mind and I am now a faithful user of her Organic products. For sure I'll be ordering replenishments! Thank you Bo for your quality products and for helping me to realize the power of organic products.
good experience in sweets making. keep it up :)
I’ve been blind as a bat my entire life. I’ve always wanted to get LASIK done but have always been afraid of laser eye surgery. I finally gathered the courage to undergo the procedure after breaking my glasses for the tenth time! I researched Pannu Laser Vision and saw all the great reviews, so it was natural for me to choose them. I had my procedure performed last week in Fort Lauderdale and could not be more pleased with the results! My eyesight is now 20/20 and I see better than I ever did with glasses or contact lenses. I was very impressed with his staff and offices as well.
Best quality of medical service..
Excellent painting contractor. Accurate Painting showed up on time, was very proffessional, and kept their work area clean. Would definately use this painting company again.
best in Cardiff ..yummmy
Absolutely divine. The barbecue has just the right amount of char to compliment the sweet, spicy sauce. The fried okra was the most perfect since my mother's (and she died 30 years ago), and the homemade macaroni-and-cheese was so delicious I could have been satisfied with that alone. Shorty (real name Andretta) does all the cooking and her husband Victor does everything else. It amazes me that this little jewel isn't stealing all the customers from the chains that surround it.
Jayson knows home loans and can spout programs and parameters off the top of his head. I have worked with him on multiple transactions on the seller's side. If you want someone who answers their phone, call Jayson.
None
Excellent food. Eaten here twice now. Had the pulled pork sandwich this visit. Friendly, helpful staff. Fast service.
Fantastic food, fantastic service and the nicest people! We took almost 30 people there between X-mas and New Years. We had the best time and the food just kept coming and coming. My glass never went empty and the bill was better than I expected. I would highly recommend Coppa 82 when you want great food great price and a relaxed family atmosphere. Dan and Ann Marie DiTomaso
Acho o melhor restaurante de SP. Cardápio excelente, bom atendimento e ambiente muito agradável
None
The Best Tex Mex Food I've Ever Had...
The best pizza around. Chicken Marsala slice mmmmm.
Gotta love Taco Tuesday !! The best for your money. Great Prices, good proportions, food is always good and nice people too.
The food is amazing. Loved pretty much everything I've had there. Can't wait for King Cake Season to roll around again. Great people too, they always take care of you!
Good authentic Spanish food with great taste Sangria, home-made wine-based drink.
The most moving and overwhelming experience, with many aspects to it. Not just the main Museum, but the Trees of the Righteous, the relatively new Valley of Communities, and the Hall of Remembrance. It can be too much for some people to bear.
Perfect food, incredible service. Best in Pittsburgh.
My favorite station. Always good services.
Yum. Cheap hot bowl
Pat was always professional and had insights to advise us on choices to our best interest. She communicated well with us and in a reasonable timeframe. She listened and worked with us when it was appropriate, and led when the situation was indicated. Enjoyed having her as our agent.
Excellent service as always.
None
maravillosa mar sol padrisimox en el puerto de mazatlan.
White Bear Mitsubishi just helped us find our perfect vehicle. Dennis O'Donovan, as usual, has been extremely helpful, using time off to help us pick up a vehicle from another Rydell dealer in Rochester. We have purchased cars through White Bear and Dennis O'Donovan for near 20 years. In that time the respect, consideration and quality service we have received has been consistent. Thank you for your fine service!
We just got our springs replaced after a breakage, and used Garage Door Specialist. We're very happy with the work they did. They upgraded our springs (longer lasting, longer in terms of length too), replaced our noisy bearings (we hadn't realized how noisy they had become over the years), and set us up with a 10 year warranty. They came when promised, and were done quickly. We couldn't have asked for better service.
None
We had such a great time, great atmosphere. Food fantastic
Best brewery in Vegas!
I'm not typically a "fast-food" guy, especially as of late while attempting to diet. Stopped in this morning (3/26/14) @ the McNeil location (Store#34) and requested a special menu item and they were quick to comply with my request (keeping it low carb). I also requested one of your Premium Roast Coffees with a splash of Caramel, 2 creams/2 sugars which I must say beats out the famed Dunkin Donuts coffee by far. My burrito was finished and a lovely Angela brought it out to me while another kind young lad finished & delivered my coffee right behind her. Exceptional customer service & employees were gentle on the eyes with bright smiles. Keep it up I'll definitely be back on "cheat days". Stall# 19A, Ticket# 13 7:54AM
الاكل ممتاز وعاشت الايادي
Photography that is taken really seriously. Courses in analog and digital. I have taken both. This is a place with very high standards and knowledge. Highly recommended.
Pejman was recommended to me by a colleague and I am very thankful for the referral. I had been trying a new salon every few months for the past couple of years since moving to the GTA and was always unpleasantly surprised by the service and result. My first visit to Pejman's (and every visit since), he took time to consult regarding the exact colour and style that I have in mind, as well as frustrations I've had regarding hair damage and my hair type. He made recommendations according to my situation and always puts my vision and needs first. I've been to Pejman 4 times now in the past year and I won't go anywhere else. He helps work on long-term goals for hair health and growth, while always maintaining my ideal colour and style. I would highly recommend Pejman, especially to blondes who are tired of having hairdressers damage and over-process their hair. He is also great at adding subtle lo-lights to create a more natural-looking and sophisticated colour. Thank you very much Pejman! See you soon.
Love this salon! Edwin gives so much time and care to you as an individual client. He pays great attention to detail, very friendly service, and yet the price is very reasonable. Have been there multiple times now and consistently gotten a great cut. Highly recommend.
A big treasure in a very small site. The stucco frieze is amazing. The site is lost 3km from the highway and so is extremely quiet Not many visitors so you have the place for yourself most of the time
We had a great experience with Scott. He was friendly informative and stayed until the job was 100% complete, which was 10pm on a Friday night. We would have Scott back anymore (but hopefully we won't need him).
I grew up going to Chautauqua and while I can only afford to go one week of every year I make the best effort possible to give my family the same experiences I had growing up with such a place as Chautauqua in my life. I agree with the financial problems of other viewers as well as the attitude problems mentioned but I believe that to be the state of our society as a whole, unfortunately. Where ever you go on this planet you will encounter people with more: more money, more power, more something and unfortunately, some of those people have not been taught how to be courteous and seem not to have a thought of general well being toward others. I thank those in charge of maintaining the Chautauqua Institution for keeping it going and for doing their best to honor the original founding fathers intent. Thank you!
An excellent little Japanese restaurant with great sushi and very friendly staff. Definitely going back next time we're in Liverpool.
The customer service at this Tuffy location is second to none. The staff is always friendly. I have only had oil changes done at this location. They are always very quick but are thorough. From my experience these guys are top notch.
None
None
I had a great experience there. Really nice office with great people that work there!
The filet was incredible, and the blue corn grits went perfectly with it and the red wine reduction tied it together beautifully. Reasonably priced for the high quality! Very friendly staff, clean restaurant, wonderful atmosphere!
Reserved the car, got picked up quickly at the airport, small 15 minute wait while the car was made ready, was paged and asked if I needed any directions from the location to my destination, enjoyed a nice, clean, car as I had reserved, for a week, on return, a very easy and pleasant check in and return ride to the airport. All in all, a very good job done by all at Hertz at LAX.
None
Scott called first and let us know he was on the way, that was great. Very polite, clean and efficient. Thanks!
Mr. Mullins arrived very promptly, after a phone call telling me that he was on his way. He was very friendly, courteous, and professional. I very much appreciated the paper booties he put over his shoes to keep from tracking dirt into our home. After thoroughly checking both HVAC systems, he informed me of some issues with one of the systems that would require replacement/repair, to include showing me images on his iPad. His explanation of the problems was clear and thorough. I was very satisfied at the end of this service calll.
They are the friendliest and most professional dental team I have ever seen! They are caring and funny and always put me at ease. When I had an abscess, they saw me right away and immediately set up an appointment with an endodontist. I did nothing! I am so pleased with the front desk staff, the hygienists, and all of the dentists. I recommend them to everyone in the Groton/New London, CT area.
None
None
We decided to just start looking at the GMC Equinox. I bought my first car ever at Raymond Chevrolet in 1980! We were driving around the lot looking at vehicles and then decided to go inside and talk to someone. Charles approached us in a very professional manner. He was not pushy, so that gave him our business. In dealing with Chuck we were very relaxed and he made sure he got us the price we wanted. He did not give up with getting us that price. Very impressed with Charles. Thank you we are so happy with our vehicle! Tammy and Dan Dekeyser
UMA DELÍCIA!!!! SIMPLES, SABOROSO, NOSSO!!! RECOMENDOOO!!!
Get warm cream shave.
None
koththu....!
Tom, Marcia, the ladies were here yesterday and I got to thank them in person and discuss various aspects of our expectations both ways. As is my wont, I did not stay and when I returned everything was excellent ... please thank them for me and give yourselves a pat on the back for such good management. John
Used these guys to fix my boiler i was more then happy with the great level of service. Thanks
Adam is someone everyone should go to his healing is amazing and he is an amazing soul, with a heart of gold. Lots of love, Suzanne Newman Princeton, NJ
Meilleur Costco, meilleur services.
Excellent bottle shop
None
The problem with my 2001 Toyota Tacoma was found and repaired as requested. The only problem I have is nobody called me to say my car was done. I also asked for a after market estimate for some exhaust system replacement because the Toyota parts price was way too expensive. I never got a phone call or an estimate on paper for the after market estimate.
Very prompt and easy
None
After purchasing my vehicle at Coastal Nissan I decided to use their service department for all work needed. The service director Matthew Kittredge is very friendly and knowledgeable. His staff as always willing to answer any questions I have and their work is excellent. I would highly recommend Coastal Nissan for your next repair or routine maintenance. Excellent service, friendly atmosphere, and good prices.... Why go anywhere else?
None
None
Alterra offers a great service, and Marco was fantastic. He was friendly, and thorough. He is exactly the kind of Service Pro I want coming back. Thanks!!!! Grant K. Today received a callback service from Lee, and must say that this company continues to impress. Excellent friendly service, and right on time.
My husband and I took my parents here for dinner last Saturday. It was a great dining experience. Between the four of us we had chowder, chicken and pasta, ribs, a New York strip steak,one hell of a baked mac n cheese with salad and delicious hot bread and butter for the table. All were cooked well and you could feel the love in the food. I would recommend to anyone and look forward to working with them on future banquet business.
grymt trevlig personal och riktigt god mat centrerad kring öl och kött. Bara såserna gjorda på öl gör det värt ett besök.
Week day lunch special can't be beaten; soup, salad and TEN pieces fresh sushi for $10!! Byob, and it is even better.
Everytime I have ordered from here the food is great and always large portions. Delivery times are average and its great to be able to hear english spoken back to you! I plan on being a continued customer.
I ordered a DPMS LR308, placed a deposit, and received it very fast. I then bought a Glock Gen 4 21 and 27, because of the price and service. Two weeks ago I bought my wife a small Walther P22 that was a GREAT DEAL! Next I'm going to grab a 12 gauge, because they have a great selection and pricing on them.
We both wanted to write to say thank you for the amazing photos you have taken for us. We were both a little nervous on our first "photoshoot" haha but you made us relaxed and we all enjoyed the session. More importantly you worked so well with our son Sam who was only 6 months old and can be a handful. The photos are amazing and have sealed in some fond memories and we will be having some updated photos with you later this year. Thanks again.
Always a pleasure stopping into this shop. The staff is always good for some laughs as well as incredible knowledge on gear. I go here for the small stuff as well as the big stuff. Last season when I bought a marker, I was pleasantly surprised to hear that it came with a lifetime warranty. Through my experience, not many places do that sort of thing. All in all, I highly recommend going here for your paintball needs.
This was really excellent pizza. The guy who works here (I think he said his name is Emile) is a true pizza artist. The crust was thin without being crunchy (think New York style). The sauce was amazing and the ingredients were fresh. Some of the best pizza I've had in Chicago so far - and that's saying something in the land of pizza!
I'm a student and I tried to get my taxes done with TurboTax this season. I went to Liberty just for a double check, and they nearly doubled my refund!!! I can't even express how happy I am. The office is really clean and the staff was very professional. It was my first time filing taxes and I felt very comfortable here. I'm definitely going back next year!
We purchased a new Ford Escape and found the expierience to be very nice. Our salesman listened to what we wanted and provided us with quality service by explaining all options available etc. As one who does not like buying cars, this was a very pleasant expierience and would refer anyone to go there and purchase a new Ford.
Todd was just AMAZING to work with! I hired them to do my garage as a surprise Christmas present, and they came in, on time, did an awesome job and it was a HUGE HIT! I would recommend them to anyone looking for a quality product from a quality team.
None
best bike shop ever.. they attended me immediately when i was only passing by prague during a bike trip through Europe. in other shops around the city center they were not willing to help me out concerning the short time i was staying there. IN THIS SHOP they did it in an hour and they even test drove my bike! in other shops they didn't care about my situation.
I am very satisfied with the storage space this company provides. Rochelle (the manager) was so outgoing and friendly and made my experience at Public Storage awesome! I highly recommend this place if you're in need of a quality, fast, easy storage unit.
Shopping for a vehicle at Crown VW was a breath of fresh air. As another reviewer mentioned, Sean is fantastic to work with. He put the utmost effort into ensuring I found a car that met my needs and didn't try to push me into something unnecessary. I worked with several other car dealers in Kansas City and Omaha looking for a car, but I wish I would have just stayed in town all along. Sean and Crown can't be beat.
Terrific sales, sales management, finance and service staff. Patient, helpful and efficient.
Best seafood. The softshell crabs are the best I have ever had.
Awesome shop, they printed some business cards for me and people love them! Very impressed. Look forward to using PSP in the future.
sweet and yummy
None
I absolutely love the car. Its perfect for me. I love the ride, the features, the gas mileage, the looks, really everything about the car. I have owned numerous Audis a few A4's and 2 S4's and I like the IS250 much more than any of them. I am very happy with the price we negotiated, the service I received at the time of purchase was excellent, and in general I think it was the most enjoyable car buying experience I have ever had. And I buy more cars than your average person, six in the last three years I think! I'm sure I'll be back when I need a new car. Thank you Barbara Spear!
None
Spectacular! Loved the audio tour and even tried the guided. Both were great! The history is superb. The tour is well marked and you can go at your own pace. The restorations as well as the percentage of original structure is great. Absolutely no complaints. On a side note the city of Edinburgh is equally as sensational. You have to visit it and take it all in.
Very Impressed from the moment I walked in. Friendly receptionist. Not a lot of paperwork to fill out (especially when you feel terrible and can not think straight). The Nurses were professional. The doctor was professional as well as down to earth explaining things. The facility was extremely CLEAN. I will definately recommend to my family and friends.
They have just reopened. Get meal
I love the coffee shop feel of this place so much more than the chain Krispy Kremes or Dunkin' Donuts. The display is beautiful and the staff is very friendly. I've brought these into work three times, so far, and they've been a hit every single time. Some favorites are Tiramisu, German Chocolate, Key Lime Pie, Coconut Creme, Maple/Nutella Bacon, and Red Velvet.
None
None
None
Excellent parish, fine preaching, warm welcome, and extraordinary, well-planned Liturgy.
Great coffee, great food...what else could you want in a coffee shop?
None
The only thing I'd improve is the breakfast: make less eggs more often so they're fresher and add potatoes. Shuttle service to NY NY is very convenient and the staff is very friendly with a clean and quiet room.
Best most consistent place around. Always great when a place as busy as this remembers your name!
Gran restaurant siempre que he estado salgo muy satisfecho,gran servicio como en tu casa,muy buema ambientacion catalana.
None
Awesome smoke away!
I enjoy being a member here. If you're looking for a club to join, this is the place. I am always treated with respect and great care from the people who are employed here. I can honestly say that I feel that I am a part of something here. The food is absolutely wonderful! The golf is great, and the other members I've met are for the most part great as well! This club is under great management and it shows.
Both my wife and self have been patients of Dr. Schweizer for 10 plus years serving us the highest dental care we have ever experienced. His compassion and patience is well received and I more than once complimented him on a well organized and exercised practice. A great dedicated and friendly staff that blends together with state of the art dental equipment and building.
Ashley gave me the best haircut and style I've ever had. I've since moved away and I'm totally bummed that I'm too far away to go back (I live across the country now.). She took time and made sure that it was done right. I hate my hair. Always have. I have consistently gotten my hair cut and then been unable to manage it and/or didn't like the result. That was not the case this time. Lastly, after a couple of weeks, my mom randomly said to me, "I think that's the best cut you've ever had." It truly was. I'm hoping to convince Ashley to move to NC. :)
On the coldest day this year, Rob Barnhill came out to greet me, show me several different models of Toyota's Rav4, took me for a test drive and then stayed late to help me move items from my car to my new Rav4. I appreciated the professionalism and was very thankful that there was no "hard" sales pitch, just lots of answers to my questions. George and Lin helped with the finances and final paperwork to send me home in my new Rav4. Thank you all! Stay warm.
We had an absolutely unbelievable special experience there last night for our 15th Wedding Anniversary. It started off with a special greeting left on one of our menus autographed by The Chef himself and a table surrounded by 3 windows making us feel more special. My husband had the Springer Farm Chicken Ballotine Salad and I had the Crispy Herb Phyllo & House Cured Scottish SalmonNapolean for starters. Both were wonderful! For our main entrees, I had the Sauteed New Bedford Sea Scallops while he had the Grilled Stuffed Beeler Farms Pork Rib Chop. Every single dish we had was perfectly made and seasoned just right. Our only problem - we didn't have any room for desert! Next time, we'll plan accordingly. ;) Between the service upon arrival and during the meal and the meal itself, it was an amazing first time experience and a true celebration of our 15th Wedding Anniversary. Thank you, Second Empire. Well done!
Could stay up here all day. Incredible.
None
This place is the best. Small, intimate, hand-scoring only (if you've never done this, don't worry. It's very easy and can be learned with a basic google search), good jukebox, cheap beer, friendly staff, and insanely affordable. I try to go every weekend.
Great vet, very caring and gentle with the animals. All of our animals love him!
These guys are really great! I've taken my dogs there for nail trimmings and I'm always impressed by how much they actually care for animals. Strange that's not more common among people working in animal clinics, but it just isn't!
Basin Run is awesome because they're willing to check on my dogs at night is a more serious situation comes up. I've had a couple serious situations recently, and it was really cool that they did that for them.
Excellence in value-priced sushi and hibachi
I cannot think of a better place to go if one finds themselves hungry in West Philadelphia. Desi Chaat House is fast--its fresh and healthy--and its a value! One order of chaat is at least 2-3 meals at at ~$7.50, so its perfect if you've got some romantic company. That being said, the only thing you should be wary of is post-meal.Onion breath is a reality. Prepare accordingly.
None
None
If you want your face molded and shaped to enhance your natural beauty rather than just getting dermal fillers like Artefill and BOTOX injected … then Dr. Sophie has to be your number one choice. She’s like a potter with clay … and the result is a more beautiful you!
Great coffee, lovely BLT's and fantastic staff!
Song has been waxing my brows and cutting my hair for years. I have very curly hair and she is the only person I've been to who truly understands how to properly cut hair of my texture. I would highly recommend her to anyone and everyone!
I had just moved into a new apartment in the city and was recommended KBR to renovate my bathroom. Could not have asked for a more luxurious renovation. Amanda was a pleasure to work with and will definitely come back for any other kitchen and bath needs.
We had Bryan out last Friday for an over flow problem that we were unable to solve ourselves ( and we tried ) Bryan wanted to make sure he got to us before the next big rain ( which was the next day), he found the problem and stayed til 930 that evening making sure the job was done and done correctly. He will return to install addtional drains for the over flow ( as a precautionary ) If you want a hard working, honest and reasonably priced man...... well he is your guy. I would whole heartedly recommend him and his company to anyone. Oh and Bryan, thank you for the sweet letter you sent after the job was finish, you were a blessing to us as well. Tamara Stillwell a very happy customer ( BTW we had NO over flow after that last rain : )
Bought a bike here back over the summer. Tom helped me out and asked me questions to help get me set up with the bike that fit me physically and for my activity. While he has alot of carbon and high end bikes in the store, he recognized that I needed a good basic hybrid that happened to be one of the least expensive bikes in the store. The staff here ask questions and work to get you on the right equipment - not just make a sale.
Fun for Everyone! Wow! I'm so excited! I just took my boys (8 & 10) to Dead Broke and we had SUCH a great time. First the farm is beautiful and the horses all so well kept and friendly. When we arrived it was an animal lovers dream. Sweet little dogs, TURKEYS, peacocks and even a MINATURE PONY, my little boy wanted to take him home. We got organized and rode through beautiful scenic trails, my horse was so kind and gentle he responded to all my requests (and I'm not experienced), the boys horses were sweet and responsive and the ride was so smooth and relaxing. NO worries at all! I LOVED it SO much, I've invited my friend with two little girls to go back in December! It's so nice to show children fun w/o a television! I"m sold will go back and recommend to all of my friends!
Bonney plumbing is always very professional and explains everything that they are doing and why. The technician, Joey, was very nice and even attempted to entertain my baby while I was off checking some vents to make sure they were open.
None
In 1985 I put my mother up in the hotel when she came to visit from Florida; during the historic circus parade event; mostly to see how her grandson was growing; she loved it so much; the hotel; she wanted get a suite there to stay; she had taste; My son had his rehersal dinner there about yrs ago before the wedding the next day @ the Milwaukee Club; family from around the country and world enjoyed the hospitality; Recently my 5 yr old granddaughter chose the restaurant patio area for our monthly visit and breakfast was fabulous and so accomodating; such great atmosphere on the lake area from a still historic; comfy; hospitable establishment for all! Thanx, from Morgan, her dad and grandmother!
Pretty good place I'd say. Don't know why people rate it down. Come and find out for yourself. Totally recommend it.
We've been coming to Caring Hearts for 18 years. Dr. Schleappe and the staff are amazing, the care is top notch. You won't find a better clinic in the east valley. Caring Hearts Animal Clinic has taken care of our dogs and our family over the years. The way they help you when it's time to say goodbye to your dog or cat is so compassionate and and caring, it helps take away a bit of the sting. If you need a new vet? Caring Hearts Animal Clinic is the place to go.
My experience with Dr. Salemy was absolutely PERFECT!!! I researched Dr. Salemy while serving in Afghanistan. After my first contact with his reception, I was given the chance to do an initial consult over Skype. He answered all of my questions and I could tell he was extremely knowledgable of his profession giving me the comfort I needed to go forward with my Full Tummy Tuck. His team is very genuine and kind making you feel like part of their family. My procedure started with having a funny conversation in the operation room to waking up with my problem areas gone! Dr. Salemy and his team stood by me the whole time and took very good care of me. It has been a month and a half and I can now run and be active again. This procedure was worth every penny! If anyone is looking for that great plastic surgeon and awesome results...look no more, Dr. Salemy is the one for all!!! Thank You Dr. Salemy for everything, you are in fact the best Plastic Surgeon in America! I will be back for more procedures for sure! :-) *Excellent*
None
Wow what a workout... Everything I enjoy, nothing I don't. Great spa-like setting close to QEW with ample parking ... what is not to love.
Manželka měla narozeniny a exotika jí hodně láká. Mimo zájezd jsem jí pozval také do Aloha Music Club & Cocktail Bar Praha. Moc se jí to líbilo a určitě to nebyla poslední návštěva.
I feel so lucky to have found the Janet St. Paul Studio for Hair! This salon is by far the best in Austin. After receiving a traumatic haircut from a top ranked salon in Austin, I found Janet St. Paul when I was simply looking for a blow out to hide my bad haircut. I walked into the salon to inquire about appointments and the stylist Ashley saw my hair and immediately took me under her wing. After seeing Ashley for the last 6 months, my hair has honestly never looked better. It is truly amazing what Ashley has done with my hair. She took an awful haircut and has made simple cuts every month over the last 6 months, so that my hair looks good and grows out properly while at the same time saving the hair length. Ashley also corrected my damaged hair color. At Janet St. Paul they use the Balayage technique (see examples on Pinterest) for highlights and I can’t believe how much better my hair color looks as compared to my color when I used foil highlights. With Balayage, my hair is still blonde but has more depth, and now my natural light brown hair is being used in place of the low lights that used to damage my hair. Ashley also got me on a Phyto hair treatment program which has made my hair the healthiest it has ever been, and she has spent a great deal of time teaching me blow dry styling techniques which has really improved my hair on day to day basis. Overall, this is the best salon I have ever been too, even compared to LA where there are tons of great stylists. Not only is Ashley amazing, but I see both Janet and Shannon (other stylists) do amazing hair each time I am at the salon. Everyone is so friendly at Janet St. Paul, and the salon is always very clean and relaxing. It really is tough to find a good stylist in Austin, and I can honestly say Janet St. Paul is a safe place to get one’s haircut/highlights, without fear of walking out with unwanted layers or 5 inches suddenly gone. I would never go anywhere else but here and I highly recommend Ashley and the Janet St. Paul hair salon to everyone I meet!
Jessica Petrie is the best wedding Photographer I've meet and work with, she is very creative and hard worker, her pictures and the way she catch the moments talks it self.
None
None
Great place to take family or business for meals. Wonderful food. Great atmosphere. We will be back again!
Very clean, cleaning staff does very good work on keeping the place tidy
The experience was very good. It was friendly and knowledgeable which along with the high quality of the vehicles is the reason we keep coming back to Scott Honda. We have purchased six cars there and our family has purchased several others.
Although the website says most things except the flour tortillas are gluten-free, the menus does not spell this out. Our server said the shredded chicken is thickened with flour and the chili relleno is dipped in flour batter before cooking. We settled on enchiladas (shredded beef, seafood) with sides of guacamole and cilantro-jicama slaw, and were very satisfied with the food.
I have been at Watermark for nearly 3 years. The first year of that, I was a single parent with a young child. The kids programs are fantastic and educational AND they have childcare for nearly every event. So mommy can grow and learn while my baby grows and learns. Priceless! The change in our lives is outwardly apparent and now we are helping others see what Jesus can do for them. Come and see for yourself!
Friday, August 2, 2013 we are going to have Pat Green. Saturday, August 3 we are going to have Charlie Robinson. Bands will be performing on our outside stage. Come see us and have a great time. We serve food, beer, and whine. Come prepared to party with the best West Texas has to offer. You can bring your own alcohol, but there is a $5.00 cover per bottle, all setups must be bought at the bar.
None
None
My almamater. I protect with my blood, insha alloh..
I was in desperate need of a new car as my old one was not going to pass emissions. Chad and his team took excellent care of me and in a very short time, I was on my way out with a new Sonata. The payments are great, the service was great, and the overall experience was great.
None
One of my favorite cafes in town. It's just the right balance. Not too loud, not too crowded, very comfortable and laid back. Good place to hang out.
None
I first went to Shape Plus because I didn’t fit into my bridesmaids dress for my brother’s wedding that was in a month and I had heard the radio commercials with Jess saying “We do amazing!” and I knew I was going to need it! So I went in told them my goal and we went to work and sure enough after about a month the dress fit again! I signed up for 9 weeks so after I got back from the wedding I decided I wanted to loose even more weight, it was addictive. Not only did I lose a total of 15 pounds working out at Shape Plus but I developed a love and an addiction to fitness. I had been over weight my whole life and never thought I was athletic or capable of doing all of those things athletic people do but the people at shape plus showed me otherwise. They really push you but most importantly they really care about YOU, your wellbeing and getting you to your goals. With them I ran my first mile! I lifted more weights then I could imagine! I learned what a healthy diet was, not just eating the right thing but WHEN to eat. I loved my time with Shape Plus and recommend them to everyone!
Great People ...Great price$.
This is a review strictly of the quality of experience working out in this Gold's gym compared to other Gold's gyms in Utah (not contracting or sales, which I've been deceived with in the past, but that's not the focus of this review. Read every piece of the contract before you sign it!). This gym is AWESOME because although the machines are a little crowded for my taste, of all the gyms I've been to, this is the least "go there to be seen" gym. The aerobics room is separate on its own floor. What does that mean? Dudes can't park themselves in front of a machine for an hour to check out the girls doing stripper hip hop, or to try to get them to notice their steroid-enhance body. Same deal with treadmills: they face the window, and while there are machines next to it, most other Gold's have the treadmills facing machines so guys will try to show off on those machines. It's seriously pathetic--it's the WORST at the Gold's in Orem (9th east). Seriously, go just for the experience. Like at 5 or 6pm. Last, they have a basement floor with even more machines spread out into various rooms, so you go down there to actually lift and not to posture or socialize. This gym also seems way less crowded than the Gold's in Orem (both) or American Fork. Whenever I'm around SLC and haven't worked out, I go to Sugarhouse. So to sum up, the machines or gym aren't particularly new or nice, but of every Gold's I've been to in Utah, this is the best for people who actually go to work out. I like to get in a zone and work out hard, and this is the best place for that.
Good food
My wife and I took lessons with Kia ahead of our wedding to surprise our friends and family with a choreographed first dance. The experience from the first interaction straight through Kia caring enough to send us words of encouragement the day of has been outstanding. We've decided to make this an ongoing indefinite experience and will be taking classes ongoing to learn additional styles and continue with a great activity that brings us closer. I'd recommend Kia and Arthur Murray in Cambridge to anyone looking into dance lessons!
None
We have used various restaurants over the years since moving to PA. Some have come and gone, but when we discovered Pino's last year, even though we live by another pizza place, they are our first choice. They have messed up once in a while, but they make good on getting it right. They deliver in a timely manner, the food is consistent, the pies are not too heavy on the sauce and the portions are hearty.
I purchased 2 Autos from this dealer. An older truck with High miles and also a sports car. One car had an issue and RPM stepped up to the plate and fixed it with no issues. I understand that buying a used car with high miles has its ups and downs, but to be honest RPM has the best cars in the market. NO Pressure at all from them. When i showed up they explained in detail what cars they had to me that i was in the market for and gave me many options to help me get the cars i wanted. I will not go any place else to buy a car, I'm in my late 50's and have been buying cars for years, i'm happy i now found a place i can trust. The pictures on the website are the best around and show everything about the cars they are selling. Thank you RPM for being good to me and treating myself and my family as we are your own.
Scott was a great help. Not only did he show up quickly, he had a good recommendation on where he could drop us off to get a great deal on some tires.
The rear fender on my wife's 2011 Honda Accord Coupe got banged up pretty good, especially on the passenger side - hanging down on the ground with some further internal damage. The folks at Seidner's Collision were fantastic. We have Farmers Insurance and everything was taken care of, nearly effortlessly - even the towing - we didn't have to use our AAA. They have a beautiful shop, I've never seen better. And, they have a thorough understanding of customer service - Marie, the woman at the front desk is the greatest - takes care of every single detail. A company couldn't ask for someone better - seriously. The repairs were completed in a very reasonable time and we were able to pick up the Honda at 7:30 in the morning. The car looked perfect. No one could ever tell it had been damaged. Absolutely good as new - I'm not kidding. I am not associated in any way with Seidner's - this was our first visit. And, when body repairs are needed again there is no question in our mind where we'll take our vehicle. They're the best of the best in our book.
I came to these guys based on the recommendation of another local business owner. Her review was spot on! Not only did they have great prices, they were fast and very friendly. Two thumbs up!
None
This place literally has the BEST CHICKEN NOODLE SOUP IN THE WORLD... AND ITS HEALTHY! I literally got on this and everything to write how amazing this place is. And the workers are VERY nice. They greet you when you walk into the door, and they socialize! Its a very nice comfortable little soup place that is perfect to just hang out and relax or you can take it home! I freakin love this place. One of my new favorites. :D
We had All Clean out to do our carpets, sofa and even had our Prius carpets and seats cleaned. They did a great job and the price was fair. Highly recommended with confidence. Jo McConnell
None
Excellent
We hosted a pre-wedding reception dinner for roughly 30 guests at Kate's Pizza Amore, and were extremely happy with the result. The staff were extremely friendly and helpful, the bill was reasonable and the atmosphere was great. And the food was excellent - I'd eaten here before, so I know it was consistent, but every one of our guests I talked to was also pleased with their meal. An excellent place overall.
Amazing school, created many memories and grew as a student. c/o 2005
Overseas education consultants in Mumbai is IDP.
Its kinda like 5 Guys but better!!!
Awesome theater!!!!
Biggest and best burritos ever!!!
None
Ron recently listed a rental property for me that had been on the market for over a year with another realtor. With his creativity and experience he sold it in only a couple of months. Thanks, Ron
Professor Fabio is an excellent instructor and you can tell he loves being a teacher of Jiu Jitsu.
Hot food and always fresh! Been here multiple times. The food is Hot, and always fresh for a great value! I love to stop in to grab a bite to eat on my lunch break. I would recommend this place to any of my family and friends.
Vocês possuem algum e-mail para contato?
I found the car I love at Sport Honda. Now, I'm glad I found Sport Honda. They took good care of me and I know that they will take good care of the clients I refer to them. Thank you Sport Honda!
If you are looking for a good place to take your animals in Spokane, I recommend the North Division Animal Medical Center. I have a cat that seemed to be having some abdominal problems. I was looking for a new place as the last place I went to was so expensive, plus they made me feel bad that I didn't get all their latest treatments and care plans. I actually called another place first that was recommended by a neighbor, but they didn't take walk-ins and were booked for a few days. That place recommended NDAMC. I called them about 7:45 AM and got an 11:00 appointment, but was also encouraged to come in at any time to see if we could get squeezed in. After I made the appointment, I read the reviews here and felt more than a little concerned. However, I decided to go ahead with the initial exam. Dr. Sipert and his technician Chrissy were awesome, as were the front desk staff. I felt like I was treated with respect and the prices were reasonable. They also didn't pressure me to have a bunch of tests taken, but offered quotes on things in priority order. I've been to other places here in Spokane and never felt completely comfortable as a pet owner and often faced sticker shock. When I found out that nothing was urgently wrong with my cat, I decided not to go forward with the tests and take her home for further observation, and my decision was respected. I purchased the flea treatment and got some recommendations for environmental pest treatments that I could buy over the counter. Finally, when I remarked about the good service on Facebook, one of my friends told me this is where she and her parents take their pets, as well as have them boarded. She also had nothing but good to say about this clinic. I'll be returning here whenever I need care for my cats.
None
This is my local healthy food spot ... love it!
ไปส่งแม่ไปต่างประเทศ
Posted for Charles N. Swafford, Jr. - I have been in the auction and real estate business for 44 years and have closed real estate transactions ith dozens of attorneys here in Madison County, plus all adjoining counties. One of the most important things that I look for in an attorney's office, besides the actual closing, is the help from the office staff. They can either make a realtor look good or bad to their clients. Martinson & Beason's staff is courteous and gives the assistance you need prior to the closing. Receiving telephone calls is a large part of a realtor's livelihood and Martinson & Beason is always available for their clients. I rate Doug and Mac Martinson and their staff at the top of their profession. If I were to choose a law office today to handle any real estate transaction, it would be them.
The Best canteen in the world. Still remember the taste of those spicy Hot Dogs from school days
Steak cheese and mushroom, with cheese fries, delicious!!
None
Me encantó ! La playa es genial y la ciudad aun mejor. / @JuanitoCardona
Amazing range of burgers, really unique flavour. Absolutely loved my chicken burger with pear and feta, service was charming, highly recommend it.
You need to the cut dogleg a lot more than it looks.
I love this place! Great massage at a great price! Perfect.
If you like Chicken Fingers this is the place to go. They only serve fingers, fries, coleslaw and toast. If you don't like one of the sides you can substitute a double portion of something else.
None
I lived there for many years. My parents still live there. Never had any problems. Very tranquil and family oriented.
None
Amazing outdoor atmosphere, best Summer spot in Old Montreal. I try to go at least once a Summer, amazing place, great food!
I have been a regular customer with Pegasus Nelson for about 8 years & I have always had great service. I'm met at the airport by friendly staff and the paperwork is done quickly & I'm away to Motueka. Drop off is handled just as smoothly. Absolutely no hassle at all. Excellent people to deal with.
muito boa!
Awesome
I took my Honda CBR 929rr in for a leaky air valve, and to get valves checked as well as some other work. Matt was clear about what needed to be done, his turn around was accurate, and it was really nice to know that some other 'qualified technician' wasn't the one working on my bike as many larger shops have- it was the owner himself. Great service, seemed very knowledgeable and I will definitely be taking my bike back there for its service in the future. Highly recommended motorcycle shop!
Arthur the owner is a great guy! My favorite are the sandwiches! great neighborhood! very clean! Prices fit the neighborhoods way of life. I love dumbo!
Everywhere you look there's a face of somebody who needs you
A true artist.
This place is AWESOME. Their tea selection is almost ridiculous. They're open late, which is great, and free wifi, I like to go here and do work and chill. They have these awesome sitting rooms, my friends and I have gone there and had our own private room and all hung out. Owner is really nice and so are the baristas :)
Food is amazing, and the staff is always so polite and friendly!
Just had Tim cut my hair there. Never been there before but going by reviews here I decided to stop in. I was in and out in no time. Tim did a great job. Very professional. Will definitely be back again. Will be my new barbershop in the future. Good prices and great staff.
None
Great time on the Skywheel. Great view of South Myrtle Beach.
3 of us went today for the first time. The woman who took our orders was very friendly and the food was quite tasty.
I have put great deal with Sybe medical management for medical billing .. and have change my life with ittt... and can't say anything about itt :)
This is a Perfect place for a simple appetizer and a best dessert you can think of. All of this under $20.00.......Big choice of excellent Salads , French Pates and quiches. My favorite danish is the Apricot roll. This place will surprise anybody. Great value for a date.
Very friendly, great bear prices, and nice atmosphere.
My new wife and I got married there on 2/22/2014. Let me tell you, these guys are the real deal! Leading up to the wedding, we really didn't know what to expect. There was a lot going on. Arnaldo's made it very easy and low stress. Everything went as planned and I don't think we could have asked for a better venue. Food was delicious! Usually when you go to a wedding, it is pretty bland food. We had about 200 people @ the reception and we didn't want the "traditional" wedding food. So, food stations was our best bet. LET ME TELL YOU, not one person complained about the food! Actually, everyone said it was very good, rich and fun! No food was cold, and the wait staff was helping out like no other. The GM was even there navigating everything and working with the staff! All in all, we are extremely happy and if we ever need to do anything again, we will defiantly call Arnaldo's first! Thanks again guys, you guys are AWESOME!!! Best, Evan and Briana
Great looking piazza designed by Michelangelo on top of Capitol Hill. Well worth the visit.
Must go to one of the dinner classes! Guests from our b&b have gone and rave about it. The facility itself is amazing and they always have things going on.
Excellent restaurant dans le Vieux Nice, service impeccable, plats succulents (trois fois que j'y vais), bon rapport qualité
Was amazing as always
None
I love beautiful jewelrey, and have an eye for elegance, quality, and clarity as well as beauty in craftmanship, Buchroeders has surpassed all of my expectatations as well as customer service. They deserve to be recogonized for the excellence they have shown . Every single individual at Buchroeder's has been accommodating to my the purchase of my desired dreams in jewelry. Thank you Buchroeders, and Sicily.
None
None
Best Harold's in the area! I'll drive from anywhere to go the one on 87th &the Dan Ryan!
Great office. The staff is so friendly and personable. Dr. Bert is so patient with the patients. I was nervous when I arrived and the staff made sure I was comfortable and felt at ease prior to any work being done. I will surely recommend them to others!!
Good!
I've been a repeat offender on The Grapeline and have never had less than an amaze-balls time. It's not about the wineries or the wine, although let's be honest - that's why I've taken wine tours to begin with. The reason I ride with these guys is because of the hosts who take care of you, make sure you have water, get you a spot at the counter on busy weekends & if you're really special, hook you up with the good stuff. From the time you make the reservation to the time you get back home, these guys have bent over backwards to make your day fun. I've taken other tours in the valley and have only re-ridden with The Grapeline. There's just no comparison.
Innovation Fitness Solutions offers an amazing program which incorporates all aspects of wellbeing in a fitness program. Success is not only based on what the number on the scale says, but on your attitude, your belief in yourself, and your overall sense of self. Innovation Fitness Solutions offers a variety of classes for all fitness levels and abilities, including a coaching class that helps you through roadblocks and celebrates accomplishments. Check out Innovation Fitness Solutions, you will not be disappointed.
I was pleasantly surprised with this new dentist we chose that is on our insurance plan. Staff is great and friendly, I did not have to do anything concerning insurance, they verified all my coverages, and gave me my estimate cost for a root canal and a new crown on a chipped molar. The best part is that I showed up for my appointment 5 minutes early and did not have to wait which is a really nice change from any other dental or medical clinics I have used in the past. The root canal was a lot less scary than I thought it was going to be, I had a little bit of the nitros or what ever it is and was really comfortable. Unfortunately I accidentally bit down a bit to hard when they were fitting my temporary crown and cracked it.. it was my fault, but they were totally awesome and stayed with me until after hours to make sure that they could make me a new temporary and would be comfortable and have no issues until the new crown arrived in about a week. I chose a zirconia (sp?) crown with porcelain so it would be really strong and look real.. I was thrilled with the options and am very excited to get the Zoom whitening next week. We have made appointments for my wife and kids to come and get the annual checkups and cleanings. I highly recommend this dental office, So glad I found a place that actually cares.
Kozeta is a fantastic stylist who always seems to get it right. She pays a lot of attention to detail when it comes to color and I don't think anyone has done such a great job of my hair. I always feel well taken care of with each visit and can't say enough good things about her and her team.
My husband and I did a lot of research before picking a place to board out puppy. We were looking for a place that was going to care for our puppy, but also be affordable for long stays. Precious Pets is very affordable for the services they include, and we will only leave our Shiba Inu at this place. Everyone there is very friendly, and our puppy is always really happy when he comes back home to us. They let our Shiba play with other puppies his age, so it's really comforting knowing they care!
A Better Pet Sitter has been taking care of my cats while I travel for quite a while now and I couldn't be happier. Rachel and her crew set me at ease with their attention to detail when we first went over my needs. I get plenty of updates on my pets while I'm gone and even pictures so I know what they are up to. You can tell with one look how well they've been cared for and how happy they are when you return. I couldn't recommend Rachel and A Better Pet Sitter higher. You will definitely be pleased with her service!!
Looking for a regular Barber shop, this is it. Not a Salon, not a Parlor not a Boutique. Good haircuts, good service, friendly staff. I have become a regular!
None
I would like to say that in my seven years of almost daily business dealings with Sure Sarvival I have had nothing but positive interaction and results. I can only speak of my personal experiences and will go on record as saying I believe him to be a fair and honest man. The fact that some people can grab information off the internet, you know…like any 3 or 5 year old could do today, doesn’t say much about the person to me. I agree that you entitled to your opinion; however it’s when you leave the realm of opinion and enter into the realm of slander that bothers me.
Wonderful local attraction, great place to run into a neighbor and have a great time. Love the fact that all this stays in the community. Keep on keeping on, we always have an amazing time every year it gets better and better. Thank you!
Lakeside Farms is one of my favorite restaurants of all time. I sometimes drive more than two hours to have breakfast there! The apple fritter is the best on the planet, and the environment is so friendly and wholesome. Go there and give them your money.
Under construction but its awesome for the works completed
None
Such a fabulous store! I am so happy they are close enough for me to drive to! They almost always have what I need and everyone is incredibly friendly and willing to share tips and tricks! Plus, they have a great selection of classes! It is such a comfortable place to shop!
Saw A&A auto glass on groupon,and had my windshield replaced their,from the initial phone call to pickup, it was nothing short of professional, friendly with high quality work. They explain everything to me. Qoute was bangon& very resonable. I would not hesitate using them again.
Great beer and great burgers.
Great venue for late night drinks and some fantastic entertainment in the Matcham Room.
None
None
Staff is helpful, friendly and courteous, although very busy. Definitely recommend if you need to rent a moving truck.
Great place for kids! We took our two boys and they loved it. The cost of admission is a little steep if you ask me($12/ person, ages 1 & up), so it cost us $48 for our family of four to get in. I was initially worried we wouldn't get our moneys worth, but that being said, the kids had a blast. There are quite a few exhibits, and pretty much everything is interactive for the kids. There are things for small kids as well as big kids. They have a large play area for small toddlers with plenty of toys, and its surrounded by a wall(with doors that can only be opened by adults). Parents can sit on the benches and watch their little ones play without fear of them running off into the rest of the museum. All in all, I would highly recommend. There is a Jason's Deli located inside the museum as well. Admission is a little high, but the kids loved it.
None
It's donuts. How bad can it be and the coffee is excellent.
None
great service finding things we were looking for. very helpful
We are always treated like family at Dr. Frydenlund's office!! Every person there seems to take a special interest in my son and his progress. We could not have chosen a better orthodontist for my son. We are still in the middle of his treatment, but so far the progress has far exceeded our expectations! Special thanks to the friends we have at Dr Frydenlund's office!!
From the moment we drove up in to the lot until all upgrades were finished, we were treated like royality. The salesman Richard and the Manager Dennis were more than accomandating. They offered a really good deal along with some extra incentives all of which was taken care of within a few days. I love my new Equinox. This is our second vehicle purchased from Sandy Sansing Chevrolet.
These guys went above and beyond to get my car fixed before Thanksgiving. I appreciate Mr. Buddy and his staff for taking care of my taurus even though the shop was about to close. These are first class people. Thanks Again!
None
I am from New Jersey, and fairly new to the hobby. My friend has been more experienced than I am, but we keep a tank together in his office at work. I have ordered from Dave/Zach both online, over the phone, as well as in person. I was on business travel, that had my near and decided to go with my friend to check the place out. I have been to a number of stores in New Jersey, most of which I won't even buy from, and I would say that I amazed at the corals and reef keeping at Vivid Aquariums. Dave provides high quality of service, and spend several hours showing us around and helping us make selections. They are not perfect, but, I will say they seem to try pretty hard to give a high level of customer service. I would recommend them for purchase both in person and online.
They've been good to me.
None
Stayed for a night on Christmas day. It was awesome place with huge room, bath, free pool, spa and suana. Very nice environment and helping staff. I highly recommend this place to everyone! Will visit you guys again!
Friendly knowledgeable staff that jumps to the opportunity to help you. Whether you are a novice or expert weapons person, they can help. Store is small but is stocked with a good selection of handguns and rifles. If I need a specific part or upgrade, these are the guys and gals that take care of me!! GREAT STORE!!
The staff is friendly and very helpful. They are personable and down to earth.I love the selection of clothing,shoes & gear they have. Its very balanced.I went in to buy a pair of Toms they had on sale & they couldn't find the match in the back room so they looked through their inventory for it and called me to let me know it was lost( total bummer) but they'd gladly help in any other way that they could. Went in & got new toms this week! Yeah!
Proud to be part of it :)
Best cheese steaks... just ask for extra meat and cheese
None
None
Great food. I love there wood fired pizza and the salads are superb!
I had a nice dinner here. A friend told me about this restaurant. Fresh and healthy. I will come back again. The roast chicken is moist and flavorful, with crispy skin.
This is by far the best kept secret in Milwaukee. I've been to manyexican restaurants and this one is the best!
None
None
Friendly, Trustworthy, Reliable and Reasonable are the words that come to mind when I think of Alexander HVAC.. When our tenant called and the heading was not working, Alexander was there for us, made the tenant feel good that the job would get done as quickly as possible. As a landlord, this is the exactly the kind of service I need. I highly recommend Alexander to anyone needing HVAC services.
Great dining. It was a birthday treat by my boss' and whole family❤️ Very memorable👍
Courtesy, Comfort and Care defined in true sense.................
I had the pleasure of visiting this beautiful park back in June of this year. This is a very beautiful, breath taking site. I am so glad our tour guide from Pink Jeep Tours stopped at the park and let us enjoy the beauty! ( We were on our way back to Las Vegas from the Hoover Dam)
Michelle was so Wonderful to work with. She's a bright shinning spirit and John is super cool too. Love you guys. Super job !
Molto carino , si mangia bene , buon prezzo .:-)
I love to go to this after Beer Fest. Great food. Reasonable prices and a great atmosphere. Location is awesome!
None
I absolutely love working with Diego Molina. His creativity is outstanding, with a real eye for detail and setting up the perfect shot. Diego is very kind and patient, and he takes the time to explain what he's doing. I had a particularly challenging shoot where a wedding cake was placed in the reception room on a table against an open window on a bright, sunny day. I was so amazed the way Diego was able to capture the true color of the cake with no shadows. The detail shots are breathtaking. I highly recommend Diego.
โโรงแรมใกล้ๆ
None
ook wij met alle dieren uit het boss waren hier vele jaren geleden reeds.Zelfs broeder vos voelde zich hier thuis tussen adders en vlinders en heerlijk zwembadje met restaurantje
This is a true working farm. Gigantic Pigs, chickens, you name it. I'm from Brooklyn so just seeing all these animals cohabitating was pretty impressive but then they sell they're own meat, cure the sausage and the bacon and plus sell the most delicious prepared food—it is the BEST. I am particularly obsessed with the biscotti, quiche and bacon. But everything is delicious and the farmers are the hardest working, yet most chill people I've ever met. Stop by and stock up. Tell Sarah and Craig that I sent you.
No game playing. Good prices. Great selection of vehicles. Very good quality vehicles. Service department handled a door latch problem with no hassles whatsoever. (30 day warranty covered it all.) This is where I'll be going for my next vehicle as well. All staff were very professional, pleasant, and courteous.
Burlington Jade has the best chicken wings. I order often when I am in Burlington. Never late. Food always good. The owner is very nice and has no problem spending a few minutes for a smile and a nice talk.
This Northgate gem has a cozy atmosphere and friendly staff. Crepes made to order - savory and sweet - simply delicious.
I love Casa. We go there often. I don't think I've ever gotten a rude waitress or bad food.
Great little place to stop while riding on the bike trail. Good variety of food.
Had lunch with 7 people. The quality and quantity of the food was excellent. Service was great. We'll definitely be back.
This is the first time I have bought a new car in my LIFE!!! an I'm 40, These people (Molly) where the greatest people to help you between her an her Boss and I cant remember his name (He was a little pushy) but had a great personality. LOL I love this place everyone was so nice an helpful. I would recommend them to all my friends an family in a minute,[], :) thanks guys for all your help. If they can get me approved for a loan They can get anyone approved I'd bet..
Tried the pork and steak tacos for lunch. Loved the pastor (pork taco). Very delicious. Steak good, too. But definitely give the pork a try. Different toppings added to the pork taco make it extra delicious. Fast service at noon on a Friday.
Servico muito excelente e tradicional. Garcon profissional. Comida fresca, ambiente tranquilo.
Tul27 came as quick as can be. Unlocked my car and I was on my way with my business. It was very speedy process and he helped without any confusion. Great experience.
Customer Service is really tested when you have an issue that needs to be resolved. I am happy to say Elyria Hyundai’s customer service passed with flying colors when I encountered an issue post purchasing a vehicle and sales rep, Mari Veliz, went above and beyond to help me reach a resolution that made me feel pleased with my purchase. Thank you to Jeff, GSM, for your help as well.
Love this place.
Our favourite Indian restaurant, in fact probably our favourite restaurant! Top quality food and always very welcoming.
Dr. Marty Broughton is a life saver. I wasn't able to work for four months. Neurologists couldn't help me, but Marty had me feeling better in 15 minutes.
Not just truck bed liners. Rhino Linings of Colorado Springs is excellent at garage floors and such, too! Their professionalism and customer care is unmatched!
Excellent food . Take out menu includes a lunch menu, 11:00 - 3:30, average meal eight dollars, gives you a taste of some of their main meals. Lunch comes with salad, rice, choice of protein.
None
Excellent furniture. very happy with our purchases
Very cool bit of history! Oldest standing building in Pittsburgh. Emily is incredibly knowledgeable...ask her questions and you will not be disappointed.
Went tonight to have a good steak in Hammond. This place was just what I was hoping for! Steak was cooked perfect and I have to give a shout out to the bread pudding!
Full review to come..for now I'll leave it with Justine was supremely helpful, and I was very pleased with all aspects of this location.
A great place to buy a Sealy or Stearns and Foster mattress as well as other brands in Monroe. The owners are great people.
Working with Charlotte Vibe was such a joy, Chris and David were so much fun and professional to work with. They made me feel very comfortable and at ease during my photo shoot. I am so happy with my photo's and will highly recommend them to all. If you want a professional and fabulous shoot, go see David and Chris at Charlotte Vibe. Thanks Carol
These people know there stuff over there. I used to spend over $100 a month in cigarettes. Not anymore woohooo!
Loved the burrito. Lots of choices of ingredients. HOT is really very HOT. I would recommend only mild.
verschrikkelijk lekker eten, grandioze bediening en een Prosecco van het huis, en een zeer betaalbare rekening. Een aanrader!
Love love love this place! It's become my regular Friday night (date night) dinner with my wife, and we look forward to the creative specials every week. BYOB (with no corkage fee), great food, and a chef that will try anything - what more could you want?
I recently purchased a Subaru outback from Eastside Subaru. I had done some research of the prices for my favorite model and also got some e-prices from several dealerships for several different options. Most of them were nice to reply me, but Mattew at Eastside Subaru was the one who very quickly replied me with most helpful information. When I stopped by the dealership, Mattew introduced me Brian. He also showed me several other cars which were in transit. Because I didn't want any package, he showed me the one including least options. Brian brought a good price for the car, which was less than I expected. He was very nice and responsible for his customer. After I bought the car, he gave me several phone calls to check whether I am enjoying my car and I have any concern for the new car. Because I had very terrible experience of purchasing my previous car, I was afraid of dealing with a car dealer. But Brian and Mattew made it so much easier. I am really satisfied with their customer service. I am not sure whether they were very nice to me because I just bought a car. :-) But I will recommend this dealership to my friends and be back to the dealership again if I will need another Subaru. Thank Mattew and Brian.
This is the best locksmith i have ever used... they came out quickly, the technician was fast and friendly and did a great job installing the lock! Raz is the best!
John my service adviser was excellent. He made sure I got the best price on my service. He even recommended a warranty repair. He said that he remembered seeing an email about a repair that would be covered under the car's warranty. So he suggested that we get it completed while the warranty was still in force. I am sure this saved me a lot of money down the road. I strongly recommend going to Honda City for your repairs. Additionally, they run service specials all the time. So they will often be a good deal.
Ideal para escuchar Rock, buena música, y tomar una cerveza
Idea dream wedding place. A must see for any party occasion. The banquet itself is a beautiful building outside and inside. On August 31st 2012 my niece had her wedding at this place. The service was excellent! The food superb and will presented. The servers were very courteous and patient. My family loved everything about this place. I give this place…. 5 stars. P.S. thank you for finding my one diamond- ruby earring – (sentimental to me) Thank you for your honesty.
Professional, Caring and Efficient! I can't say enough good things about my experience with AZ Statewide Paralegal. They managed to help me to take care of a long sought divorce quickly and with the utmost concern for my needs. The fee was more than fair given what I've heard some friends have paid attorneys to do the exact same thing. I feel empowered and ready for my hearing and certain that this team will stand behind me and support me every step of the way until this matter is finalized. Anyone who needs legal help but can't quite manage an attorney, would do well to contact them!
Bill Nibur is honest and friendly. I've happily had my cars repaired and maintained at C&B for many years.
Absolutely the best food, service, and restaurant experience I've ever had! I definitely give it a ten rating!
The staff at this office is very kind and warm. They were hospitable to upfront questions about cost and very transparent. The communication in making appointments and confirming them showed great customer service. Dr. McKee is very reassuring. He seems to go out of his way to settle a patient's nerves, while remaining focused on the procedure. Most importantly, the work he did was great. My dental issues have improved because of his work, they healed quickly, and with minimal discomfort. I cannot say enough about this office and recommend them with the utmost confidence.
" My 11 year old loved the office and felt very at ease at Loew's. She really enjoyed her consultation, how clearly everything was explained to her, and how the staff and Doc tried to connect with her on topics she loves - like fiction about cats. My daughter usually has a lot of anxiety in any medical office, but she felt comfortable and even went as far to say how much she liked the practice after her consult. As a parent, I was very impressed as well. Nice people helping people get their best smile. "
Pekerjaannya rapih dan cepat
I was in for service with my 2005 ML 350 and had the pleasure to meet Mirela Cristache, a sales rep. that greeted me and asked me if i was all set and offered me coffee. She asked what kind of vehicle I am driving and offered to show me the new models that are out . I love my car and did not think about getting a new vehicle but her customer service skills were so persuasive where she got me interested. I told her if and when I will be in the market I will make sure to contact her. Also any friends and family that are thinking about getting a new Mercedes will go see her !!! Thank you Mirela !!!
I came in for some complicated services. The staff was so patient despite the many Christmastime customers coming in and out, and was competent and efficient. I was very impressed and happy.
Nice..
Moving my office back to Austin from Florida after 15 years I needed help navigating an unfamiliar commercial market. A friend of a friend recommended Rebecca. She helped locate all of the spaces in the area I wanted to be in that fit my square footage requirements and my budget. She set up appointments for all of them and actually picked me up and drove me to most of them as well. She wrote three letters of intent and negotiated two leases, going back a couple times on the one I finally decided on. She made suggestions that I probably wouldn't have thought about. And she even got me free rent and below quoted rates in what is surely a landlords market. Oh yeah, and I got a pint of Guinness out of the deal too.
Compared to the other BJJ academies I have tried in the Boulder area, RFLX stands out as the finest in all categories. As a purple belt, I can say that the advanced curriculum is top-notch and taught by excellent instructors. The fundamentals curriculum is solid as well, with an emphasis on details that'll help build tough grapplers. Here, you can also round out your game with excellent striking instruction or improve your cardio with fitness classes. Plus it's the cleanest, best-looking gym I've ever been to. It really is a great place to train for men, women and children. Great vibe. Check it out.
I recently enrolled both of my sons (5 and 3 yo) into their school. It has only been 6 weeks but I have seen a tremendous improvement in their swimming behavior. The staff is very friendly, but they push the kids in a good way. There was some crying in the beginning but that improved within a couple of weeks. In the beginning, both were unwilling to even put their faces in the water. Now my 5 yo can actually swim a few strokes unassisted and my 3 yo is diving under the water for toys. Not only has it helped with swimming, but bath time is much easier now (what a bonus!) We love Aqua-tots!
Been a patient of these guys for many years. Simply THE BEST!
This is a wonderful place a filled with help if your new to olive oils and balsamic. I would recommend my friends and family to go, and anyone else.
Best damn coffee in town. It's 10x better than Starbucks. Best caramel macchiatto in btown.
Best medical office in town as far as I see it. I have watched this practice grow in the last few years! They have not lost their personal appeal!
I can't pass up a good cheese plate and artisanal cocktail, so The Cellar is kinda perfect. In the basement of Beecher's Cheese shop, this place is a little pricey but the food is well worth it. The staff is very knowledgable about all the food, especially the specialty cheese. Every night features a different cheese plate or cocktail for happy hour. Go early for Happy Hour and to beat the crowd. It's basement and bigger than most venues but still not huge and it gets packed fast.
These guys are awesome! Sent my PC that I thought had seen its last day and that I'd have to replace, these guy's sent it back to me better than the day I first bought it! Really quick turnaround and very professional!
From exhaust to oil changes you will not find a more honest auto repair shop. I have shopped around and Rays is fair priced and up front. The waiting room is spotless. They offer online scheduling. They also have a great loyalty program that earns you points/ credit towards future work.
We had such a great experience, I had to tell everyone! I scheduled an appointment for my 18 y/o daughter at Beauty Brand by Oak Park Mall last saturday and was able to get in the same day. The stylist that they assigned to us was Holly Mikkelsen. She said she was new, but she looks experienced and very stylish. Holly gave us an amazing consultation and made some great suggestions that we ended up doing. My daughter got a cut and partial highlights, both of which look amazing. Holly suggested using layers to make it look better, and they definetly look amazing. I can't reccomend her enough, I keep telling everyone, because my daughter gets compliments every where she goes now! I know her scheduled days fill up fast, so make an appointment quick! Also, I was really surprised how cheap the services were...
None
I come to Munich on business 1 - 3 times a year and I always stay at the Platzl if I can. Great hotel, staff and location.
Just leased my third Murano from them and they are great to work with. Super professional and respectful of my time. I highly recommend them. Frank Coppola was the salesperson I worked with and he was great.
We switched to the birth and womens center at the end of my second trimester because we were really unhappy with our obgyn. I loved the commitment to letting mom and baby be in charge of the birth experience. My husband was glad that Baylor is only three mins away. Turns out we were both right. Baby was born after 3 short calm hours of labor, healthy and beautiful. but due to a 1:3000 complication afterward I was rushed to Baylor for emergency surgery. Beverly was amazing. If I could have more, they'd be born here.
None
Best cakes I have ever tasted. Banana bread and carrot cake are superb.
As always, the BEST and most honest service around. I called Dana when I got some mysterious things going on as I was heading back to Glenview from the city. He warned me that I might not make it without a tow, so I was not surprised when it died. Was towed in by AAA, they were waiting for me, diagnosed it and I was back in my car the next morning. Thanks!
Great food! Great service! We sat outside and the waitress even brought a bowl of water for my dog. We'll definitely be back again and again!
None
Nach 2 Jahren wieder da gewesen - immer noch Klasse!!!
Coffee Evi is a great local spot in the South Tampa / Westshore area. The coffee and food is so much better than the big chains in the area. It's also a perfect place for business meetings.
My business had a very good experience with Lampert plumbing. Simply, they were professional and efficient, and helped us by working within our time constraints. In all, a very favourable experience, and I've since recommended them to friends.
Mama Maria's is our favorite! The food and service are consistently great! Authentic and delicious food where the owners make you feel like part of the family.
My wife and I stopped here for breakfast on our last visit to Scottsdale. The store is very small, but the food was excellent! My wife raved over the homemade croissant her sandwich was on, and my omelette was fantastic. We also had a great time chatting with the owner and learning more about how the cafe got started. Can't wait to visit again to try the Arizona Benedict!
Great sushi better than most places in town
Everything on the menu is homemade and delicious! The bloody mary bar is to die for and you can't beat the happy hour. Love this place.
Dealt with Gilbert from Jade air - incredibly knowledgeable and upfront. Will go the extra yard to make sure your system (HVAC in my instance) is working properly and efficiently (vents, ducts, etc aren't leaking). An honest company!
I love Mario's! There aren't very many good Mexican restaurant's around the West Garden Grove, Huntington Beach area. Mario's is the best and has the best Mexican food. Their margaritas are wonderful, and they serve you fast. ! My favorite is the enchilada with the green sauce. Yummy . Love those hot chips they make.
Fortunately, I have no problem with dentists and especially this one. Dr. Barsoum is a smart man who has filled his office with wonderful, extremely competent ladies. From the front desk to the X-rays to the cleaning to the polishing, I was well looked after and experienced excellent work and customer service.
I've sailed with Asaad for over 20 years as a child and continue as an adult with friends and family. I have had a consistently wonderful experience on his boat, which is always well-maintained. He is very professional and a good conversationalist. Sunset cruises are always my favorite.
Love the friendly atmosphere....the awesome staff...yummy food...and of course the patrons of high top # 3 :)) !!!
Dr. Lo takes the time to explain findings, recommendations, and procedures in great detail. I feel very at ease in the chair. I have never felt even a twinge of discomfort during any procedure. Dr. Lo has a very steady hand, quick wit, and a professional and caring demeanor. His staff is dialed in and focused on providing a world-class experience.
Good Pit Spot on Banglore -- Chennai Highway.. Fill your car and yourself...
They cater to my clients needs, always are upbeat and attentive and offer friendly guidance. The location is great, parking sometimes a hastle, but my clients leave feeling accomplished and appreciated. Cindy Maya is the best.
great food
I have had the opportunity to interact with Mr. Alston as opposing counsel during my time as a prosecutor. He was always well prepared, very knowledgable about the law, effective, professional and ethical, with only his clients best interests at heart.
THE best wings in Austin! Try them charbroiled, or extra crispy ;)
have Taken The Family To Uptown Buffet Several Times Great Place Love it.
This is the eminent National Defense Thinktank community of Thailand
Great food, friendly staff, clean store. Would like yo see donuts added to the menu.
Working at kmart was delightful and a amazing. I enjoyed the employees friendship,supervisors, and manager kind guesture.They treated customers with respect and attend to ones that needed help.I have fun with everyone. Hope to see you all someday mwahh:)Sincerly: Pauline Gausi
All Start Heating & Air Conditioning is very professional and courteous. Jimmy was here for two days working diligently and did a wonderful job. Great neighbors to have here in Fall City, WA too! The owner - Patrick, is wonderful to work with.
Hatte vor einer Woche Flyer und Plakate bestellt und bin super zufrieden mit dem Service. In der Datei waren Kleinigkeiten die angepasst werden mussten und bevor der Druck in Auftrag ging wurde ich kontaktiert und hab noch ne Chance gehabt das zu verändern, anstatt ein Paket mit 2500 falsch gedruckten Flyern zu bekommen. Das nenn ich Servicequalität. Außerdem kann man als Selbstabholer noch Porto sparen und muss nicht ans Ende der Stadt fahren um die Packete abzuholen. Fazit: Top Produkte, Top Service und gute Anbindung in Potsdammer Platz Nähe.
Had my first treatment with Georgie last week in her very comfortable studio. She accurately pinpointed a number of issues and I felt relaxed and rested that night, and reenergised the following morning. I have already rebooked!
This is my second vehicle I've purchased here. I worked with the Financial Services Manager Saeed Khamenian and my experience was second to none. He was helpful, insightful, professional, and very kind. I would not hesitate to reccomend his services or Alexandria Toyota to anyone. I am very happy with my experience.
Best car wash for the money. Get coupons from Vons for $5.99 washes.
Go-Forth Pest Management does all of our pest contol services and we couldn't be happier. They are always on time for their appointments, and very respectfull while their here. We are proud to say we have had no pest problems since we started our services with these guys, and plan on keeping them on our team for years to come. We would reccomend Go-Forth for any pest control needs commercial or residential.Thanks Guys for all your hard work, and we will see you at our next appointment. Andrew Beck North Carolina Trailer Sales
I plan dozens of events a year, from small business functions, to large charitable events, and even weddings. It's RARE to find a venue like Noor Ballroom. In my humble opinion, what makes Noor better than your average venue is not the absolutely delicious food, it's not the amazingly beautiful venue, it's not even the ridiculously reasonable prices. No, all those things are icing on the cake, but what makes this particular venue stand out in a sea of places with tasty food, ambience, and comparable prices is the SERVICE. I threw a big charitable Halloween Ball at the Ella Ballroom last night for 200 guests. Robert Shahnazarian was a dream to work with from start to finish. He made the process so simple, from our first phone call, to the venue walk-though, to the menu planning, and all the way through leading up to the day of the event. He listened to my needs, worked within my budget, followed up promptly, gave me great insight and ideas to enhance our event, and he did everything effortlessly and efficiently. He knows exactly what he's doing, and that takes away a lot of the stress of planning a large event. On the day of the event, the on-site manager did a great job seeing to our needs, the staff were professional and efficient, and they rolled with all of the punches (helped us with a stand for our step & repeat banner when our stand wasn't the right type, moved furniture around to accommodate the needs of our vendor sponsors, did a great job passing the appetizers and tending the bar, etc.) Robert even dropped in to say hello and make sure everything was running smoothly, and then sent me a follow-up email in the morning to ensure that I was happy with how everything came together. I would recommend this venue without a shadow of a doubt. I will look to them for future venue needs, and will refer them to friends, clients, and family. They have my full stamp of approval. THANK YOU for helping to make my event a successful one!
I took my son to Doctors Express for an earache. I was in and out of there in less than 20 min! the staff was very professional and the doctor was great. The office was very clean and up to date. Most importantly I loved that they open at 8 am when other urgent care facilities do not open until 11 or later!
The TV I wanted wasn't available anywhere local, and I wasn't having any luck with the big online names. So I scoured the net and found East Coast TVs. I ordered my 55" HDTV on 6 Feb - the website stated that 5 were in stock. After I placed my online order I received the confirmation email. About 30 minutes later I received a call from Steve to verify delivery address and shipping options. I was actually glad he called because he made me aware of an error I made on the delivery options, so we were able to get that resolved quickly. There was no pushy upsell, and Steve was a pleasure to talk to. The TV was delivered about 2 1/2 weeks later - there was some delay because of the weather. The delivery guys brought the TV in, unpacked it, set it up where I asked them to, and turned it on to make sure it works. They also had me inspect it to make sure nothing was broken. The next time a big ticket item I'm looking for isn't available locally, I'll go with these guys first. Thanks Steve!
There is no better place for my Dally and Chip to go during the day or over the weekend. Julie and the staff at The Dog Park couldn't be better at caring for the dogs and providing a great environment for clients. Dally and Chip are always so excited to go during the week, they never dread getting dropped off. A great place to send your pups knowing they are going to have a great day!
Absolutely an amazing experience. Loved the service. They were all very informative too. And even better,there was free food and massages. I loved it. Really shows that they know the car buying process can be a nerve wreck and time consuming. These accommodations really make you feel like VIP as well. Will be going back again, but not for the free food and massages haha :)
Gary and Rudi were most helpful in selling me the car I'd been searching for at a fair price. Their customer service was better than the competition.
Lunch menu is great. Service is quick and nice.
The experience at Bill Penney was very pleasant. It seemed that all the employees encountered were sincerely trying to provide great customer service. I also liked that the owner was on the floor working with his people and customers. The atmosphere is non threatening and professional.
Doctors and staff alike were very professional and extremely attentive to finding and correcting my vision issues.Just one visit and you too will clearly see the difference.I would recommend the Berkeley Eye Center for all vision related needs.Seeing is certainly believing! MICHAEL ALDRIDGE
Bonjour , j'ai trouvé le personnelle respectueux à l'écoute du client , le changement des intérieurs ne pourra qu'être que meilleur pour la nouvelle année , merci Suite hôtel.
We ate at this restaurant last night for the first time. The food was EXCELLENT. This Chinese food was prepared with a Master Gourmet Chef's mentality and attention to flavor. Everything was freshly prepared and wonderfully flavored with fresh vegetables and ingredients. I had the Shrimp w/ Cashews, steamed rice, Wonton soup, egg rolls, and cheese puff. My girlfriend had General Tsao's Chicken, fried rice and egg rolls. I might add that I had a Dr. Pepper that was really good...old school good. Portions were more than adequate, and there was enough left over to take some home. The staff that served us was quick, courteous, and diligent. The café is relatively small, as cafe's are...but is able to seat maybe 30-40 people, it is very neat and clean. We witnessed a brisk call-in order business as well. We definitely will return to this restaurant either as part of the dine in crowd, or as one of the many who phone ahead and pick it up on the way home. While there is no delivery service, any inconvenience this might cause is quickly erased by the food that is definitely worth the time and trip to get.
Great service, convenient, inexpensive. Would not hesitate to recommend.
man I enjoy my sushi from this publix more than any other ones, I am a huge sushi fan and sometimes when you are in a hurry or around the gables I would suggest you try it form this publix, it is real good. As far as the staff is very friendly and always looking to help
I LOVE THE EXTRAS !!!! I ALWAYS ORDER 1 TACO AND ADD AN EXTRA FLOUR TORT TO MAKE MY SELF ANOTHER !!! YYYAAAAYYYY !!!! 2 FOR 1 !!!
Shaddy Oaks has been boarding & grooming my dogs for over 9 years. I even call them before I call the vet on health issues. 6 years ago we adopted one of their dogs that came off the show circuit and he has turned out to be the greatest dog ever. My grand kids can do anything to that dog! They even share the dog toys! If you want to leave your dogs with folks that really know dogs and care about them this is the place.
None
They are clean, super fast, accommodate your schedule and their prices are super cheap!! The customer service is great and results are always perfect. My wax is done by Jeanie, she has been doing this for years and it is virtually pain free.
The folks at work ordered from here for my birthday lunch. The food was outstanding! I usually review based on service, and I can't speak to that this time around because I wasn't there. I had the pork belly sandwich and it was flavorful, great textures and delicious bread. Everyone else enjoyed their food as well.
Liked it
Five Valleys Landscaping did a really great job of our garden, drive and terrace area. I really liked their ideas and found them very professional and honest people to deal with. I wouldn't hesitate to recommend them for any scale of project and will be using them again in the future.
Williams has a great atmosphere and great food. I love the rice boxes and sandwiches and my son raves about the apple pie with ice cream. The staff go the extra mile. Thank you.
This was the best show that I have been to. If you want to laugh go to The Laughing Derby. Take my word for this. Ken
I have rented from Long & McQuade a few times for Zumba fundraisers. I have always had a great experience. The rental staff, I've often had Conan, are great. They take the time to explain how the equipment works and make sure that you have everything that you need. Renting a system from here is much cheaper than using an AV company. The only catch is that you are responsible for picking it up, setting it up and bringing it back. Will happily contine renting from them as long as I need any sound equipment. I've refered them to friends and other instructors multiple times.
None
They did a great job getting out my business cards! Best cards I ever had!
Deep dish is amazing and will put you asleep in no time... And the thin crust isn't too bad either.
Randy did an excellent job of selling me my ES 350 (3 of them). He is the quintessential professional car salesman. There was never any pressure to purchase. He explained all the features and benefits of the Lexus. The sales manager and him helped me purchase the Lexus at a fair competitive market price. Randy is always very friendly when I get my car serviced and washed and always asks me if he can do anything for me. He is definitely an asset to this dealership and why I return to buy my cars. Semper Fi Robert Nolen
I just received my safe today - everything went smoothly - ordering, delivery, communication. I could not be happier! I will recommend their safe to everyone I know!
We were impressed with what Envision had to offer and with a better price than the ADT which we already had. The rep. was very professional and very clear with presenting the information which we required. The switch over was very simple and the install went smoothly. There was a glitch when setting the perimeter, however it was corrected with the wireless system. So far we have been extremely satisfied even though it has only been a week. We really appreciate the 2 key fobs at no extra cost. ADT wanted almost a hundred dollars for the second fob. They charged us extra each month to have the cell phone number as a back up. Thank you envision for such good service and pricing.
Luca helped me out with my bathroom tile. I walked into the showroom and he led me through tons of styles and ideas.Turns out they had the oldtime classic octagon black and white mosaic I was looking for. His knowledge (about the tile material to things about the installation I should know) was impressive and satisfying. Aside from the tile, I was able to leave with bathroom accessory pieces for my sink and shower. All prices were reasonable. I will go back to Tiles Unlimited for any future jobs in my home. Thanks again Luca!
None
None
None
One of the best Bar on the way to Upper Assam at Mangaldai.
i was hesitant at first due to experiences at encounters, but the staff here made me feel welcome and gave me great tips on meeting new people. i had a very good time and i plan on returning as often as possible :) it gave me new insight to what the swinging life was all about. cant wait to fulfill my next fantasy and meet more people in the lifestyle, thank you club discretion's for giving me this amazing experience!
I love Zama Massage. I had a terrible back injury and, for a long time, their massages were the only things that would relieve the pain. I'm also a big fan of there serene and inviting space.
I have been working with Ark for several years and have closed many short sales with them. They are always thorough and communicate well. They really are a one stop shop for all of your short sale needs!
Best Margarita in the world in the lobby bar.
Boneless Chicken Biriyani + Lemon Chicken were awesome!. Definitely one of the best biriyanis in the city.
Carrie Tourney joining G M Peters has been the best thing for us. Carrie took the time to review our account, find another market, which resulted in saving us money.
Taking my laptop to the Laptop Shack was one of the best decisions I've made in terms of efficient, friendly and reasonably-priced computer help. What a wonderful company! My laptop was seriously infected and I thought I would be without a laptop for several weeks, at a great expense. Instead James worked very quickly, and within a week, and at an astonishingly low cost, I had what seems like a brand new laptop. And he did all of this with consummate professionalism, patience, and even good humor. I cannot recommend the Laptop Shack highly enough.
Extremely Satisfied! My "usual" housekeeper had cancelled on me last minute, two days, before my husband's 30th birthday party. Then my co-worker recommended Maria and they were able to come the next day and help clean up!!!! Maria was a LIFESAVER and now we are monthly customers. I have already recommended them to 5 other friends.
None
Great Place to take a corporate event...especially since they have a new Bar & Grill Opening up!
Muy buena seleccion de carnes y vinos. Muy recomendable.
It was difficult to find a studio that offered a mix of yoga, cardio and toning but I was so pleased when I finally came across Good Vibes. From the first moment I spoke with the receptionist to get set up on the 30 day trial to my first moments in class, it was always such a positive experience. The staff at Good Vibes are so welcoming (even first thing in the morning!) and the instructors are exceptionally trained in their field so you really get results. And classes are always different so you don't get bored of the same old routine. Working in Central London, I love having 2 studios in close proximity to choose from – it’s so nice to be able to escape the office for a lunchtime yoga, powerplates or spinning class. I feel Good Vibes work with their clients to create a schedule that works and are constantly adding other classes (and upgrading the studios) so we can get the best options. The online schedule and booking option is also very convenient and easy to use. I highly recommend Good Vibes!!
This school changed my career...Love this school..:))
I took my little 97 Toyota Corolla in to get the interior detailed, it's an old car that definitely needed a clean. And I was astonished with how good it looked afterwards! That car was a disaster on the interior, but once they were finished it looked like I just bought it brand new! And the customer service was top notch as well. Everything from the phone call to make the appointment to taking it home was absolutely perfect. The entire time I knew my car was in good hands. And it was all at a very affordable price. When I need to get my car detailed again, I'm definitely going back here. It's nice to know that there are still businesses out there that you can trust.
Great pool service... I had a weekend party I was throwing and they came out within 3 hours notice to help clean a whole bunch of debris from the top of my pool water. Seriously saved the day.
None
Reliable Private Institution. PSD sending their sponsored student to study here. Accepting international student
My family has been attending Clovis Hills for almost 2 1/2 years and we absolutely love this church. They have a very inviting and non-threatening atmosphere, which we really liked since we had not been to church in 20+ years. The spiritual growth that we have seen in our family over the last 2 1/2 years has been tremendous. Both pastors do an excellent job making the sermons light and relevant to todays issues/struggles. The worship band is absolutely amazing and energizes the entire congregation each week. The children's and youth ministries do a phenomenal job teach kids and teenagers biblical lessons as well as leading them through activities that make it enjoyable. This is a great church!
El lugar es fantástico y tienen una carta muy amplia. Tienen algunas mesas y un tatami maravilloso (es una pena que casi nadie lo utilice...) para poder deleitar sus tés verdes japoneses de Ippodo (muy buenos y de mucha calidad) y otras bebidas caseras. Para acompañar el té puedes pedir un daifuku, un chiffon cake o un Akashi Parfait. En verano recomiendo muchísimo el kakigori, refresca mucho y te deja como nuevo. También sirven menús que van de unos 8 a 16 euros, y todos consisten en un plato a escoger (onigiri, temaki, curry de ternera, donburi...) acompañado de una sopa de miso (en invierno, o un reimen en verano), ensalada de algas y té. También sirven cenas de tapeo, cervezas japonesas, cócteles con sake... El ambiente es muy tranquilo y agradable, puedes estudiar o leer tranquilamente.
These guys did an excellent job fixing the body work on my C6 Corvette. I was devastated when somebody backed into the car cracking the rear quarter panel. The repairs took longer than planned - Joe told me he was not happy with the first fix and sent the car back to have them do it again. The car came out looking perfect - couldn't tell anything had ever happened. Great customer service, highly recommended.
None
Ce centre de Bowling est un des meilleurs que je connaisse. L'ambiance est plus cool qu'ailleurs. Et plein de beaux gosses derrière le comptoir ;-)
Breakfast was wonderful with very attentive waiter named James. Excellent place.
Trato inmejorable, buen precio y cocina espectacular.
I have had the privilege of working with Rick at Skyline Graffix to design a website that suits our business. Rick has helped me every step of the way by making it very easy to navigate through this process. The final result is a beautifully custom designed website, with great visibility due to their help with increasing our organic search results. I would highly recommend Skyline Graffix to any business that wants an amazing website, and the visibility to increase their business by working with an extremely knowledgeable and professional company.
a great dealership
I've bought new place where I wanted to build a new house for my wife and me. I have called B & D Contractors Inc. and we've made the plan. They build up the house really fast and it looks really gorgeous. I really loved their work!
None
Spoke to Chad. He was succinct and well spoken. He set my mind at ease almost immediately
Wonderful, now a filming location for Top Gear
Anytime I Have A Problem With My Back Dr. Jones is The Answer! I Also Love The Once a Month Massage! I Reccomend Crossing Chiropactic as a Leader in Wellness! Barry N. McFall
It is exactly what I expect from Chinese delivery. They are fast, cheap, and the best compared to what is around, If you are looking for fancy Chinese food, then this is not what you are looking for. If you are looking for good Chinese delivery in Allen than take my advice and just stop looking and place your order. We normally order the lemon chicken as well as the cashew chicken, we are fans of the price, quality and quickness of delivery.
Love the staff and prices
I bought 2014 Nissan Rogue SV from AutoNation Nissan Miami and I haven't found any reason not to recommend this place for others. I worked with Ramon and Mr. YY as Finance Manager and both of them are always ready to help and clarify the questions I had/will have.
This place is really, really good. It's my favorite restaurant in Edmond.
I've been coming to Dr. Brakes on and off for the last 2 years or so. I've only gone to them for major service/maintenance and they never disappoint. Mike is always doing his best to inform, educate and equip consumers with better understanding of what needs to be done. He's not overly pushy like other service centers I've been to and always keeps me informed of any issues that arise. I would recommend Dr. Brakes to skeptics and anyone in need of service for their cars.
None
I've been to Paint Along several times and love it. I don't understand people who want to complain because they wanted the rules to change for them or expect a small business to make a policy change just for them. The lady that owns this studio is awesome and very funny. If anyone has a 'bad' experience it might be because they didn't get their way or special attention and NOT because of the studio itself. Try it and you'll see that this place is AWESOME!!!
BC Melt is lovely. Staff could be more interactive but sure, not everything can be perfect. Food is brilliant. Nice vibe from the place, the music, atmosphere and decor is very hipster, very nice and chilled.
One of our go to places to eat. Never disappointed.
Spectacular sorroundings with a pond, delicius meal. Fisherman's soup (or "halászlé") is the best worldwide. Moderate prices. Just try and U will agree.
Ist supergut für stammtisch! :p
Every time I come to Beijing, the first place I go to is Tims bbq. It is a little Tate of my Texas home. Try the brisket or my favorite the beef ribs. Good cold beer.
My favourite pub in the area. They serve lovely food that's not only delicious, but is amazingly served. Even having sausages and mash, which now I have had 3 times, they serve it with a small sprig of parsley. Overall an amazing pub, with lovely people,waitresses and waiters. If you are looking for a friendly pub for special occasions and a pint of lager, this is the place to go.
Was pleasantly surprised I was able to order not only a gluten-free pizza but also gluten-free pasta. Staff at Winflo Osteria is very understanding of cross contamination and gets their pizza dough from local producer Smart Flours. Service was excellent - sat at the bar for lunch and enjoyed a cool, quite atmosphere along with my lunch. Will be back to check out dinner, brunch & happy hour!
The best gift baskets in Plantation and Sunrise. Hand-dipped chocolates and handmade cake pops will make your family love you all year!
When I walked into Goodwill in Fridley I was greeted by happy employees! I walk into other store and no one seems to like their jobs. This Goodwill was like a breath of fresh air. Their clothes were name brand and in very good condition. I now shop there every Tuesday for their 1.49 color tag sale. I am proud to say ....my closet is now filled with beautiful name brand clothes in excellent condition! ...and I still have money in my pockets!!!!! Thank you Goodwill in Fridley!!!!!!
A perfect place to see... Never gonna miss it
Some time ago I brought my 14 year old son here after he had injured his foot during a soccer match. He was in serious pain and naturally my wife and I were very concerned. Fortunately, it turned out to be only a minor sprain, but I will never forget how attentive and personable the staff was. They managed to calm our fears and promptly took care of our son. Since then, we have continued to use the VHMA services when the need arises. We have always been very pleased with the treatment and I have never felt as though we were being hurried in-and-out. Their rates are also reasonable. I wouldn't hesitate to recommend them to anyone. Two thumbs up for a great little medical center!
Coming from South Africa, my wife and I were tired of the sity life of New York, LA and San Fran. So we chose to catch the bus to the Golden Gate Park. What a great choice. If i lived in San Francisco, this would be the place i would spend most weekends, either chilling by the many waterways, sleeping on the grass, or playing soccer with my team (i would have to make a team, but they didn't look too good, so that should be easy!). We took a walk through the park, all the way to the beach, which was around 5miles, but 5 great miles. If you are ever in San Francisco, best you take a weekend day to check it all out!\\oh, and there's a really cool Japanese Garden there too!
Najbolja pizza u gradu! :) Uvek najbolje prija posle napornog dana, a i između obroka. :) PanGea tours preporučuje Caribic.
I used to have my hair cut by Joe Mills at The Lounge Soho. It took me a long time to find a men's hairdresser in London who could do a flat-top properly. Luckily, a friend recommended Joe. He's been cutting my hair for several years now, and I cannot recommend him highly enough. The staff at his Barber and Hairdressing salon, Joe and Co, are as polite and welcoming as their colleagues at The Lounge, and the Soho location makes it easy to reach. Excellent!
Very very good
None
Si eseguono Riparazioni Tutte Marche di Auto-Moto e scooter , con diagnosi computerizzata.
I highly recommend MNL Architects for their knowledge, great service and expertise. Their work reflects an enduring commitment to sustainability and the belief that design is one of the most powerful strategic tools for securing lasting competitive advantage.
Really liked it, friendly people didn't mind about horses turning up.
哎呦～！這店家有心噎 有google map的在地商家了 哈哈 上次去偏頭痛瞬間解除！！真開心 呵 而且用的精油真的很棒很實在～～ 推推！！
Really great coffee. Super friendly service. My favourite in NYC.
Excellent customer service!! I bought my first car there - a Honda Civic. The car lasted me 10+ years, I only traded it because I wanted something newer! Anthony gave me an excellent deal and took care of me every step of the way. Great cars, great customer service, HONEST salesmen!
Absolutely awesome doctor, and I don't say this lightly. I have been to many eye doctors over the years, and this is the first time I've actually been fitted with the correct contact lens and can see wonderfully with them! I adore Dr. Dornic, and all of his staff is very kind, courteous and helpful. I could not be happier all the way around, and don't know what I will do when we have to leave this area. Don't believe all the hype on the commericals from other doctors in this area, Dr Dornic is an amazing doctor, and in my opinion, and based on everything I've heard from others who have gone to other eye offices, he IS the best eye practitioner in the Raleigh, Durham, Cary area.
We liked the experience at Morrie's Hyundai so much, we bought two cars! After doing our research for new cars (especially Consumer Reports), it looked like Hyundai was really going out of its way to make an excellent car at a good price. Based on a positive referral from a family member who purchased a car here last year, we dropped in to Morrie's Hyundai on 394 to test drive a new car. We started working with award-winning salesperson Steve Cherches, and he made the experience very pleasant and enjoyable. He's a straight-shooter with a good sense of humor, and he really worked as a champion for us in securing a hard-to-find Sonata! When you make a big purchase like buying a new car, you want to have fun while doing it. Steve very much made this a good time, and his availability by phone or text message really was appreciated. Every one from the sales, service and business teams worked hard to help us as well - and we recommend Morrie's on 394 to all of our friends who are looking for new cars. We ultimately bought an Elantra and a Sonata and are very happy with our purchases! We know that we got a lot of car for our money, and the service and support we received through the buying process was fantastic!
None
Only time I've had to wait on my food was when it was really crowded and the cooks couldn't keep up with the orders. I've never seen this place dirty, have lousy help, or bad food. They have the largest selection of Tequilas in St. Louis or anywhere I know of in the states. Just looking at and reading the different brands of tequila thats displayed are a reason to stop by in itself.
Great people and great space and get drinks
None
None
Taqueria Mexico is, by far, the best mexican restaurant I have ever been to (that's out of atleast five states). The food is well priced, authentic, and DELICIOUS. The restaurant serves three different types of salsa with every meal (all delicious and made in-house). The servers are friendly and can customize/ add-on to meals easily. My husband and I have been eating here on a monthly (more often, weekly) basis for the past 3 years, and we have never (seriously, never) been disappointed. 2 thumbs up, 5 stars, 10/10 whatevers. Hungry for Mexican, GO HERE!
I have ate at several restaurants and haven't found a single one I didn't enjoy. The Indian restaurant is my husbands favorite, it is a large tasty amount of food for your money.
my experience is too good.... i go there with my friends....i enjoy a lot.... there i saw a reconstructed bed room of mahatma gandhi ji...we see how they live.... and the library is soo good it ha two section 1st section books about gandhi ji and 2nd section books are about other matter...tere a lot of painting and personal itemof gandhi ji..it's too god....it gave me a new experience.... according to me people should go there...
I had to mail (2) oversized checks and was concerned that they would break. Jacob helped me out and took care of everything. He recommended how I should package it the most cost effective and safe way. Both guys were great (the one with the hope tattoo on his arm), greeted me when i walked in and were super friendly/helpful!
Echt coole location um Weine zu trinken, zu kosten und um sich über italienische Spitzenweine beraten zu lassen. Service ist echt klasse, man kann auch gut essen. Wenn man richtig gute Weine kosten und probieren will dann kann man die location nur empfehlen.
Awesome job. Exactaly what I was looking for in a dentist.
Logan, Josh and the entire crew at AP Precision went above and beyond to meet the tough quality requirements of my enclosure design and production. I can be very demanding when it comes to the fine details, but they recognized and respected my specific needs and took the extra measures necessary to guarantee a beautiful finished product. Their powder coating is better than most dedicated finish shops and the prices are reasonable. Thanks guys.
I was very pleased with my first impression from a phone conversation when I called to set up an estimate for a new heat pump and air conditioner. The secretary was very personable and efficient. I was blown away by Brian, the the technician who originally came to my house. He was very informative, friendly and patient while explaining the how AC and heating work and showing me all of my options. He also let me borrow a portable AC until installation day. I decided to purchase a new system because I felt sure that I could depend on and trust this company. They arrived bright and early the day they had scheduled and worked non-stop to get us up and running. They were very professional and helpful throught the whole process and I will use them for any other issues in the future.
Great cuts, quick and easy parking and access. Excellent experienced staff who know what they are doing! Awesome hairdressers and even do piercings!
None
My wife and I stayed here for our anniversary. I called in my reservation and had advised the person that we would be in town to calibrate. I asked for a view of the river walk and I was advised no problem. When we arrived I was advised that our room had been upgraded at no cost to a room with a terrace with the river. We went for a walk and when we returned to our room we were given a bottle of wine and some fresh strawberry. This hotel works hard to make sure your stay in great. The staff was friendly. The hotel was very clean. The food at the 5:30 kick back was good the free drinks where even better. The hot breakfast was also good. They are also military friendly as well. From this point forward I will only stay at Drury if it is an option.
None
Bill Kidd’s Volvo Service is a class act from start to finish. I like the capability to set up a service online; to be able to add a comment on that online service request to clarify my particular concerns and requests is a significant plus. The website capability is great. Dean Marino is an outstanding service representative. He is knowledgeable, thoroughly professional and has a great personality to deal with customers. Bill Kidd's Volvo service has a great asset in Dean. I like the fact that the service done on my vehicle was not just limited to what the manual says, but the technician did a thorough inspection of my vehicle, reported the inspection results to Dean and then Dean made recommendations to me on what should done. I am confident that the work recommended was necessary; I didn't feel undue pressure to agree to the recommendations and felt free to say no to anything I did not want done. Bill Kidd’s performed the service in the time promised, the loaner car process was effortless and convenient and the vehicle operates 100% following the service. I would definitely recommend Bill Kidd’s Volvo Service to anyone.
Decent, nice management, never hear the neighbors. Maintenance is fast. My second time living here... Lived here when I first started out on my own. They are kinda small though, but they take most pets.
Had a full detailing done with a living social coupon and the car looks like I just bought it. Considering how dirty the car was after weekends beach camping and moving, I was impressed at how good the interior looked. So glad I finally did this.
I've always been happy with the service that I have received from Basil Toyota.
Its great food at a really low price!
None
None
Absolutely breathtaking! Such a beautiful and quite place in Moscow! Will definitely visit again! Highly recommended!
None
Nice place, only here until we purchase a home.
Awesome....
Rented an apartment a few blocks from this place, and decided to try it out for lunch. The sushi was fresh and delicious, and felt a little more authentic / traditional than normal strip mall sushi tracks. However this track in particular is pretty neat as the plates come by way of an actual Train on tracks! The plates were on the cheap ranging from the usual $1 to $3, I got out of there for under 10 bucks. Try the tempura snapper and calamari. I will return!
The "Best Bar in Natal 2012"Always great music, beautiful people, very chic people of Natal,reasonable high end place.Its like a "you are where you go"! type of place. very popular amongst the more established people here.A Must when in Natal! !
None
None
Good place to unwind!
None
Brandi Sailers is awesome! The absolute best stylist around with color and cut.
Mucha variedad en parafarmacia y muy buena atención. Se preocupan por ti.
A staff member at the Cactus USPS location went out of his way to see I received a package that I was having issues with. Many thanks! A very happy customer.
I'm so happy to have found the team at Parkway Wellness Center. I first found it after coming to see Ashley for a massage (which was great!) I've always had pervasive lower back problems on and off since I've done construction for over 20 years. I decided to check out the chiro here and I'm so glad I did! I've seen probably 5 different chiros over the last 15 years always with relief. But this was the first time I actually felt like we were getting to the problem. I met with Dr Joe and he talked with and did some testing, then we took xrays. Only the 2nd time I've ever gotten xrays for my chronic low back pain and I've seen quite a few doctors about it. Dr Joe sat down and showed me the xrays. I could see where the irregularities were and some arthritis I have developed. He also explained to me how we could stop the process and get me feeling better for the long term. I am very impressed with the whole process here and I'm excited to be involved in regular care to take care of my back and my health so I can work another 20 years or more if I so choose.
Five Star Catering ROCKS! They made my event look SO elegant and everyone loved the food so much! The chef obviously prepared everything fresh! Our whole party was very happy with the presentation and the taste of the food. Thank you Five Star Catering!
I can't begin to express how happy I am with Critter Caretakers! Dawn and Christine took the time to come over and meet my cats and thoroughly explain their policies before I left on vacation. My cats can be very finicky about strangers, especially my Maine Coon. I've had cat sitters who said they never saw him the entire time they came in and only knew he was eating because his food always disappeared. But he and my other cat came right out to meet Dawn and Christine and made friends with them from the start. I was gone 11days and Christine and Dawn took turns sending me daily emails with pictures of my kitties. Such contact is tremendously reassuring when you are away from the pets you love. In addition to simply feeding and cleaning litter boxes, they took time to play with my kitties and also left detailed daily notes summarizing each of their visits. I think Clio (my tabby) has spent the morning today looking for Dawn and wondering why she hasn't come to play. (Apparently my "play" attempts don't measure up. LOL!) Thank you, Critter Caretakers! You are my "go to" pet sitters from here on out.
None
Absolutely phenomenal. One of the best shopping experiences I have had. The person who I was dealing with was very respectful and kind. Her name was Alex and I plan on doing business with them and her again in the near future. I highly recommend them!
The first time I went to visit was a thursday night- ladies night. I was actually very impressed by the ambiance. I wasn't expecting a restaurant that nice to have free drinks for ladies. I went with one of my girlfriends, sat at the bar and ordered some tapas. I had a cheese montadito, which was so good I had to order another one. The bartenders were very friendly, easy to talk to and gave me some recommendations on what they thought was best
Excellent service on two occasions. First, Lauren in customer service was exremely helpful with an ipod exchange, very pleasant. 2nd, I spoke with a gentleman for about 20 minutes and asked him tech/networking questions that he very professionally answered.... cust service was great!!
This is our #1 tambayan with my boys because the place is very laid back and we love lounging there. The internet is also blazing fast. The drinks are GREAT!
I have ordered 2 cakes already and they are to die for!!! Everyone at my parties wanted more and more. Thanks Gladis!!
Can't say enough good things about Dee Weaver and the team at C2C Resources. They led me through the process step by step and got results! I value their professionalism, thoroughness and expert efficiency.
None
I have been affiliated with Little Big Pluming for around 5 years. Their dedication to craftmanship and professionalisim is beyond comare. They truly live up to their name satisfying customers with Bigjobs for Little compensation, Affording me multiple Solar Energy and Renewable Energy Invsetment tax credits and deals. Thank you for your dedication and service, Your company does the plumbing community proud. Patrick J Vollmer CEO-Custom Buisness Solutions
I have never purchased a car through a dealer before and Chris made me feel right at home. I had ZERO issues and had a car within two simple visits. I expected to leave with a basic car but I did not expect to drive away in a practically new car with under 10,000 miles on it!! Thank you!! I love my car and know it will last me a long time :)
None
None
None
Awesome Awesome Awesome!
We were impressed with Micah's facility at Davis Paintball Center and his dedication to what he has created. We also want to thank him for his extremely generous donation to our son's preschool auction.
These guys have everything you could ever even hope to need. Terrific service, too. And Jenny's quilting tutorials on YouTube are awesome!
Awesome beer, food, presentation, hospitality, and prices!
Hello. Daniel Bridgman represented me in my social security case. As is the case, I was turned down by the government at the first stage. I had prepared extensively for this journey, but knew at this point I needed an experienced attorney to handle this. I searched long and hard, having already been forewarned about becoming a number with most of the advertised television attorney's. I didn't want to be a number...and I wasn't. Mr. Bridgman met with me at the first appointment and was with me throughout the case and into the administrative hearing. He was always available to answer any and every question I had and even called me out of the blue just to update me on my status. I highly recommend Mr. Bridgman and his firm and am certain that he will do his best to win your case. He won mine!!
None
Разумни срокове и цени.
None
Staff is always very friendly and polite. I started going here because the location was convenient...but I've stuck around because I really like the people who work in the office. I also really like that they notify you of openings for cleanings in case you want to visit on a non-scheduled time.
Excellent park for camping and beach. You will not be disappointed.
I've been dinning here off and on for several years now, and I really love it. I love their breakfast the best. I always get the The Wild Fork Hash. Its the best in my opinion. They are always friendly, and nice. The food is amazing, and I come here as often as I can. I love the fact that's its in Utica Square!!! I would high recommend this place. The atmosphere is elegant, and the wall art is unique to view as you wait on your food or it makes great conversation starters. I've also been for happy and I liked their drinks as well, but The Wild Fork Hash is so good and filling. Its such a classy place in fashionable Utica Square!!!!
None
Super korrekte, freundliche und motivierte Mitarbeiter. Sehr flexibel. Jederzeit wieder!
Called at 8:30 am and my door was fixed before lunch. Great service, nice guy, reasonable price. I highly recommend Bryan's services.
Called on a Saturday morning and someone arrived about two hours later, in the middle of the time window quoted on the phone. The whole job took about 40 minutes; technician was nice and did a very conscientious job on both installation and cleanup. Very thoroughly vacuumed the interior and took the time to reassure my girlfriend about superficial damage to the door frame, which she appreciated. Would definitely recommend these guys. FYI $230 total to replace driver-side power window in a Subaru.
This is a very nice and cute hotel to stay at if you are on a budget or not. The room was very nice and clean. I purchased the room for a in town getaway. It was perfect. I would recommend anyone to stay here..
Great espresso and espresso based drinks! Sandwiches are amazing too!
A Melbourne icon. This cinema preserves the spirit of this art. My favourite.
Outstanding. I went in to Frisco Eye Clinic three days ago for the first time for an eye appointment with Dr. Buthod and I have to say: This man is a wizard. I went in for a routine visit expecting an ordinary appointment with a typical blank-faced doctor. The experience of having lenses selected was, however, nothing short of inspiring. In the space of two or three minutes, it felt like we went through hundreds of lenses as he honed in on a lens that might improve my vision, every time, his assessment becoming finer and finer, and with every manner and hallmark you might expect from a person of the very finest training and skill possible, which he had. My vision turned out to be pretty good, but since I was there, we decided to see if he could improve it anyway, which of course he did. The lenses he found were actually a remarkable improvement, and equipped me with vision that seemed impossible to me as I switched back and forth between the machine and my ordinary vision to make sure it wasn't some sort of illusion. In addition to his skill, this doctor had the moral character and integrity on top of it to point out without pretense that glasses for me from this store were in no way a necessary purchase, my vision being good enough without them. I decided to get them anyways, being much cheaper for me to buy now in case I might need them more down the road thanks to my insurance which is soon to expire. In choosing frames, I was also pleasantly surprised and impressed by the services of Jason Crump, the optician, who had helped me to pick out a frame that suited my facial structure and style. This was also no ordinary experience: he did not once try to suggest a frame simply because it was more expensive, but instead suggested several frames at various prices and makers to suit my taste and features. On top of this, when I came back to purchase them, and he was not present, when one of the salespeople there came up with a higher overall figure for the price, and I inquired about the price he had quoted, he called back the very next morning to honor the quote he had given a few days before. This is why I am giving a review at a full five stars: in an era where dubious pricing schemes and cheap two-bit salespeople are commonplace in the healthcare industry, the people at Frisco Eye Clinic defied what is becoming the unfortunate stereotype of the healthcare industry with the incredible quality of their service, and the care and attention to detail with which they ensure the considerable quality of their products.
Went here for a Liverpool game and breakfast on a Saturday morning. Food is great. Drinks are great. Bartender Poz is the real deal.
None
L
Our Car Wash metal pit grates were getting stolen for scrap. We talked to AMD and installed their grating. It works and looks great! No more stolen grates! Thanks AMD! - Kirstin at A-1 High Pressure
None
This place is perfect for busy people and people that know what they want. I am in the same business just Motorcycles not cars and Solomon Palacci my sales person was a pleasure to deal with.He found exactly what I wanted and everything went so smooth.They delivered right to my job.I will recommend Legend Leasing and Solomon Palacci to everyone i know.. Thanks for the great experience. We love our G25X .. Dave & Liz
None
My mother and I spent 5 nights and 6 days in Ann Arbor at the Ann Arbor Bed and Breakfast, it was truly a wonderful experience. Each breakfast was exquisite, and lots of choices. The hospitality could not have been better. Our room was very comfortable we had a queen bed and a desk and two chairs which worked our perfectly for us. The bed and breakfast has lots of charm and distinction, and a wonderful patio/deck that was very relaxing and comfortable. I would highly recommend it
test
I'm visiting from out-of-town and had a little time to kill, so I went to this shop. I'm completely new to serious cycling, and they answered every question I had. I think the guy helping me was named Jason. He knew I was visiting and wouldn't be a likely sale, but he still answered every question I had and helped size a bike for me. It was a wonderful experience and I recommend this shop to anyone new to cycling. I'm glad there are still pleasant businesses like this one. I will definitely keep them in mind when it's time to make a purchase. I don't live too far away to come back for friendly service.
Hele leuke webshop! Snelle levering, betrouwbaar en leuke items!
They came out promptly after my phone call. The 18 point inspection turned up problems with my home that will help reduce my utility bills. The staff Frank Benaderet and Mark Meyers really knew where to look and suggested remedies to each issue they discovered. They were a joy to work with. We decided to do a few of the upgrades that they suggested. The work was completed on time and for a fair price. These guys are great!!
They have the awesomest burgers ever you have to go there its awesome and yummy
Killer food ($6.50 for a massive plate of food, beer on tap (local breweries of course) and super friendly staff. Give this place a visit anytime you are down/up/over here!
Absolutely amazing service and well priced. I was in and out with a brand new car in a matter of Maybe 3 hours and there was no hassle whatsoever and they even gave me a more than generous trade in value on my old junker and I didn't have to put any money down at all. Got a great rate and my payments will be a drop in the bucket. I went in with a car I thought I might die in and walked out with one I can rely on and enjoy driving. The salesman Chris Jones and all of his co workers were all very knowledgeable and courteous. They worked me out a nice deal on a convertible Fiat which was used but in near perfect condition. Got rid of my tired beat up '91 Honda accord in the process. Overall very satisfied and will be recommending this place to everyone wanting a new car. You have a customer for life!
Charles Wiles was awesome at his job. Even though I came there with my mind set on a smaller car I left with a larger one it great I really just wanted something to drive that was safe and dependable and of course easy one gas. Charles found me a car that was just right for me I love everything about my new car. Truly the business at Don Marshall's is Extraordinary!!!! Also Jim Brink helped me as well with the financing of my car. Plus he a Cardinal fan he always be a good man in my book!!!!!
After a long and exhaustive search for a new vehicle I finally purchased a brand new Mitsubishi Outlander Sport. It’s a cute little SUV but is filled with safety features and tons of basic features that were part of the base model. It’s loaded with everything from Bluetooth to an inside temperature display and all for less than $17K. The best part is that I got a bumper to bumper 100,000 mile warranty and a 5 year Roadside Assistance Service!! When they told me that, I was sold. Plus, they helped me with the financing challenge of being upside down in what I owed on my old vehicle. So, a big Thank You to RC Hill Mitsubishi, especially Jeff and Bob for being so helpful!!
You don't often get a guy who will take the time to explain everything, what is wrong what has to be done, what if it doesn't work, what else should you do - and this guy did. He took the time, did a thorough job, took the time to clean up, explained what to watch for - what signs would mean trouble. I would use him again if the need ever arises.
Amazing. That is all.
None
My favorite spot to get a haircut. They are always warm and welcoming. And they do a bang up job as well.
None
We love this school. We had the kids at Creme de la Creme for a long time, and recently made the switch. Goddard is a much more calm, engaging, and learning environment. The teachers are fantastic, the owners are helpful, and most importantly, our kids love to be there. I recommend this school to all of my friends and family!
This place is reminiscent of a storybook Vermont Inn- the interior architecture features exposed wood beams, fireplaces in almost every room, and lots of comfortable places to sit while you work on jigsaw puzzles or after you come in from a long snowshoe through the woods. The owner and his wife greeted us and made us feel very welcome from the moment we stepped through the door. We ate at the restaurant/tavern and that evening's live classical guitar music accentuated the already lovely ambiance created by the festive holiday decor. The Maine mussel appetizer was epic, libations were classic but innovative (good selection of local craft beers and quality wines) and overall, the dinner menu provided a little something for everyone- epicureans, vegetarians, carnivores and regular folk will all be pleased. Prices are on par with restaurants that serve high quality food- free range, organic & local are prevalent ingredients. The waiter was absolutely terrific- attentive, knowledgeable, and friendly. We didn't stay at the Inn, but if we were tourists coming to ski at Okemo- we would highly recommend checking this place out.
Fantastic selection of beer. Friendly and helpful staff. The yam fries are good, but the regular fries are great. Try the Staggering Pig.
If you are planning to visit Nepal for trekking and any other adventurous activities such as Expedition, Peak Climbing, rafting, bird-watching and many more, then Osho World Adventure will be best travel agency to organized your tips. I am recommending it because the Owner Deepak can arrange any type of tour program especially those who are looking for budget travel package....
Just found the place by chance. The six course menu was a real revelation. Definitely worth a visit. Although we instantly got a table, a reservation is a good idea.
What an incredible experience! Before visiting mattresses & more, I visited the other mattress stores in my area just to find the mattress specialist either not knowing about there product OR not caring enough to match my needs to a specific mattress. At Mattresses & More, you will receive friendly service and they KNOW everything when it comes to a mattress. I told them I needed a mattress that would help with my back pain, I wanted a mattress that when I wake up, I feel refreshed & with their help, I'm having the best sleep! Because they offer same day delivery, I was able to sleep in my new mattress that night! Thank you Mattresses & More! So glad I found you!
Best ice cream parlor I have ever been into.
None
None
If there were a club for “Insurance for Dummies” I would be a charter member. I easily get confused with all the options that are available. Teresa and her staff have always been readily available and more than patient with all of my questions to make sure I understand what insurance I need and how it will benefit me. Thank you Teresa for making me feel “insurance smart”
Cold beer great people!
Ian and the staff of My Expert PC are running a well structured and knowledgable establishment. Fast and very efficient service are exactly what is needed in today's technology age which is exactly what My Expert PC delivers. What started out as me searching for a IPhone solution has turned into the team at My Expert PC to start developing websites for me. Clearly a one stop shop for all computing needs.
This is the second year in a row we have had Sarah's Pony Rides come out to our Rett Syndrome Association of Illinois annual picnic. They arrive ahead of time and do a great job working with our kids and young adults with Rett Syndrome. We are going to have them come back again in 2014. Everyone loves the staff and the pony rides. I highly recommend them.
Thank you, Phyliss! Your Raspberry Cheesecake is the best we have had in our entire lives!! Sincerely. Mary E Page (violinist) and Bob Meyer.
I use their service 2 or 3 times a year and they have never let me down! Always timely, courteous and quick! I also have recommended the service to several colleagues that are as pleased as I am!
My absolute favorite beer store in the area. I have begun making this a weekly pilgrimage. Great beer good prices and GROWLERS!
Friendly and professional. And on top of all that they work on every type of system. Even oil and water basted heat.
Went in to just look for a new car. Glenn was my salesman and did a great job not making me feel pressured or rushed. Spent a lot of time with me and finally decided on a 2013 Escape. Highly recommended! I will be asking for Glenn for all my future cars!
Un moment privilégié pour les gourmands et les gourmets.
Great food
The quality of our trade show products and brochures were amazing! IMS provided excellent products and offered very helpful suggestions to compliment our overall display. JJ and the team are extremely professional and were able to help me with some tricky color corrections. Taking the time to confirm my color choices (from web to print) and ensure they were exactly what i wanted solidified that I will go nowhere else for my print work and signs. Great prices, great products, great customer service!
I bought a 1999 Jaguar XK8 convertible from Rosenthal Land Rover/Jaguar this week. Walking into a luxury car dealership (without a million dollar bank account balance) was not something I ever planned to do but the experience was not at all what I expected. Our salesman, Craig Faunce, was extremely helpful, genuinely friendly and applied absolutely zero pressure while we were looking over the car. The sales process was very quick and easy taking maybe 45 minutes. Craig took plenty of time explaining the features of the car and offering advice as to maintenance and care both before and after the sale. Whether you are looking for a brand new Jag or a great deal on a used one don't skip this dealership - and ask for Craig Faunce when you get there.
None
Ottima pizza, buon servizio, asporto veloce!
come here every time we go to Hot Springs love the place!
Love them, their pedicures are clean, well-priced and really well done. They take care of any nail issues and give great, not short foot and leg massages. I choose to go here as often as I can!
You can't help but be drawn in to this shop by the awesome aromas wafting out its doors. The selection is absolutely fantastic and the Quiche is to die for. The staff is super friendly and always ready to recommend a great bite if you get stuck with your choice.
Had a pump go out on my spa recently. Tom and his crew were able to get me a refurbished pump at a great price. Everything got set up and placed in the spa but for some reason it still did not work. Carefree sent someone to the house who discovered what the problem was, cleaned up the work and fixed it. The problem was a result of mis-wiring and the work was done at no additional charge to me. My wife and I were very grateful for the quality and timeliness of the work and are thrilled to have the hot tub back in working order. Thank you Carefree Spas
I bought my 2000 Saab 9-3 from Good Used Cars Inc in 2009. The service was great, and I have been so happy with my car ever since. I recommend this place to all my friends and family and know that several have gone there as well!
Asesoramiento y seguimiento gratuito! Los Productos de Herbalife son Fantásticos! Controla tu peso, mejora tu nutrición, tu bienestar, tu energía y ten una vida mas saludable aprendiendo a cuidarte de forma natural!! Oportunidad de negocio. Distribuidor Independiente Herbalife en Madrid - TEL: 633 138 432
Amazing Experience! The gentleman that helped me was extremely polite and well mannered. Always said "Yes Sir" and "Thank You Sir". Somethings you don't hear everyday. Anyways their Food is beyond anything you would eat at any other Pho restaurant. If you're in the Downtown area stop by here, you wont be disappointed!
None
Received a voucher as a birthday present, just after my new puppy Blink came into my life, and was so pleased to see it was for Brighton Dog Photography. Had some amazing shots of my German Shepherds and Collie previously and was really looking forward to seeing how Rhian would capture Blink. Again was over the moon with the shoot, so much time and effort taken to ensure we had some great shots, and preserved some of the puppy memories i have with Blink. AMAZING AMAZING AMAZING
ik heb er zelf mogen werken. met erg veel plezier. maar t buitenland lonkte
None
Lots of variety with great vintage pieces and selected pieces from local artists.
Just bought a piano through Mike for one of my tuning clients and am very happy with price, the quality of the piano, and just the overall way Mike represented himself. An excellent man to do business with!
I brought a pair of badly warn shoes here and they did a great job with them. They went from basically unwearable to looking almost like new.
None
My new husband and I had the great pleasure to have Mark be our photographer for our wedding. We chose Mark because his pictures were amazing and made the other wedding photographers look mediocre in comparison. We knew he was the one for us and we were not disappointed by any means. Mark and team did whatever they could to work with us and accommodate what we needed and wanted. We opted out of having engagement pictures done and instead did a Trash the Dress session which was more fun then we could have imagined. Mark's excitement for it only made the experience better for us because it made us more excited seeing how much he was getting into it. I highly recommend Mark to anyone who really wants their wedding story told in an amazing and beautiful way. We have fabulous pictures now to be able to cherish our wedding for years to come. You will not be disappointed if you choose Mark and team.
I had some legal issues in Philadelphia when I moved from Los Angeles. I was new to the city and needed legal representation. My main concern was finding a lawyer who not only knew a lot about their field but was also one I can trust and depend on to have my best interest in mind. I was nervous at first, but after deciding to go with the lawyers at the Law Office of Douglas P. Earl I have absolutely no regrets. I had a successful outcome for my case and they were very dependable.
love the color
INFOFIT has been more than a wonderful experience for me! 10 years ago I became a single parent and was working full time. I knew I needed to further my education to support my kids! INFOFIT provided the perfect opportunity for my situation. I could go to school on weekends and do my apprenticeship program at my own pace. Today I am a very successful trainer with a full time career in an industry that I love! I am able to provide for my family and be happy doing it! Thanks INFOFIT for being there for me and being such a huge part of my awesome career! You guys are the best!
None
None
Graceful dining at the laid back price for journeying, with stellar reputation characteristic of their Unbelievable Canadian charm.
I couldn't ask for better! I've been to 3 different dentists in the last 2 years after mine retired, and Dr. Davis is by far the best! His attention to detail with my front fillings have me smiling like I have brand new teeth :D The staff is not only friendly, but genuinely nice as well. I highly recommend, and have already been telling everyone I know to go see Dr. Davis. A+++!
I just bought my 2013 Honda Civic at RWH. By far the best experience I have ever had buying a car. I dealt with Jimbo Aycock. He was beyond great, honest, and I felt very respected as the car buyer. I had an excellent experience and would highly recommend Rusty Wallace Honda to any of my friends and family.
Come here if you wanna eat the original pizza from Napoli. I'm from Napoli and I must admit that the pizza I ate here is possibly better than so many pizza you can eat in Naples itself. If I'm not wrong the owner of this pizzeria is from Salerno, near Napoli. The charcoal oven gives this pizza an incredible taste and consistency. I ate here in April 2008.
Yêu trg hihi <3
We went there twice during our weeks stay in Malta, and on both nights we had the widow soup. Set menu was great value, tuna salad was nice. Food portions were big even though I went for small. Good and friendly service. Overall a pleasant experience.
Отличный отель для любителей спокойного отдыха. Шикарные завтраки и ужины (мы не обедали), прекрасный пляж (по сравнению с соседними), хороший бассейн, вокруг тихо, но до города совсем недалеко.
Everytime My Husband And I go here, We always leave knowing that we have had a great meal. Love the food, and the people are very nice. There are times, we can not finish our food, but that is rare. If you want great food, and a fair price. Try Moe's Southwest Grill.
Its helps me
Just excellent
My 4yr old has gone to Starlight since they opened in the fall 2008. I have been very pleased. The Staff & Teachers are all very friendly and all know my family by name. They even help me with some of the behavioral problems that I was having with my son when his baby brother was born. Plus you can't beat their affordable pricing for care.
Jay Lee's Honda of Sumner is the place to go for great new cars and excellent customer service. Our salesman, Soloman, was very knowledgeable about the Honda Accord and took a lot of extra time before we left to program our phone to the bluetooth and set all the other settings to our liking. From the moment we walked in the door, we felt the difference! Everyone was extremely friendly and helpful! We will definitely go back next time we are in the market for a new car.
I had Leaf and Limb come to my own home to remove a few trees, including a large one right up against my house, do some selective limbing and then grind out the stumps. I have a lot of time, energy and money invested in my landscaping and was impressed with their work. The left the job site clean and neat and were responsive to my concerns. I recommend them highly.
great place to buy a vehicle very nice and the sales people aren't pushy
Excellent service ...
After reading a number of horror stories around laser hair removal treatment, I was thrilled when a friend referred me to NuVision. The staff is profession and friendly and the environment is very neat and clean. Now in my fifth month, I have experienced great results.
Has always been one of favorite places to eat! Food is always great!
My family and I have been taking out vehicles to Hawkwood Auto for 17+ years, and have never once had a bad experience. The work is quick, the service is always pleasant and helpful, and the pricing is reasonable. I wish I would rate higher!
My life was going on a downward i did not what to do i received a letter in mail when i got there i felt really relieved they are very nice people i think i made the best choice i highly recommend lee law firm
None
I only eat at the Great Wall Chinese Restaurant in Latrobe. The food is excellent and I have been going there for years. I highly recommend it to any one.
Very good salads and Tofu products.
None
Friendly atmosphere, knowledgable help!
Great service! Great staff! Great job! 100% satisfied and happy! They go the extra mile to make their customers happy, and I am. Thanks, Robert and team!
didn't have to wait at all, staff was super friendly and helpful, i came in with pneumonia, i recieved a shot, xray and nebulizer treatment within 20 min of arrival, and and i felt better within just a day. they had all medications on site, so i didn't even have to go to walgreens. fantastic experience.
I've been bringing my cars (one classic Italian sports car, one Toyota Prius) to Barry at Black Bear for the past four years, and I've never been disappointed with the work done there. If I need him to diagnose a problem, Barry will call me in a few hours and explain it to me in plain English, and what my options are. His prices are very reasonable and the work is done quickly. I can't recommend him highly enough.
Good, I'm ordering today.
Best beer selection in Orlando hands down! If you are a craft beer lover this is the place!
I came here w/kids they love it sanwich the best
Vapor lounge is awesome! The people who work there are always friendly and nice and the prices and promotions are always great!
None
Excellent!! He was quick to return my call and worked efficiently for a great price. Thankful for hard working local business owners like this one. I now have his number saved in my phone for any electrical issues that may come up!
None
I turned my ac on for the first time this week. Its been pretty mild weather and what do you know it wouldn't cool my house. I looked around online found this company WeatherGuard. There price for the service call seemed right and the cost of the repairs was even better. It turned out we just had a burnt wire he said because we didn't have the coils cleaned regularly. Something to do with pressures causing the wires to burn. I don't understand all the technical details but they explained it in a way that it made sense. When it was all said and done i paid a lot less then i expected the AC is blowing nice and cold. Great work. I would highly recommend there services
None
Dont Let this little taco stand fool you.....its packed with big taste and flavor. My daughter used to hate re-fried beans....now she loves them....everything here is MMMMmmmm good and delicious!!!! Its not just a good idea if you come try this spot out.....its a bad idea if you don't :)
great food, awesome service
I stayed here with my Grand daughter to attend a Play at the Berkeley Play House. This was my second time staying in Berkeley previously stayed at the Quality Inn. This I believe will be my first choice on future visits. Rate was reasonable the room was very clean and comfortable. This is a good choice.
Dr. Joe Boggs knows how to listen to your needs and treat your whole body, not just the symptoms. He is a wonderful chiropractor.
Excelente Universidade, excelente campus, com boa localização e bem administrada, contando com biblioteca atualizada, sobretudo da Faculdade de Direito. Recomendo a qualquer um que queira ser um bom Advogado.
I had some issues with a ceiling fan in which the light stopped working one day. After taking it apart I didn't quite understand what the problem was. I called them to ask for advice and replacement parts. They were helpful over the phone and even more so when I came in. Their advice was solid and they were friendly. I wouldn't hesitate to ask for advice or buy parts from here again.
We had a blast on Viking - (we are about 60 yrs old). We opted for the Danube Waltz. It was sort of "spur of the moment" - just a few months off. Viking gave us options to control our air flight (for a little extra charge) and to add on a tour at the beginning or end of our cruise. We did that. We added a trip to Prague. The cruise was really interesting as were the other 142 folks on the ship. We got to know a lot of them as we had so much time, tours, and meals together. I thought the tours were fabulous. And they were included in the price, so that was easy. I took a ton of great photos that helped me re-live this trip over and over, and wish for more. We'd done ocean cruises to Europe before, and loved the experience, but this way we saw much more, and at a better price. Sure there were some bumps in expectations due to low water in the Danube, but Viking more than made up for it; they take the best care of their clients and I strongly recommend them.
None
None
None
Festivals sympas, bonne ambiance, bon son, et la sécurité au top.
I was a patient at Back In Motion recently and I must say that the service I received there was superb. The staff were friendly, welcoming, and answered any question that I had. The therapist was very knowledgeable and dedicated to patient care and improvement. I would highly recommend Back In Motion Physical Therapy!!!!!!
None
The Doctors and Staff are professional and personable. The office is outstanding at contact and communication. Appointment times have always been met within a nominal margin of error. The office environment is comfortable, including above chair televisions with cable programming. I would definitely reccommend this office to anyone looking for a positive Dental experience.
Scott Harman began cleaning carpets for our(Legerity Property Management) rentals in 2008 and to this day continues to provide prompt, competitive service. The affordability and occasional specials for tenants has certainly contributed to more frequent carpet maintenance and thereby extended carpet life, for which I and my clients are very appreciative.
Ed is the man. Looked all over, this is the only place that ever gets it perfect.
None
None
None
I have been a customer for over a year. Tim and Janna adopt a very personal approach to customer satisfaction by getting to know you and it makes all the difference. They host different social events at their store which invites the sort of personal interaction which permits them to make appropriate recommendations for gifts. Each time I consider a gift for my wife, I call or email and ask for suggestions, Janna pre-selects pieces which she knows will "wow" my wife but stays within budget. The result is a beautiful but affordable gift with tremendous impact. Tim knows watches very well and Passion is the only place I would trust to repair my timepieces.
1 Cul/Sec. Yo soy de la Bolivar, no de la Simon, sera ahora que el Ampere no sirve, antes era lo mejor
None
None
Alex and Mike know what they are doing (I've been deceived by two other places in town before I found Aegean), scheduling with them is easy, and they go out of their way to help. I've had multiple oil changes with them, a full brake job, 60K tune up. Prices are reasonable, I usually call around to other places to quote stuff and they don't overcharge. Also, they've never even attempted to push extra work; they just do what I bring it in for.
Excellent cafe! My favorite in Nelson
Baxter was great! I just purchased my first vehicle, and Baxter helped me make a responsible car decision! - The whole crew really cared about my personal situation and made sure that I made it into a car I love driving. - I would definitely recommend checking out the website and stopping by the dealership! I worked with Tyler S. in sales and Chad in finance; both of the guys were extremely helpful when it came to evaluating and understanding all of my options, and I had a very enjoyable time while they took care of everything! A+
After a brutal burglary attack, Evan Willis brought in a crew to clean the bio-hazards left behind. He packed up the entire home, cleaned the items. Removed and replaced flooring, sub-flooring. Cleaned the house from top to bottom. He worked directly with the insurance company leaving us free to deal with other things until he completed. In lieu of a maid service, we have opted to use his weekly cleaning service. We know our home is always clean for company.
Had a great day yesterday playing at Rancocas. First day back since last season and the course is still a challenge. The exciting par 4 is what I live for.
Thanks for all your help Robert, went there with an almost over lease and left there with a brand new Grand Cherokee, This is the place to go.
DA CONSIGLIARE APPLE STORE
Quick, friendly, and SUPER-helpful coordinating with insurance (and coordinating correctly - I've lived through the horror of doctors screwing up with my insurance). I've always been able to schedule my appointments when I want them, and you can do so online as well, which is great. Highly recommended.
Pre Bratislavčanov skvelý tip na víkendové popoludnie. Radosť budú mať isto najmä deti, keďže je tam dosť veľa zierat. Určite odporúčam. Treba sa však pripraviť, že tam bude vcelku dosť ľudí :) Ale nie je to zas také strašné
None
Good food been eating here for years
My wife and I rented equipment to ski for 4 days and the people were great and the equipment was fantastic.Steve who worked with us is a great guy, hope he is there next year!
Cheapest rates in town. I called everywhere and they were nearly half the price of competitors. They had me scheduled and auto window fixed the next day.
After moving back to New Lenox a year ago I thought I had found a daycare as good as the one we were leaving behind. However, after going through two really bad ones we finally found LaPetite and have not looked back since. They are wonderful there and take really good care of my children. You know you are in the right place when you kids come home "messy" and tired by the end of the day. A parent couldn't ask for better than that. I would highly recommend then to all parents who are in need of a good daycare.
Harriet Zilber got me though two of the toughest times in my life. She is objective, introspective, intuitive and kind. I was very fortunate to find a therapist who doesn't snap-judge or patronize her clients - rather, she listens with an open mind and gives thoughtful advice.
Love this place - think it is fast becoming my favourite spot for brekkie - the fig and cinnamon muesli rocks and their coffee, well just plain smashing. It's not the biggest place, but that adds to it's cosy factor. Friendly staff, comfortable seating, warm atmosphere, just all good really....oh and it does wine (and I guess dinner, although not tried it) too in the evenings
my wife and i like this restaurant very much
When I decided to move to a new house, Metropolitan Organizing LLC was at the top of my list of phone calls to make. I had lived in my home for almost 25 years and needed to weed out a lot of items before the move. Every session with my team has been immensely helpful. They assisted me with purging, organizing, and moving out of the old house, which included two attics and a garage. Now that I am in my new place, they are working with me to find solutions that fit my needs, lifestyle, and space. They are delightful people --- completely unfazed by clutter, pest problems, dirt, dust, indecisiveness, time pressures, heat, cold, rain, or snow! These are top-notch professionals. Do not hesitate to call them; you will be thrilled with the results.
Excellent!!!!
Great food and very helpful and friendly staff. I love that they always have a new special on their menu. The sweet potato fries are awesome.
I hurt my back the first time some years ago. My Dr gave me pain meds, mucle relaxers, inflamaition meds,steroids,stuff to make it feel better. In febuary of 2012 i woke up one morning and couldnt get out of bed. Worst pain I ever had.My Dr prescribed the same things, sent me for an M.R.I and to a spine specialist,who gave me meds and added thearapy. 9 mos of thearapy and very little improvement. The day after christmas I woke up and couldnt get out of bed.... I finnaly took my daughters advice and went to Dr Overton.WOW!!!!!!!! I am in my 5th week of rehab with him and I still cant believe the difference.I am not on any medications, and 90% better already. Chiropractic is the way to go, and when you do, go see Dr O!!!!!! DR Overton and his staff are some of the nicest people I have ever met, and they always make me feel that they care about ME. I will continue to look forward to my appointments with them. They turn my frown upside down :)
I loved it! It was quick, less messy and a comfortable atmosphere. Definitely coming back.
Отличное местечко с приятным персоналом. На конюшенной оч.хороший и отзывчивый управляющий. Она быстро реагирует на пожелания в работе
the people of Nirmalya Web Solutions are supportive
Muy buena y rica Comida
Excellent restaurant. Reasonably priced, in an otherwise expensive town, Asheville. Great Thai curry, warm sake, a hand roll with cucumber instead of seaweed (amazing), and pineapple, tofu fried rice.
I had a sound coming from my 2010 Traverse. I took the car to my local Chevy dealer. They originally diagnosed it as a rear differential, but after picking the car up, the sound was still there. I had them reassess and was told a new list of problems costing $2400. I then decided to go for a second opinion at Don Larson. The Don Larson price was $500 less and I decided to go with them. As Kevin was going through the information on the computer, he remarked that we had Zurich service plan and that I would only be responsible for the $100 deductible. I was sheepishly surprised needless to say that I didn't remember we included that plan when we bought the car. I was treated with respect and will definitely bring my car repair needs to them- even though it is a half hour drive. Great people!
I thought that the customer service was excellent, coming from a Marketing background. The receptionist was friendly and informative, and my hairdresser was very professional. This is exactly the sort of experience I've always expected but not received. Well done!
This restaurant is the best in OV. My wife and I go there at least once a week. Specials every nite, Thursdays are Greek special nites. Cool background music all the time, whoever makes that happen has great taste. Bfast any time. Bowl of spicy homemade chili over a side of mashed taters is one of my fave budget meals, good for lunch or dinner.They make their own desserts which are fantastic. When the weather's nice you can dine outside. We're there so often we consider the folks that work there as friends. They even have wi-fi. We love this place!
None
I have been fishing for many years, and I can tell you that you cannot find a more friendly and knowledgable staff. They not only tell you what you need but how to use it, where to use it, and the pros and cons of all the stuff they sell. I know that I can get just as much help from the flyfishing staff as I can from the bait and panfishing staff. Beginner and veteran alike can benefit from their kind service.
None
None
Marcy was a fantastic realtor! She truly listens to your wants and needs when looking for a home. During my experience she was available to talk when things were stressful which was truly appreciated. I would recommend Marcy to anyone looking for a home in West Michigan!
Best Mexican in Ft Worth!
great southern food. loved the fried okra. a must go to on the Square
tempat paling romantis..indah banget..suasananya OK..makanannya enak..ga nyesel deh waktu itu, berkesan banget
Saw the Led Zepplin Experience and it was a real joy... Ron Onesti owns the place and is doing an excellent job handling this facility
The food prices are crazy
Excellent experience! Everything was completed professionally and in a timely matter. These guys are great, straight up guys to deal with. No hassles what so ever. Thank you Omar for showing the car and making the deal happen. Thank you Kevin for gettin' me approved in 1 day! A huge thanks to Faysal for completing everything and makin' my day! These guys are chill and I will definitely be back in the future to do business again! So, If you're lookin' for a car see these guys... you won't be disappointed! Thanks Guys, Bryan
Loved it, Was up in Santa Monica for AFM, went there with a friend...ate there every morning... I miss the place, great food, best waffles I've ever had!!! Open one in NM!!
Try the Godzilla roll! Excellent hibachi, too. It is regular drinks and beer. No wine or cocktails available.
EL MEJOR QUE HE PROBADO. FELICITACIONES!
I had a legal issue that I needed assistance with so I called Shazam. I set up a meeting with him right away. He explained the entire legal process to me in a way that I could understand. I had called several law firm's before this and couldn't even get an attorney on the phone. After meeting with Shazam I knew he was going to fight for me until the end. Every time I called he always returned my call the same day. From start to finish I felt like he was fighting his hardest for me. The out come of my case was wonderful!!! My experience with this law firm has been nothing short of the best!! I highly recommend Shazam Kianpour and his firm.
Outstanding food and service! This place is a great place to enjoy great ribs (kids loved the wings) and a cold beer. Will be back!!
In the emergency room with my husband he is sick with stomach virus
I never really had a problem with this place, I use to live across the street and go here every week, there were times the buffet was not all out, and missing some dishes, other than that the service was excellent, and the price is cheap!! At the review below are you sure you are at the right place roaches??? I been in here more than 10 times, and I have really bad OCD when it comes to clean, and i have seen NO bugs!!
None
My fiance & I found this place a few days after moving to Louisville. We decided to stop for lunch...that was the best find since we moved. Since then we have probably eaten there at least 30 times in the 9 months we have lived here. We have brought our entire family here for multiple occasions...15-20 at a time. We were so worried moving from NYC/NJ that we would never find sushi like we had up north. WRONG! :-) The food is divine, the service great, the owner and employees just amazing people. It's our place for sushi or just a good meal in general. You can not go wrong. The Buddha Roll, The Tropical Tuna Roll and the Snow White Roll are to die for. Bona Petite!
None
None
A genuinely great experience. The owner is amazing, sweet and super attentive. She stocks really great stuff and you walk out feeling like a new lady. Highly recommended.
Top notch staff. Ashley is an amazing artist. Everyone is friendly and I most def. recommend this shop to anyone looking for a great quality tattoo without being hassled on getting something else! Will be going back once I get another design stuck in my head.
Good stuff,Great Beer on tap...Friendly staff, Friendly Patrons
None
Ich habe hier für meine Hochzeit sämtliche Sträuße anfertigen lassen und bin sehr zufrieden. Alle Blumen können sich in einer sehr hohen Qualität sehen lassen und sorgen dafür, dass meine Hochzeit in toller Dekoration erscheint
First and foremost, 42nd Street Photo by far had the best price for the digital camera I purchased. I ordered online and the checkout process was seamless. The shipment was quick and arrived well packaged. No doubt I will be looking to purchase from 42nd Street Photo in future.
Outstanding. If Steve Federico is still around, ask for him! More knowledge than an encyclopedia on improving game and performance! Been going there for over 20 years and always happy when I leave!
We had a family dinner out, six of us. There is very little to criticize, even if I tried hard, about our dining experience. So I will start with a tip. The restaurant has the temperature of the Mediterranean. Wear clothes even in winter that can be removed. The owner loves his job, he & his staff make everybody welcome, young and old alike. The décor is based on the area in southern Italy of his family. So to the food, under normal circumstances I find it relatively simple to work out the best part of the meal. On this occasion, I cannot. It was all great. If you would like genuine southern Italian food and wine in central Scotland this is it.
None
The best I love it I think it is better than chuckee cheesea turn up ooh kill em
I love the Bead Station!! I read the review others have left and I totally disagree with them. The service is amazing and the staff are so friendly. I was invited my first few times shopping at Bead station to an event where a group of woman get together and string beads. The owner brought tons of food and provided the event for free!! It was a blast. Through the love that is shown at the Bead Station, this great store is one of my first go to's for beads and supplies. Sometimes people just have a bad day and blame others and then they write a blog that can harm businesses, this is not ok.
Great Service! My wife took her 2002 Mustang GT and had paul look at it due to a Service Engine Light that turned on. Not only did he take a look at it, but he found no issues and let us know that. Anyone could have made up a story and listed a number of reasons and had us spend money to get it fixed, but he was honest. These days, that seems less and less common so I think Paul and his team deserve recognition for not only good work, but honesty as well! I would HIGHLY recommend Paul's Automotive to anyone and everyone!
I have worked with Maximus Fitness and John Pitsch over the last year and a half and I must say he is a true professional and all around honest great guy. He is comitted to his gym and all of the members, and is always open to helping out anybody in anyway he can. The gym has everything you need at an affordable price, and the staff are always very cheerful and happy to see you! Whatever your fitness goals this place has everything you need and they do it better than anybody else! Thanks Maximus Fitness!
Doing business with this small shop was an absolute pleasure. I was treated with more respect here than anywhere I've ever been. Jose has extensive knowledge and is very well-spoken. The price was given to me BEFORE the work began...very refreshing to experience this in the realm of automotive mechanics. The end result was exactly as described and exceeded every initial expectation I had. Time, craftsmanship, customer service, and price were all better than I could have imagined. I would drive many miles to see these guys again.
Always good service, knowledgeable staff, and dependable products. I purchase oil changes and other auto products besides tires at Tom's.
The new location is gorgeous and the staff is always so nice to work with. Dr. Cappucino is the best - he makes you feel so at ease, he truly listens to what you are looking to accomplish. I have to recommend the Crystal Peel soap specifically to anyone with that icky dry winter skin - I promise you will love it! and I just starting using the Obagi products and am very pleased with the results. LaBella Medispa makes you feel like you are in a 5 star luxury resort spa and its right here in Mt. Airy!!!
None
None
I walked in expecting to be disappointed, but Scott Cook was awesome. He helped me get through a roadblock to get a phone again. (mine was damaged beyond repair) It seems very rare these days that someone sees the situation you are in and will go the extra mile to help you get it resolved without you kicking and screaming. Thank you Scott for doing your job above and beyond my expectations.
Great place for entertainment
I had a great experience with the company with a long trip back and forth from Orlando to West Melbourne. Keith the driver was on-time, courteous and drove prtofessionally
First of all, I had the pleasure of working with the Owner of Two Maids & A Mop and that certainly gave me confidence in hiring from them locally. The entire company is built on such good values and ethics and is client focused. I hired Two Maids & A Mop to clean a rental property where the tenant had just vacated. They had their work cut out for them. They arrived on time, were very professional and did a thorough cleaning making it "move-in" ready for the new tenant. I highly recommend them and would hire them again! Glad they have an office here in Charlotte!!
Groupon Deal so was obviously a good price! But a really nice cosy, friendly old fashioned country Inn. Clean & Warm, with exceptionally friendly staff, Dog friendly and nice location. Evening meals very nice. Just a 2 night break in January but good value.
Great food and service!
I LOVE Juno Salon! Brooke Cady does my eyelash extensions. I have worn strip lashes for a couple of years and thought I would try this new trend, Lash extensions! I love them! Brooke individually glues lashes to your own lashes. Jack loves the look and the cost is comparable to buying lashes/glue/mascara. This salon has a great atmosphere. I probably shouldn't say so, but as I waited for Brooke last week, I overheard negotiation between the owner and the Denver Nuggets Cheerleader Representative... looks like I am in good company choosing Juno Salon.
The #1 place in NordStad for quality food, good service at a good price.
None
One of the best airport on country
My wife went there and the work is impeccable, long lasting makeup and overall wonderful service.
Y pensar que alli estaba todos los dias, tocando la guitarra y cantando, y ahora esta en lo más alto, es muy grande, el mejor idolo que se puede tener, kidauhl <3
I had the privilege of working with John and Mike at LaunchPad Studios in creation of my debut album in 2010. From scratch track to CD jacket they were there to help me see my project through to completion. I worked closely with John in co-producing the album sound, coordinating studio musicians when I needed them, organizing tracking and listening sessions around my busy work schedule and all the while being encouraged in developing my own personality and style into each track. It was a blessing every step of the way. When it came to mixing and mastering the project I often found myself saying "Mike…because of you I believe in magic!" Making my dream of an original album both affordable and enjoyable - I couldn't have asked for a better studio to work in on this project. Hold Hope is an album anthology of years of personal journey in music and they helped bring it to life and make it shareable to the masses. I would highly recommend anyone that needs a great recording space, engineers who won't cut corners on quality or a set of production ears to give quality musical feedback….these are your people. Thank you LaunchPad…..until next time!
La Familia Restaurant has a great menu! Hooray fish tacos! This truly is the best salsa in the State, no question. Not only is their food delicious the atmosphere is very friendly and cozy. The service is excellent too, no waiting here!
Leah always gets my order perfect!
Great place !
South Bay Hydroponics and Organics on Bascom AveI can't say enough of how well the staff and store is ran. This is my first time trying to do a organic vegetable garden and every time I need a question answered or a product- Seth, Andrew and Jake are always there to help. They are extremely knowledgeable and helpful. Wouldn't have such great veggies if it wasn't for their help. Will be more than happy to refer to our friends. Thanks Guys!
Nice shop, but extremely expensive
My wife and I visited several dealerships looking for a family replacement car. Subaru of Loveland easily stood out of the crowd in terms of professionalism and a no-hassle sales team. We didn't feel pressured one bit and actually were compelled to purchase from them because they were so good. They definately do not fit the stereotype of a "car salesmen"; these people are professionals and make you feel great about your purchase. Plus, their product sells itself. We will definatley be going back to this dealership next time we need to replace a car. You won't go wrong dealing with these folks and you'll get a very competitive deal.
Jonathan We purchased a Honda CrossTour through him. It was negotiated well and with a professional manner. he is a good sales person who listens to the buyer and identify/understand the need. I will really recomend him to anyone as a good sales person.
La calidad de la educación es exelente.
best deal for the location indeed
best Hydrabadi Biryany I evr had 
Please note: The "reviewer" named Cody is incorrect. This is NOT in an apartment building as he claims in his "review"...it's in a retail strip center on the corner of White Bear Ave and County Road C. It is very much a "public" laundromat and you can wash and dry your clothes there regardless of whether you live in an apartment, a house, or in the park. It's open to all. Cody must be confused so please ignore his "review" as it is incorrect. Thank you.
Mike was great! told me my used car was in great shape and needed nothing except the oil change. wow every where else would have up-sold you a boat load of crap! to meet quota i will be back here....5 stars
I had order for valentine combo gift “HEART SHAPE RED ROSE ARRANGMENT + 1/2 KG CHOCOLATE CAKE + SMALL TEDDY.” The gift was quickly delivered within 2 hours of my placing the order on your website. I really appreciate your service and would recommend your portal to any of my friends who have to get a gift delivered to Mumbai. Not to forget the prompt update from Petals and Gifts team the moment the gift got delivered.
Ich habe einen VW-Bus für einen Ausflug mit Firmengästen gebraucht und im Internet die Seite von vwbusmieten e.K. gefunden. Nach nur einem kurzen telefonischen Kontakt wurde mir der VW-Bus reserviert, unverbindlich und kostenfrei bis eine Stunde vor Abholung am nächsten Morgen! Und sogar das Büro wurde für mich eine 1/2 Stunde früher geöffnet, da ich den Wagen schon vor 9.00 Uhr morgens gebraucht habe. Die Abwicklung war unkompliziert, das Personal freundlich, der Miet-Preis sehr angenehm... Der Wagen war in Top-Zustand und sauber. Als ich den Wagen am späten Abend auf dem Firmengelände abgestellt habe, konnte ich den Schlüssel noch sogar nicht wie sonst üblich anonym in einen Briefkasten werfen, sondern persönlih bei einem Tankwart um die Ecke abgeben. Daher eine Top-Bewertung für einen Top-Service!! Würde "vwbusmieten e.K" gerne weiterempfehlen!
Back in business and doing a great job for the north side. Staff is always friendly and the coffee is great. Last time I used the drive-thru they even had a treat for my dog.
Fantastic and beautiful location for opera and classical concerts alike. Never a disappointment and a lovely venue. Definitely recommended.
Great little sandwich and coffee shop, even better as they know what I and/or my son like even before we get a chance to sit down.
Been a member since '97. My favorite club by far. Bigger than Champlin and much larger pool, more free weights than Fridley, More machines than Maple Grove. Friendliest staff. They constantly clean the equipment. Not too crowded except 5 pm-7 pm so I just avoid that time. Large pool area. Staff is great up front.Just for fun, I try to leave without making the turnstyle noise to see if they still say "Have a great day", They still catch it at least half the time. Does that make me a nerd? Probably I see the same trainers & employees year to year. Being a business owner, the continuity says something about how the club is managed locally. Problems? I wish members would take a little more pride in putting weights away. I see Matt the trainer picking up and organizing weights between sessions. And there's one design flaw that's really minor. The hallway into the mens locker room is about 4 feet wide with a sharp 90 degree corner. There are about 100 near crashes every day coming through that corner.
A great stay down to the finest detail. Clean, well appointed rooms, many fine courtesies both in the room and in the establishment at large. Beds were very comfortable, nice ambiance (fireplace and furnishings), and a great view from the window. Scrumptious breakfasts, afternoon tea time (actually wine tasting ;) And the staff was fantastic; friendly, attentive, and personable. Location was nice. Easy walk to shops and restaurants. If you're staying in Langley, this is the place to stay.
I have been a customer with this storage company for many years and their services are incredible! I am very satisfied with their professionalism and courtesy. Thank You All so much!! Charlene :)
Best place in the area. The food is so delicious and you get a lot of food for what you pay. The staff is so friendly and kind. We go here whenever we want chinese
One of the best book stores in the world.
I have been to this location three times in the last year. I love their service. This last time I had to go back just one week after getting an oil change because the underbody guard had come loose and was dragging the ground. They removed it for me and the rep was very good about providing additional information on upcoming issues to be aware of, but no pressure to have anything done right at that time. They didn't even charge to remove the broken guard. I highly recommend this location.
None
None
Best!
We stayed at this Holiday In for 1 night, August 13. From check in to check out we received wonderful service. After check out, once we were already on I10; I realized I left my cell phone on the bed. I called to hotel, asked them to check with housekeeping and let them know we were on the way back to look for it. When we got back 20 minutes later, a manager (regretfully I did not get his name) was waiting for us at the hotel entrance with my phone in hand. This is 5 star service. The Bringmans family.
I don't know what more someone could want in a coffee shop.
Ótima farmacia
None
5 stars for Russ Ali and everyone at West Houston Subaru. Russ was very knowledgeable about the car, did a great walk around showing me each and every feature and making sure my phone was connected before driving away. They beat my Credit Union rate, and made the process about as smooth as purchasing a car can be. I purchased a certified Passat, and I am greatly satisfied with the financial part of the deal, as well as the dealership, the salesman and the car itself. Kudos all around!
Awesome spot to camp if you like walking over Dartmoor!
I was first introduced to Brett Shopsin in 2007 while shopping for a new car. I eventually bought a 2008 BMW 328i Coupe. Brett and the entire staff were excellent. In October of 2012, I traded my 328i on a X1 x35i. My new X1 arrived in December and I really liked the car. Again, Brett and the entire staff were great. Soon after I developed a serious problem with the X1. I had an engine failure after 800 miles. I was upset and concerned about having to have the engine replaced. I wanted a new car. To my pleasant surprise, they agreed. I took delivery on my new X1 on March 28, 2013. Brett, Jimmy Anderson, and John Hall were great not only in getting me a new vehicle, but in their support of the customer (me). I have nothing but good things to say about the Checkered Flag BMW organization. From Sales to Service to Management, Their Top Notch. They have certainly made a lifelong customer out of me.
None
Close enough to the university to pop by for coffee & cake mid afternoon, but away from the busy park street coffee shops so you always get a comfy seat! They offer free wifi and if you get the attic herbal teas you get a free refil too!
Dr.Cass is the best and kindest hearted vet! You will never be rushed in an appointment. You will never go in for one thing and be convinced your animal needs a thousand other treatments. She will take the most hollistic approach possible, while still being practical and making sure your animal is taken care of and gets better. She is understanding and accomidating with scheduling appointments. I feel so lucky to have her taking care of my pets!
great place to eat and great price
I have a rescue dog I got about a month ago. I've been into the TVC twice now. They are sooo good to work with. When the vet examined my dog, she sat on the floor and let Luna crawl in her lap. She was also very thorough. I'd been to another vet who barely looked at her and never picked up she was sick. So I'm really pleased with TVC. All of the staff is very friendly and seem to just love to be around animals. It's such a nice change!! I feel as if I've found my long term vet. Thank you!
Great bike shop! These guys are down to earth and service is great. I have had a few bikes serviced here and they dropped what they were doing to take care of me. I have tried this at a couple of other shops and there is usually at least a 2 day turn around. Great service. They have a good selection of bikes as well. I highly recommend.
Abierto 24 hrs excelente actitud de servicio a la vanguardia en equipo médico personal altamente capacitado
Took a tour, it is so clean, with dedicated employees after the tour switch to Pepsi instead of coke beenpepsi drinking for 30 years. look Pepsi products from Pepsi Cola Company are great. A lot of products beside the beverage.
Excelente para tapear Excelente bar de tapas para tapear algo por el centro de la ciudad tienen varios locales céntricos, por cada consumición nos han puesta una tapa bastante buena y cada ronda iba cambiando . Muy buena relación calidad/precio. Lo mejor de la zona centro de plaza nueva. El servicio muy eficiente y rápido y muy correcto en un bar tan pequeño hay como 8 camareros. Creo recordar que cada cerveza cuesta 2.20€.
Rooms were spacious & clean, recently renovated, beds were comfortable, staff was friendly and helpful. Highly recommend.
Clean and cozy atmosphere. The service was great. Everyone smiled and everyone was friendly. The food was delicious and the presentation of the food was excellent. I will definitely eat here again.
AMAZING experience from the very beginning. I was told by other "LASIK" centers that I was not a candidate because my corneas were too thin and prescription was too high (-8.50). Other doctors never offered alternatives, but when I went to see Dr. Cutarelli, he assured me that I was a candidate for PRK. His staff at both locations were very pleasant and made me feel right at home. On surgery day, I couldn't have been happier with the overall experience. I was very relaxed and Dr. Cutarelli and his staff were very thorough in explaining what I could expect during and post-surgery. Now a year later, I've had a few post-surgery visits and the staff and Dr. Cutarelli are just as pleasant as the day I met them. Thanks to them, I can wake up and not have to worry about wearing contacts or glasses!
Best in town
My mother Hortensia was seen by Dr Shook two yrs ago, She was in a auto accident. I'm please of how well the Dr and his assistant took care for her.
None
The Jolly Millers is under new management and wow!! what a change: Spanish tapas, great home-made grub, real ales, live entertainment, a fine selection of American bourbons and every Tuesday night is Cheeseday night; bring your own guest cheese! As a villager and real ale enthusiast, I'm biased but its the best thing that's hit Cottenham village in all the years I've lived here. Even the local micro-brewery owner hangs out there so that has to be saying something.
Came for a quick bite at lunch. Food was great, very trendy looking place. Ordered an iced tea and the crispy duck spring rolls amongst other things and both were amazing. Can sit outside too. Definitely worth a try
None
Great agency and they believe in service the old-fashioned way! I highly recommend if you need insurance in Indiana contact this agency!
I ABSOLUTELY LOVE THE PRODUCT AND SERVICE!!! It was soooo easy to switch the number. Seamless, smooth transition. I always hated the fact that I barely missed getting a 212 number. I had a 646, better than 347, - I know it is vanity, but who cares?! - but it just irked me. I mean, I live in Manhattan; so, why shouldn't I have a 212? Anyway, my number is easy to remember, and the transition process and customer service was phenomenal. Top notch. I highly recommend it.
Not only do I take all my jewelry to H&H for cleaning/repair, I also purchase all my jewelry (including watches) there! I can't sing the praises of Ron & Jannine Alexander and their staff enough! They are knowledge, credible individuals to whom I would place my reputation on doing a quality job, competitively priced, for my friends/family/neighbors/clients.
Место для регулярного посещения
Maga La Boheme is a very tiny but full of chic boutique in east Austin. I was happily greeted by Ashley today who helped me find a beautiful cream colored and lacy spaghetti strap summer dress that fits me perfectly. During checkout Ashley was very courteous and personable making me feel right at home in this fabulous local shop. Before I visited the storefront I had gone to the website to glimpse at the inventory. Honestly I thought the prices were a bit high. After visiting the store though I found that the prices are actually pretty reasonable. The sales are great! I'm not sure if the website has not been updated but don't let that deter you from visiting! I plan on making another trip to the east side soon.
a lil expensive n the service is really good .. if u eat a lot this is not the place for you .. otherwise its definitely worth it .
I absolutely love this place. Every time my bf and I get the money to go out and eat this is where we go. Very delicious. Customer satisfaction guaranteed!
Doreen recommended a unit sized on my furniture description , reviewed the pricing and showed me two units. I rented a 10 x 15 and am very satisfied. The property is spotless and in a nice area. Doreen next reviewed all the documents and I was finished with the transaction very quickly. I will recommend this facility and Doreen to all my friends needing storage in Las Vegas. JME
None
Having never had a spa before now and had some teething problems including a faulty salt chlorinator, Endless Spas after sales service was 10/10. Their experience and advice was paramount. Would have no hesitation in recommending Endless Spas.
My two sons and I have been going to Greater Raleigh Chiropractic & Rehab since 2012 and love it. My older son is a soccer goalkeeper and Dr. Jeff keeps his hips adjusted and aligned and helps him through all his rigorous training. My younger son is growing so fast that his legs just can't catch up with his body. Dr. Jeff makes sure his hips stay adjusted and aligned and he gets the proper stretching so he too can keep up with being a soccer player. I have gone to Dr. Jeff for my neck and shoulder stiffness, migraines and stress. Through my exercise routine for my neck and shoulders and the adjustments that Dr. Jeff provides, I am pain free for the first time in a very long time. Our experience has been very positive with the three of us and we look forward to our weekly adjustments, it just gives us a better quality of life!! Dr. Jeff and his staff are very friendly and proactive to your health and welfare. Give them a try, you will not be disapointed!
We recently moved to the area, but have been visiting for many years. The Royal at Heysham is a lovely old pub which serves fresh, home cooked food from a menu which changes regularly and a good variety of cask ales and good quality wines too. The menu is split between their standard menu which in itself is very nice and their daily specials menu featuring fresh and interesting dishes. We always order our food at the bar where we find the staff very helpful and friendly and have never waited too long for our food, which, bearing in mind is freshly cooked always comes in a reasonable time (If you want fast food go to Mcdonalds). Their fish and chips are to die for with a huge, lightly battered fish, fresh cut hot chips and wonderful mushy peas. If you're in the area make sure you give it a try you won't be dissappointed.
These guys had several sets of leather couches, but get there early! We arrived around 6 and claimed the last of them. The atmosphere is great, the place was very clean... especially the restrooms! I'm going back of Oktoberfest! Someone told me they have a German Brewer guy... great beer selection!
Highly recommend and trust these guys!
The serviceman came today to evaluate the water system and inline water heater that we purchased just over one year ago. He was courteous and answered all my dumb questions. He changed some settings to make the system more efficient. I am having them return to replace the pressure restriction valve and the water valve coming into the house on Friday.
This store is phenomenal! The staff is friendly, and the owners are awesome people! I just walked in for the first time, and got service that is unparalleled in Boston! The cheeses are great, and most are locally produced. The beer selection, while small, offers a good little something for everyone. I walked in to check out the store, and walked out with a bag of cheese and beer. Highly recommended, even just to meet the staff!
I have worked with T'Ann with Boho Beauty Studio many times and I have always had a great experience. I have worked with her as a photographer as she has done makeup for many of my shoots. She is amazing. I can tell her a look I want and she will re-create it in the most perfect way. T'Ann has a way about her that makes all she works with feel comfortable and beautiful. T'Ann is a professional 100% and conducts herself professionally. I recommend all my clients to have their makeup done prior to a shoot and she is the one I recommend them going to. T'Ann is an amazing makeup artist and a fabulous person. I give T'Ann my highest recommendation. From one professional to another professional there is no other makeup artist I would rather work with than T'Ann and Boho Beauty Studio.
GREAT EGGPLANT I've eaten all over the country being that I driver charter bus tours and being from the nyc new jersey metro area I'm use to a fairly high quality of food and they have one of the best eggplant parms I've ever had.
Great selection of tiles, open monday - sunday.
Great view of riverwalk!
My favorite dish is the Pad Spicy - called Pad Grapow at other Thai places - basically basil, chicken, white rice, peppers and the sauce. Have never had a bad experience. Since it is not near my work anymore usually I will get 2-3 orders to go and save it for later in the week. Very nice group of people.
Took the wife there today for lunch. Every bit as good as last time we were there. Lunch menu runs through 3pm with most expensive plate at $7.25. I judge TexMex by the cheese enchiladas and Rosarios has the best cheese enchiladas in town. Add a margarita on the rocks. They're excellent. Go! Enjoy!
Delivery for pick-up arrived on time. Calls to customer service for information were answered with a friendly and helpful attitude. Upon arrival at terminal for pick-up, product pick-up was fast and the forklift driver was an expert. All in all, absolutely no complaints. Product shipped was undamaged and well handled.
We were walking down the street from our hotel and walked up on this Thai restaurant. The prices were good and a great aroma was coming out of the restaurant. The food was just heavenly and tasted awesome. There was so much on the menu to choose from, but I started with sushi, crab wontons and shrimp coconut soup then had Red Curry Chicken and Thai fried. I'd recommend this place with 4 stars and will dine there again before I leave.
Raja and his team at Fil Support have been an integral component to the evolution of our business, bringing a freshness and heightened presence to our placement on the web. Our new website is crisp, clean and most of all, we are experiencing fantastic results which have translated to a significant revenue increase in our business. We couldn’t be more pleased
Always a pleasant trip!! The staff is extremely professional and proficient. Each customer is immediately recognized and promptly serviced. I have purchased a beautiful rose gold faced, white leather band watch (about two years ago) which they recently and promptly serviced upon delivery.They are personable too, since they remember all of their customers faces and their taste. Also, the sales are phenemonal!! If you are a busy person their online site also have beautiful pieces. This store is one the best places to purchase jewelry due to their impeccable quality and eccentric pieces. Absolutely love The Michael Hill Store!!
I have an Audi 2008 Q7 which needed breaks and routers, I went to Cherry Hill Audi and they gave me a price over $1400. I went to best buy Motors, which been recomended by a friend, and they gave me a price of $750, with all original Audi parts. They fixed my car, and now in great condetion. They where very helpful and finished on time. I do recomend this dealer ship to buy a car or do services. Take my words, and check them out. Great Services Great people.
I have always loved the food there with brilliant food and friendly staff.
I lived in Columbus for about a year and was a member at Snap Fitness. I enjoyed the gym so much so that I would drive to Fort Benning for work and then drive back to the exit 10 area just to go work out. Randy, the owner, is caring, kind, and knowledgeable. He trains everyone from teenagers in middle school to senior citizens. I have tried most of the bigger gyms in Columbus, and Snap Fitness on Double Churches is by far the cleanest gym I have ever been to. Randy usually has his employees clean in the mornings, and then he will clean later in the evening once the 5-o'clock rush has hit (by the way, the post-work rush usually tops out at about 15 people in the gym). Cleaning typically consists of sweeping, mopping, and wiping down all of the machines with a Simple Green solution. The restrooms in the gym are also big enough to double as a changing room. It has most of the typical amenities you'd think a larger health club should have--tanning booth, forearm rollers, foam rollers, ab mats, stretching cables, jumping rope, etc. There is a fairly open space at the back of the gym that will accommodate Crossfit-type activities, but don't drop your barbells like Crossfitters love to do! Snap Fitness is also a franchise, so your key card will work at any Snap Fitness--I've tested this out, and it worked in Charleston, SC, San Fransisco, CA, Knoxville, TN, Hattiesburg, MS, and Charlotte, NC. Before going, though, call the gym and ensure a staff member is there--it is a 24/7 gym, but a staff member is usually there from 9am until 6pm. The poor reviews from earlier are before Randy owned the gym, and things have certainly turned around since then. (Also, I think you're probably not the brightest crayon in the box if you continue to let a fitness facility charge you several years after you've left...clearly you don't care THAT much about it.) I HIGHLY recommend Snap Fitness, and any time I'm back in Columbus, I will be going back there.
I've been to Mario Fazio's about a half dozen times now, and each time has been a really lovely, delicious meal. The food is excellent (I'm kind of obsessed with the lobster risotto) and the service very good.
yadesh bekheyr oon rooz ke ba ashkan raftim oonja, ghashang hes mikardi kharvarha khatere oonja khabide
I have had the pleasure of using Steven and US Auto Spa on four of our vehicles and the results are, always, above our expectations! He goes beyond what is required and makes great recommendations. Our vehicles look amazing and Steven's attitude is infectious! We actually look forward to the next time he comes out to pamper our cars. You will wonder why you waited so long to use Steven and US Auto Spa!
None
None
Love it! The atmosphere was great!!!
We tried several seafood dishes including the ceviche and were very impressed. Very personable service, and prompt. Don't go without getting a frozen margarita!
LOVE this pizza!! The ladies at our salon always order it and they are always so accomidating when we have strange requests! This is our FAVORITE pizza place. EVER. Won't get pizza anywhere else :)
Amazing, but very expensive, loved the buffet, but drink prices were crazy.
I love this place! A real sanctuary for children
I used to climb at Sport Rock until Vertical Rock opened up. After my first climb I fell in love! It is not overcrowded, parking is a LOT easier, and most of all the staff is not only nice but incredibly friendly and you can tell everyone there loves the sport of climbing and just wants to share their love with everyone that comes in! The gym is large, with both small and tall walls, and a really great bouldering wall. The best part... you hardly ever have to wait in line to climb a route or a problem.
Ci vado regolarmente, mangiare molto buono e prezzi ottimi. Ormai si è creata una familiarità che apprezzo molto!
None
Family oriented but moreover, competitive, disciplined self defense skills are taught that add confidence, test personal boundries and push back fears in all forms. Incredible people that serve as role models and personal motivating mentors. ATA (American Taekwondo Association.) regimines allow you to compete worldwide witin professional standards. Not the place for you if you want it easy or have a bad attitude. The Kowkabanys run a positive, strrict, disciplined Martial Art environment and both are High ranking Chief and Senior Masters well respected in Worldwide Taekwondo. Advanced students are exposed to Gun and Knife defense, Ground fighting and Krav Maga clinics. There is a Toastmasters Gavel Club 2 times every month. this experience will enhance your life like it has my whole Family's
Top rated restaurant of our place,overall good food,excellent Dum biryani .
It reminded me of the Cuban Cafes in Miami.
I don't know about you but, we are always looking for good sushi. We have found the best. Being from San Diego, we more than enough selection but nothing has compared to this. Excellent drinks, service (Michael) was superior and, as I said, the sushi was beyond good. Thank you to the entire staff: hostess, waiter and sushi chefs for an amazing last night dinner on Kauai. We will be back next trip.
Friggin awesome, variety of stores and options for all needs and wabts c;
None
Karl Troy truly goes 10 steps above and beyond servicing his customers. He is honest and passionate. When you speak with him for a few minutes, you realize that you have found a mechanic for life. He is "the guy." Karl treats my Porsche Cayman as if it were his own. He was recommended by several Porsche and BMW enthusiasts. I couldn't recommend enough.
gorgeous venue and the most helpful staff i encountered while shopping for an engagement venue !
When I was stationed in Germany having issues with my 2008 535i BMW that I had purchased there, I took it to BMW where they diagnosed the problem and told me that I needed to replace all of the fuel injectors at a cost of 1200 euros. I shipped my vehicle back to Orlando and took it in for repair at the local BMW dealership. They diagnosed it as the fuel pump and replaced it. The issues with my car continued. Hesitation, power, and starting issues. Through the recommendation of a good friend I brought the car in to Auto World Atlantic. They quickly diagnosed the issue, and at a cost of under $500 they left me with my BMW running like new. Having it less that 1 day had me back on the road. To this day I have not had any issues with my car. I know that they are the European car experts in Orlando. Highly recommended!
This place is fantastic! My wife and I stayed here for a night and we both loved it. The hosts were incredibly nice, friendly, helpful and we loved absolutely everything about this place. Our only regret was we stayed for just one night but we will make sure to remedy that on the next visit.
None
I have used this hotel for the past several months to host a business luncheon. The staff has been so kind and helpful. They confirmed in advance what I needed and made sure I was satisfied with my arrangements. I am very pleased with the service they have provided. It's a shame that hotel has a handful of negative reviews because it seems only complainers take time to comment. I am glad I took a moment. Willis Blake, the manager, is doing a great job there and I'll be back.
I began searching for a new vehicle for myself about 2 months before i visited Baker. I went through many other dealerships, all proving to be unsatisfactory compared to my experience at Baker. When you walk into the dealership you're greeted warmly, and quickly by a number of qualified staff members. You're immediately assisted by a helpful staff that asks questions and finds your needs before finding a car that fits you. The dealer I was helped by, Ronnie, was extremely nice and very pleasant in his assistance of myself and my family. He answered all of our questions honestly, and without hesitation. He never once attempt to 'bs' us. Everything was straight to the point, honest, up-front, and most importantly very helpful. The buying process was quick and painless. They helped us out tremendously on the price of the vehicle without pulling any shady maneuvers. I wouldn't imagine that after 2 months of tirelessly looking for a dealership that would be even decent, we'd stumble across a family-owned and operated establishment that really cared about our car buying experience as much as we cared about it. I would never go anywhere else without going back to this dealership and I can't emphasize enough how exquisite our experience was.
These guys are without a doubt the absolute best tire shop I have ever been to... And I've been to a lot of them. They are much more akin to an indy pit crew "team" than they are a tire shop. They take it to an entirely different level. Really. Seeing is believing. Prepare to be amazed as I was. I will never take my cars anywhere else. Also, be sure and spring for the "road force balance" test if you want the absolute best ride possible. They will explain how and why this computerized system gives you the perfect ride. It's science and popular mechanics, but they dont mind taking the time to show you how and why it works so well.
We eat here about once a month. Service ia always good & the food is fresh & hot.
I've sampled most of the bigger Gyms in Seattle and like this one (and it's other Seattle area affiliates) best because of the vibe. Yeah the staff are friendly. but so are the other customers who seem to be there to work out, not hang around to see if anyone they know shows up, or sit on machines to socialize or read. Having plenty of equipment probably helps. There's plenty of parking, lockers, etc. It's not as cold as some gyms or hot & humid as others--it's like they figured out some kind of machine that maintains the temperature and circulation or something! I haven't experienced any of the billing problems other people mentioned, and I've stopped and started 3 times.
Had a great experience receiving two tattoos on March 9, 2013. Dave had done my daughter's tattoo a couple of years ago and did a wonderful job, so we were glad to find him at the shop we had Googled. I would recommend Dave and Genuine Tattoo Co for anyone who is looking for an experienced tattoo artist do their tattoos.
2nd best college in Mauritius-my 2nd home
None
I've always had great experience with Dr. Doran. I have had two surgical procedures done by him, four wisdom teeth extraction and another extraction from a botched root canal performed by a local endodontist. Unfortunately for me, Dr. Doran had to extract this tooth because it was so infected. Great service. My husband and I thought he had a great bedside matter and very professional. I recommend him highly to everyone. He spoke to my husband at lengths about all of my possible complications after my surgery. His staff even handed out instructions and reviewed everything before and after my surgeries. I don't understand how anyone can say anything bad about this surgeon or his office. But then again, I came into his office with a good attitude...
Great Cabernets! Take some time for a proper tasting. You won't be sorry.
Italian Family Restaurant - Great pizza Thanks Sam , we are happy with your services, Best Pizza, Pasta, Drinks, Salad ....... * * * * * 5 Stars
Best sports bar in eilat
The sushi is excellent and the noodle dishes are awesome. The servers are really nice too.
I've been a customer of Lou's for years, and he is a true professional. Great service, feedback, provided exactly what I needed.
Being a world traveler I have been to many golf courses. The Augusta National is immaculate as befits a world class golf club. The waiting list is extremely long and the fees and membership cost about what a pair of Rolls Royces and a Ferrari do. It is not for the average person but you can get tickets and get to see how the other half lives. They have embarked on a program of buying up all the adjacent properties and even paid to relocate a major traffic artery. They just purchased a strip mall and apartment complex about a half mile away and plan to incorporate the property into the club. My recommendation is if you can manage to get tickets, go in, look around then get with more attainable stuff. Being what Augusta Georgia is like, the National is the best asset in town.
Recomendo, vista para o mar, as ondas,...
I can't say enough good things about Powersource! I was impressed from the very first phone call I had with their receptionist Sara. She was so wonderful and got me right in, which I very much needed. The office is beautiful, clean and spa like as well as a big screen TV with fun facts and information. I met with Chrissy first who is wonderful and she helped me do my initial assessment. Dr. Scott Dubrul is the real deal and beyond. I've been to other respected chiropractors and after seeing Dr. Dubrul they don't compare. His knowledge of the body as a whole is impressive. He doesn't simply fix your body; he explains how each part of your spine connects to nerves which in turn can affect your organs. He is all about healing the whole person. I got x-rays right in the office and came back the next day for the results. Dr. Dubrul had put together a comprehensive care plan for me and thoroughly explained all the results. I was really excited to see the findings and how much progress could be made. There wasn't any pressure put on me to make a bunch of appointments or anything, but believe me I was more than ready to! Powersource also offers massage, wellness plans, food intolerance testing, muscle therapy, hormone testing as well as other services. They also carry the exclusive supplement line Standard Process, which really impressed me. I had muscle therapy with Ryan and he is very talented. It was the most effective massage I've ever had. My muscles were extremely tight, so it wasn't the most relaxing, but I felt so much better afterwards. I am a very competitive tennis player so my body and health are always on my mind and I only want the best to be a part of my team. Again, I can't say enough great things about Powersource and really believe everyone would benefit from their services. It is a very welcoming and professional atmosphere and not a single detail has been left out right down to getting text/email alerts about your upcoming appointments. This is the type of place with the type of experience you would expect to find in Beverly Hills or Hollywood. I'm already moving and playing better tennis and am so grateful to have found Powersource Chiropractic!
Excellent Service, and a very Friendly Staff, to all people.
Dr. Holzman and Staff at TLC were amazing! They made me feel comfortable before, during, and after my Lasik. I am glad I made the decision to go with TLC! Thanks to everyone who took care of me!
Dr Alanna, I have been seen by a lot of Chiropractors, Dr Alanna does a great job of adjusting those sensitive subluxations. Out of all of the Chiros that i have seen in the past Dr Alanna does the best for my neck issues! Thanks!
Great shop, great prices and extremely helpful staff. Unlike B&Q they were able to mix a colour that is no longer produced, and I had painted my whole house with it a few years ago! Glad I found this shop!
I have been coming here since I was 18. I was very sad to see the previous owner let it go, but am thrilled with the new owner operator!!!! I am always greeted warmly and with sincerety. The beds/rooms are always clean. I am always happy with my results. they also have great early bied deals and packages. I reccomened it to any one!
I am Realtor and one of my services is to provide an Insurance quote for my clients. I call Melissa at Sandhill, in less than 24 hours I have a quote with explanation in my email. Excellent Service! Extremely helpful! I highly recommend Sandhill Insurance Agency! Echo Belser
I love this place! It's off the beaten path. It's great. Stop by if you get the chance. Their lunch is AMAZING!!!
This was my first car shopping experience. As a recent college graduate bound for law school I knew I was on a tight budget and I was not looking forward to pushy salesman and the lure of false promises. HOWEVER this WAS NOT the case at all at Port Charlotte Honda. Our sales rep, John Sennett, was very knowledgeable, personable, and helpful in this endeavor making it completely painless. It would highly recommend purchasing a car at this dealership and working with John.
None
Sign Palace worked with us very closely to design our entire fleet of vehicles. They worked very hard to make sure our vehicles had a consistent look and feel since they were all different makes/models. They turned out exactly how we had imaged, and we are very pleased we decided to work with Sign Palace. We would recommend them for any local business.
Great cupcakes! Really friendly staff
Excellent food and service! The staff are attentive and friendly, and knowledgeable. I would definitely recommend - especially for a date.
Really great food. Surprising given that it's in a gas station.
Great breakfast place one of my favorites. 8.99 breakfast bacon egg chese croissantwhich with contry potatos and 2.50 unlimited coffee #heavenlycoffee
A pawn shop is in it for a profit, too. They can't give you what the item is fully worth retail. Knowledge is power people! Do your research. Uncle Man's is the best in DFW.
They are the worst. The owner is a real cheat. He screws electrical supply houses out of tens of thousands of dollars, refuses to play fair, doesn't return or answer phone calls, nasty and rude to many NYC building dept. authorities ( these authorities have confided with us about this many times) and he is known throughout the industry as someone to steer clear away from when doing business. I will withdraw this comment when he actually pays us what is rightfully owed. He randomly deducted close to 30 thousand dollars for a "Manufacturing" error and blamed us for this!! We just delivered the product!!! and.. the manufacturer asked us to sell their product to him.
When I walked into the shop, it impressed me so much on how clean and tidy it was that I booked an appt right away. Caitlynn helped me that day and I went back the next day and got a new tattoo and another tattoo fixed (not orig done by anyone in this shop). She was very pleasant to work with, she took her time to explain everything even though I have several other tattoos and know the drill. It's always good to hear it again. My new tattoo turned out perfect! I love it!! She added and cleaned up my other tattoo and it looks great too. I've already gotten several compliments on them! I've booked an appt for another tattoo with Caitlynn. I highly recommend her and this shop. I've been to several different shops in the area and this one blows everyone out of the water. My husband is now going to go and see Caitlynn about a tattoo he wants. Thank you to Skin City Tattoo! And Thank you very much Caitlynn for the best tattoo!!
None
None
Love this place. I go everyday and am always amazing by their prices - amazingly cheap given the price of 'health' food.
I've had the distinct pleasure of working directly with Bill and his executive team over the better part of 2010 and have to say I'm having a blast! Bill's got the charisma, he's got the desire, he's got the integrity, and best yet, he's got the smarts to continue to make a huge impact on the Medical Billing arena for Healthcare providers of all sizes... I've seen him do it.
I have used Galaxy Blinds for both my houses with great results, they came out and measured and quoted for free and then after I gave them the go ahead, they made my blinds and then fitted them within a week. I live in Wigan but didn't mind using a window blinds company from St Helens, very recommended....
Been going here 20+ years. Nice quiet location and the staff are always friendly.
I had a pending medical need (but not urgent) and was looking to maximize my insurance benefits for the year. I asked my dentist of 20 years, and Dr Kee was the referral. I couldn't have been happier. The staff was professional and the service was flawless. Dr. Kee is a great professional, I am glad to have found him.
Awesome
None
So fantastic
None
Before I visited Dr. Carr, I was in pain due to wearing those cute boots that I know I should throw away! In one visit, I was realigned and was able to workout as usual. I would recommend Dr. Carr to anyone in pain that needs a doctor who will listen to you and do a full assessment before going forward. You definitely don't feel like you are going to get roped into 40 visits and a life long payment plan. A refreshing change from other chiropractors whose servicews I used to use!
Jason is AMAZING. He was great about asking the right questions to find out what we wanted. He was very communicative and available whenever we needed him. He also made sure to show up great houses. He has a lot of insights on areas, prices, neighborhoods, etc that came in handy. One of the biggest assets he could provide though was insight into the costs associated with new homes. He was in the process of building a house himself, and as we looked through homes and pointed out things that we would want to update, he could tell us approximately how much each update would be. As we planned our offers and our budget, that insight was invaluable, and helped us walk away from several houses that would be more than we could manage. He knows his stuff when it comes to post-search things as well. We had a few minor issues come up during closing because either the bank or the other person's Realtor was wrong. Jason found it, and coordinated any issues so that we had one of the smoothest closings I've ever heard of. We ended up with an absolutely gorgeous house even closer to our ideal neighborhood than we'd hoped (with a pool!) for $20,000 less than every other house on the market in our specs. We couldn't be luckier, and a huge part of that was Jason being at the right place, at the right time, knowing his stuff, and moving quickly. Jason is the best Realtor I've heard of, and I'd recommend him to anyone.
Every experience that I have had at McCall has been very positive. They are fantastic with my kids, and I have been pleased with everyone, including the front desk staff!
Love this place Craig showed ,me the 2014 Ford Fiesta!!! LOVE IT!!!! They guided me on how the radio and sync worked. By far the easiest way to buy a new car. Thanks Fair Oaks!
A complete life changing experience with super effective techniques. Pain relief - absolute wonder, works like magic every time I use :)
Since moving to Miami not too long ago, I had not yet found doctors to help in whatever scenario may arise. I had a potentially serious sports-related eye injury and needed to find somewhere to go quickly. I read the reviews for Dr. Gould, and decided to see if the office could schedule me immediately. The office was so concerned about my health that they ensured I rushed over to get checked out, squeezing me in between patients immediately. Dr. Gould was thorough and friendly, even though she didn't have much time to see me. Everyone in the office was super friendly, and I actually enjoyed hanging out there. Very good experience, and I would definitely recommend visiting Dr. Gould!
He talk like sweet knife X
This Taco Bell Is A Great Restaurant!!! Please Go An Enjoy Yourself At The Best Taco Bell On Detroits SouthWest Side.
People are fun. Manager is awesome. Food is really good
設施不錯、乾淨, C/P值算不錯的一家飯店。
Nacho es un profesional que logra sacar lo mejor de ti mismo/a, te ayuda a cambiar de actitud frente a tus limitaciones personales o prefesionales y a potenciar tus puntos fuertes. Todo ello lo resumo en solo unas palabras: MUCHAS GRACIAS por mostrarnos lo que podemos llegar a SER y CONSEGUIR. Un abrazo. María José
Truly excellent food at a reasonable (for the quality) price. Great service, very friendly staff backed up by a great wine selection and relaxed atmosphere. Will certainly go again.
I have been getting my vehicles serviced with Fixcarnow for approximately the past 10 years. Initially, I would take my car in for a quick oil change, then I began taking my car to Fixcarnow for major repairs. I mainly deal directly with the mechanic who are very friendly, courteous and perform the actual work on my car. What I am most pleased with is their pricing; I've asked other auto shop about pricing just to compare it with Fixcarnow and they almost alway have the best price. I have sent many of my friends there and I highly recommend this place.
Great Food!!! Smoking Hot Cashiers and a SEXY lady Shell in the back making pretty burgers!!! Hot, Fast and DELICIOUS food! Got to love THE KING!!!! Whoop Whoop Whopper!!!
Great location wonderful staff and easy access. The manager was also very helpful and courteous.Thank you!
None
None
great place to live.
I researched several schools before deciding on HAI. One of the things that stood out for me with HAI was that several people I had spoken to said, "The best massage I have ever received has been from and HAI graduate". That spoke volumes to me. I was immediately struck by the supportive nature of the office staff and directors at HAI during my interview and as a student. They are committed to not only teaching you how to be the best Massage Therapist you can be, but to assist you in meeting your goals as a student and as a graduate. The teaching quality of the instructors is excellent. I found the instructors to be sincere, knowledgeable and experienced. They make it their goal to not only instruct you on the materials but to impart thinking and problem solving from an 'outside the box' perspective to give your clients the most beneficial experience possible. I will always appreciate my time with HAI.
None
asli ada. jadi bukan fiktif. adminnya juga ramah sederhana baik hati dan tidak sombong lagi ganteng :)
None
Try not to go more than three times a day.
I recently held a sold-out event at the Lyric for my job and then my wedding shortly after. The experience was absolutely fantastic. Jack Wollman, the Box Office Manager, made the process for both events more pleasant than I could have hoped for. I can't recommend this place highly enough! It was just as perfect for my 60-person wedding as for my 500+ person work event. The rates are fantastic, too, especially compared to other area venues. You can bring in any caterer, and the tables and chairs are all included. Two thumbs up for the Lyric!!!
Great players. Great Fan Club.
Food comes out fast, portions just right, prices are fair, service is courteous and all around great experience. I think its only on the weekends they have a guy that walks around singing and playing classic PR music on his guitar. I always get the shrimp mofungo with garlic sauce my fiance gets the roast chicken with rice and beans. Wash it down with Medalla Light beer! Excellent. Will return.
None
Great place for chicken. Really friendly staff and people. Very fast and efficient.
Value for money
Great food, great service. Best Italian food in Irmo.
None
We had an amazing stay at 'Sitting on the City Wall's - we stayed in a double room. Room was all we needed incl. lamps in the bathroom that keep you warm when you get out of the shower. Winter and even spring in China can be cold so that is certainly nice for those early mornings. The hostel also organised a trip for us to the Great wall of china. In fact an amazing hike of 4 hours with stunning views. The courtyard in the hostel is a lovely place to eat, drink some nice tea or just hang out. For my kiddo (only 9) this hostel was his favourite place to stay during our trip throughout China and Japan :)) In the courtyard there is also a dartboard, a tv showing sports and just around the corner there is a playground where he socialised with some Chinese kids. In all just perfect !
Delicious!!
Brandon was extremely helpful with getting me into a new vehicle that I love! He was very honest and thorough which is hard to find sometimes at a dealer. He made the process as painless as possible and I spent very little time ever waiting! I would highly recommend Brandon to anyone looking for a good car-buying experience.
My home has never looked so fresh and clean.. Carpets stayed clean for months on end! Beautiful job!
Ich kann MK-Matratzen einfach nur Loben. Super Produkt, schnelle Lieferung, top Qualität, super Preise und die Bezahlung ist einfach. Ich kann MK-Matratzen nur empfehlen und werde auch weiterhin dort bestellen wenn ich etwas benötige. Macht weiter so!
None
I bought two pro DSLR cameras and a bunch of accessories from these guys. They know cameras, they understand your needs. Don't be shy to ask for a discount. They won't be able to give you a big one for cameras (since profit margins on cameras are pretty small), but you can get a nice one for accessories.
This place was awesome. Really liked the high tech concept. Not only that, but the food was perfect. Great restaurant in #LondonEngland.
Wonderful place, great sunset if the weather permits. Nice climbing paths to a rock bluff overlooking the Atlantic Ocean. Worth the trip.
None
Excellent food, location, store and staff. For an authentic Chicago Pizza look no further. As with most American restaurants the portion sizes are immense, and with reasonable prices as well, you certainly get more than your value for money. Excellent bar and screens as well.
I have stayed in the Solaris at Vail 3 times now, and I cannot begin to express how amazing this place is! Combine the excellent treatment that you receive upon arrival with the prime location in the heart of Vail Village, this place is hard to beat. The views of the front side of the mountain are spectacular! One gentleman, David from Elevation Resorts could not have been more helpful when helping me choose a residence for my family to stay in during our stay in Colorado. We will definitely be back next year!
I attended the Waltzy for Christmas Lunch with 22 family members and Everyone LOVED it! The food was beautiful and the service was excellent. Thanks for a great day and a belated Merry Christmas to the team! We will certainly be seeing you again in this new year :)
I lived there for 10 months. This is a beautiful apartment and is well connected to everything in Houston.
Always attentive, timely and responsible. Our family has been going to NB Auto for over a decade now and couldn't imagine going anywhere else. They are extremely trustworthy and I would recommend them to anyone.
None
Vita Dental Arts is the most caring and professional dentist office in Jersey City. They went out of their way to make me feel comfortable during my visit. I've sent friends and family there...and they've all said the same things. Also, everyone was really nice in the office.
It is.... Awesome.
I would take a massage at Equilibria over a new pair of shoes any day of the week. Really. The atmosphere is incredibly welcoming and very comfortable. I had a massage last week and I left giggling, and continued to smile for hours, because I felt good, lighter and relaxed. I have done a number of things to my back over the years, and it lets me know. So, when i start daydreaming of a massage, it's time for me to get one, in fact, I’m probably overdue. It's a quality experience and you feel the attention to detail and consideration. Absolutely wonderful, good for the body and the soul.
An Awesome School
These guys were fantastic in assisting me with my mortgage. As a first time buyer I needed all the help I could get! Fox Davidson provided me patient, solid advice which helped us get exactly what we wanted, at the right price.
I was looking for a place to rent in Sandy Hill and went for a viewing of a one bedroom at 485 King Edward with my girlfriend. The agent was quick with calling me back. The apartment was really nice, and actually looked like the photos online, unlike the first one we saw on Stewart and Friel. We ended up renting nearby because somebody rented the apartment before we made up our mind.
I came in to these guys Feb of 2013. They replaced my windshield for me. Extremely fast install. When I set my appointment I was told an hour 1/2 for completion but they had me out in a little under an hour. After I had been driving for a few days I noticed an air leak at the bottom. When I came in to get it taken care of they didn't just put extra glue at the bottom, they done the whole job again to make sure it would set right the second time. Everyone was friendly and the service was great and taking care of me the way they did I will never go anywhere else for my Window needs and will be coming back for my tint needs. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED to my friends and family.
the food and service here is great !!!!
Fast, friendly and very fair priced.
None
I woke up to water on my kitchen floor and freaked out. Called a plumber who said I needed a new refrigerator. I called the company and a man named Joe came by that afternoon and fixed the problem. My wallet is very happy and my drinks are cold! LOL
None
None
My daughter has been to many dentists and this is by far, a top rated one for her. She received excellent care and the staff is wonderful! Great place and I highly recommend.
Fantastic experience. Dr. and staff very personal with a excellent result! Highly recommended
Recently I stayed in Clayton, NM thanks to a snowstorm. The Luna was showing a so I went. I was affordable and had a nice old fashion atmosphere. The staff were very nice.
None
I normally don't write reviews, but I've a bone to pick with Brad's review below. He feels that Sam's Bar-B-Q should serve more meats than pork and sausage. Seriously, Bradshaw's BBQ on the other side of Gunter serves only pulled pork, not even sausage and they use the label 'BBQ'. Sam's more than deserves their name. He also feels that Sam's fare is 'nothing fancy', but he's too short-sighted to realize that 'nothing fancy' is perfectly acceptable of Bar-B-Q and that a butt doesn't need to be over-spiced with some crazy blend of rub to be amazing. Why Brad seems to think that high schoolers working at a small Ma-and-Pa restaurant is a bad thing, I have no idea. Expecting a small, hometown hole-in-the-wall restaurant to employ only adults is discrimination and just illogical. There's only so many places for high schoolers to work and Sam's is just a good of a place as any. His opinion of sausage is his own. Their sausage is just like any other sausage. He's nitpicking, trying to find something wrong where there's nothing wrong. He thinks their beans are mushy. Reality check: that's how beans are when they're cooked. I've been stationed at Gunter since 2010 and we eat out at Sam's at least once a month and I can tell you this: their pork is great, most of the fat is separated right before it goes on your plate, the sausage is delicious, and their fries are fresh, crispy, and piping hot. This is a consistent thing that's been going on for years. Having a high schooler run your cash register or separate fat from meat is not going to ruin your meal. Get off your high horse and enjoy some friggin' pig.
VERY FRIENDLY STAFF. Absolutely love their $5.00 meatball footlong subs. EXCELLENT!
I brought them my damaged watch and they didn't disappoint. they were able to repair it flawlessly. highly professional, excellent quality repair and it was taken care of while I waited. I approve.
Just got done with my first appointment with my new dentist Scott Grant, DMD. I've been to a lot of dentists and this by far is the best one I've been to! Right as I walked in the door they were friendly and actually giving away a BBQ to a patient for referring more patients, and they treat you like family there, making sure your as anxiety free and comfortable as possible. There up to date in technology too, they can make a porcelain crown right there in the office. If you need a dentist or just want a better one give them a call and let them know Cory Maas referred you (so I can potentially get a macbook air). Oh ya, if you refer 4 people they just give you an iPad mini...who does that!?!?!?!?!
I want to Thank Mr. Kaplan for all his help during my horrible financial crisis. Thngs have worked out for me and this is all owed to his advice. It is not everyday a client will meet someone who is honest especially in the field of law. I am so appreciative of his help and his friendly personality. -Anne November 1, 2013
Stayed here in early 2014. This is a real gem - the rooms were impressive with terrific views. The restaurant, although small, was absolutely superb. I could not recommend this any higher.
None
This has to be the best buffet in the STATE OF GEORGIA IF NOT ON THE EAST COAST AND THRU THE SOUTH!!!! HELL IM HEADING THERE IN A FEW TO SEE WHAT IT DO, JUST WANTED TO LEAVE THIS REVIEW SO EVERYBODY KNOWS!!! 10/10 ((( TASTE LIKE GRANDMAs COOKING!!! )))
Yogesh ko paas karo balaji.....
Long time customers who typically purchase whole bean coffee. Consistently fresh, not over roasted, and they are careful about not letting bad beans get through.
Ben is a consummate professional and knowledgeable of all things in the world of insurance and investments. His hard work and tenacity create proven results and I would recommend Ben for all of your insurance needs!
Big Big Big Thank you for the last minute help you gave me with printing my letter heads and flyers. Was a big help to get them all done on time.
I wanted to share my experience with Amanda at Salon NV. Let me first say that I have extremely fine, thin hair and I change my color and cut about as often as I change my mind! I first discovered Amanda at Outback Hair over 5 years ago and knew instantly that she would be doing my hair from that point on. I got my hair cut, colored, highlighted and deep conditioned today and am thrilled with the result. I stopped by my office afterwards where my boss (who has impeccable style) stopped and asked me who did my hair because it looked fabulous! She said the colors blended so well in fact, that she was rethinking her hair color she had just received in Highland Village! Amanda is professional, kind, extremely knowledgeable and always friendly. As for me and my hair, we will NEVER go to anyone else!!!
Great food, good weekend karaoke, awesome customer service. Great place to bring your friends!
Very good donuts. Extremely nice and very clean...
Cathy teaches other lawyers across the country how to file bankruptcy. I highly recommend her. You can't do better. She has trained a number of other attorneys how to properly file bankruptcy and how to defend foreclosure cases. She has always proven she cares. I have been providing bankruptcy seminars to other lawyers as well for Lorman and NBI. Cathy has consistently been professional, patient and compassionate in all the years that I have followed her as another NACBA member and trainer. I don’t often recommend other attorneys because we all compete for clients. But I can’t recommend her highly enough.
have tinted 3 cars at tint world so far. always excellent customer service, and a quality job. have never encountered anyone rude their, or I wouldn't be a returning customer!
None
professionelle Beratung, rasche Terminvereinbarung und nettes Ambiente - Preis/Leistung paßt!
None
None
I recently was shopping for my engagement ring and wedding bands. My (now) husband and I decided to go to Ben Dannie from the advice we read on Yelp and Google. The owner talked to us for nearly 20 minutes about how to rate a diamond and what kind of diamonds to look out for. We gave our budget for the ring and after my fiancee and I found the diamond we wanted, we were quoted a very fair price. When we told them we wanted some time to think about it, they actually encouraged us to shop around some more. We didn't find anything we liked nearly as much. We later went back and purchased the diamond and even had the ring custom designed based on my idea of how I wanted the setting. If you are serious about finding a quality diamond, find this great store!
Had the El Rico shrimp burrito. Fabulous. Very fast, attentive, and friendly service. We will return!
Amazing food, and amazing atmosphere. I highly recommend if you are out treat someone to fine dining.
I've been there and purchased Parts twice, Parts were in stock, technical advice was on the money and prices were very good. Refreshing to deal with a small business and get away from the monopoly of contractors and up-selling of the other places. Highly recommended...you will not be sorry.
I recall the 1st time I went to Miss Shirly’s it reminded me of Saturday mornings as a kid just elevated. I don’t think there is 1 thing I don’t like on this menu. Every time I go I get the same thing the Funky Monkey Bread, which is to DIE for, and The Mac Crabby. I’m hungry now.
None
The staff is excellent. They always greet me kindly. The office runs like a well-oiled machine. Listen to all instructions and ask all questions up front. The full healing time is about 6-8 weeks, meaning the clearest vision. Be prepared for that. I definitely do not regret having this procedure done with these professionals. The cost is reasonable compared with other places but you are also paying for the years of experience that Drs. Dello Russo have. Get yourself the free consultation at least. You won't regret it.
Comida riquísima, establecimiento acogedor y servicio magnífico.
Pizza was Great! The Hummus is Awesome.....They need to put more bread with it though. Food is always good. Sometimes a long wait....
Mr Whiteru is an exellent lawyer who is caring, diligent, and very hard working. He doesn't slack and is very professional. I am forever in his debt... Thank you Okie!
The service at BMW of Peabody has been excellent. I have been servicing my car there for the last 12 years. I am leasing my first BMW from them. My client advisor Jamie McCoy, was great to work with. Thanks Again
I just purchased a car from Lunde's Peoria Volkswagen and I have to say it was the smoothest car buying experience I have ever had.The staff was very friendly and never once did I ever feel pressured. My sales person Wayne was just great! He was very helpful and informative. Also Xavier was very helpful and took the time to show me around the beautiful show floor. I definitely recommend you purchase your car here.
Loooooved it! Ate here while visiting Chicago and it was GREAT! Service was excellent & food was delicious! It is small but definitely worth it to experience the food and service.
Jacob, Is very knowledgeable about handguns. I learned a lot from taking his course Oct 20,2012. I never shot a handgun in my life and looking forward to shooting a 38 revolver a Smith & Wesson. Jacob and several students gave my husband and I places where we can try different guns out before we purchase one. We are new to the state of Colorado and all this information is so wonderful. I would like to Thank everyone in the class for the helpful information and all the laughs!!! Had a great day Gob bless all. Namaste, Zeula ( Aka Debbie Lee Dickinson )
Staff was excellent. I worked with 2 gentlemen who took the time to show and explain the nuances and differences between the Glock 23, 27 and S&W M&P .40 C and Shield. Their prices were very competitive with online, as Buds Gun Shop wanted $30 less for the same gun, but FFL fee would have made the difference moot. I'd rather support a local store anyway...
I first starting going to Apple Valley Chiropractic & Rehab after getting rear-ended in 2010. I started going to Mandy for lower back massages to loosen up the muscles. She did an amazing job! She was very friendly and really made me feel at home. I started seeing Jon a few sessions later and he was the same way. They are both very professional and really know what they are talking about. I had to get a few x-rays and MRI and they explained to me what they saw and what I should do to help strengthen by lower back. I have since moved to Colorado and I am afraid to go to anyone else. I have tried to go to a few massage therapists out here but no one matches up to Mandy. I make sure to schedule appts with them whenever I am in town because I know what kind of service I am going to get when I am there.
None
The food is fantastic. The interior decor is Simple, yet pleasingly cozy. The owner Eric is very hospitable. I highly recommend this Soul Food restaurant. Enjoy!
Great resort.Quiet and great service. BONUS it is attached to the Westin Hotel!
Home
None
An excellent, clean facility. My Service Adviser (Dane) was efficient and friendly, and the technicians that handled my oil change were equally kind and proficient. Both this location and the Roseville one were good experiences as a vehicle owner, and I wouldn't hesitate to refer people looking for trustworthy and affordable car care to either place.
Nice place to work nd make good money
My best Thai food in the world
I bought a new car at this dealership from Mark Shapiro, who was on it with pricing, respect, and honesty with the hard questions. I'd recommend him to anyone looking for a VW.
My fiancé and I were specifically looking for locally-owned mattress stores in the northern virginia area and came across Urban Mattress, which had great reviews on all of the local sites (yelp, google) and mattress underground. I also really wanted a latex mattress because latex is more environmentally-friendly (although frequently more expensive). I did my homework before going to any stores, and found Nathaniel, the owner of Urban Mattress, to be incredibly honest, and easy to work with. The 100% talalay (highest quality latex) mattresses were all comfortable and affordable, but Nathaniel suggested my fiancé and I try out a talalay/soy foam mattress that was less expensive, which we ultimately bought and are incredibly happy with! We also love the two pillows we bought, the free local shipping, and the 2% of sales donated to a local charity. Urban Mattress was a great find!
None
Excellent organic bread made with soaked grains and sourdough, what else could one ask for?
I was very impressed with the neatness of the facility and the presentation of the cars on the showroom floor. I found it very easy to work with Mike H., as he answered all my questions in a positive manner. That is appreciated from a customer viewpoint. The price offered on my trade in (2003 Silverado LTD Diesel) was very fair. Picked the new vehicle up the next at the time as promised. Mike went over all of the various functions and got the OnStar up and running. Overall great experience and I would recommend the dealership to anyone without any reservations. Thanks Rick
None
My team and I are working downtown on Sunday. We ordered 9 different meals to be delivered. Estimated delivery time 30-45 minutes. Driver showed up in 25 minutes. Great service. All the food was hot, tasty and much less costly than some of our other lunch ventures. Will keep them in my address book for future lunches.
Dean and Lisa have GREAT hoops!
Sehr schönes Ladenlokal und gute Beratung
Tammy the property manager was very professional and helpful!
Dr. Upston has been nothing short of amazing! I have been visiting Dr. Blake for a few years now and from day one he has impressed me. The time he spends on the initial review and explaining what is going on will really show how much he cares. Every visit has been incredible. I am very active with marathons, triathlons, and soccer and Dr has been vital to my health and well being. I have NEVER dealt with any health care professional that treats me more like a friend than a client. I have and will continue to recommend Dr. Upston and his crew to all my friends and family. Thanks Dr!
nice collections with reasonable price
My elderly parents live here. They really love it. The facilities are really nice and the staff is very helpful and friendly.
OK, everyone is entitled to a mistake once in awhile....and I am not saying Fox Honda has not made any BUT I am extremely satisfied with their service before, during and after the sale of a car. I have bought 5 cars from them just for my wife and I. So just from that statement it will tell you that I am a loyal customer. Thanks to Jack (who has retired), Russell (who has taken his place), Scott (the GM) and Vince from service. All A+ guys.
Well done, Silverprint. It is fantastic that you have achieved so much and are offering such a great service. Digital photography is a terrific advance in technology but has still a long way to go to beat the involvement you have as a photographer with film. I have placed several orders in the past and never had cause to complain. Hopefully, in the near future I will have the chance to visit the shop - just wish there was one more locally. Good luck for the future and many thanks from a grateful film photographer.
One of the best places to hang out. Their non-ending menu of drinks-hot and cold, snacks and food is amazing. Vibrant location with great decor!
Wide variety of Food, not just Chinese. Crab Rangoons, Pork and Shrimp Wonton Soup, Catfish Mai, Sauteed Brocolini and chocolate Creme Brulee would be a large but mild first meal, add a second soup and desert and it would feed two. Want it spicy? Sub Teriaki Chicken with hot mustard for the rangoons and get lamb blrani instead of catfish
None
The best ice cream in Wroclaw.
After the dealership told me I need a new muffler at $840+Labor, TLC quoted me $120+Labor. When I arrived the tech looked at the problem, told me I did NOT need a new muffler, and fixed it by replacing a small section of the muffler instead, for only $50 and in just 20 mins!
Ermoso
Jean Leon is a pleasure to work with. His team is highly professional, dependable and do excellent work. I called him at 10:00 a.m. and he had my entire job site clean up by 3:00 that afternoon, on a Saturday! I have used his services many times and will continue to do so. He is a great asset to my business. Johnny Pidgeon President Johnny Fix It Home Improvement
Super Anlage. Toller Service.
Dr. Harmon is great at what he does. He makes sure you're taken care of and actually explains where your soreness or problem is coming from and lays out a thorough treatment plan to get you back on your feet. He is very professional, the staff is great, and you will be very pleased with his services. I highly recommend him!
Nice rink. Adult night had a lot of good skaters.
I was really impressed by Small World Moving. When I called to request a quote, Cebrina was quick, polite and efficient. The cost was significantly lower than other local movers. The movers themselves were polite and fast -- called to confirm their arrival, moved quickly and without damaging any items, and even shaved off a few minutes to keep my cost at an even amount. Would highly recommend them!
None
Was in Paris late July this year. A friend of mine just visited the city and gave me a list of restaurants she went. I booked Josephine for lunch not knowing much about it. Once I got there and saw a valet outside I knew this place would be interesting. The moment I sat down I was given a glass of white (free of charge). I'm guessing that this is a traditional thing. The menu comes and its all in French (turns out there's an English menu), so I simply asked what's good. The waiter pointed to the Veal, "It's very good" he said. I ordered it even though it was 43 euros. I also ordered a half order of house pate. Long story short, the pate was fabulous. Then comes the veal....it was absolutely the best piece of meat I've had in my 30 years of existence, even the mash potatoes that came with it was superb. I savoured every bite and was extremely glad I didn't cheap out on not ordering it. The only pity was that I saw an absolutely delicious looking Napolean being served at other tables, and I didn't get it because it was a 30minute wait (it said on the menu but I had the French one). So make sure you get that too because I basically saw everyone else get it. Bottom line, if you like classic French food, go there. This place made the other places I went in Paris pedestrian (I went to modern French places after that). Really try it out!
I've had storage units with other companies, but this is the best one! The place is very neat and clean. Glenda is one of the best managers I've ever seen...She was very helpful when I came to check out the units, explained everything in detail, and made sure that I understood everything, asked if I had questions, and also mentioned that they had boxes, tape, locks and whatever I needed to pack my items. I left the property knowing that my items would be safe.
Simple Yummieeee food :-D
Sehr sehr lecker! Calzone und canneloni absolut zu empfehlen. Würden wir jeder zeit wieder hin gehen !!!
Which time? I've enjoyed it every time i have visited the bakery. It's like "Winfield is alive with the taste of vanilla sugar", I recommend for every one to visit Vanilla Sugar @ least once and decide for yourself, try the peanut butter sandwich cookie, or the peanut butter filled cupcake, those are my favorite, and u can't leave behind the macrons, they are the ones made out of meringue, "Oh my god i am getting full just by talking about it". Anyway you would have to try to believe. OH, I almost forgot the most important thing, Ya see what sweets do to you! LOL, the people are the best, they always make sure you leave vanilla sugar happy. (Maria Briseno)
These Patriots actually did fight in the trenches!
All their work is done properly!
We had our Daughter's First Birthday here on March 1st 2014. We took "Mandap" for about 100 people. Loved the hall and ambiance. We spoke to a gentleman named Ashok. He was very accommodating and professional. We were little skeptical about food based on previous reviews. But Ashok has assured us that food will be good. All our guests loved the food. Most of the halls got chandeliers, decorated walls and a nice stage. We cant ask for anything more. We ended up finishing our party within our budget without compromising on anything. I would definitely recommend this place to a friend. Thanks again Mr.Ashok. We will come back to Royal Alberts Palace for our next party!
I have used skymaid Cleaning Service twice now and they are fantastic! I never used a cleaning service before so I have nothing to compare my experiences to. However, I have no complaints at all about skymaidservice. Both time they have done great job, after their work the window sills were dustless, every nook and cranny of my apartment was mopped clean. They also did it in an incredibly short amount of time. From now i will always call them in any type of cleaning needs. Thanks skymaid
This is the best school in Loudoun County. After many school tours, we fell in love with this campus. The teachers are amazing! Our boys have learned a tremendous amount in a positive environment. We already have them enrolled for next school year. We couldn't be happier!
I've been to lots of weddings over the years and Nathan is the best photographer I've come across. He has and incredible manner, always gets everyone grinning from ear to ear, always in the right place at the right time, and never in the way (in that annoying way that some photographers have!). That's why we got him to do our wedding earlier this year, and we couldn't be happier with the photos. Nathan, you're a legend, thank you!
I gave a lot of detail about the work I wanted done on the form I sent with my boots (form available on the company website), so I didn't have any need to speak with Dave on the phone. I had a full resole and a bit of repair work done. The work was completed quickly, correctly, and the cost was very reasonable. I will certainly send climbing shoes and boots back to Dave for any future repairs or resoles.
This is a fantastic gem in the middle of the country. The owners have poured their hearts and souls into the place and you can tell. The food is fresh and delicious and the whole place has a great energy. Get your friends and go!
Ruby Tuesday is hands down the best restaurant I have been to in Mt. Pleasant. The Atmosphere was phenomenal, the Food was perfect, and the Value was amazing. This is the only place I have ever tipped 50% but the service was fantastic and deserved every penny of it.
Great sushi love this place
I was very pleased with the honest, knowledgeable, professional help from Jeremy and Blue Mountain Gallery during my recent visit. I would recommend stopping by Blue Mountain Gallery for your professional picture framing needs.
Very good chips and Salsa. They didn't let the drinks or the chips get empty at all. Food was well prepared and hot and tasty. All the staff were pleasant and attentive. We will be back.
Delicious food
We were invited to The Mercat Bar through business for dinner and a wine tasting with no preconceived ideas about the venue, but goodness were we surprised and ended up having one of the best evenings we have had in a long time. The food was delicious the wines absolutely gorgeous and Grahame our host couldn't have been more welcoming. This is a venue you could choose for numerous outings. Just an early supper on the way home from work, a casual meal before or after the cinema, or a whole evening spend enjoying good food and wine with a special person or lots of friends. It is not haute cuisine, nor does it pretend to be, just using excellent quality produce making it very good value.
I eat there about 5 days a week, and I am not a vegan. My favorite juice The Volcano. You will fall in love with the almond milk. The entire menu is wonderful.
None
Bought a 2013 Tundra Rock Warrior from Jasen Sutherland on January 11th. The service was beyond anything I've ever experienced! Jasen, Jake, Billie, Jennifer, Scott and Jimmy all treated me with the highest integrity and respect. My purchase was done efficiently and in a timely fashion. Couldn't have asked for more! Thanks to all involved that made my purchase incredible! I will forever buy @ Beaman!!
Bought my car for cash at a fair price on the spot. Best part was I did not have to deal with all the hassle of selling a used car. Meeting with strangers,dealing with cash, ect.
Cambodian Thai is hands down the best Thai restaurant in Michiana. They have a "spicy scale" of 1 - 10, and even the spiciest people I know max out around a seven there. Supposedly you can do a triple ten, but I am not that adventurous. If you are in the mood for something basic, you can't go wrong with the Pad See Ew or the Cashew Nuts with Chicken. The Panang Curry is great! They just expanded the restaurant from a place that seated around a dozen to around 80.
Dr. Jamal and her staff have been thorough and had excellent customer service in delivering my invisalign treatment. I can say with a smile that I am now proud to flash my pearly whites!! Their hours also make it very easy for someone to come in for treatments. They also never make me wait - first Dr. ever I think!!
It's really a great club! the protein shake bar is awesome for after workouts(or before if you're into that sort of thing) all the equipment its generally clean and up to par and most members are friendly, encouraging, helpful and full of conversation! The pools are neat but if you're not a parent or elderly, you might want to go at an early or really late hour, for they have aerobics and obnoxious kids(swimming lessons). The outside hot tub is great anytime and you can usually get it to yourself for a few minutes, which is nice! All in all, this is an excellent gym and i recommend it to anyone! Also, the staff is great! They will contact you personally if you express any concern, i'm honestly just amazed. if you're looking for a gym in idaho falls, Go to this one. its not just a gym, its a club and its worth it.
Great food and service! Ask for spicy! Friendly atmosphere! Let's eat there often!
Mike Whitesel helped my wife and I find the perfect vehicle after looking at many different lots. He was easy going and not pushy whatsoever. He made the car buying experience and easy and enjoyable one. I will more than likely buy my next car from him. Thanks! A+++++
We recently moved to the East side of IC and decided to take our 2 boxers to Best Friends. I'm so glad we did! They are by far the best veterinary clinic in the area (I've been to several in IC and NL). Dr. Vercande and her staff are more than welcoming and really made the experience special for each of my dogs. When one of our dogs, Roxy, became terminally ill unexpectedly, they went above and beyond in not only the care they provided her but in the sympathy they showed to us when we had to make the difficult decision to put her down. I have been blown away by the level of service and care they provide. I would highly recommend them to anyone and look forward to taking any pet of mine there!
This place is amazing. Dr. Blick is an absolutely fascinating person and a great Dr. I would highly recommend her and her practice! Need your eyes checked, look no further and her plans for expansion are incredible!
Ribeye was cooked just right. Chicken nachos were ok.
I took my cat there yesterday to get neutered and all of his shots. I also have taken all of our pets to get their shots there. I have never had a bad experience with them. The staff is always friendly and helpful. At discharge, they took the time to explain everything to me in detail. I will continue to take my pets there for their shots. Thank you for looking out for the people that don't have a lot of money to take them to a vet that will naturally charge them a lot of money to get the same procedure done for a 1/4 of the price.
None
formidable team of brothers. MBA, CPA, and JURIST DOCTORATE. good solid advice.
None
I recently had service work done on my Expedition. Great service, great price, and kept their word! Like any business they want to make money, BUT, my experience is they are more than willing to work with you. Just ask and they are reasonable. I would recommend their service department to anyone.
Dr. Tellman's staff is really friendly! They get you in and out the door promptly. Dr. Tellman is a great dentist. He doesn't push you for things that are not necessary. They are very mindful of making sure you are comfortable at all times. The office itself is open with TVs to help keep you entertained while they work on you or while you are waiting. Did I mention there's fresh cookies when you check out!?! They're great!
When I'm looking for a gently pre-driven car, I rarely look any farther than Chignoli Auto Sales. This is the 3rd car I've bought from this dealership and I have yet to be disappointed. Purchasing a car from Chignoli is like purchasing a car from a trusted family member. They make it as painless as possible and a first-class experience from the first test drive to the final deal. I was especially pleased with my most recent visit and purchase because Gregg and Marc were able to help me get out of a jam with my previous car while making my new purchase quick and easy. I couldn't have asked for it to go any smoother and I am very grateful for their help and fairness. If you're looking for a good pre-driven car at a good price, you can always find it at Chignoli
None
Very helpful staff, very knowledgeable. Highly recommended.
We recently used ASAP Movers for a long distance move from the Central Coast to Northern California. I have to say that we were very happy with the service we received. We got several quotes from different local companies, all of them were out of our budget. After looking over different moving company websites we decided that the service provided by ASAP Movers seemed to be as good as any of the others. Kasey Fox came to our home to give us an accurate estimate based on the amount of stuff we had. I felt that he was very personable and professional, getting as much information as possible about our needs. The quote he gave us not only fit our budget but included the same services other companies provided. The morning of our move the crew arrived on-time and immediately got to loading the truck. The guys worked very diligently and efficiently. Within 4 hours they had packed up everything from our house and garage. They even provided wardrobe boxes for our hanging clothes in the closets and big crates for our TV and framed artwork. The 2 guys were very nice and really seemed to care about handling our belongings with care, especially the boxes we marked FRAGILE. The following morning, the truck arrived at our new home a few minutes earlier than expected, which was great! Again, the crew worked fast and had all of our furniture and boxes unloaded and set up in our new house after just 2 hours. Overall if you are considering a move to or from the Central Coast I definitely recommend using ASAP Movers.
I love the Rabbit Hole, try the lamb shank or the chocolate bacon!
I have 2 personal and 8 business vehicles serviced there on a regular basis. Always get prompt, professional service at a fair rate. Never leave feeling gouged or lied to. I have sent both my mother and sister there as well and I normally do not refer family members anywhere. A nice side benefit is the record keeping they do. I can always go back and find out what was done to which vehicle with no issues. This has helped once or twice when a part I had replaced broke and was under warranty. I did not even have to ask Roy's - they simply told me that the part was covered by the manufacturer and took care of all the details!
None
A long established family plumbing business. Reliable, trustworthy and friendly.
Church of the Harvest is a body of Spirit-filled believers united in pursuit of corporate and individual Destiny. Through partnership with the Holy Spirit, we fulfill the mandate to share the gospel of Jesus Christ through bible teaching and practical ministry. Our services schedule: †Sunday Morning Worship and Healing at 10AM †Wednesday Night Bible Study at 7PM. †Saturday Morning Prayer at 9-10AM. I have been a member of Church of the Harvest for over a year and love them! A church that is full of Love and compassion for all. Clear easy to understand messages that are scripturally supported by a very dynamic Pastor, Fred Timmons.
We order banners from here all the time, very fast turnaround and affordable prices
None
We have been taking our fussy vehicles here now for about 10 years (we've lived in Arlington for 30) and would not go anywhere else. Highly qualified mechanics, outstanding customer service, utterly honest - highly ethical. They will work with you to solve any problem. As in our case, with a couple of older vehicles, they searched for reliable used parts to keep our costs lower (for a Mercedes and a Suburban). If you are buying a used car as our daughter just did, they will give a thorough assessment. They are willing to discuss their opinions about car performance and reliability if you are in market for a vehicle. They also work on classic/antique cars - the owner, Wade Aylor, is a specialist in this as well. Your car will be treated with TLC!
Never had a better haircut in Manhattan/My faith in the barbershop was restored.
Murphy Road Animal Hospital was the place I chose after a lot of research upon adopting my dog Jack last year. The reviews were all very good, the only negative thing written was that their pricing is a bit too high--this however I did not believe to be true in my visits. In my personal experience I have felt that they give some of the best care, are ready to answer any questions I have, and have good pricing. When I first adopted Jack, I was still in college and on a tight budget, however, they were willing to help spell out the different costs and they all were reasonable. As a new dog owner, I felt that they really took the time to take good care of my dog and answer any questions/concerns I had. They are very involved with making sure we make it to all our checkups and shots, and they also send out a few emails a year reminding us helpful things about different holidays and seasons. I would HIGHLY recommend this vet for any and all pet lovers in the Nashville area.
I'd recommend the Holt Cat Fort Worth Field Service shop, because the technician got out to the machine, found out what was wrong with the winch, and took care of it. I was very pleased with the work they did on my CAT D6H track-type tractor.
None
I had been to another dealership an hour before I walked into Chevrolet of Naperville and they told me I'd never be able to get what I wanted for the price I wanted to pay and kind of chuckled at me. Then they quoted me a price almost double what I was willing to pay and what was listed on their website. Their solution was to just finance more. The staff at Chevrolet of Naperville worked with me and found us the perfect car within our price range. Thank you! This is our second vehicle from a Dan Wolf owned dealership - and we'll definitely be back again.
Rebekah at Public Storage has always handled my storage requests over the past years with professional courtesy as well as personal care. No question is ever unimportant, nor personal concern not attentively handled with respect. My storage needs have fluctuated over moves as well as career moves and she has consistently been of assistance.
A holy and deeply moving site to visit.
Dr. Nemec & his staff are very supportive of any health concern, issue and will go out of their way to help patients with any health challenge. I have seen patients heal from all varieties of health issues ranging from type 2 diabetes to Chrohns disease to cancer. Dr. Nemec is very versed in nutrition and has numerous entities of education for patients. His purpose of teaching towards patients is phenomenal. Total Health Institute is truly a mind, body, and spirit center and again has a large emphasis on education especially nutrition and thorough understanding. Would recommend to all family members!
One of the best breakfasts in the Boise-Meridian area. Wonderful Salad bar, and great lunch and dinner entrees as well. They are very reasonably priced, and we always have great wait staff. Will continue to come again and again.
I had a very positive experience at Mossy Nissan Kearny Mesa. I bought a 2011 Nissan Rouge and I LOVE it. The sales staff was very nice and accommodating. My salesman Bill was very kind and really helped me through the process of buying my very first car. We negotiated a great price and they were very flexible. I get so excited every time I get in my new Rouge, I love driving it!! I would highly recommended Mossy Nissan Kearny Mesa. It's also pretty cool how they take your picture after and put it online so you share with your family and friends!
They do food right! Awesome happy hour.
I live in the opposite part of town but make a point to visit the Tuck Shop at least once a week, if I lived closer it might be a daily visit. Food is delicious, home made, prices really beyond reasonable and service with a smile. What more could you ask for?
Un trato bueno, Antonio el de la charcutería genial me ha aconsejado perfectamente.
Great service. Great food. Classy place.
None
this place is the hidden gem! Food was very delicious, servings are quite huge. You can literally order one dish for two people. Our kids enjoyed the restaurant as well. We''ll be back for sure!
None
Amazing food. Amazing service. Not only this location but even the other locations. I've yet to be let down.
None
Want to take the time to thank the crew at Islands Tanning Raleigh Hills!!! Mike, and Carly really know how to treat a guy. Friendly, funny, clean, and very proffesional. Never once felt pressured. Really feel like they had my best interest in mind. Amazing all the health products they have!! Not just a tanning salon, but truly a med spa.
Great place to go for dinner. Chill atmosphere, low lighting and phenomenal food. Hoping to go back soon.
جنة الدنيا
The highlight of our Maui trip! The molokini and turtle snorkeling trip is amazing! Great staff who is very friendly and very knowledgeable. This is definitely the best snorkeling trip to take. The food and drinks served were great too!
Dali vrsite dostavu na brajdicu terminal
I have used Robert Walters to recruit a web designer and two digital markers over the last few years. great service, and more importantly really great hires!
Buena comida, buen servicio, buenos precios, hy más para estar en plena zona hotelera!
None
None
We just returned July 13th. This place is huge and absolutely amazing
I found the best and affordable apartment in my budget during London trip. I loved it. It was good to find all the services at one place.
It is by far the best place to eat in East Grand Forks and Grand Forks! Service is excellent and the food is simply amazing!
Great food and great atmosphere. The entire staff is very courteous, helpful and friendly. I enjoyed the steak more than usual. Excellent ***** !
És el millor bar que he estat. Si t'agrada jugar al billar hi has d'anar perquè té 6 billars.
The friendliest barista's, the best Illy coffee and perfect contemporary decor.
None
None
None
Excellent rapport Qualité - Prix, j'y retournerai sans hésiter
None
I stayed at a holiday cottage managed by Poppies in Charmouth and it was so well organised, the house was spotless and the entire family was very impressed with the professionalism. Graham was extremely helpful and the ladies who work with him, very friendly.
They're very quick to respond and helpful. I would recommend.
None
Highly recommend...
Atmosphere is cute, and the food is delicious! Best fries I've had in awhile, but beware: large here means large!
This is a GREAT place to have a wedding reception or any other kind of party
Nice family park
My experience at B's Barber Shop has always been great. I look forward to my appointments. Each cut or color I get is done perfectly the way I want it. The atmosphere is always positive and friendly. Brad and his family are welcoming and fun. I would recommend this place again and again!!
Great people great product. I would for sure use this place again.
None
David and his team has been awesome to work with and very accurate. Highly recommend them!
I recently switched all of our insurances over to Bob after comparing pricing. Any time I have had a question about the correct coverage or about adding new coverage it has been answered quickly. I would definitely recommend them to anyone.
I was dealt with in a professional manner. The sales person Tim Wichmann was very helpful in moving my purchase of my 2010 Hyundai Elantra along. I would recommend Mirak Hyundai to anyone.
AMAZING!!!!! OMG I had been to 10 other bridal boutiques and none of them made me feel as beautiful as Renee’s. Sara and Renee helped me and their positive energy was incredible. Renee was so creative and Sara was fun! Their gown selection was varied which was nice. Renee’s goal seemed to be that she would do whatever it would take to make me happy and she succeeded! I bought my dress there yesterday. I’m so excited for my wedding for the first time through this entire planning process.
This is store is one of a kind! I have not seen one like it! They really have the best Brazilian and Malaysian weaves I have ever seen. The Brazilian hair is off the hook, it feels so smooth and soft. I washed the hair about 5 times and it still feels the same as it did when I bought it. My best friend purchased her Brazilian full lace wig when I bought mine and I cant believe how good it looks. I wont go any where else only Natural Wigs. Not to mention the owner is so cool, she has alopecia, she's bald, and you would not know she's wearing a wig unless you look at her before and after pictures.
None
I started a new job in Washington DC. I had been here 2 weeks when the Transmission went out of my Buick Park Avenue. I had to get a tow from the Triple A, they are listed as an approved service center. I got the car to the lot, we knew I had a problem, but not yet how serious. Set me up for an appointment to look into the matter. Quick service, quick follow up, it turns out the transmission was completely shot. They offered one of the transmission repair facilities that they use often and offered to make tow arrangemnets to get the car there. The transmission work, rebuild and installation was going to cost more the car was worth, I decided to sale the car to junk dealer. It took 5 days to work out all paperwork in Ohio and Virginia to get that accomplished. Never complained once about the car being on their lot, all of the time it took to fine, mail and register titles from one state to another. I felt sad about the Buick, it was like family, it was acar I used to do consulting all over hte Mid West and it did get here to the East Coast. The car had to dragged onto the tow truck, the transmission was that damaged; I go in the service area to pay my inspection fees, which is certainly in line with Ohio prices, much less DC Metro area prices and the Manager waved the fee. What a Blessing.
Great Mattress!
None
Harry Hellen is one of the good guys in the financial services industry. He is ethical, honest and truly cares about his clients. If you're looking for a cookie-cutter approach with old ideas, Harry is NOT your guy. He is constantly seeking out individualized solutions for his clients, and working for THEM, no one else.
Who likes to sweat? I know I'm on the never ending quest for the next great workout in Philly, and I'm glad I took my search to this studio. I tried the Rittenhouse Rowzone classes after recommendations from my coworkers and a great Living Social deal. And now I'm back for more! Rowzone bootcamp classes combine rowing machine sets on the erg with weights and calisthenics. Each class I've been to has been different, based upon the instructor and the day. Usually it's a good mix of cardio and weights that keeps your heart rate up throughout the entire class. The room is well stocked with top of the line ergs, lots of weights, mats, towels and resistance bands. Every instructor I've had has been good - they're a great mix between motivational and form-focused. I'm not sure what the qualification is for being an instructor here, but it doesn't seem like everyone has been a rower. I rowed in college, though, and know that the form they teach in the class is spot on. All in all, a great workout and a very fun 45 minute sweatfest. Look out for Living Social deals to try it out, or get one of their beginner packages.
None
In Lovejoy's Tea Room, I was a queen, a very queer queen, but I queen indeed. I felt pampered and royal and got to eat teeny tiny sandwiches and scones along with fancy tea. Tables reserved for Queens, Kings and, all Royalty were appropriate, though some of my servants felt left out and I would ask for a separate table for peasants. Though, all in all, I thoroughly enjoyed this fine eatery.
Got my tiger explorer 1200 yesterday. Brandon in sales and Duane the GM were outstanding. Everyone treated me wonderfully. Did few test rides then the road the bmw rt 1200 and bmw gs 1200 and came back to these guys and after jumping on the explorer 1 more time I understood right then and there that was my bike. Thanks for everything and for a really good price too.
We had a great weekend trip. All of the staff members were very friendly. On our trail ride, the leader took the time to listen to every little thing my 6 year old had to question about and comment on. She was well educated and patient. The indoor water park was awesome, though the water was pretty chilly. There were others commenting on it as well. The outside water park area was great too, though the weather was cooler so we weren't there long. We upgraded our room to a suite and were definitely not disappointed! The full kitchen was nice; we were able to make most of our meals and save a few bucks. I will say there was some trash left on our patio that hadn't been cleaned before we got there, and the pull out mattress from the couch had stains on it. You saw it as you pull the bed out to set it up. Other than that, everything was great. Thanks for a great mini-vacation; we will be back!
Extremely tasty gluten free pizza. No worries about cross contamination as different pans, boards and knives are used only for the gluten free. So nice to be able to go out to pizza again.
They messed up my order but knew what was up when I asked for the manager. They made my order right righta away and were very professional about it. Food looked like the ads. I highly recommend this Wendy's.
My third visit to the President's Quarters (hadn't been since 1992) was my attempt to introduce my northern sisters to the history, quaintness and beauty of Savannah. We were so pleased with the personalized breakfasts, friendly staff and, of course, your wonderful location - walking distance to EVERYTHING. Your rooms are such a nice departure from the everday hotel room that lacks imagination. We felt a true sense of being in historical surroundings. Thanks again.
I went to visit Dr. Gamboa in a desperate plea for help with my back pain issues which have deteriorated over the years as a result of 2 horrific car accidents in the past. I was amazed to see that Desi (love that name) was more interested in giving me relief and hearing my story than filling out paperwork or identifying insurance or payment plans. I said that I was unemployed and needed to get back to work and he replied that we can work all that out later, lets just get you fixed, now that is how I would define a true human being.
Best Apartments In Green Bay! I have been living at the Brook Park Apartments for about 3 months, and I have to say I'm extreme impressed. Move in process was extremely easy. We were trying to move-in in the middle of the month and they worked really hard to find us exactly what we wanted. The people in the office are extra friendly. The maintenance crew never leaves us waiting, they have fixed any problem we had in a timely manner. Neighbors are very friendly, you can tell management does great background checks. If you plan on moving here, make sure you get an apt the faces the empty field towards the west. Wild turkey, deer and foxes come out all the time, and the sunset is amazing. I'm very happy that I moved here. I would recommend these apartments to anyone.
Friendly and knowledgeable staff. Great shop with an excellent atmosphere, inventory and service. Highly recommended.
None
Really a first-rate experience! I had virtually no wait; I hadn't completed my intake paperwork before I was in an exam room being tended to. I think the total visit was less than 11 minutes, far better than I've seen at any other ER or urgent care center. The doctor, nurses & reception were extremely friendly and great to work with. I hope I don't need many ER visits, but this will unquestionably be my first choice next time.
Drs. Lee, O'Sullivan and Quest have taken great care of our senior beagles. The entire staff is compassionate and responsive. The facility is clean and inviting. We don't live in this area of town anymore, but still make the trip because we have had such a great experience.
Love you. Serena
One of the top eateries in Marathon. Food is fantastic with gigantic portions. Service is perhaps the best in town. The flavors in the dishes I've tried are perfectly blended. A GREAT value for the experience. This is the FIRST restaurant I recommend in Marathon. Love love love this place!! DISCLAIMER: I live in Marathon, but I do not know Lance or his staff.
Based on the positive reviews I had read on here, I called to make an appt, and I didn't even need one. Sam the owner was very nice, and the SMOG test was done in very little time. He offered me a bottle of water while I was waiting. Very personable service. Highly recommend it.
"Goodting is ther best fidelity bank movin forwot
its the greatest bank in the Boston area cause of the tellers are all ways smiling friendly
I went to Valley Honda to look at 2013 Honda Civic Si's. There I met Tom Propersi. We had briefly talked over email when I requested a quote. He was very helpful and never felt pushy or like he was just trying to get a sale from me. He let me know that the 2013 model had not yet came, but they had a few 2012 models for a lot less. He was very patient and informative the entire time. I would recommend if you are looking for a Honda to ask for Tom Propersi.
One of the best pubs in Cyprus
In an ocean of chain restaurants, drive-thru dinners and uninspired entrees, a local restaurant run by local people supporting local breweries is and always will be a welcome diversion. Great care has gone into selecting the finest in local ales and brews of which the owners and staff will be more than happy to share the history and the subtleties of each one. The food is divine. They specialize in gourmet pizzas; wonderful, fresh toppings and unique arrangements sitting atop a homemade sauce and crust that has their own beer as a main ingredient. I highly recommend their Gourmet Goat pizza: goat cheese and buffalo mozzarella topped with spinach, red onion and fresh tomato. A pizza so sublime that it has firmly planted itself as one of my all time great indulgences. Come for the pizza, stay for the beer. Please do yourself a favor and support this fine local business and don't forget to "Drink Like a Local".
Great food, one of the best steaks around
Es el mejor lugar para un bello encuentro con amigos...es divertido,tiene la mejor musica...y una excelente atencion!!!Se los recomiendo gente linda
None
The service is always with a smile and the food hot. You can not go wrong going in here for a quick bite to eat for lunch.
Best. Pizza. Ever.
Great Experience, Reasonably Priced, Good Food!
None
None
None
None
Never had a better experience. Kristina Smith it the lady you want to work with. She is willing to bend over backwards for you.
I live in Las Vegas and I came into Reeves to buy my car because they are the BEST. I always go to see salesman Mike Khoury. This is my second BMW from Reeves, and Mike is the best. I knew I wanted a car I just didn't know which model, what color, etc...luckily Mike has the patience of a Saint because I am not the easiest client to please. Mike is very thorough, and made buying a new car easy. He even shipped the car right to Las Vegas. The next car I buy will definitely be a BMW and I will always go to Mike.
A wonderful carpet cleaning service! We have been using their service since a year or so and there are absolutely no complaints. The company has got some really quick, hardworking boys. Gets the work done like a pro! Highly recommended!
It's as close to NY pizza as I've ever had. Bianca with capers isn't on the menu, but it's amazing.
We needed graph paper to be printed. They gave us the best price and very fast turn around but the best thing was the quality of the work: crisp clean printing on quality paper! They were so helpful in making sure we got what exactly we wanted. You could tell they really appreciate your business. I highly recommend them.
I've eaten takeaway from Agra many times. Overall I think it's the best value for money takeaway in Haywards Heath. The food is excellent and service very friendly. I don't mind trying new things and they have always been able recommend a new and tasty dish. Thanks Agra!
Nhà cung cấp thiết bị mã số mã vạch tốt nhất HCM, Sản phẩm công nghệ tại Trí Vinh luôn đi đầu thị trường vầ chất lượng, giá cả và phục vụ
Awesome! Did you know that every In N Out burger was on the cow less than 72 hours before you order it? Thats they they are so fresh !
Fantastic restaurant! The owners and Wait staff are friendly and fun and the food is always fantastic and great! Their margaritas are the best in the area... definitely a go to place in the Waterville area ;)
We had a great experience. It was raining, but that was no problem because it's covered. Staff was very helpful in identifying the gems. Kids, ages 6 & 9, had fun finding their shiny treasures. We got 2 kids souvenir buckets, an amethyst and citrine bucket, and a super bucket. "In my souvenir bucket I found amethyst, ruby, citrine, rose quarts, and some others." -age 9
Just enjoyed our 2nd year Christmas lunch and can't recommend it highly enough. Not only was the food excellent there was a large amount of it. We will be back in 2013.
Jim the manager at Reside went above and beyond any customer service I've had in years. I stayed at the other hotels here in vernal and by far reside is the cleanest and most affordable place in Vernal. Thanks for your hospitality Jim. I enjoyed my 14 week stay.
If you are a craft beer fan this is a must stop in Northwest Indiana. Draft beers are constantly changing and the cider/mead list is great for patrons with gluten intolerance. Love the atmosphere and staff. Tuesdays are live blues bands that are great to see.
It was the best thing that have ever happened to me in the world!!!
Semplice, mangi bene e spendi il giusto
Guaranteed Non-invasive Road to Recovery. This is the ONLY doctor appointment I look forward to going to. I have never waited longer than 10 minutes to be seen and everyone is extremely attentive. I am a believer and a true fan of the ProAdjuster and entire staff.
None
None
I've been going to this restaurant for many years. One thing I am extremely picky about is the quality and the freshness of the fish. This place never failed my expectations and without any doubt they have great service.
We found Rose City Dental for an emergency visit on Saturday. I called many other dentists and none were as responsive, available or helpful as Rose City Dental. We got an appointment immediately and were seen moments after arrival. Dr Lee was patient and comforting to my four year old son who needed stitches. The office was clean and the staff were extremely helpful and efficient in getting us in and on our way. Thank you so much! We highly recommend Drs Lee and Rose City Dental.
None
My experience at the Oak Tree has been the the experience of a life time. Reasons behind my statement is for the simple fact of the staff that gives their all. I didn't think that there were people out in the world that actually care about your well-being. (A Man of Your Word) is posted all over the properties and they are being living examples of what that really means. This was the best decision I made when I chose to come to the Oak Tree Recovery House. It's most definitely the best Sober Living transitional home I'd ever been in. I recommend that if you want the best service from individuals who will love you into early recovery, I would advise you to give the Oak Tree a shot. You will not regret it for sure.
God mat, trevlig personal, mysigt, och den latinska anden ligger i luften. Kan klart rekommendera denna lilla oas.
Experimental prototype community of the world (epcot) See the world in one day eat in any country with authentic food and people from the respective county working there. The Fireworks show is something that can't be missed. Also great rides like mission space, test track, soaring and many others.
I absolutely love this place. Reasonably priced, clean, excellent customer service and very capable manicurists and masseuses. I have gone there for Gelish manicures multiple times and for whatever reason they last longer than other ones I've had. The atmosphere is wonderful and parking is really easy. I highly recommend this place.
Best craft stores ever.
Had an appointment for Monday 2/4 for my Ford Escape, however on my wifes way to work her truck broke down. I had it towed to the Pep Boys on Evansville's East Side. They understood and switched appointments and repaired her truck fast and fair. The serpentine belt , and a pulley broke. Her truck was out by that afternoon and she was happy. So was I . Thanks
Our experience with DCH Honda was so excellent all thanks to Armando Lopez! He's has been our salesman for a few years already and has just sold us our fourth car on Saturday. He's very knowledgable when it comes to car sales, and we never feel pressured by him like other salesmen normally would. I HIGHLY recommend him to anyone who is seeking to buy a car at DCH Honda!
First class service been using them for 10 years, i tried to save some money going elsewhere but have learnt not to compromise. Their knowledge is endless and work first class. Highly recommended.
None
The best T-Bone-Steak in the world! yamyam. :-)
Easy to find. Quick service. Quality result.
Amazing PC gaming store. They literally have everything.
As a Local, I always bring guests here for home town breakfasts. Fancy? No. Good food? You bet... And, some of the friendliest service in town.
I used to go here back in the day! I haven't been lately but as a kid man it was so fun going to this restaurant! I loved the decorum and the food!
We loved this place!
One of my favorite places to stay.
Great restaurant. Good food. Nice people (that speak English well). You can special order anything and not worry about herring the order wrong!
I have never received more professional, dedicated training since I began with United Studions. Sensei Tyler Martin has been a tremendous influence not only in my martial arts, but in my life. I have reached new levels of confidence, I have learned to focus my energy in new and positive ways that will benefit me throughout my life. Sensei Nancy inspires me to always push forward, to reach further each day more than the one that came before it. I look forward to continuing my training with Sensei Tyler and Sensei Nancy because I know how much better my life has become because they are a part of it.
I hurt my back and tried everything to help - exercises, muscle rubs and even anti-inflammatory and muscle relaxant medications. Nothing helped and I was still in agony. Then I went to Ashley at Awaken and after the very first massage I noticed a big difference. She worked with me for a couple of months and my back has been great ever since! I have sent several friends and co-workers to Awaken and everyone has loved the care they have been given! Great people, great skill and great service!
Supply Hardware has been around for years. There is a reason for that. I always find better customer service with a non-huge corporate store, and has better products. (For a short period of time they teamed up with ACE, but I didn't like the ACE product selection). They are back as the Supply Hardware that has always been around, that my kids smile about when they walk in. Good Stuff, good prices, all the small nuts and bolts you want to get 1 or 2 at a time instead of a package that has a dozen you don't need or want to pay for. And popcorn. And of course they will almost always greet you as you walk through the door. I have been a loyal customer for at least 20 years, and I am glad they have been a part of our lives during all of that time.
This is really awesome.... superb hotel and mind-blowing service by hotel staff
This place has all the heart and flavor need to be one of the great ones!
Michael was very helpful with getting me setup with a mortgage for my first home. He was able to answer all of the questions I had and was available anytime I had a question.
Who's the man? The man that cares about your needs first, your budget second, and getting the sale only if it makes sense for you? The man is Dwayne Ayer. As an ex-car saleseman myself, I know exactly who I *don't* like dealing with. Those guys that try to trick you into thinking you are getting the best deal. Dwayne laid it all on the line, he was very straight forward with me and told me the best possible deal I could get. I ended up buying a car from another dealer, but out of the half a dozen salespersons that I worked with across all the dealers, Dwayne was the best. Also, he's ridiculously good looking. If I know anybody who is looking for a Honda/VW/Audi/Porsche, I'm sending them directly to Dwayne!
Круто
None
None
Loved the atmosphere and great food! C's had a company get together at Muse to ring in the new year. I would definitely recommend Muse to my friends and colleagues.
I am French and live in Defence Colony, a 10 minute walk from the Nanda Dental Clinic. I wanted to find a dentist in the area to be able to return easily for regular treatment. Before visiting the clinic, I found this website and I liked the fact that the Nanda couple looked young, very friendly, and with good references. Their clinic also looked welcoming. Well, I must say that I was not disappointed. I got an appointment quickly. I had to undergo root canal but unlike what I had heard about the procedure it was really not a big deal! My dentist in Delhi is now Dr Smriti but her husband is most likely a good match:)- I learned today that they are about to celebrate their second anniversary...So Happy Anniversary, Happy Trip & See you soon!
Romanticón.... Jajaja :)
A great old time barbershop. Shoulder massages, shaves, and great haircuts from girls who you'd actually trust to cut your hair time and time again!
Great location - just 5 minutes drive to Byron.. Walk over the dunes to the beach.. Friendly, helpful staff and good amenities.. Felt really comfortable on large sites camping with a trailer.. We will defo use again!
When I stumbled across this restaurant, I really had no idea what to expect. Portlanders certainly do not think of the Milwaukie area when considering a night of fine dining. They are missing out if they overlook Amadeus Manor. The food is wonderful and the service is terrific. The pace is VERY relaxed, so you actually are able to enjoy an exceptional appetizer before your meal arrives. The view of the Willamette as the sun sets is not to be missed.
friendly service, good pricing, good food. One of my favorite places when i wanna eat close to home for a quick satisfying good meal.
My name is Brenda Ellison and my husband and I went to Long Hyundai recently and purchased a Santa Fe. Our salesman was Zak Ibnsliman he was very helpful in explaining the features and process of purchasing the vehicle. He went out of his way to make sure we were happy with our purchase and is a very nice man. Thank you Zak for making the whole family feel welcomed and thank you long hyundai you will now be our dealer for life. It was a great experience.
Just another pleasant buying experience at Nielsen. My salesman Frank was very knowledgable and he and his team ended up going above and beyond to get me what I wanted. I'll be back, again and again.
I had the best experience at Bill Volz's. My sales rep, Shari Roufberg was extremely helpful. She was very patient, detailed and honest with all the information she provided for me. The whole process was done in a very timely manner. I am very satisfied with my new Jeep Patriot and with the help I received at Bill Volz! Over a week after my purchase and Shari is still answering all my questions and concerns via email! I would definitely recommend this dealership!
I always love to eat here..every food is super yummy! :)
None
None
My experience so far has been tremendous. Since Bakke was launched officially in Guyana, I enrolled as student in the MBA programme. I actually switched from another on-line university in which I was enrolled to pursue my MBA. However, in that university there was something missing. I was doing well in the class work, readings but I was unable to comfortably share my faith experiences. When I transferred to Bakke, it was where I needed to be. The faculty, support staff, are all amazing and supportive. In the first session, the orientation, I knew I was in the right place. I was experiencing some difficulty with my internet and connection and the BGU Staff based in Jamaica was so patient and helpful, I was never treated in this manner before and I did not even start a class as yet. Each faculty bring their unique presence to the classroom, each class as well contributes to my life first then to the wider community. The love, respect and comradeliness felt among faculty is also translated to students. I am currently enjoying my journey at Bakke, it does not even feel like I am in school. It more feels like I am among a group of friends learning.
None
The Moore College of Art Alumnae Association needed a last minute logo created for a branding initiative, on a zero-budget. We had a name but not an idea of what it should look like. Quynh donated her services and creative expertise to create an exciting, concise logo for our alumnae initiative. She was quick to respond to feedback on her work and made changes to achieve a final product with hardly any turn-around time (minutes; really!).
Dr. Hirsch has been my family Dr. now for about 5 years. I have zero complaints about him. I have been through my grandfather's death from congestive heart failure about 5 years ago with him, and also my father's prostate cancer. I myself had extremely high cholesterol, (we thought the tests were screwed up it was so high) and through all of these issues, and years he has been very helpful, encouraging life changes for the cholesterol instead of prescriptions, and the drugs were not necessary. I would recommend him to anyone.
Wonderful food and service in a comfortable atmosphere and often great live music. Try the home made gainola, baked in butter.
Absolutely beautiful store. Amazing people that work there. Cannot wait to have a ring customized!!
None
None
Great. I never met Steve, because I was out of town during the inspection. However, he sent the full report in PDF to my email, complete with detailed photos of all of the issues. The report was very thorough, and he was quick to respond to my email asking him to explain some things that I didn't understand.
Its spiritual place in new Bombay I feel very happy every time when I am visit their
Dean Aikins was the best!!! If you ever need to purchase a car ask for this guy he's the best!!!
My experience at the Long Beach office was extremely pleasant. The entire staff takes their time to explain and ensure that I'm comfortable each and every visit. I am especially grateful to Angie. Angie made me feel at home as she guided me through each process during my visits. She made sure that I was at my scheduled appointments on time and called me just to make sure I was okay. I feel extremely comfortable with this office and it's staff. Thank you, Elliott
I have taken my family's four cars to this Midas repair shop over the past few years and feel that they have always provided good, honest work. I can't imagine thinking anything but positive reviews about them. I'm quite surprised by some of the reports. I think you should trust them!
None
About Staffing takes the time and the care to fully understand more than the skills and abilities required for the job. They take great care to match the personality and values of the candidate with those of the company where they will be employed, as well as the to ensure a good fit between the candidate and the team they will work with. This care and attention enhances the likelihood of a successful match and a longer term relationship!
None
Lovely B&B with very good breakfast. Nice owner who gave us best advice to explore Islay. Thanks a lot.
I have been going to Winterholler Denistry for a few years now and absolutely love this place. The workers and doctors are always so polite and explain things very thoroughly. I recently moved to Buckeye and still make the hour + drive every few months because this is the best dentist I have ever had!
None
Una delle pizzerie senza glutine migliore della Sicilia.......................................................................!!!!!!!!
My FAVORITE store. I've been shopping here for 6 years and I would say that about 55% of my entire wardrobe comes from Diva. LOVE LOVE LOVE great customer service, great prices, flexible prices, great merchandise. I get compliments every day. I'm wearing a shirt and pants from there right now!
Awesome!!
You simply can't beat the price of Starplex Cinemas. In a world where all other movie theaters are charging $10.50 for a student ticket, places like Starplex are the ultimate find. Plus their employees are friendly and efficient. We won't go anywhere else!!!
HUGE selection of cars. New, used, certified....pretty much anything you could want all in one location. What can I say, the folks at Galpin are really really helpful. They will walk you through the test drive process even if you have absolutely no idea what you want. Likewise, if you have certain criteria, they will bend over backwards to find you something that meets your needs. I walked in with a VERY specific budget in mind, thinking I was only going to be able to afford a base model Fiesta. They worked out such a good deal for me that I ended up getting a 2012 Fiesta WITH power everything AND Sync for the same price of the base model. I am very, very satisfied with my experience. The sales people are not at all the super crazy pushy people you commonly have to deal with. Overall I felt very relaxed.
None
Want to say Carson Toyota was top notch!!! I was working with a great employee of Carson Toyota,his name was Nathan, I drove approx 300 miles from the Central Valley and it was wayyy worth the drive. Nathan saved me about 200 a month compared to dealers here in Fresno, even got a moonroof and entune at no extra charge..Process took only around 30 minutes to complete transaction!! I will only buy or lease my future cars from Carson Toyota in the future...
Best burger I've had in San Antonio. Their blue cheese special was spectacular
None
Chris was great. very friendly. Chris and Mike the sales manager bent over back words to make sure we were satisfied with the car we purchased as well as getting the payment where I wanted it. I'll go there the next time I need a vehicle for sure.
I disagree with the poor reviews of Bike Country because I had an absolutely WONDERFUL experience there!!!! I have worked retail and Im sorry, but when its time to go, its time to go. If I owned the store, I might stay and sell a bike...maybe the guy had somewhere to go. If you stay open for one person, then more people come in. Also, if the store is that busy, sometimes its hard to acknowledge others who have walked in. Especially if you are paying attention to the customer you are with and think someone else may have greeted them. Anyway, I went into Bike Country today because I have been having a VERY hard time finding a bike shop who was willing to work with me and the issues I had been having riding my bike. I had been having pain while riding in a "sensitive" area. I assumed that any bike shop would have been able to help me, but 3 major bike shops in Des Moines dismissed me and 2 of them were flat out rude. Yeah, I get it..I am a girl and my seat is pointing in directions it shouldn't be, but you would think that the bike shops would be PROFESSIONAL and help me out. It seems that they were quick to judge me as not a serious rider and since I don't have boy parts, they had no desire to help me. I swear to God, that is how I felt!!! I was greeted immediately once I walked into Bike Country. All of the sales people were with other customers and I patiently waited until Leanne (hope Im spelling that right) was available. I told her my issues and she was completely understanding and knew exactly what I needed to fix my problem. The seat I was told to buy originally was too big and made for a man.I bought that after the seat that came with my bike hurt me too much so I was just told to get a new one. It was like 140.00! She showed me how the seat was causing pressure points and pain while I rode and put me into a very reasonably priced WOMEN'S seat that fits me perfectly. They have a tool there that actually measures the distance between your sit bones and that determines the size of your seat. I couldn't believe how EASY it was to do that!!! Not ONE place in Des Moines offered to measure me. Such a SIMPLE TOOL!!! Once we got the seat on, she had me go outside and ride around in the parking lot so she could see how I rode and also so I could tell her how it felt. The first loop around the lot, I felt a bit of pressure. She made one tiny adjustment and then it felt great! She also gave me some great tips and even showed me how to adjust my seat myself. I had nothing but a fantastic experience with her and the store and I will be going back there for all of my biking needs. All of the workers in there were very professional and courteous. The store was very clean and kept up nice and I think the merchandise was very reasonably priced. Even the bike shorts. Most stores they are 60 + with the nice ones being over 100. I noticed their nice ones start around 45. I hope my review goes a long way with potential buyers. I am not a recreational rider, I take my riding seriously and have spent thousands of dollars on my bike and equipment. With the help of Bike Country, I can take my riding to the next level without suffering with terrible pain!!! I think they are more than capable of helping any rider at any level. Go check em out! :-) (Especially if you are a woman, go there and ask for Leanne, she is fantastic and understands our bodies!)
Very convenient location. Nice rooms, nice yards and nice people!
I have been using Just Brakes for my oil changes for over 1 year now. I am very loyal to them because they take care of me. They do a great job real fast. They even are great at e-mail reminders. Hats Off!!
When I needed a head shot for my business, I drove all the way from Dallas to Austin to have a professional photographic session with Kim Francois. That may seem like a long drive when there are great photographers in Dallas - but I really trusted Kim. She totally understood the look I wanted and worked with me on wardrobe, jewelry selection and even purchased flowers to create the perfect backdrop for my picture. In my business, image is very important. So I went the extra mile for the professional and technical expertise that Kim provided. It was a great experience and well worth the trip to Austin. I more than recommend her.
I was directed to Bill Browns after winning a trip through my company. I was treated great by Sue Ann and she took care of everything, even when I had to change my plans at the last minute. I was nice knowing I had her working for me.
It's not an Inn, there are no rooms to rent. The name is historical. There is good gourmet drip coffee, beer, milkshakes, good homemade pie and cookies, a few dry goods, free wifi, and a free jukebox. It's a great restaurant where you can talk to locals! Good well water too.
Pretty easy to find the place
Altitude MMA! Great gym, great instructors, and most of all great passion to teach! I would definetly recommend Altitude MMA to everyone from kids to adults! Check them out!
None
I went in to meet with Christian and she was with another client, so Gabriel helped me out. He was EXTREMELY helpful in every aspect. We test drove and when I decided it was the car I wanted we found the color and crunched numbers. When we realized I was not going to be able to afford that car, he did not hesitate to take me out to look at others. I decided on one and realized I really wanted a certain color. We drove all over the lot looking for it because his boss had told him t was there. I think he was just as excited as I was to find it. We came in and he really worked with me to be able to afford the car. All the while, Christian was coming over and checking on me. She sat there through most of the process.I finally got to go into financing with Christine and she told me I had the opportunity to purchase the car, which was so exciting. She patiently waited as I called my husband to talk it over. She did not pressure me at all. I am SOOOOOO appreciative for her giving me this opportunity. She called and had them put a protector all over my new car. She even gave me demonstrations of how these would protect my car. When I went to see my car all cleaned up and ready to go, Christian and Gabriel had noticed that it had some water spots and said they have told several people and would set up an appointment to have it completely fixed! They were confident it would not put me out at all. They reassured me that I could get a loaner car during the process so I did not have to miss any work or anything.Everyone I dealt with was very helpful and kind during my experience. I would highly recommend them!
The delivery was early which was excellent! The flowers were beautiful and the arrangement exquisite!
My family loves going to Happy China. Thomas and the rest of the staff there take a personal interest in their customers and really make us feel at "home."
Tudo que eu preciso de ferramentas eu sempre encontrei na ferrara
None
Always been impressed with Ask whether dining in or takeaway.
Jobspring has been very helpful and found me the exact job I was looking for. Everyone was extremely helpful, friendly, and very knowledgeable about current technologies and trends.
Excellent all around service, I've been taking all my vehicles to Greg's through the years, even my kids cars and my wife,s as well. The Best. Thanks Greg's. Joe,Kym and Family.
Thanks guys, i Love my new WRX! --> It was my first time financing a car and these guys went above and beyond to cut me the deal I was looking for. Buddy, Al and Mo really came though for me. They also helped me along every step of the way and made sure I left feeling like I had become part of the Maita Subaru family. I'll definitely be brining my car back for all the tune ups and will be keeping in touch. My Dad bought his Forester here in 2004 and I'm glad I headed his advice to shop here. Since this was my first experience buying a car in a while I was worried about being taken advantage of, but the second I walked inside and met Buddy, I could tell he was a genuine person. He made the entire experience easy and fun. Thanks again guys, see ya at 3000 miles!
Ryan M was an outstanding man kbows his stuff please keep him for awhile
Loving this place..... quality food at a reasonable price. Go for option meal for 2- will feed at least 3. Get it delivered ... makes for a brilliant Friday night
I visited Sharon after suffering repeated sciatica pain that wasn't going away. Not knowing where to go I read the reviews and took the plunge. After discussing the problem she carried out an intensive massage in a professional but friendly manner, from which I immediately felt the benefit. I would definitely recommend Sharon and now look forward to my next visit to keep away those aches and pains. P.S Very reasonable price too.
Alhoewel er intussen bij mij in de buurt ook een Apple service center zit reis ik voor problemen toch eigenlijk altijd af naar Den Haag. Door de jaren heen verschillende machines naar hun gebracht voor reparatie, en ze zijn hier erg snel in. Ook geen vage toezeggingen, maar juist heel duidelijk en naderhand ook goed inzicht in wat het probleem was. (beter dan service bij de apple store zelf, waar een reparatie 3 weken kostte en vervolgens er meer stuk gemaakt was dan gerepareerd)
Love the service at Hyundai of Newport!
I needed a 10x10 with in a day. Everyone ells gave me really high rates until i called All-Size Self Storage, the manager Kendra gave me a really great deal in a 20x20. I love the great costumer service. Yosio Aguirre
I have been storing my belongings there for two years now. I feel that for the size and the items being stored the price is very reasonable. On top of that the insurance is very reasonable. It is very easy to access and paying the bill on-line is great, because then I don't even have to go to the storage unit to pay it. All my belonging have been fairing quite well and I overall have no complaints! I would definitely recommend it to all!
Delicious! Went a few hours before closing, ordered 5 rolls and got them quickly. Very nice people as well :)
Other people may think it sucks but its the closest park to me and the splash pad is a great place for little kids or sometimes teens(:
It's refreshing to shop at a hardware store where the staff is attentive. Being able to buy nuts and bolts by the piece is great. Free popcorn is a great touch.
None
None
Sachse Nails has always tried to accomodate my crazy schedule and on my worst day going here to get my nails done made me feel so much better.
None
Dave and his team at Melbourne SEO are industry leaders in the SEO space. Having purchased several of Dave's training products (each excellent value for money), I can speak from experience in saying any business serious about growth on the web should pay attention to Dave's insights. I look forward to his weekly emails keeping me updated on key events/trends in the SEO space.
Hot wings delious, tacos delious
This is my family's favorite restaurant in Harrisburg. We love to go for breakfast, brunch and lunch. They are open on Friday and Saturday nights now which is nice too! Excellent food and at a very reasonable price! We love everyone in there. The food is consistently good and service is exceptional. Sometimes they get busy and you might wait a little longer than usual, but that's because it isn't a secret that this place is GREAT!
This was not our first visit to Intermountain Hospital and it wont be our last . They care for both , our little friend and us . It is rare today to find a business that puts caring ahead of money -- they do . They have gone out of their way time after time to make us feel a part of "the team" in caring for the health of our pet . Saved his life by alerting us to a hidden health problem we didn't see --- He is fine today because of the diagnostic skill of Dr. "K" and not a day goes by that we don't think of the "what if" and we could of lost a valued part of our life .
This my born hm
None
7/12/13 el primero pero no el ultimo concierto que voy de R5:3 hermosa R5 familia mexicana♥
Great place for English original movies! Love the balcony. Not cheap but well worth it!
Good food
Unfortunately Marvie was only our dog walker for a short few months but it was the best few months ever. My dog Dierks was a rescue and was still adjusting to the good life when Marvie started walking him. She was beyond accomodating when I told her he was unsure about men, didn't like smokers, was afraid of loud sounds, etc. She made a point to avoid the construction sites nearby and avoid the smoking residents in the complex. Dierks also loves human contact and she spent so much one on one time with him. The day she had to return my keys to me (I decided to move us across the country. If I were still in the area, I would've kept Marvie as our walker) I could see only love between my dog Dierks and her. I have a new dog walker out in Colorado and he does not even compare to Marvie. I don't think anyone could love Dierks as much as I do and I appreciate everything she did for him. She really helped him break out of his shell and make him feel comfortable. I couldn't be more grateful for Marvie! I wish she could just bring her company out to Colorado! If you're looking for a kind hearted, animal lover, Marvie and her staff are the ones to pick! They'll spoil your pet while you're away at work. I never used her for my vacations but I would trust them with Dierks 100%.
None
Excellent efficient, courteous, obliging and punctual service. Happy to recommend highly and we will use Little Red Trucks again.
Need some new bike shorts. Popped in and they couldn't have been more helpful in assisting me. So helpful that I ended up buying a new jersey as well. Highly recommend this helpful bike shop.
Francesca was very professional and personable. The transaction was quick and easy. Francesca gave me the only smile I believe I had all day.
A friend recommended Care Wellness Center a few years ago when my back went out. I have been having back issues on and off for years now and I can honestly say that I have never had as much relief, or ever expected to, as with Doc Whitten and his wonderful staff. I now refer to Doc Whitten as my miracle worker. Not only do I feel much better when I leave the center, I take home all sorts of excercises, routines and tricks to help me continue my therapy at home. A pulll that a few years ago would have had me flat on my back for weeks healing, is now a few days of therapy with Doc Whitten and I am up and about, back on my feet in no time ! The staff is beyond excellent, very attentive, caring and always do their best to accomodate the patient. LOVE this place !!
CrossFit Wilmington is the best! Everyone on the staff and in the classes made me feel welcome & comfortable from the start. So glad I made decision to go with CFW!
Very great place.
I've been using Computer Orbit for 6 years and even though I have the internet at my fingertips, I still opt to buy locally for their great service and prices. Plus very happy to support a local computer outfit. My business is computers and I couldn't have a better local partner than Computer Orbit.
None
I worked with Axiom for over a year on a project that was very important to me. From the initial meeting to go live the experience could not have been better. The staff is professional, organized and very talented at creating applications that are bug free and perform as planned. I especially was impressed with the suggestions Axiom made to make our application more functional and easier to use. The costs were always know and fair and Axiom completed the work on time. I will use Axiom in the future and highly recommend them to any organization needing custom software.
None
Adam, Terry and Jordan helped me move from Thornton to Ft. Collins. They were very friendly and went above and beyond. They even helped me set up my tv! I would not hesitate recommending them to anyone moving in the Ft. Collins area. Great job!
Every time I've been to Thymeless, my experience has become timeless. The decor, the company and location allows you to escape into a dream world of country meets eclectic. Forget about your fine dining and branded establishments. Thymeless Tings is otherworldly that appeals to all your senses. The dishes served truly are top class. They are homemade with homegrown ingredients, served in large portions at highly competitive prices. For something unique and relaxed that gets you out the city and off the beaten track, I highly recommend a trip out to the Cradle to one if its most engaging new eateries.
Totally professional and knowledgeable, fast priced right all goof
As a colleague, I highly recommend Dr. Burt for his skill and expertise!
Great spot for good food and good pricing. Service is very good also.
Wonderful, fast service! I came in confused, stressed and feeling defeated. Kaydi made me took all of those feelings away and took care of everything! She was wonderful and I would definitely use her services again!!! Teresa Murvin, Thousand Oaks, Ca
As a Massage Therapist I am very passionate about my well-being and of those around me. I found like minded people in the staff at Pain Relief Rehab. As the result of a back injury, I went from being a therapist to being a patient. Thankfully, as a result of Dr. DaSilva's care, I was able to avoid back surgery and fully recover. I still maintain my wellness at Pain Relief Rehab & I highly recommend you treat yourself to the care you deserve and the care you will receive here. You're in "Good Hands" at Pain Relief Rehab!
Very good experience here today. Had a great cleaning that was done quickly, thoroughly and professionally. The staff are very knowledgeable and take great care of their patients. Going back in a week to have some fillings done and feel great about the decision to come here.
I wish I lived closer, I would go here all the time. They make a delicious pesto pasta that I always order, and my family enjoys the food too. Not a big chain restaurant....has a homey feel. They have great prices and I think the quality of the food is great.
When first thinking back on my start skydiving experience there dont seem to be many other words other than speechless, but on second thought I can think of a few off the top of my head. Marvelous, incredible, lifechanging, remarkable, fantastic, exceptional, and unprecedented!!!! The staff was perfect the plane was perfect and the jump went as well as I could have imagined. All in all I would say that if you go skydiving anywhere else you are making a huge mistake.
Dr. Fisicaro is extremely professional and dedicated to her patients. Though she may have a long wait time (which occurs because she is usually seeing numerous patients throughout the day), when she is in the room with you, she makes you feel that she truly cares personally about you and your health. I feel invested in on a personal level and she always is certain to fully follow up with me.
Vamos tigre de mi vida!
GREAT service! I used the online ordering, they called to clarify a specification I had requested, and were on time to the minute for my delivery (which was 5+ pizzas, 3 salads, 2 and orders of chicken fingers). Then, after the very polite delivery man handed me the receipt, I promptly lost it. All of the food was a big hit to our guests, delicious and served hot. The next day, I called to see if I could have another copy of the receipt, the gentleman on the phone was very helpful, had remembered my order, and immediately sent me a copy of the receipt. I will use them over and over again!
None
Nice family hotel good service
Was only one pharmacist on duty 30mins before they closed & she was especially nice & patient as we had all of our family medications transferred in!
Моим иностранным гостям, очень понравилось побывать в магазине Тоскана, сложились самые лучшие впечатления от продавцов. Мои ребята купили песцовую шубу и кожанну курточку, очень удивились дешевизной товара. Они сказали, что у них на родине такая шуба будет в разы дороже стоить) Иностранные гости получили по мимо положительных общих впечатлений и покупки, которые были спонтанными) Спасибо Тоскана, за хорошую продукцию по выгодным ценам!
The sweet potato burrito is amazing! Very fresh food. Fun environment. Get some extra hot sauce to go, it's the best!
El Charro is excellent! The food is delicious and the salsa is yummy!
Aim High Tutors did a great job with my son. They sent me a great male tutor that really connnected with him and helped him raise his grades. No more crying or shouting with him over homework or studying for a test.
I LOVE THIS PLACE Food: A+ (Great quality food, interesting meals, they fill you up at a good price. Decent menu selection... the soup is REALLY great! Breakfast is neat with a make-your-own omelet option, but no waffles! My husband was so sad.) Service: C (Eh... average I guess. I feel like they have a lot of new people who aren't as knowledgeable as they possibly should be but if you get a seasoned waiter/waitress it is unbeatable! Once they get a little more trained im sure this place will run like a well oiled machine!!) Drink: B (selection is ...eh like any other bar in the area... Overall, not bad but pretty average and that is quite alright with me. This isn't really a bar spot its a food spot with the option of a bar area) Ambiance: B+ (quiet yet it has energy, casual yet it has some class, its a nice cozy place to be. The bar is tiny though. Also: the bar room and restaurant area are separated which is nice if your having quiet dinner)
The price at Fon Jon is incredibly reasonable (about 42% less for daycare than where I used to take my dog!). When we start to drive down the street my dog gets excited and at the end of the day always leaves happy so I know they are taking great care of him. I would highly recommend Fon Jon's to anyone looking for doggie daycare :)
They were fast and gave us a great price.
None
It is absolutely delicious and the service was fabulous. I always have the lasagna and its sooooo gooood. They give u homebaked bread that is also very very good. Portions are a good size... overall best at everything.
None
Donald MacbethJr Being a Charter Member of the Fitworks Anderson family I can tell you that I have seen tremendous growth in the facility. This club has two cinema theaters filled with tread mills, bicycles, eliptical machines and stair climbers. The one cinema plays ESPN and sport channels. The other cinema plays current hit movies. I enjoy the choices I have while I workout. The club offers exciting, fun, and challenging classes taught by knowledgeable caring instructors from Spinning to Group exercises such as Zumba Dance, Step, TRX Training, to various Bootcamps depending on your fitness level. The gym is clean and friendly. I am glad to say that I have recommended the club to friends, co-workers, and family and they are still active members of "The Fitworks Family. All I can say is give the gym a try and you too will see what I am talking about. I have been able to lose weight and build strength. Thank You, Fitworks and keep up the motivation we all need to keep coming back. IGYD
Briliant food, lovely people, excellent service!
Dr Goldman is the best. I took my dog some were else for years just recently my baby dog got sick she would not eat so I took her to the other place she was diagnosed with diabetes so I left her there to be treated to the tune of 1500 and when I picked her up she was worse then when she went in. So one of my friends suggested Dr Goldman I made the appointment and took her in well in the short time he had her in his care he and his staff showed so much caring for her and her condition I wish I would have tooken her here first. sadly my baby is no longer with us but I will be taking my other dogs here. for the sheer fact these people care about the animals they treat here. other places are all about how much money they can sqeeze out of you and treat your beloved pet like garbage... not Dr Goldman he is a blessing and a true Vet.... ask your self when it comes to the life of your pet that you love like child would you throw your money away on a vet who only cares about his nice shiny office and his Mercedes or would you go to a place were they give real quality care. I chose Dr Goldman for the Quality care every time.
None
I often have called Happy Valley Ride early in the morning (4-6am) for rides to and from campus. They have always been prompt, professional, and very affordable. I am more than pleased with Happy Valley Ride.
None
Food was great but the service was better! Zachary did a great job with our group of 7. Always had full drinks and he made sure everything was just right!
None
Tropical Zuko is awesome and the people who work at this facility are great! Love me some Cholula too.
Sonrise has performed work for my home seller clients at eXp Realty and they have been very pleased with his work
None
I usually avoid the dentist, but after months of having issues with a tooth, I decided to bite the bullet. I wasn't in excruciating pain but the tooth ended up needing a root canal because half of it was missing due to cavity decay :/ . Let me just explain how awesome this service was: 9:00 i called to make an appointment 10:30 They had an opening and scheduled me. by 1PM they had already drilled the root canal and put on the crown, They were very good about asking me about my pain level during the procedure and because of that feedback he was able to numb the area's that still hurt. I didn't feel anything after this, and the root canal was way easier than i thought. I've heard countless horror stories from family and friends about how much it hurt etc. Thankfully, I chose the right dentist. I'll be using this dentist for as long as I live in the area.
Great food. Sorry, AWESOMEEE food. Try it !!!
None
Mike was extremely helpful is getting me started in the business. I would recommend agents getting started to contact Mike. I would encourage customers looking to buy or sell to contact Mike for his expertise.
Very beautiful ♥♥♡♡
I'm going to join the chorus that has praised this vet. (1) Efficiency: my dog was seen on time; zero wait; (2) Niceness: The vet (Catherine) and tech (Kim) I saw were just incredibly nice; you could tell they genuinely cared about my dog; (3) Concern for my wallet: they advised me that I might be able to get some vaccines more cheaply at a local clinic -- when was the last time you heard that? Their prices were fair -- perhaps not the cheapest but by no means the most expensive; (4) Professional skill: to be sure, my dog didn't need anything complicated but they were totally professional in their approach and discussed various options and issues for prevention and treatment in a mature and intelligent manner. I will be going here again any time my dog has an issue in the Fort Collins area. Indeed, I might well come here for regular treatment if possible. A+
None
Don't miss the corn tortillas, I always get flour (which were great) but the corn tortillas were the best I have ever had. Lots of TVs set to football in the back room.
None
Lorraine is a wonderful Counselor. I went to her for a few years and she helped me tremendously. I would highly recommend her. Leah Krumme'
It is my pleasure to highly recommend A-Z Window Screening. We have used them to sweep our chimeys and also to do some replacement work on our chimneys. Each time Arron came out to our house he was friendly, thorough, and very efficient. We love the work he did and look forward to calling them next spring to replace some of our screens.
Probably the best auto repair center I've ever been to. They kept me 100% in the know and let me know exactly what was going on in terms easy to understand. The customer service was second to none as well! Very friendly and up front about everything. I would recommend them to anyone, and will continue to take my vehicle here for any work I need.
None
Favorite breakfast place!
None
Just signed my second lease at Stonegate and couldn't be happier. Yes the gate can occasionally go a few days without working but I have yet to live in an apartment where the gate wasn't always broken. The staff in the front office is always extremely nice and will help you out with any problem immediately. The two time I needed maintenance to come out so far they showed up very quickly and fixed it without any problems. The pool area is very nice and the clubhouse has a nice pool table and shuffleboard table along with a separate room with big lounge chairs and big screen tv to watch sports on. Just got new equipment in the fitness center so it is very high end. They have a lot of different floor plans and some of the best prices in Austin. Also a great area with Southpark Meadows right across the highway with almost any store you could need. Would recommend anyone to Stonegate if they are looking to rent in South Austin.
None
I HIGHLY recommend Snyder Chiropractic to anyone who wants a great chiropractic experience. Mr. Snyder is unlike any Chiropractor I've ever been to. He's highly knowledgeable, down-to-earth, and best of all, his prices are lower than any other chiropractor I've been to. I get a good feeling every time I go in, and feel even better when I leave. You owe it to yourself to check this place out!
wish that there were more
Amazing service by ALL staff
Great dining and service also great food and plenty of selection for all
None
None
I have been a customer of Studio 93 for over 6 years. They have the BEST stylists in Georgia. I love my Stylist Julie she makes sure that my hair always looks GREAT, If you are in need of a new look or just need someone to help you look fabulous..... Call and make an appointment today!!!
If you like Noodles you have to check this place out. My wife and I tried the very tasty steamed pork buns, the house ramen and the spicy and very flavorful Pho. Highly reccomended!
I went there along with my wife in April 2012. At that time the quality of food was excellent. A real Pakistani taste in USA. That reminded me the taste of original Pakistani food of Pakistani restaurant in Pakistan. We ordered Haleem, Kabob, and Tawa Chiken. Ambience is normal but food is highly highly recommended. Do not miss it give it a try and I am sure you wont gona miss it again. Regards
The best international education institute in Thailand
Been here twice now, food and service is fantastic!
Excellent espresso . And the 8 ounce cup of drip coffee is always welcome.
None
We went to several stores before going to Michigan Discount Mattress. The selection was great and they beat all of the others in price! We wanted firm mattresses for all of our rooms. The salesperson explained the differences in all of them to help me make the right choice. We love our new beds!
Friendly and helpful staff, nice easy atmosphere, and great food! Had a beef tri-tip/chopped pork combo, baked beans, greens, and a beer. Way more food than I could put down. Left happy and satisfied :)
None
Could not have been happier with Chris's professionalism. Had no idea about writing vows, logistics, or even where to put my hands during the ceremony, and he took the time to walk us through options on the phone, by email, and in person the day of the ceremony. His delivery of our ceremony was impeccable, as was his timing during the "pause for laugh" jokes we wrote into our own vows. The search for an officiant is anxiety-inducing (anyone else have no idea what criteria to look for), so from someone else who was there, highly recommend Chris. Plus, it's cool being married by the guy who officiated Gene Simmons's wedding.
I have been going to Jodi at Todd Shalley's since moving to Bluffton a couple of years ago. This is a great establishment. Jodi has done an excellent job with my hair and color. The atmosphere is lovely and comfortable. All the stylists seem very professional. Jodi listens to what I would like to have done. The prices are within my expectations. Definitely a touch of class in this great community~
Bought a Groupon and used it through the last year. Friendly, professional, and great lasers. I never had to wait at my appointments, everything was always smooth and painless. Am looking forward to going back for more treatments soon.
everyone was super friendly and dr. lee kept asking me if i was "okay" during the procedure. which i thought was very nice, because that was probably the first time a dentist checked in on me during the procedure to see if i was okay. i recommend this for everyone and would consider coming back.
None
Dr. Grimm has been a godsend to me! I started seeing Dr. Grimm more than 3 years ago and his adjustments to my neck and back as well as the exercises he taught me have brought me so much relief. After years of suffering with pinched nerves and many other doctors telling me there was nothing they could do for me. Now I rarely get pinched nerves, the pain has subsided and I can turn my head without being in agony. God Bless Dr. Grimm. Update - now I work with Dr. Paul! He is a wonderful person; he truly cares and will do everything in his power to help your body heal and keep you healthy!
Great food great service!
this place is very loving place becuse it is near chandigarh it park, mansa devi panchkula.and many more ple in shimla nd hill station
Jennifer and Chad know how to do things right and are very reliable.
The food is great an as far as I can tell authentic.
The food was great as was the service. Like all new establishments it can take time for things to come together. If you love Mexican food and are in the L/A area this would be the place to go.
Carla is just great. Got us going this morning on our trip to shedd aquarium. She made sure we got some liquid sweetener in our iced coffees. We just asked for sugar but she didnt want it to settle at the bottom. Definitely the best service we've had there. Will return.
Outstanding place to get your cheese. Low prices and excellent quality. You will not be disappointed.
Proud of my city n Gaya Airport
in
First time playing here. Course has just reopened. In good shape considering. Beautiful course. Cant wait til its all green. Will be returning soon!
Visited after reading an article in Springfield News Leader printed in July 2013. Every bit as good as stated in the article. Tried to warn girlfriend how BIG the pancakes were pictured. She couldn't believe that the cakes would be as big as I described. Thankfully we both only ordered on each. Needless to say this may have been my first visit; it certainly won't be my last.
I send my students to this store because th staff is knowledgeable and accessible. I think a lot of kids expect an a-hole "comic book guy" manning the counter. Not so at this place. They have just about every popular title and then some. All of the DC Direct collectibles, too.
Highly competent and professional care, every time.
I was suffering from extreme pain, inability to sleep, to work, take care of my family after having a car accident last November. Not only did Dr. Baker see to it that my kids who were in the car with me and I experience a full recovery, he was completely flexible in accommodating my schedule, even on occasion providing treatment at my office. My treatment didn't cost me a dime and Dr. Baker worked with my insurance company so that I am even being compensated for time I missed at work. I highly, highly recommend Dr. Baker.
My son and I found this place on a wrong turn but it turned out to be one of the best dining experiences of our vacation. Truffle fries with gouda fondue appetizer was delicious, the flavors balanced nicely. 10oz Filet mignon was seasoned and cooked to perfection, I enjoyed the sautéed broccoli although there was a seasoning used I didn't care much for. The service was excellent. The small, quaint dining room was full so we sat at the bar. The bartender who was our server as well was very knowledgeable on menu specifics, Joshua was his name I believe. I would Definetely make a return visit.
I currently live here and could not be happier! Everything has been first class since the day I moved in six months ago: the customer service from the staff, the grounds and landscaping, the work out facilities, pool, business center, the view from my apartment... even the size of my apartment! I can fit more furniture in my one bedroom here than I could in my old two bedroom. I feel so safe walking my dog at night because I frequently run into Joe, one of the several security guards who lives here and walks the property every hour of every night in uniform! Also, the North Hills Security guard patrols the property in his squad car every hour as part of his normal route. My dad loves how safe it is! The maintenance staff is incredible, too. During the snow in January I saw them outside all night shoveling snow, scraping ice and spreading salt to keep the area safe. I was blown away! I really love living here and do not plan on going anywhere anytime soon.
I've worked with Hofstede over the years on a wide range of projects both large and small. The stand out for is their dedication to every nuance of the design process, regardless of the brief or budget. I've also had Hofstede design promotional campaigns. I trust them and give them free reign to see what they'd create, I'm constantly and pleasantly surprise and impressed. They're also a nice bunch too.
The most friendly staff. Dr Jensen is very professional and accomodating. Great experience. My whole family loves this place!!
Regardless of what you believe or what you do not believe, Mosaic is a great place to meet some of the most inspiring people in LA and to discuss the tough topics we all wrestle with as humans. It's refreshing to go beyond surface level conversations and have the talks that we typically don't get to have in our day-to-day lives. If nothing come for the free coffee and the chance to make a few friends, and you'll leave with much more.
I went to Tameron Hyundai today with the intention of viewing a used Hyundai I found online. I was pleased to work with Corey Hooper who worked with me and showed me all of the options they had available. When I decided on a new Hyundai Sonata, he and the rest f the Tameron team worked with me to get me the car I wanted for the price I wanted. I recommend this dealership to anyone looking to purchase a car.
We love eating here. The stuff is so sweet and caring
I purchased a 2013 Honda Pilot EXL. This was far and away the best experience I have had purchasing a car. I was able to take care of most of it over the phone. I had to sell my old 2004 Odyssey before I could proceed and I never felt pressured to take care of that quickly. Joey White was very responsive and gave me a fair and great quote right from the get go. What I really appreciated was the fact that there were not hidden fees in the quote. Other dealers were not this upfront. Everyone I dealt with was extremely nice and professional. I have recommended this place to all of my friends.
Being in the military you travel a lot, I am from the old country and this is the first bakery that you can say it is original. I have experienced flavors from Mexican bakeries in Colorado, Texas, New Mexico, Arizona and California but never have truly tasted a better bread like the one that is baked at this place. Over 70 and love my bread, so I honestly can say this is the closest, if not the real thing to a Mexican Bakery.
Great Service, Awesome food!!
None
Great company , with awesome service !
Un buen lugar para estudiar
This is a great office space. The building itself has established some hefty security procedures but it does feel pretty nice going up 43 floors and looking over all of Manhattan. There is a great view of the Empire State building and good lighting on the floor. The staff is very friendly, and extremely helpful.
Have to visit !
We’ve used Quantum Digital at The Kittleman Group for over seven years, and we love the results. With the new Trigger Marketing program, we know who is looking at home values around our sold listings. Our monthly postcards look sharp, are affordable, and get the attention of our audience. The process is simple and the results are real.
Great place! Good food and cheep beer!
Wonderfull shisha
Super friendly from start to finish. Quick, efficient, and most importantly, painless. I got gassed on the house, and even an additional discount for taking care of the procedure on the spot. Don't kid yourself this is a business like any other, but they were good about explaining all the associated costs as they went along, instead of saving the surprise for the end, which is greatly appreciated. Overall, I would recommend their services. Dr. Aggarwal was very friendly, just short of funny, but I wasn't there for a comedy show either. She was done removing my wisdom tooth before I even knew it. Thanks for the painless, professional, and quick service. Great team!
I applied for insurance and they were very helpful. I have a great experience with Critical Illness Insurance
None
Das beste Thai Taiwan away von ganz köln
Been here for about 14 months.. really liking the staff and how nice everyone is. Its easy and convenient and i love the way my teeth look, and can't wait to get my braces off. I would absolutely recommend going to Hiser:)
I have been getting Doctor Hendlin's chiropractic adjustments and nutritional counseling for my whole life. I am his son, so that made it easy. But I have seen him change so many lives for the better! He has helped people lose weight, heal from all sorts of things from chronic rashes all over their bodies to steady pains in joints, muscles, and other parts of their bodies. He really knows what he's doing and many people ahve told me so. The love and aloha spirit I've witnessed between he and his patients over the years is like nothing I've ever experianced. He is very busy but he also does spend a lot more time with each patient than most chiropractors do. He also knows SO MUCH about the human body and how different vitamins and minerals (or nutrients) are to be used to heal and treat specific things, from ligament and joint damage, to gastro intestinal disorders, to pretty much anything under the sun. He provides health care for your whole body, and sees it as a complete integrated system -- Its Holistic health care for your WHOLE body!-- This I believe is what he does best. P.S.- A great natural alternative to MD's because he provides your body with the natural tools it needs to heal itself the way it was designed to, as opposed to providing toxic drugs with harmful side-effects. Many if not most diseases are caused by neglecting the bodies needs for certain nutrients, and lifestyle habits like movement and exercise. Don't neglect your bodies own ability to heal itself and repair damage! All most people need to do is give their bodies the tools to do its job. Doctor Hendlin is my dad, and I love him, but I still think that everything in my review is true. Aloha, Go get healthy.
None
I work there, and it's kinda awesome..
I highly recommend taking your vehicle to Complete Auto Pros. I am a former mechanic myself, and appreciate that I am treated with common professional respect when I take my vehicles to CAP for repairs I don't have the time to perform myself. Ron is up front and honest about all repairs and recommendations for your vehicle. The communication and customer service is top notch. Don't hesitate to take your vehicle to CAP if you're having an issue, you won't be disappointed! Ron will make you a customer for life.
Erik Montaño always makes sure everything in the service drive is done the right way. His service is greatly appreciated even on busy days he approaches is customers with a smile and GREAT customer service. Thank you for all you do Erik Montaño. You are the best - JimmysMom
None
I recently purchased a new Chrysler Town and Country at East Hills Chrysler Jeep Dodge and couldn't be more pleased with the experience! The purchase price was better than the other two dealers I visited. The sales rep explained every option and sat and showed me how it all worked so I could decide if this was the vehicle for me, and what options I would want in it. I dealt with the service department as we were having a trailer hitch installed on our new vehicle, and not only was the installation immaculate, but they provided a loaner vehicle for me! I will be back for my servicing and the next time I need a new vehicle! -Matthew
I absolutely love this place! We are CSA members so we have free admission to everything all year long, get fresh produce (a lot) every weekend and it is a great variety. We love to stroll around and see the animals....Elmer is my personal favorite :) The winery is across the street and CSA members get free wine tastings as well (they can choose 3). The view is amazing from the winery deck! For 6 people, the CSA is about $450 for the whole season which works out to about $75/person to experience everything they have there, get free wine tastings, get fresh produce PLUS free bonus picks every week all season long! This also includes the free member pancake breakfasts that they put on every so often and all special events. This may just be my favorite place on earth!
Great service, caring staff. Very different from other oil change places, much more valuable. I value great service, and am more than happy to pay more for it. I have no interest in the lowest price because you generally get average service at best -why would anyone want to work with a company who is doing everything in their power to get the lowest price, that means cutting corners... -not for me, I want things done right and I understand that high quality costs more. By the way they have deals on Groupon every once in a while for $19 -you can't beat that price -in fact, I don't understand how they can make any profit at that price! (note to owner: please don't price your stuff too low, I want you to be in business for a long time to come!) These guys know how to treat you right, if you appreciate that, then The Oil Exchange is your oil change home!
None
Needless to say beyond belief most enjoyable place ever. Mind blowing view...relaxing...great shopping attractions and beyond.
None
I buy Port City fresh roasted beans and I've never found a better cup of coffee. Love it Love it Love it. I especially like when I visit the store and they are roasting bean right in the shop. Incredible smell. Incredible cup of coffee -- both at my home and in the shop.
Love the atmosphere, food and staff!!!
Great food, service and decorations its small but worth going to eat there the food is delicious and the prices are fair.
Quality directions...Suggession is to mark bridges when showing directions on the map..will b like an assurance.
I landed here looking for > 2010 car. They had precisely was they had advertised in Autotrader and their stock (I had been to other places they didn't have what they had listed). Used cars I tried were cleaned up and maintained for the best experience. They work with you on the pricing, but as in every other place, be ready to deal with professionals, yet kind and enthusiastic sales personnel. I worked with Tyrone and Kalvin, and they are both great, but also bounded by their managers on what they can do for you. Kalvin took the time to show me a great car, and he was not wrong when he said the car was in great conditions and an excellent car. You never know when what somebody is telling you is the truth, but in my case, Kalvin was right and he introduced me to an excellent car. I tried 5 other places with the same kind of car 2010+ Acura and Hondas. The best of those I tried at this place and at the Acura itself, although Acura had higher prices ($3000+) I think. Other places, the cars did not just run as well or were more deteriorated. Overall, I recommend looking around, then landing at Honda Curry so that you can compare. I found them with higher quality for the price. Thank you.
No other place has managed to capture the true Egypt on our minds so effectively through ambiance, taste and service. I highly reccommend it.
Hotel yang cukup popler di Jakarta dan pelayanannya cukup bagus bagi pengunjung. Terlebih kegiatan yang ada dalam hotel tersebut seperti seminar,pertemuan,dll tidak menutup diri kepada para wartawan dan awak media.
Love the sandwiches here, especially the reuben and the club (order it hot). The quesadillas and wraps are also great. It can get crowded during lunch but I take that as a good sign. If you get there before noon you should be ok. The owners are nice people and are always working with the rest of the staff.
My crew began coming up here from Ohio every year for 60 (yes, 60) years! Jon and Ellie are wonderful hosts. The accommodations are great. I always look forward to breakfast in the lodge. The fishing, the fish stories and the scenery are great.
Φοβερές δημιουργίες και ιδέες από τις κοπέλες στο κατάστημα για την οργάνωση της βάπτισης.
None
Bit busy when we went but I guess that's a good testament to the place. Portions are huge, service was great and it was all extremely tasty! Will definitely be going back again :-)
Very very nice
None
This dealership is first-class. Everyone was helpful and friendly and the amenities are wonderful. Cafe, Club Lexus (spa, etc) I love that I can get something done while waiting for my car instead of just sitting around (nails, massage,hair, media center...). My sales associate was David Kafka who was incredible. Friendly, professional, knowledgeable. No sales BS at all. I think out of all the sales associates that I've dealt with over many years, David is by far the best.
None
None
It was a mini-vacation with just me and the wife. We stayed in the cottages, they were very clean and spacious, and VERY reasonable for lodging on labor day weekend. Beautiful views outside the windows all around. Loved having a coffee in the morning enjoying the bluffs and the Mississippi. Rented a boat from the resort and did some fishing. we were centrally located from Alma and Nelson and just across the river from Wabasha. A big "THANK YOU" to Wes Stensland for making our stay comfortable and stress free. friendly folks! definitely would return
I have yet to find a better mountain biking shop in the entire US. Do it!
None
None
Had a VERY good experience here! Service was top-notch and my car looked impeccable! Prices were more than fair as I feel I robbed them! LOL. A definite recommend!
I have known Mr. Graham for over 10 years and he is a good criminal defense lawyer. He is very good at handling dui, dwi, drunk driving, drug charges, possession of marijuana, and assault and battery cases. In the interest of full disclosure, he offices next door to me but I have had the opportunity to observe him and he does good work for people charged with criminal offenses and he is a good lawyer.
Great service - fast, economical, no bait&switch or anything like that.
The sausage rolls are fantastic but once you try the muffins you will really be in love! I can't decide which is my favorite between cranberry orange and double chocolate. But you will only know your favorite if you try them all including banana nut, blueberry and cinnamon.
Great service and the food was to die for. End with a delicious 3 leches. Yum!
The staff is awesome and aren't douches like a lot of restaurants. The food is great and have NEVER had problems with it. As for the drinks, same as well, never problems. Food + Drink gets served fast so no waiting time hardly unless there is a long line, which even then, gets done fast.
Best deal on tackle & line in SD! Great selection of rods & reels and terminal tackle.
This is one of my favorite places for Happy Hour. Not only is the food good, but it has a nice patio for people watching.
Erstklassiges Essen, professioneller Service, angenehme Location!
Great experience, well trained staff, gave me all the information I needed to make a quick decision. I didn't even have to shop around, found a vehicle on my first visit.
None
Its for those who really want to study...to achieve their goal in life.
50 meters pool
Fun pet shop in downtown Provo. They seem to know what they're talking about, and have a great selection.
If you're looking for a solid, biblically sound church in the Lansing area, you should definitely check out South!
Perfect location marking.
I visited Sheehy Nissan of Glen Burnie, along with a few other car dealerships in the area, a few weeks ago. On this particular day I was only there to explore my options and was not ready to buy. When I returned this week, I was pleasantly surprised that my salesman, Kenny Pursley, not only remembered me, but remembered the vehicle that I was interested in, and most importantly what I needed and why. I was very impressed since I didn't leave my name or phone number on my initial visit. Not only did he listen to my needs, he was also very knowledgeable about the vehicle and extremely welcoming to me and my family. I felt very comfortable talking with him and never felt that I was being pressured to make a purchase. Kenny takes the time to get to know his customers and their needs, in my opinion, that is the basis for excellent customer service. I would highly recommend Kenny to my friends and family.
Absolutely love Cypress Grill! Their gumbos remind me of my grandmother's recipes. And they know how to fry oysters correctly - after breading them in corn meal.
None
For Triathlon equipment there is no better.
WOW!! I called ahead and told them another garage said I needed new rotors, new brake shoes, new wheel cylinders, etc...I was skeptical so I took it to Cooper in Muncie even if it is 1.5 hours away. They looked at it and told me the hand brake needed adjusted, there was air in the brake lines (I put it there so I knew that) and they adjusted the rear brakes. $35 ! WOW, they could have told me I needed all that other stuff and I would have felt like it must be true. I will always go there now!!
They do great work.
too, family owned, been there many times, my family enjoyed every time.
The loveliest hotel on Ibiza for over 1o years!
De los mejores shushis que he comido nuca
I always feel good when I walk in and even better after. My husband and I like to come in for the fresh selection of herbs which we use for everything from teas, BBQ rubs and our cats' favorite catnip.
I like this place so much I made my corporate HQ use it as our default PDX hotel. Rooms are big, beds are above average comfort and big granite desks with flat screens are great for business travelers. To the guy who said there's no fan in the bathrooms; there is, it’s just an always on whole building fan that constantly exhausts the air.
Learned By Doing! I want to go back for another degree.
None
Different than any beer in Seattle. This is traditional, UK beer. Barrel conditioned, cask ale - so it's flat and warm compared to US beer. But if you can get past that, the old building is vast and awesome to drink in.
Best auto repair shop in Arizona. Fair prices and honest work.
Simple, clean and fresh-- with lots of healthy variety. You'll walk away feeling good and not too heavy.
I lived in the South prior to moving to Portland. I was skeptical about southern food in Portland, but Whoa! I made sweet face love to their pulled pork sandwich, it was sinful. I just wish it was open longer
These reviews about the receptionists are surprising to me. Perhaps the office staff has changed since? I was helped by a woman named Heather and she was really nice and very patient with figuring out my insurance. The PA I saw was Kathryn Johnson and I think she's fabulous. Also the facilities are nice and I've never had to sit and wait forever for my appointment.
I think this is one of the best restaurants in Europe! The food is excellent, high value for you money, the staff is extremey friendly and efficient! I have been eating there 7 days in a row now and will come back many more times ! Jan-Anders hedenquist
Great experience for my 30k service. Called 2 days in advance to schedule, arrived the morning of my service was promptly helped and given my loaner car. Loaner car was in great shape. I was called when the work was complete and picked up my car which is running like new. Ive been to 2 other Subaru service centers and this has been my best experience to date. Everything is professional and written in detail. Do not hesitate to visit. Highly recommended.
As a mortgage loan officer I don't get the chance to give the names of home inspectors, but when I do, I always recommend Chad at Alamo Home Inspections. My past clients have been very satisfied and he has a great reputation in the community.
The team at ServCorp are incredibly skilled and professional. No job is too big or small for them and they ensure that my office is managed efficiently so I can focus on my business. I wouldn't hesitate recommending them to anyone.
I don't even really like Sushi but their Tempura Calamari is the best!!! I guess it doesn't really count since it's fried, but still! If you love Tempura Calamari, this is the place to go! The only thing I eat here lol. Edit: So, I've expanded a bit earlier this year and their BBQ White Fish Belly and Salmon Skin Hand Rolls are pretty good. I order the HR without the sauce though because I'm deathly afraid. Oh yeah, the value is great!!!!
The best Patisserie in North London. Stunning cheese buns. Wonderful bridge rolls. Fantastic cheese cake. Nice staff. Always polite. Recommended
Fast service, kind professional staff. I had a 3 inch laceration on my leg requiring 11 stiches.
Best pizza. Awesome appetizers, great dinners. It is a family run restaurant and they are great people. All the know is food, family and friends. Don't believe any negative stuff about this restaurant. Go there, you will not be disappointed. Love.
رائع مميز حديث مريح جدا ياليت يفتحوا بالباحة
I dont go but I will go there in my all life..I liked tooooo much
Everyone works super hard to make a positive experience for dogs and cats!
Craig Holten came to visit us at our new home soon after we moved in. I was a little overwhelmed by the advanced septic system that was already installed on the new property, as I am new to home ownership (apartment dweller). And with my husband being unfamiliar with such aspects of water provision and maintenance, we wanted to make sure we understood what we had on our hands. Craig was absolutely wonderful! He was patient, thoroughly explained how the system worked, and put my mind at ease. I was well informed and able to explain it all to my husband when he arrived home from work that evening. I would definitely recommend R&K Septic to other home owners in our area. LaToya S.
GREAT!! I would recommend BeanTree Pediatric Dentistry to anyone with a child. Dr. Mason works very well with the children. The place is very clean and nice, and they have a great room for children to play,color,and or watch movies while waiting to be seen. My son loves it.
Best Limo company in Syracuse. Have used them for everything, bachelor party, my wedding, wine tours, etc. Always had exceptional service. Defin recommend!!
None
None
Awesome, its helped me loose nearly 4 stone :-)
Good guys that know the business and do what they say they will.
I started going to Rockville Dental Arts recently and it has been a very pleasant experience. I had a big fear of dentistry after bad experiences with other dentists so I went in with considerable anxiety. But Dr. Barnes and the staff at the office are patient, respectful, and attentive. Appointments are efficient and easily scheduled. Though dentistry is expensive in general, Rockville Dental Arts is priced competitively and have not attempted to up-sell on unnecessary procedures. So far I have no reservations about recommending them to others.
After having called about 10 dealerships in the Middle and Southern TN area, and northern AL area, Landers McClarty was the only one that could locate the vehicle that my wife REALLY wanted and was able to deliver it in the time frame that I was looking for. Tony Moya was very helpful and made the entire process easy. I'm very thankful I found these guys and will make the short trip from TN to their dealership for my future Nissan Purchases. I deal in customer service and its easy to recognize others that it seriously. Thank you Tony Moya and Landers Mcclarty Nissan!
We had a very , very good experience with Ingrid. I found the vehicle I was looking for online and we started corresponding that way. The response was prompt, and all of my questions were answered. We are from out of state and I was concerned with how smooth the whole experience would be. My concerns were quickly dismissed. We had been at another dealership here in WI. on Friday, and ended up leaving, the customer service was less than desirable. From the first email Ingrid sent me, to her staying late to finish our deal, everything went better than we could have expected. We were in and out of the dealership with our new vehicle in two hours. Elmhurst Toyota is by far one of the best experiences we have had buying a vehicle. We will be back !! Thank you Ingrid for your excellent customer service!
None
None
No further comment. Had a good experience. Excellent job!!!
None
Way to go ... JS Support
Just finished mowing my yard after a repair by Frank. I think my mower may be running better than when I bought it. Frank was not only honest and flexible with my time but did a great job. I would recommend him to anyone needing repairs.
My girlfriend and I were in the market for a SUV for the family and a truck for myself. We had been to several dealerships is search for the best deal. I contacted Maplewood Toyota and spoke with Mark Swenson. I gave him our budget and the vehicles we were looking for and he responded very quickly with multiple options. Showing great teamwork, Mark set us up with Jim Miller who worked with us on the logistics of the deal. Jim did everything he could to make the process smooth and timely even staying late to help us clean out the car we were trading in. The final step was financing and AJ Altaher was patient and informative in answering all my questions regarding my first leasing experience. From start to finish we were thrilled with the team at Maplewood Toyota. At the end of the day we traded in an old car and happily left with two new vehicles that fit our life and our budget. Thanks to Andy Hulcher and the entire team at Maplewood Toyota.
Matmon provides excellent work with a quick turn around! So impressed!
Great community, outstanding professors, home town feel. Loved my time there.
This was by far one of the best car buying experiences that I have had. I received a more than fair price, excellent service, and a great vehicle. Both our salesman, Alex Whitmon, and the finance manager, Duane Massa, were fantastic. Both exhibited professionalism and were very knowledgeable in their respected areas.
None
安靜聖潔祈禱之處並可談心之處歡迎來看看
As soon as you get on the lot, ask for Sim Luu. My wife and I were interested in getting a 2014 Prius Plug-In. We were first met by Sim, who came off as genuine rather than the stereotypical car salesman. As we went through the car-buying process, Sim laid out all the details for us and our financial options. I really could not have asked for a smoother car-buying experience. Sim was actually able to make it enjoyable. Next time I need a car, I will be going straight to Sim again.
Hands down the BEST pastry place around. The cookies are to die for. The apricot turnover (my favorite) is amazing. From the crepes to the eggs Benedict, you can't go wrong. If it is busy, just wait and be patient knowing that you are about to enjoy some fabulous food. :) Once again, another fabulous meal! The addition of Debra to your staff is a huge win. She has amazing customer focus and the welcoming smile is the topper to the cake. Awesomeness at its best for certain. Getting hungry just writing this!
The food is great very nice portions and great price a great place to eat !
Very friendly staff, excellent food, love the outdoor seating.
Very laid back atmosphere great food. Highly recommended. I had the stuffed cheese Burger and sweet potato fries and it was delicious. My wife had the ceaser salad with blackened chicken. That was very delicious. I highly recommend this restaurant if your looking for something off the main strip and where the locals go this is the place.
None
charcoal burgers. super waffels. fast. best breakfast. ask michael phelps. great french fries. good tuna salsd.
This place is great! The family that runs it are true Greeks and the warmest people you'll meet. The food is fantastic! Parking is limited so if your planning on going for lunch make sure to get there early or call in your order ahead. Make sure you try the Greek fries, they are my Favorite!!
Fantastic people and great prices! Check out the first counter on the left when you walk into the store on the LEFT side.
I recently had a very good experience in the Cedar Park ER. I had some bad reactions to some antibiotics I was prescribed and was really scared. The front desk staff was really friendly, the nurse was great and the ER doctor took care of things right away and I was in and out in a couple of hours. I was seen to with in ten minutes of walking in the door, and the nurse who was leaving her shift came in to check on me before she went home, and introduced me to the nurse that was taking over. I liked how it was very clean, didn't have a strange smell and has all brand new equiptment. I'd go back for sure!
We had such a wonderful experience here. Neil Thompson was great. He helped me get exactly what I wanted, a great price and a great interest rate 1.74% Couldn't be happier. He showed me exactly how to use everything, set up all my features. I love the car.
We had a crack that developed under our window well and got worse over the past year. Every time it rained, our basement would start to leak. Nusite was recommended to us by a neighbor of ours. They were able to fill the crack and it's been dry for about 6 weeks now. They took the time to explain everything to me and provided a good service overall. Would use them again.
the Tom Kah soup.......mmmmm!
The fried chicken and waffles were the best I've ever had.
BEST SCHOOL EVER!!! Great teachers and great student. Very high quality
Great local place for food, sports and meeting with friends.
Håper de åpner igjen...
Its the bees knees
Dr. Zachary has moved across the street into his own office - look for Manhattan Gastroenterology
I have started the process of a cover up by Gerrit at Fire Fly Tattoo. They are very professional, and is unlike any tattoo business I have ever been to. These people are artist and do not make mistakes. I cant wait to see the finished tattoo.
I just want to take a quick second to thank make-up artist and stylist, Zoi and photographer, Cheff for everything you have done so far to help me excel in this industry. But more importantly just wanted to thank you, Zoi, and Cheff for making the journey fun. I have learned many things in my 23 years but none so important as enjoy the journey! 9 times out of 10 it's way better than the final result.
It's the best. Helpful and knowledgeable staff always!
Kambiz found exactly what we needed and the service was impeccable. Thank you Mercedes
The best Pub in Trowbridge by far! Great atmosphere, good range of ales and the Pizzas are amazing! Defiantly worth a try if you are in the neighbourhood.
Jackie did a great job on my facial. I bought a Groupon and had no problems. I did buy the 2 facial package. Booked my appointment with ease, nice reception area, welcoming, warm, lots of space, not on top or near others, in a private room, nice background music, smelled good, very polite. My first time visiting and look forward to my next appointment. Face feels and looks great. I totally recommend it. I just moved here from Canada, so I was pleasantly surprised at my finding a great spa on my first visit! Liked: Service, Atmosphere, Value
Madeleine is a world class photographer, you can't do better and the photos she takes are so graceful & timeless; the finest way to capture a very special time in your life.
Tratando de llegar temprano!
Elmari has a very gentle nurturing touch. She specializes in headache and stress reduction.
None
I have had nothing but Great experiences from Patrick and his crew in the past 5 years. When the warranty ran out on my 2007 Bmw I was worried about finding an honest and reliable company to help me keep it running and in good condition. Thankfully I got a recommendation from another BMW owner about MB Auto. After the first time taking my car here I knew I had made the right decision. If you are looking for an Honest , reliable, trustworthy company, It is MB Automotive. Thank you again to Patrick and his great crew
These guys do a good job. Fast, friendly, and good quality. Jody was very helpful.
None
None
very nice
Great atmosphere, excellent coffee/espresso, and awesome people!
Took our 8month old boy here last night and can honestly say this place is fantastic. The staff were exceptionally helpful and friendly and the food was out of this world. We will definitely be returning! Try it out you won't regret it.
None
None
Sugarland Mixed Martial Arts is an excellent place to train! They offer high quality instructors that care and that believe in growing relationships with customers. The first time I walked into the school, I was greeted immediately by the one of the owners and felt welcome and comfortable. It was in no way intimidating like some of the other experiences I had before from other schools in the past. Since I have started training I feel great, more confident, and have lost several pounds. Daniel, Chad, and Jeff are high quality instructors who provide the perfect balance of professionalism, friendliness, hard work, and fun for their students. This place is the best! It is also a kid friendly martial arts school that dedicates itself to teaching children hard work, discipline, confidence, and self-control.............I would and have recommend this place any day over any other MMA School! Thank You SLMMA for all that you do for your customers, it does not go un-noticed!
Superb college with great facilities and sports activity.... U will really like it very much
Brian has been doing my taxes now for several years. I have a day time consulting business, a portfolio or rental properties, a real estate training and education business, and an internet marketing business. So my tax situation isn't considered straightforward. Brian has done an exceptional job handling my taxes and tax prep. He's proactive in getting me my quarterly documents to file in plenty of time to get them filed, he advised me with respect to the tax implications on a complex sale of a commercial property and helped draft the appropriate language for the closing documents, and he understands the tax implications and treatments regarding real estate investing, which is huge and not very common from my experience with other tax preparers. Brian is also accessible and he's a good guy who is fun to do business with. His fees are also extremely reasonable - I get a TON of value from him. I give him my highest recommendation.
I was out of the hobby for a long time thanks to unfriendly hobby shops. I went into Maj's for the first time over 3 years ago and was instantly welcomed as a friend. Always helpful and friendly, never makes you feel like you are an idiot like some other shops in the area. Miniz racing is always fun! Flying helis and planes is a blast. Maj is ALWAYS there to help, if he doesn't have what you need you'll get it in a couple of days. I only shop at Maj's now.
My procedure consisted of mini tuck, Endoscopic brow lift, lower lid bleph with soof , and I had laser resurfacing done on my lower lids and mouth. Dr. Freeman explained everything to me thoroughly before my surgery. The surgery went extremely well and each day I could see my face improving bit by bit. By day six I felt good enough to go out to a movie. After four weeks I could see a beautiful me emerge. No longer did I see jowls and wrinkles on my face and neck. My face looked so much younger. As I type this now it has been nearly 6 weeks and I absolutely love the way I'm looking. I really appreciated Dr. Freeman's positive attitude from the time I went to interview him. Everything I anticipated and hoped for with this surgery was made possible because of Dr. Freeman. He did an excellent job on my face and I am extremely happy. I look 15 years younger. If you are thinking of having anything done to your face, I would highly recommend Dr. Freeman over anyone else. He is a remarkably skilled surgeon and a very thorough doctor.
Teeth cleaning Wednesday at Family Dentist Tree along with bite wing x-rays and fluoride. Everything went smoothly. One thing I hope they change is notifications that your normal doctor is away on vaca. I was notified on Monday that Dr. Stroop was away on vaca and I'll be seen by another Dr. Let me know this a couple weeks in advance or when Dr. Stroop puts in for vacation so I can reschedule. 2 days in advance doesn't leave many openings to be had to try and reschedule. I'm not taking anything away from the doctor that did see me though. He was kind and got to the point. Overall, I will and I have recommended Family Dentist Tree to many others.
A place to enjoy;-)
This place holds the most amazing opera shows with the most outstanding performances by the professional actors/actresses. I love the orchestra that accomodates the performance because I am a musician myself. It is a wonderful experience for those who haven't gone and has a strong interest in classical music.
I have been having regular reflexology sessions with Georgie for the past few months and I have to say I have loved my visits to retreat 4 your feet. A little haven in the heart of Putney and highly recommended.
We were getting married, so we signed up for private dance lessons with Fabio Bonini. We sent him our wedding song, and he choreographed a beautiful showstopper! We could not have been happier! Our friends and family loved it, and called it the "PERFORMANCE OF A LIFETIME." We HIGHLY RECOMMEND Fabio and Forever Dancing! Excellent experience all the way around. Friendly staff, beautiful dance studio, easy parking, and inexpensive considering what you get for your money.
WOW! I've bought lots of cars, new & used, over the years. This has to be the BEST CAR BUYING EXPERIENCE EVER. From my first internet inquiry, through several phone calls, to the dealer visit. WOW! Straight forward internet price quote. Car prepped and ready for test drive on arrival. No hassle or pressure. Minimal negotiation of trade value. I traded 2 older luxury brand SUV's, and their offer was spot on. A little more negotiating made the deal even better. I showed up to buy a Crosstour, they showed up to make it easy for me and to be sure I was more than satisfied. Brian, the Sales Manager, called me the night before just to be sure I had no more questions prior to our appointment. No hype, no hassle. Mark greeted us, showed us the exact car we had discussed, and let us take it for a no pressure, no 'follow my directions' test drive and he answered all our questions about the car. Back at the dealership, we agreed on numbers - hint: I GOT A GREAT DEAL - and sent the car to make ready while we went to the business office to settle up. Adam understood exactly what he needed to do, just the paperwork. We didn't finance, they knew it up front, and he never pushed it. He answered all my questions about warranties, both factory and extended. We selected a great add-on warranty, at a very fair price and tailored to how I use the car. Plus, no big push to upsell dealer add-ons. Plus a great price on the ones I wanted. And none of the it's already on there, we can't take it off bait and switch. Lastly, when the car was done in make ready Mark discovered a minor paint flaw, a bird dropping stain that need to be touched and buffed out. What did he do? He and Brian let us take the car so we could go get lunch, while they pulled another one from stock and got it ready. Later Mark came to the house and switched cars. THEY WEREN'T HAPPY WITH THE FIRST ONE, SO THEY GAVE US ANOTHER ONE! No other dealer had more than one of what I was looking for in stock, some had none. Rusty Wallis had enough inventory to replace a car they weren't satisfied with and didn't want to deliver to a customer. SUMMARY: Rusty Wallis Honda ROCKS! They make a compelling case for dealing with a family owned business and not the corporate owned dealerships.
I LOVE FIRST CREEK MIDDLE SCHOOL, great principals, and great teachers who care. we have great sports teams and really great coaches. The school is beautiful and I love First Creek Middle School!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
There is a reason why Car Zone gets great reviews. Murph is awesome. On multiple occasions he has saved me hundreds if not thousands of dollars. One example - my car was making weird noises - took it to a dealership and they told me my water pump was about to go and I needed to get it fixed asap and it would run me around $1,200. Took it to Murph and he told me the water pump was fine and fixed the car for a lot cheaper. It runs better than ever and 20,000 miles later no problems with the water pump. I won't take my car anywhere else.
The Cuckoo clocks are amazing, this "shop" is jammed packed with every type of clock you like, as well as souvenirs etc. It is a quick drive to the outskirts of Toowoomba, not far. When you walk in you don't know where to look first. I bought my first Cuckoo clock there 20 years ago & love it to this day! Well worth the small drive just to listen to all of the clocks!
Let me start off by saying how much I hate going to the doctor. I've never enjoyed the experience. That was until I met Dr. Schultz. He is a friendly and caring doctor that has gone out of his way to treat a difficult patient like me with care and respect. Because of this he is also the go to doctor for the majority of my extended family. He has taken time out of his schedule to visit my ailing father in law in his home just the check and see how he is doing. Those kind of services no longer exist. Those types of doctors are extremely difficult to find. I HIGHLY recommend Dr. Shultz and his practice to anyone in the area looking for an excellent family doctor.
I also called looking for rather obscure information. The gentleman was very helpful AND answered the phone after 5pm - an amazing thing in the Albuquerque area!... Aside from what I was looking for, I found out he sells re-furbished large appliances for a good price, delivers for $20 per item, and offers a 90 day warranty. I can't comment of follow-thru at this point - but I would try Mr. Ed's in a heartbeat.
My name is Shawn Kinard. I work with Godshall Professional Recruiting. We recently had some plumbing issues and Dipple Plumbing did a great job of helping us out. They were at our office within 24 hours of us calling about our problem and they had great customer service skills. I would definitely recommend them to anyone who needs plumbing assistance/repair.
Staff is attentive and the food is great . Get the fried squid legs on the side you wont regret it !
This was easily one of the best decisions I have ever made. I am an amateur mechanic myself but when I picked up a subaru wrx to fix up, I was out of my league. I bought it knowing some work had to be done and after I bought it I noticed a work receipt from the previous owner said the mechanic recommended a whole new engine! I felt absolutely sick. A fellow car enthusiast recommended local wrench. They ran a few tests and eventually figured out my car was misfiring due to a simple melted wire going to the cylinder. Not only did I NOT need a new engine, instead of buying a whole new 900 dollar wiring harness THEY BUILT the one piece of the harness I needed, which saved me about 850 dollars. I would say I SAVED THOUSANDS OF DOLLARS by taking my car here! These guys know their stuff and are not in the business to rip you off. Some of the most honest mechanics you will ever meet and Jeff calls you up and fills you in every step of the way. You would be absolutely crazy to take your car anywhere else!
I've always been very pleased with the customer service I've gotten. It's so easy to do business with them!
I love Cargo Bar for Lunch during the week, the $10 steak is a treat. Every time I walk into the venue staff are friendly and the lounge is a great place to party on the weekends.
Great facility. I really enjoyed spending time there this weekend at #wcgr
I've eaten lunch here for two years, and everything has been hot and delicious. Their cream cheese won-tons are awesome, and they tuck one into every lunch combo. If you like it spicy, just ask and they'll add a fiery kick to whatever. Today I had spicy broccoli beef, and it was excellent as usual :)
First class,great service,always on time,Auto Sales,Auto Repair and Towing these guys do it all.Highly recommended.
:-)
I have been taking cars to Mike for many years (he has serviced at least 5 in the last 10 years). He is honest about what needs to be repaired (hard to find an honest shop these days - very few left out there) and he has bent over backwards to accomodate me. Highly recommend.
I have been here twice. Delicious, Fresh and Authentic food especially "Paneer Makhani and Dal Makhani". A bit spicy but ingredients and meals were perfect. The staff is also quite friendly. I would love to visit again.
I joined Perfect Balance Doral just 2 months ago as a way to stay healthy and fit and already I can see a big difference in my body. I have dropped down in my clothing sizes and I feel so much stronger. Instructor Franky has great energy and is always super motivating. He changes the class a little every day to keep us engaged and working hard. This is also a great place to talk to people about healthy eating habits and Inst. Frankie always has advice about taking care of your body. It's been a great experience and I think it's been a great investment.
None
None
What a wonderful place. VERY helpful people - and parking right in front. No shpooing- mall drama. Yes!
Cenamos con unos amigos y pedimos un menú degustación: buenísimo todo, pero en especial me encantó el Pastisset de Boniato con foie y el Nem con salmón, rúcula y algunos secretitos más....también buenísimo el montadito de pescado en adobo y el Cerdo Pekín. Vamos, que nos gustó todo!!! Y excelente trato.
None
On my second visit to Raul's, I had the Chicken Lime Soup - delicious. Then I needed a little goat cheese, black bean, and guacamole taco. My sweetie had a different taco. We loved it all. Our only regret is that we live far away.
The best beef burger I have ever had, and the second best burger (the other being a bison burger at a high class NYC restaurant) For the price you cannot get a better deal. A buck more for twice the buger and 10x the taste than a bigmac. Tons of seasoned fries.
Best food on the river!
My past home
ชื่อภาษาไทยของคอนโดนี้คือ จุลดิศ ริเวอร์ แมนชั่น เป็นคอนโด 18 ชั้นริมแม่น้ำเจ้าพระยา สงบ ร่มรื่น น่าอยู่
Owner is nice, atmosphere is pretty good, food is alright. I would go back for a drink but don't expect amazing food, its decently priced bar food.
Вкусная пицца. Одна из лучших в Киеве. Хорошее тесто и на начинку не скупятся.
have used this service many times. I like the location because it is on my way to the airport. The drivers are always nice. The parking award system is good. Sometimes the wait for a pick up at the terminal can take a little while, but that can happen with any shuttle service. The pick up at the lot for departure is always there at your parking spot. No complaints
Traveling from out of town, stopped in to repair a non-function screen in iPhone 4. 45 minute turn around, promised when ready, and - best of all - less than quoted. Very honest people. I will send them my future repairs via mail.
This was the second time I used these guys and same ones moved me as before, courteous, efficient,careful and a lot of fun. On time and on budget, what a combination. Thanks guys, hope I don't have to move too soon, but believe me you will be the first to hear. Enjoy the summer
A good place to get my haircut. Prices are reasonable and the staff is very pleasant. My stylist of choice is Katie, who does a wonderful job.
We went there on a Friday after work and did not leave until after 10pm even though the salesman was scheduled to get off at 9pm he stayed until all the paperwork was done and made sure we knew all about the new Altima we purchased. This was the first time we ever bought a car from this dealer and we will be back again when the need arises.
I love Sara! She does an awesome job cutting and highlighting my blonde hair, which is very long and can be temperamental with color. She always cuts it exactly how I want it and I always leave happy. I recently moved to Austin and I still drive to San Antonio to have her do my hair. The salon has a great atmosphere and I always look forward to going in there.
I try to buy all my Mercedes at Greenway. They provide the best service.
Ivan is very friendly and helpful! He has the latest styles in stock at affordable prices. I chose out a pair of glasses that I really liked, but was way over my budget, Ivan kindly gave me a big discount to have them fit under my coverage! Ivan is very community oriented and would recommend him in a heartbeat!
The service is fantastic, the ladies are SO kind and loving to our animals, all 3 of our cocka poos come home looking smelling and feeling great! Would recommend Puppy Paradise to all animal lovers out there :)
Excellent courses provided. 100% satisfaction
Clossed now called Dirty Anchors.
amazing food. really tasty. Definitely i will be back!!
They take eftpos. Chicken burgers are amazing, World Cup burgers are revolutionary, great student food/fish&chips, but really the greatest burger experience around. You expect great taste from major restaurant chains, but lil Ben does well to make a name for himself among dozens of local competitors.
I get pizza from there EVERY Friday..........it is the best stuff I have EVER had..... EVER
My school :) I studied here for 10 yrs!!
Pickup USA is a great place to work on your game and get some runs in. It's at a convenient location of the 605/210 freeways, everyone on the staff is friendly, and you don't really have all the meatheads that run around at 24hr or LA Fitness. Everyone here is here to play basketball. They have a well organized system for getting in games too...when you check-in, you're entered into the queue for the next available game. If you win, you stay. If you lose, then you can get right back into the queue. No more arguing over who's got next!
I have been coming to this coffee shop since it opened. Have seen several owners come and go.. Mike is by far the best owner and makes a great pour through coffee.
I have known Joe for a couple years now and everyone that I know who is working with Lincoln Insurance only has rave reviews of their service.
Hi everyone dis mom nd dad shool nd my mom is ateacher in dis school it got big classrooms nd spacious playground in kiddle vth lotus pond comptly school constucted vth designed way thnks to all
My husband & I have appreciated Dr. Hodge's services for 35 years. My husband had some very bad experiences in the military with dental care. When he heard Dr. Hodge and and his staff "catered to cowards", he gave in to getting dental care with Dr. Hodge. In addition, all three of my daughters & their families value his compassionate dental care. My youngest daughter would wait until she was home from Tennessee and Germany to trust her dental care to Dr. Hodge. I have appreciated the positive environment in Dr. Hodge's office carried through by his caring staff. I also appreciate how Dr. Hodge integrates the latest technology and how he involves his patients in determining what strategy for care will be provided. There have never been surprises from unexpected expenses. I have also referred friends & family who had dental emergencies. Not only were they worked in immediately, they are still Dr. Hodge's patients and trust him with their dental care.
Marsh Insurance & Financial has always provided excellent service that has been second to none. I've always been treated as a valued customer and friend by Greg and his entire staff. A few years ago I was with a national agency with no local representation, but found that not only did Marsh save me money, but gave me a local resource for all of my insurance and financial needs. I would highly recommend Marsh Insurance & Financial to anyone that values "being valued" as a customer and client!
Courteous staff, excellent coffee, and get the breakfast burrito!!!
None
Very friendly staff and amazing food!
None
Jeff's a great guy and his staff are knowledgeable and capable.
I had liposuction performed by Douglas Senderoff, MD, FACS. He provides extraordinary pre-operative plastic surgery and post-operative plastic surgery care. I am from Westchester and elected to have my liposuction plastic surgery procedure performed at his NYC surgical office. I never wrote an online review before but I am so happy with my liposuction results that I just wanted to thank him in this special high-tech way.
Not too pricey, not too casual. Food was very, very good.
I just finished my stay at the Shamrock Hotel in Toowoomba which lasted a week. I heard a lot of bad stories about the last owners, but to me it seems like they are addressing everything possible. The last staff at the Shamrock so far as I have heard were all sacked for unprofessionalism, dishonesty, or what have you but I have never been there before so honestly can't comment. The whole inside and outside of the licensed section of the premises is being renovated to be brought up to a modern look. They are putting in a new TAB, Gaming Room, I think they are even putting in a night club. I ate there every night and the food was always delicious, especially considering how well priced everything on the menu is. The entertainment was more than you get from any other pub in Toowoomba I am guessing as there was Karaoke and Live bands on just about every night while I was there. The rooms were so much bigger than the last hotel that I had to stay in for a month, but they were both around the same price. The rooms were spotless and looked good but no doubt will be even better after the accommodation section of the hotel is finished being fully renovated too. The housekeeping staff were really friendly, I would probably even describe them more as "Cool." The bar staff, the management, everyone in that place was just so friendly, I think most guests who stay actually would become friends with them. I also made friends with other guests too, it is just that sort of friendly place. There is only one place I am staying next time I go to Toowoomba, and I recommend you to too.... Shamrock Hotel in Toowoomba Rocks, thanks guys.
Living Springs Veterinary Care has been such a valuable asset for our family. Our dogs are a big part of our family and our Dog Training Business. Living Springs has helped us through everything from the birth of our puppies to the sorrow of losing one of our beloved dogs. Their commitment to their clients and of course the many varieties of animals that are in their care. I highly recommend Living Springs Veterinary Care to anyone with veterinary needs. Their courteous and knowledgable staff will take good care of you and your pets. Leah Morse CPDT-KA Certified Professional Dog Trainer/ Canine Behavior Therapist
None
Excellent product & professional service overall. Happy to recommend!!!
fixed my PS3 for $79 and PlayStation wanted $129!!! Great deal, I appreciate their work, thanks.
Very professional and polite service. Would recommend to anyone.
I went to see Claire for help to quit smoking. Have to say I was slightly sceptical and didn't know what to expect. However Claire was very accommodating, understood my issue and has finally helped me get over my smoking habit.
Amazing service so far!!!! We have struggled with internet service ever since we moved out to Eagle Mountain 4 years ago. We tried Digis and hated the internet speeds we got... it was NEVER what was advertised. We then switched to RapidWave and they were ok, but then they merged back with Digis! We had NOTHING BUT PROBLEMS and were regularly getting speeds less than 1 Mbps even though we had been paying for 15 Mbps. With Direct Communications we are getting exactly what we paid for (20 Mbps) and sometimes we even exceed that amount! I am absolutely amazed and wish I had made the switch years ago!
The lady who have helped me was so nice -- my question was answered so quick! :)
Great takeaway!!
If you want to experience the power of the augmented reality, Adstuck is the one stop solution for your all kind of needs. Adstuck is the only augmented reality company who provides Image Based AR, Location Based AR and Sound Based AR on the single platform. Lets enjoy the next generation Augmented Reality using AREAL..
Excellent service! I've been diving for 12 years and a divemaster for 2, and have not come across better instructors anywhere. My girlfriend and I came here to escape the cold up north, and knock out her checkout dives. I was very happy and impressed with our experience. Instructor Dave Ross is top notch, I highly recommend diving with these guys and will certainly come back in the future!
Just had my AC serviced by Daniel M. Was on time, and got the job done quickly and correctly. Would not have anybody else working on my home system.
Geetika excellent treating my daughter dental procedure cleaning and sealing. her office was very nice and impressive and excellent staff
My little sister’s wedding was coming up, and I wanted something really special that would be glamorous as well as appropriate for the occasion. Though we were not in her wedding party, the bride wanted all her sisters to dazzle, and I knew exactly who to call – Bridal Styles Boutique! Elaine was so wonderful! We talked about what I was wearing, my style, my sister’s wedding, and her wedding look (Elaine and Edward designed her veil and headpieces too). What she and Edward created exceeded anything I had imagined. I’ve never worn anything so gorgeous in my hair. I felt so beautiful! Thank you, Bridal Styles, for my incredible sparkly hair flower. It added just the right amount of magic to my little black dress!
I am thrilled with the level of service and professionalism at The Temple. From the moment I called to set up my appointment to the second I walked out the door, I felt as if I was in a high-end salon! Very friendly staff, helpful, and professional! I have been to many places over the years (all over the world), and I rate my haircut, color and highlights in the top 10 of services I have received in the past! I will be going back to The Temple, and I would recommend it to anyone looking to have their hair done in Frederick, MD!
None
Aaron is an excellent Plumber. He went straight to the problem saw what needed to be fixed and provided the solutions and prices for the fix. I recommend Aaron to anyone wanting to get the job done right in the right amount of time at the right price. Thanks to Aaron we will continue using them with all my plumbing needs. JD plumbing quickly responded to a friends house whom we referred last week during this freeze. She was totally impressed with the service and call my wife and I to thank us for the recommendation. If you are reading this you should use JD Plumbing.
None
Extremely friendly staff, and lots to do and see, as 2 teenagers we really enjoyed out day
David Tower has amazing ability to see beyond a basic client request. To see everyone as their own individual canvas making suggestions and collaborating to ensure quality work that will last a lifetime with no regrets. His staff as well live up to the highest standards by David and are respected by him for their individual capabilities as they all strive to be better then the next artist. Truly a chill environment and if your looking for far beyond satisfactory work this would be the place to check out. They are opening up another shop so that alone provides concrete evidence that they know what they are doing and aim to please.
I had a great experience at this location and am very happy with the customer service. I am in the service business and can tell when people are lazy and don't do their jobs correctly. These ladies were EXTREMELY helpful and went out of their way many times. The Property Manager Gissel was very nice and got me in/out as quick as she could. THANK YOU VERY MUCH!!!
great gelato, no comparison with some touristy places closer to the monuments. you should go here instead
Great Experience, very professional. I have 2 periodontal / dental offices in Long Island New York, and Anthony's work was excellent, professional, and just a work of art. I recommend him to anyone who would like a virtual tour of their business. Very easy to work with... and on time! Alan Farber
I've been a member for over 30 years at the Bountiful location, I've always been treated well and have loved the service they provide. When they have helped me with financing vehicles they have always had great rates. They are a great Credit Union.
Tasha was very helpful and made the move in/out fast and easy. Would 100% recommend this location to others!
I found Dr. Koretsky and his staff to be both capable and polite. Dr. Koretsky did my colonoscopy and it was quick and painless procedure.
Signs Now did graphics for our window. Very professional. Easy to do business with. Will definately call again.
Stephen was delightful, his setup was very professional, and the coffee was delicious!
I had mold all over my newly purchased home. I called h20 911 and they came to my rescue. They did the job in a timely manner to get my family back into the home. They not only did a great job in removing the mold, the build back was better than before. Thanks Dave C. I will recommend them to anyone!
I selected Sublett Studios to photograph our wedding last summer. After meeting with multiple Wichita area photographers, I felt that with Sublett I would get the artistic photo quality that I desired for a very affordable price--and I was right. I typically dislike being photographed, and so I was thankful for the confidence and calmness that Heather and Amber brought to our photo shoots. Their sweet personalities put me at ease. Heather has been so easy to work with before, during and since our wedding. I highly recommend Sublett Studios!
Loved it. Great town great people. Beautiful location.
I love this company . From the time I called and talked to the lady on the phone I knew that this was the right choice. I signed the contract online. They price matched. The big part was they was prompt on the drop off to my building from my building to my home. I promise you. this is the storage company for you.
I'm from Brisbane, but I travel to Melbourne several times a year and the Doot is a pretty regular stop off. The food here is great - a cut above other pubs without being any more expensive. You can rely on getting a delicious risotto or perfectly cooked steak, in generous portions too. They serve good beers from the tap! I know Melbournians love their Carlton Draft, but it's refreshing to have something else on offer too. They have some craft beers and quality internationals.... I'm a beer lover, so I think that might be why I prefer the Doot to other Melbourne pubs. It's a really welcoming place, which is pretty important for a solo interstate traveller. I put it down to the uber-friendly staff and quirky, but comfy fit-out. I've not stuck around for the full party / club Friday or Saturday nights yet, but I'm probably too old for that anyway. I do want to check it out one day (my friends and colleagues have all recommended it) but for now I'm well happy with the place for good beer and great food.
None
Went today for the first time. They are super friendly and personable! I hope they will be the place I go for my dentistry needs for a very long time! They welcomed me, got to know me, made sure I was comfortable, and the visit went by quickly as well. It's a great place to go for your dental needs.
I was so embarassed at 39 years old I needed braces! I had spoke with other Orthodontics who tried to persuade me to try Invisiline. Iam grateful I didn't. Not only did I feel a bit too old for braces, I also drink alot of coffee; which has left me with a stained retainer. I had been a client of Dr. Gardner when Dr. Niepraschk took over the practice. He holds great credentionals and I knew Dr. Gardner had spent a great amount of time searching for the right person to take his place. I was very amazed how Linda and Dr. Niepraschk didn't 'miss a beat' during my visits. The new Dr. explained everthing about my treatment plan, and shared other innovative methods. My teeth are finally free from braces! I loved the way I felt when visiting! It was just like visiting friends! And the best part was how everyone collaborated with each other regarding the client's needs. If you don't like your smile, I know just the team to help! I toast to everyone who works in the office! They did an exemplary job! Sincerely, Cheryl McWhorter
Great place!! Different than other party places in that you get the whole place to your self (parents can relax a lot more) and you can bring all your own party food and stuff. Kids had a blast the place has a little bit of everything and is decorated really nice!
None
Soy Oliverio Satisfecho y formo parte del magnífico equipo de The Magic Factory. Quiero dejar constancia con estas palabras de la satisfacción y el honor que me produce pertenecer a tan augusta empresa. Gracias Daniel por tu generosidad y buen hacer. Mi gratitud amigo.
Pete Risi is an incredible musician and an excellent music teacher. You will feel comfortable with him and he will help you to achieve and exceed your goals.
None
None
Love this place! Great sandwiches and fast.
I ordered dinner from Cristino's online. When I got there, they had not received my online order and in fact could not find it. I say they have excellent service because the owner went above and beyond to correct this problem. It ended up they had technical difficulties and my order actually came thru while I was there waiting. So, even as they were slammed (and for good reason, the food is amazing) he pushed my order through. When we got home, everyone - friends and family- were so impressed with the quality of the food, we never even gave the little extra wait another thought. Bravo! Cristino's!
Howard's advice is always clear and concise and he is always interested in looking after his clients and making sure they have the right investment advice and protection to suit their circumstances.
Let's cut to the chase. Dr. Curry is a miracle man. And a really great guy too. Four years ago I pinched a nerve in my back/neck. After epidurals, an osteopath and physical therapy, I went to East Bank Chiro desperate for relief. Within a week I was in relief and essentially "cured" after about 3 months. I continued with regular adjustments for another 9 months but for some reason stopped going. Never-the-less, these guys put me right and I carried on for another 2+ years pain free. About a month ago I started having hip pains and literally 10 days ago I had very limited mobility in my hip. The pain was level 8-9. My first port of call was East Bank Chiro and Dr. Curry. I got almost instant relief, but the xray found that one hip was half an inch lower than the other, the source of my pain. At 48, my body needs some attention and TLC and the treatment is working. In two days I am going skiing with my 16 year old son and I am ready to go - something I didn't think would be possible 10 days ago. I realize this is just a necessary part of my life now and I will make sure I receive regular adjustments from now on. The staff are great. The office is nice and comfortable. And I always get in and out in half an hour or less. These guys have all the xray and muscle measurement tools in house and they are professional and welcoming. Highly recommend. A+++++
We have purchased numerous vehicles at Burt Watson and have always been completely satisfied with all aspects of our purchase. We also take all of our household vehicles to them for maintenance and service, they do great work at very reasonable prices. Also thanks for all they do for the Freeland community.... I now understand why you say "It's a Burt Thing", great job to everyone there!
First Digital is a great company to work with. We have been working with First Digital for a year now and the have always been great to us. They have been really flexible and fair to us, they have accommodated our needs and met our expectations . Their customer service has always been prompt and efficient.
Great staff.
The food is excellent, the service is great, the decor is very pleasant. There's just so much I could say about how wonderful this place is. I had the Chili Rellenos and, while they burned through my tongue (ouch! spicy!), it was worth every bite. You also *must* try their fresh orange juice. I fell in love with the OJ.
None
Grady Nerad is, in my opinion, the best tattoo artist in the area hands down. Great dude, great work, clean, and has no problem chatting it up while he works on your tattoo. Also, very fair prices. I walked in with a friend of mine and just gave Grady a broad idea of what I was looking for, came back in a couple days and he had a rough sketch that looked exactly what I was picturing. Told me $250, and I paid $250 on the day, no bull****ting around! Definitely deserved the nice tip I gave him and would recommend him to anyone.
Amazing atmosphere, people, and delicious food! By far worth every penny and then some!
I've been going to BYB since December 2012, the studio is filled with a fantastic group of teachers and students and I can't recommend it highly enough.
Had a great time! Staff were friendly and helpful. I tried the long black course and it was really hard (I'm a somewhat lanky 19 year old male) but was a great challenge. Definitely worth a visit, but don't make the mistake of thinking only the hard courses are fun, the others are very relaxing.
Great results and a professional service. Dan Lewis and the team are very easy to work with. They take all the stress out of the process and deliver an open honest value for money service. Highly recommend using them.
Melhor atendimento da região.recomendo.
Excelente servicio, calidez humana, e inmejorables instalaciones. El lugar, muy bonito. Da la certeza que el mundo se detiene a nuestros pies.
Estudo no UNI e só tenho elogios a essa instituição.
They are simply the best. anything that a human could desire... They always remember your favourite - are fast and efficient and really - just perfect
I call in to the Dog & Doublet regularly and always get great service. I would highly recommend the Inn
I have been stopping at this location for probably 5 or more years. I like the floor plan of this store as compared to others. I love the Latte's and the pick two. Tonight I had the Broccoli and cheese soup and the Sierra Turkey sandwich on the Asiago Cheese Focaccia. Yum!! My other favorite is the Fiji Apple Chicken Salad, always good. The food at Panera, regardless of location is always consistant.
None
This was by far my BEST car buying experience. The staff at Universal KIA are friendly, helpful, and courteous. Billy Bidwell has restored my confidence that good car salesmen do exist. It is because of him I was able to purchase a quality affordable car, and he worked out the best possible deal for me. He has a wonderful sense of humor and made me feel like family. Billy drove all the way from Franklin to Clarksville which is about an hour and fifteen minute drive to pick me up and bring me to the dealership. When I arrived I received great customer service and was able to drive home the same day in my new car :) Thank you Billy and Tabatha for making this process so easy for me, you guys rock! Four days later and I am still in awe, smiling from ear to ear. I feel great about my purchase and will gladly recommend Universal KIA to anyone looking to purchase a new or quality used vehicle and please see Billy Bidwell he is AWESOME!!!
None
Outstandingly good and affordable. We come several times a month. Had the lentil-meatball soup for the first time, wow, savory and filling.
Best escort service.
Jeremy Williams is key for us new agents to find direction and to create and follow a plan for success. I appreciate the direction and accountability to grows my business.
None
Expensive for what it is but food is definitely excellent. No complaints there. Our final waiter was great but our first was not as much and the hostess appeared very confused. We had to sit at the bar first because we arrived at 5:24 PM and seating didn't begin to 5:30 PM. When it came time to move to our seats, we moved ourselves and made a few trips to bring everything with us. We were surprised that none of the waitstaff came over to help bring over our drinks and menu.
Honest. Will tell you if there's nothing they can find that's wrong with your vehicle, if there is indeed nothing wrong with it. Always friendly and very much in demand which tells me that these guys are reasonably priced and very professional. A great place to bring your vehicle from my experience.
Great place to eat in San Gimignano!
Astonishing
The best sandwishes by far!!!
I have been a patient of Noah's for awhile now. All I can say is good things about this man. For Instance, he cured my acne and now I have the confidence to pursue my acting career and he can successfully remove a mole/lesion within the first visit. I highly recommend Noah to any future patients,who are looking for Doctor that is fast and efficient.
Good people with loads of selection and great service. I have bought many vehciles from Ocean Park Ford over the years and I keep going back. These guys are worth talking to if your looking for a new or used vehicle
Jim has been cutting my hair for years. I started having him cut it at Lou's and followed him when he opened his own shop in Springfield. I was very happy when he opened a shop in Ozark. My son still sees Jim for a hair cut when he visits from Chicago. Great barbershop. Great conversation and Jim is great with kids, too.
Patient on Ward 66 for 3 days, excellent treatment and nothing but praise for dedication and kindness of nurses and doctors. Anthony Booth
One of the last real record stores. Please support real music shops!
I was very impressed by Mr. Goldberg. He is very knowledgable in many different areas, specifically bankruptcy law. Randy provided great guidance and above all was very professional. What I really enjoyed about him was the personal touch that he approached my situation with. This showed me he really truly cared about me as a client and wanted to do everything to help me out.
None
I have been a client here for years. I love the location, very easy to reach and park. The staff are all very nice and attentive. Its a treat to have nice cup of flavored coffee or drink during your service. I have referred many people over the years and all have had positive experiences. Both Mason and Erin are very skilled and well trained hair stylist. I also love the wide range of products they offer! I wouldn't go anywhere else. Try it, you'll love it too!
I think Idaho Fitness Factory has a lot to offer for a smaller gym feel. They have a wide variety of classes. My favorite is bootcamp! The gym is always clean and has up to date gym equipment. Definitely worth the money.
Gary and Mike came out to my home to do a "12 Month Warranty" inspection just to make sure that I didn't get stuck with paying any "builders errors" before the warranty expired. I had no clue what to look for. They did a fantastic job, very thorough, spent a few hours here, and gave me the peace of mind knowing everything was A-OK! Their report was very detailed and easy to read! I'd highly recommend ANYONE from the Home Inspection Man team!
This Place is THE PLACE to eat real Mexican Food!!
So yummy and fresh!!
None
excellent
excellent customer service with the lady's > Brandy nd Vikki.., YAY!!
None
Scary Perry's is great place to go this time of year. It has some really cool decorations for your house. I recommend it to anyone in the area looking for unique Halloween costumes! The owner is really helpful to find everything you need.
None
Swamiye Saranamayyappa
None
Great talent with affordable prices and great beauty advice as well. You would be smart to make Cortney your hairstylist.
None
I would definitely recommend y'all any day. Your tech Steve is very professional and knowledgeable. Great job Abacus!
Nemůžu jinak než chválit, obsluha byla milá, jídlo i pivo výborné. Jen ceny trošku vyšší.
I've used RR Landscaping for several years--reluctantly at first because I've always done my own lawn work. Their service is excellent, staff is professional and courteous. They are reliable, efficient and do their best to accommodate requests. They charge a fair price, which is very important. I have never had a reason to regret hiring them -- and there have been times I've thought about it just because I'm stingy. But what takes me 3 hours, they do in 30 minutes (1.5 acres), and time is money. The owner is easily accessible and responsive to questions. I have also found them to be pro-active when/if there are conflicts (weather related, etc), which is great because I know the job will get done. I guess anyone can have a bad experience with a company -- but having been a client for several years, with no prior knowledge of this company, I have to say it's been a great relationship. And now I found out they do Christmas lights. Holy cow, I may get off the hook this year!
Pizza does not get better than this. As a guy that always orders food and never cooks for himself, I can say that I've tried every pizza plays in Ballwin/Chesterfield and nothing, NOTHING comes close to Jet's pizza. Their signature Deep Dish pizza is like no other. The sauce, the cheese, the FRESH TOPPINGS, nothing is left out, and they're not skimpy with their toppings! Not only that, but the customization they offer for everything from breadsticks, calzones, pizzas, and even salads (yes, salads) is not your every day customization. You can choose from lite, regular, and double toppings (triple too!). You can do this for your sauces and cheeses as well. Oh, and you can also get your pizza well done (extra crispy), or litely baked (soft and doughy). You can't do that at most pizza places. The final point I'd like to make about my local Jet's restaurant is their staff. They are kind, friendly, patient, and personable! They ENJOY what they do! I mean who enjoys working at a pizza place?! Uhm, every employee I have ever seen at Jet's. I always write them funny messages on "special instructions" box during my checkout, and they ALWAYS respond with something funny or cute on the inside of my box. Not only do I get delicious food, I also get to smile. What more can you ask for? Try it, you won't be disappointed.
None
Kelly Rakowski is awesome! Very helpful, wouldn't want to work with anyone else.
Just bought a Colt LE6920. Really was surprised at the negative reviews because my dealings with these guys were top-notch. Fast and friendly service. After a lot of research and shopping around, even at the Indy gun show, these guys still beat the price by at least $200 dollars from anywhere else I found. I absolutely will be purchasing another firearm from these guys in the near future.
A few months after being introduced to this practice, I found that I have more energy, I'm standing straighter, and most importantly I'm virtually pain free! I appreciate the knowledge and willingness to get to know their patients, and the information and skills I have learned have been invaluable!
This is my second Volkswagen CC purchased from John Ostlund and Dean Team Volkswagen. John is very courteous and extremely knowledgeable about the product line. It is truly a hassle-free experience which is one of the main reasons I keep coming back. My wife just purchased a new vehicle a few weeks before from another dealership and we had to deal with the "typical car salesman": pushy, aggressive and he even threatened us if we didn't give him a perfect score on his review. Needless to say we did not give him a perfect score. My experience with John and the Dean Team was the exact opposite. I was made to feel comfortable from the very start and was at no time pressured into something I didn't want. The whole process took less than a few hours (it only took that long because I couldn't make up my mind) and I am extremely satisfied with the service I received. I would highly recommend John Ostlund and Dean Team Volkswagen to anyone who is fed up with the "typical car salesman."
Great Vet! We acquired a cat from a neighbor. He had been neutered at Dr. Dan's 3 years ago so we took him there for his rabies and temperament shots. Great friendly staff that are "Pet People" as i like to call em. We have another aging cat that had lost weight and was not looking too good. We were so impressed with Dr. Dan and staff that we made an appointment for our 2nd cat "Monday." We found out she had a liver problem after doing blood work. Dr. Dan gave her an antibiotic and some other medicine, plus a vitamin supplement. Were happy to say she is doing well. Our special thanks to a great veterinarian! I should point out that Monday used to have a good vet whose company was bought out by another. We got the impression that they were too big to provide quality personalized care. I'm glad we found Dr. Dan and staff!
They have a buffet sometimes, which is fantastic. On the buffet, they have queso. Enough said.
This is the best gosh darn pizza I've ever had! I know a former worker there that told be about it & I really love it! Best pizza in the world, please do try!
One of the best burger joints in Panama. Their specialties are awesome, I prefer the Japanese Swiss and the Three Amigos, but you can custom make your own burger with whatever ingredients you want. They also have a Burger Challenge which is free if you eat a burger with 3lbs of meat in under 20 minutes.
Wheeling's River City Ale Works has fantastic bands, fine food, excellent drinks and a goovin' atmosphere.
Fantastic experience - felt very comfortable and didn't have to worry about anything. My therapist took care of everything for me and greatly eased the tension I'd built up from snowboarding all week.
I have been a patient of Dr Smith for many years now, have refereed all my friends an co workers to Dr Smith and his capable hands.
I have always loved Paula Deen and I will always support her. I never get why this place gets low stars. I have been twice and both times the food was so yummy! The servers were so nice. MY phone died and the server found a way to charge it for me. He was so nice. Even my husband who is from NYC loved the food! Every time I am in Savannah, I will stop by!! =-)
What an awesome campground! We camped 3 nights in a tent in the Osprey Loop. Campsite 20 is amazing! Large campsite with a short walk to the bathrooms and showers that are very clean and have nice hot showers that are free. You can walk down the short trail to the lake, which of course provides a beautiful backdrop for the campsite. Everything about the park was very well kept up. Very impressed with the price and amenities.
By far the best bar in University, and one of the best bars in Charlotte.
I love my new website. It is easy for us to manage because we are dance and music instructors, not programmers. With our old site nobody ever found us online either and now they do.
None
This place is so great! Friendly owner operators treat your animals like they are their own pets. The place is immaculately clean. Couldn't ask for a better home away from home for your pet!
The waiter was extremely friendly. The food was excellent, and seemed to be much more authentic than other Mediterranean restaurants. The tabouli had more parsely than bulgar (made just right). Their hummus was excellent. For the price, the portion size is large (we left there with uneaten food). They even gave us some free dates! The atmosphere could use a little work (maybe some more decorations on the wall).
Great experience had them do a fall cleanup pricing was good and the cleanup was great. They did a very thorough job after they left their was not 1 leaf in sight anywhere...
Chuck is awesome!
The owner was super polite. I went to get my car smog the price is reasonable the staff is friendly and it was fast. definitely coming back to get my oil and sparks changed.
I usually did this yoga 2times to 3 times a week. If you looking for something to do for your health, I highly recommand this studio and master Hyun. When I took a class first time I felt relaxed right away and warm my whole body. I never felt my body warm before this yoga. Also I got a backpain because soccer. After 1month this yoga my back pain was gone. It never happened again even though when I playing occer. If you looking for yoga master, Please do not heisitate to contact master hyun. He has been teaching this yoga over 15yrs. You will get what you want to get it. L.B.
None
Absolutely love BBF and Jenny! I've been going to her for a while now and absolutely love her. She is very down to earth, sweet, and genuine. She makes you feel comfortable, relaxed, and cares about not only her work, but you personally. The location of the salon is very convenient, clean, and a funky chic! If you go, you won't be disappointed.
My wife and I love this place. We frequent at least once a week. The service staff is fantastic especially Kim and Robert. We love the sushi rolls and Bento Box Specials for lunch. We used to drive 45 minutes for Sushi, now we only drive 2.5 miles for amazing sushi.
I love buying my watches and jewelry at Sierra West. They always take care of every need. Tim is the by far the most knowledgeable Jeweler I have met. Thank you taking care of me and my adult children.
Just super!!! *****
A clean and fun atmosphere, a friendly knowledgeable staff and the best in trendy underwear (as well as erotic adult items) - clearly, all the ingredients needed to make this shop the hottest in the gayborhood!
She is 5'6" gauges in her ear and very attractive. She made my pita with love.. Something about the way she understood my slight kosher ways which she accommodated by cleaning the grill and cook wear. The night was ending on a Wednesday 11/4 and she invited me out for drinks as she closed the shop and I wanted to go so bad but I couldn't.. This has to be the one of the most pleasant place to visit after everything closed. I like her a lot.. Will Dream about.. Drink a beer for me. ..
I have been a vocal student of Saul Fox for about a year now. I thought I had a pretty good voice when I went to see him, but I soon realized I had not even scratched the surface of what was possible. Saul is one of the best teachers I've had in any discipline. He challenges you to work hard and go beyond what you think you are capable of doing. He is always positive and encouraging while making clear what areas need more work. Saul always knows what songs to teach you to complement your particular voice and maximize your strengths. Also, he provides opportunities to perform and develop your confidence in front of a live audience. If you have a desire to perform someday as a singer, I highly recommend you give Saul Fox a try. Andy Bishop
Though I do not train at Goshin, or even live locally to partake in all of the wonderful things they do, I do interact with Mr Boggs quite often. I am a martial arts instructor, as well, and one of the dangers of our business is that we tend to run ourselves ragged, giving of our time and attention to everyone but ourselves. When it comes time for me to fill my tank, I often look to my fellow martial artists, who understand everything I am going through, and Mr Boggs is one of the most inspirational people I have met in martial arts community. He is fair, open minded, creative, receptive, and productive; all of the traits an excellent instructor should possess. Though I am thousands of miles away, I have no qualms about recommending Mr. Boggs and Goshin Karate & Judo Academy, as I can only imagine that the personal interaction of a student's experience would far outweigh even the great benefits I receive in the digital world each day.
I shifted to Auckland three years ago, after trying about five hairdressers in central Auckland I came across Corporate Mens Haircuts. After one visit I was hocked and been back every four weeks since. I now wouldn't go anywhere else. They do a great job and their attention to detail is top notch. Great location and always clean and tidy. - If you are looking for a quality barbershop, look no further.
Dr. Shannon is courteous, professional and most importantly effective. He will answer any questions you may have, his clinical skills are top notch, and so is his "table side" manner.
Old Marigudi Tempel.
None
I'm responding to the last review before me- I think this person might have had a bad experience or someone having a bad day?? My husband(MILITARY) and I first went into the garden place after calling around looking for some mulch,manure,natural matter. We called first to ask questions which KARIN the owner spent about 10 minutes just giving us suggestions! when we went there we had to wait a few for one on one assistance on a busy sat. then karin personally spent 30 minutes with us.she knew a lot about all kinds of gardening issues and we spent $50. Not a lot considering the personal time spent with us. try getting 30m out of an employee at lowe's,home depot!! and u spend at least that $. she employs a few people and they are frequently busy so I try stop in early to get more personal time. its a small business that I have seen many times giving personal service to its large amount of customers. yes prices are bit higher than the big stores but worth it just for the service. never once have I heard any negativity towards military, I'm in there at least twice a month because I make an all natural body,bath care line and karin asked me(on my first visit) to bring some my items in to sell there, without wanting anything in return. I now give her 20% to be fair(electricity is not free). I buy some of my herbs and plants for my natural line from her. I am a stay at home military wife and mom of 4 have lived in clarksville area for 7 yrs now. I've shopped at all the nurseries and big home stores and overall Garden place is a good small business. Everyone has a bad day from time to time so maybe that last reviewer didnt get the normal service I have seen there so often. Everyone deserves a second chance!
Great food at a great price and it comes fast and hot.
This is an excellent hotel. Everything was just great.
We had been planning to install a hardwood floor for quite some time now, but somehow or the other the thing got postponed. This year my wife and me decided to put a little effort into our flooring venture and this is how we came across Floorlabor. During this time, we had contacted a few other providers also, but given the experience and the reasonable quote we decided to stick with Floorlabor. I am happy as they delivered more than my expectations, they did a good job, and we will surely hire their services for two other rooms we plan to hardwood next year.
Very polite, great decor, and a fun atmosphere!
Beautiful gardens to explore.
Perfect place for kids
Jesse was very knowledgeable and helpful. Way to go!
An enjoyable dental visit! The dr is friendly, actually listens, and does beautiful work. My smile was fixed! I highly recommend.
Service was good, despite the fact that they were completely surprised by a large surge of United Methodists flowing in from the OnCenter. VERY friendly and helpful despite the situation. Food was great. Recommend the peanut butter bacon burger! (Suggest that manager make it a point to know when large events are occurring across the street)
Great recent move with RSL moving! Professional job, very well executed. Everything went smoothly thanks to the great care which was taken every step of the way. We had a lot of stuff that had to be moved with great care and RSL did just what we asked. The main thing that pleased me was the speed with which the process was carried out, without hastily rushing and making mistakes. It was really a pleasant moving experience.
hecho
None
One of Florida's best! I've been in nearly every dive store in Florida and have rarely seen such a heads up operation. SCUBAdventures has received the Naples Daily News Southwest Florida Choice Champion 8 years straight! The entire staff are very experienced instructors, having trained thousands of students in Open Water on up through Instructor levels. They are also specialists in unique training like underwater photography & video, emergency procedures, spearfishing, freediving and technical diving. I like a dive shop loaded with gear, and Kevin has packed the place with diverse equipment from Scubapro, Zeagle, Sherwood, Aeris, Cressi, TUSA, O'Neill and more. Repairs are another forte' of SCUBAdventures. Never have I seen such a large following of divers going on trips and attending social activities! Scheduled this year are big trips to Dominica, Bonaire, Bahamas, Dry Tortugas and Grenada. Monthly Florida dives are planned to the Keys, Ft. Lauderdale, Pompano, West Palm, Jupiter and the best wrecks in the Gulf of Mexico.
Nice
None
I Love BBQ...:)
Nice place GOT
Tracy is a fountain of knowledge, and can build out nutrition and diet plans based around your schedule. Works well for me since I work crazy hours and sit at a desk most of my day.
None
Food is real good
None
Paul Howard had a hugely positive influence on me a few years ago. As well as helping me quit smoking, Paul gave me the tools to start living a more confident and happier life. I'd warmly recommend him to anyone.
Great food and service. The biscuits and jam were delicious
Awesome structure
Went to see Richard Snyder out at Crown Kia and could not be happier. He explained everything to me in detail and got my car fixed very quickly. I definitely recommend Richard to anyone who wants a good honest service experience.
None
None
Miso Express is a very good place to eat! I think it has the best Japanese fast food in Canton, Ohio!
I bought a Groupon (or some similar deal) and had 4 spider vein treatments with Diana. Terrific results and a great price. Diana is very skilled and pleasant. I have also bought some high protein/low calorie meals there; one I especially like is the 4 or 5 Bean Casserole. My dealings at Spiegal Spa have always been pleasant, punctual, and productive.
For my birthday I wanted to try out something different, so I reserved Shoot Indoors for myself and my friends. A lot of the girls were a little nervous before we started because they had never shot before, but Shoot Indoors was great in giving us an excellent safety tutorial. The tutorial was to the point but informative and I didn't feel that my time was wasted at all. Brian and the rest of the staff were also walking around giving pointers and making sure everything was working well with the guns. After maybe a couple rounds all of the girls were hooked. They LOVED it. So much in fact that a bunch of them set up a girls outing to come back. The place is brand new, the guns that they rent are high quality, and the prices are excellent for what you get. They were able to accommodate over 25 of my friends with no problem. It's just a cool place to hang out and I will most certainly be coming back.
I really appreciate the environment of service over sales!
Dr Linda has been my doctor for 12 years and i've watched her 'mature' into an expert in the field. I don't know where i'd be without her advocacy and caring support during the most chaotic times. She has a sense of humor and is easy on the eyes as well, which is a major plus because nobody wants to share their soul with someone without…. well you know what I mean.
The home of Faculty of Humanities (English, China, Japan, Psychology, Business Law, International Relation), Character Building, and Language Center.
Great building. Maintenance requests get filled promptly, cheerfully unlike with most apartment buildings. Can't beat the location. All the staffers are super friendly!!!!
this is by far the best place I've ever been to. I took my Nissan Murano in for a problem that no other mechanic knew how to fix. Julio was the main mechanic that helped me with everything & quoted me a great price that i couldn't refuse.
They are excellent! I NEVER EVER cared for red velvet cake. Until I tried theirs. THE STORY: I bought a few for a party since everyone seemed to like red velvet cake. They all took a bite into it and their eyes turned into huge saucers. I was like "what?" And everyone freaked and talked about how amazing it tasted so I tried it and I was pretty floored. YUM!!!!! It doesn't taste like any red velvet I've ever had. It's a dream in a cupcake form. Now I'm afraid to get Red Velvet anywhere else.
I had a great car buying experience here and recommend it to all my friends. James White is an incredible resource there. He is extremely knowledgeable and honest. He is more like a buddy trying to help you find the best fit and definitely not a guy pushing something that won't work for you.
Meet a friend there for early lunch as we like the quiet, no loud music for background. their patio is wonderful, sheltered and quiet like in another world. Have not gone there for dinner nor done any bar action. Food was so good the first week we went there that we came the next week end also.
超喜歡這裡 好像家人一樣被對待
Great Place. So many trails and a cool creek. You are right on the water
Theyve got just what you need for every occasion, Sweet Tea vodka, Straight, and Ruby Red! Love love love!
Absolutely the most service orientated store. There are ladies that work there who are willing to help you find anything, find the best deal and truly want you to save money. I was impressed. No matter who you are, they treat you with respect. Thank you Watertown for having this store and thank you employees for being so friendly and helpful.
In reference to Kaylee's bad review: I have been to this store and have been helped by Kaylee a few times. She has gone out of her way to help me with my vehicle and has replaced the bulb on a head light for me and also switched out my battery. I have found her to be knowledgable and professional. I am wondering if maybe the nasty reviewer was having a bad day and took it out on the folks that work there.
Lovely Community with a ton of fun things to do- pools, hot tubs, tennis, putting green. I love it!
They had an okay selection of hookah equipment, but not the best (they did have what I was looking for, but not a lot of variety). They did have a good selection of shisha though. They have a lot of pieces and water pipes too, if that is what you're looking for, as well as all the standards: a wide selection of cigars, tobacco, tobacco pipes, papers, cigarettes, and chew. The staff was friendly and helpful. There were several employees present, which meant they could help each customer find what they were looking for and ring them up with no wait. I did not feel pressured or pestered, which was nice as well because I usually know what I want when I walk in to the store. The shop was clean, well organized, and not cluttered (a problem many smaller shops suffer from). It would be nice if they were open a little later, but their hours are better than most smoke shops. Overall, a very good business that I would recommend.
Sice jen vydejni misto, ale bleskove odbaveni.
None
Excellent mid sized zoo my daughter got to feed a giraffe for a five dollar donation
Emad and his team provide fast, efficient service with a friendly smile.
None
Excelente arquitectura, sin embargo le faltan mas tiendas!
Bonita iglesia
Recently I purchased an iComfort mattress from Mattress Capital and couldn’t be more pleased. They were very friendly and helpful without a high pressure sales mentality. I had been sleeping on a very inexpensive mattress for about 8 years during a period of frequent moves. Now that I have settled down I felt it was time to get a better mattress. I chose the iComfort which is a moderately priced mattress. From day one my sleep improved so much that it is hard to quantify. I really did not know what a good nights sleep was until I purchased this mattress. My biggest disappointment was that I did not purchase a mattress of this type earlier.
Everyone! Stop fighting and listen to me! Yes, maybe this place closes at ten, and yes, maybe Sheila was glued to the computer! But there is so much more to this place. This seller of fine nectar, this haven for the unwashed! We must unite our forces under the flag of the Big Rock, under the sterling flames of the Coors Light! Brothers! Do not fight, do not raise your voices in anger, but harmonize in the love of fermentation! Drink with me and celebrate the glory of liquor, the triumph of booze! Do not succumb to the teetotalers but raise your hand in celebration! Here's to you, Royal liquor!
ここより美味しいインド料理屋さんを見つけるのは、かなり難しいしと思います。下手に都心で食べてしまうと、後悔してしまいます。
What an amazing, high-speed, professional framing shop. Besides their absolutely huge selection of frames, their service is very fast, very efficient and .... well, just perfect! If you're anywhere even remotely close to this place, you must go in and see them in operation. And because they deliver, it's a serious no-brainer.... why use anyone else?
Buen trato, lugar muy céntrico y tranquilo, habitaciones limpias y cómodas. Muy recomendable
Muy buen restaurant a mi me gustan mucho los tacos al pastor.
None
None
Vino Artino is a great place to take a significant other or a group of friends. The atmosphere is warm and coupled with great step by step instruction. I am looking forward to revisiting soon!!
I actually go here for Tattoo Removal. I went to another place that was more expensive and was beginning to scar. The Gentlemen here at Tattoo Bills was very helpful and nice, and he did my tattoo removal very quickly and efficiently. He was knowledgeable and professional. The tattoo removal healed up much nicer than where I had been going and faded better than the other treatments. I will return here for the rest of my tattoo removal, and should I want a tattoo in the future, I will give them a try!
The guys at this location are very friendly and always give great customer service.
A real English pub, beer oh clock. Go there, end of.
Ben y asercate al camino de Dios aqui en contras el Amor de Jesus Muestro Salvador. Ben que nosotros los Catolicos tambien le alabamos, glorificamos y bailamos al Señor muestro Dios. Aqui te esperamos y recuerda Dios te Ama Hermano
Great service!!!! Highly recommend them. Killed all my bugs. No more pest problems.
Collision Care repaired my fender-bender promptly, courteously, cleanly, and VERY economically. My car looks like it just rolled off the assembly line! I will definitely use Collision Care again for any car body repair needs. Thanks so much!
We've moved to 801 E Deuce of Clubs. Just around the corner from our old location. Now serving Dinner 7 days a week. Come check us out
It was a wonderful experience with Dr. Klock. The staff was friendly and welcoming and they made the experience comfortable. I would definitely recommend them to anyone who is afraid of going to the dentist.
Kolej Teratai
My stay there was fantastic. The manager Harry Hawkins was very professional and helpful. The staff was polite and the hotel itself is wonderful. I would totally recommend this hotel. The ambiance is mellow and the layout is so sexy. I recommend visiting the Aloft at the National Harbor as well.
Tony was very attentive to our needs. We told him what we were looking for he brought 3 different models inside for us to look at so we did not have to go out to walk around the lot in the cold and high wind. We decided the Fusion would be the best fit. Tony sat down with us and discussed colors, options, and explained the option packages, in other words to get this option you have to buy this package. After explaining all of this he brought out a car for us to test drive. Tony is a good listener because we bought the first car we drove. Unlike other dealers who get you to drive the most expensive model they have, then try to work your way down to what you asked for in the first place after test driving 6 different cars. When it came to finalizing the deal Tony found all available discounts. Through conversation he found I had retired from a automotive parts manufacturer that is a Ford supplyer, so he called the personal dept. of my company and got the information from them, called Ford a got a pin number and got me on the Ford X Plan for Ford suppliers. I didn't know I was still eligible for that discount. The next day they had us come back to teach us how to use the Sync system. Justin was very patient in explaining everything and very thorough. My wife is not computer savy and Justin was very patient with her and took time to find ways to explain so she could understand. It was a very good buying experience and I recommend Kistler Ford to everyone planning to buy a car.
Great food and service. Always quiet for lunch.
None
Great group of event professionals. I worked an event with All Star Talent, inc. and Meeting Dynamics Inc. for a large group of Movie Theater Managers and we produced a military base theme and they made the provided audio and video. They made the whole process simple and amazing! Total event industry pros!
Did not realize it how fancy this place was, almost walked out because I felt under dressed, but they allowed us in and seated us. The steak though was out of this world. No steak will ever compare to the steak I ate at Chicago Prime. Thank you for a great experience!
This is a wonderful school because I did not get any practiced at home or with anyone else and my teacher helped me practiced in the street and had a lot of patience with me. My favorite teacher was Rosa she was so polite and explained stuff carefully. Syed was very funny and entertaining during the long class hours!! Can't wait to take my driving test for my license!!
Great Games, awesome hospitality.
All of the people are very friendly, professional and helpful. Dr. Wollock is conservative and only recommends work when it is necessary. He always describes the work as he is doing it. I feel very comfortable with him and confident in his abilities.
Key to success
Prompt, helpful, informative and tailored to what I needed and even put back my hub cap. Full marks!
Have had this storage unit for past few years. Very very well-maintained and great staff. Carts and large elevators plus cargo elevators make it so easy to bring items in and take things out. Like a hotel - you could feel safe sleeping in your unit! Good system of security!! Can enter any time during day or night. Temperature kept at normal room temperature. Can't get a better storage facility!!
None
Awesome night here, full of good people. A wonderful experience overall! Nice cocktails!
The Montessori Scholars Academy is a true gem. I visited the school in March of 2013. The building is brand new and the atrium is built specifically to minimize allergies, maximize natural light, and have fresh air flow. The safety of the building is quite secure, with a keyless entry code at the entrance, a check in and out system for the children, and an emergency system in place. The playground is big, clean, and safe. The kitchen was exquisitely clean, and the menu for the children very accommodating to allergies and dietary restrictions. The attention the teachers pay to the students was very impressive. You can tell they truly care about the education of the children and the success of the Montessori system. If you have any doubts about the place, make an appointment! Ms. Veronica, the school director, was extremely accommodating to my last minute appointment request and gave me a thorough tour of the school and answered all of my questions regarding curriculum, education, and philosophy. This is a world class facility, right outside of Atlanta!
None
Finally, a great place to see fantastic Americana music in DC. Great set up, wonderful bands, perfect location, cold beer, delicious flatbreads, love the owners Karen and David. The Vinyl Lounge - a bar in a side room with a VW bus inside - is also fun place to hang.
I had an accident with my Macbook Pro and a liter of water. I took my macbook to a Apple store, and was told that the motherboard hab to be fixed and it would cost me $1280.00 to fix. I decided not to fix it. Fast forward to 6 mos later and my girlfriend and found PCMac Tech. She told Blake my story, he said he could probably fix it for $600. I brought it to Blake he fixed it and had it running within 2 wks. (It would have been soon, but he had to wait for some parts). My Macbook works like new! I have nothing but praises for Blake and his crew!
We were very skeptical about starting the car buying experience. You know the joy of the toothpick chewin' car salesman sleaze ball. Soon as you pull on the lot they come running almost knocking each other over trying to be the first one to you. Well thankfully our experience was not like that. We went to Ehrlich Kia about 15 minutes before they were closing (not knowing that they closed at 7). We just wanted to get an idea of what our options were. That is when we met a gentleman by the name of Tyler Stoughton. He was literally on his way to his car about to leave for the day. He took the time to go over a few options that would land in the parameters we had set for ourselves. Also made us aware of the 24 hour test drive option that is available. In addition mentioned that Ehrlich had a few other dealerships in the area and we were welcome to view there websites to see if there were other vehicles we would like for him to have brought to the dealership. (which was greatly appreciated) So from there we set a time to meet with Tyler when the dealership was open. When we met with him he was successful on providing us a few different options that we were interested in. We ended up test driving a 2012 Santa Fe and then ended up taking it on a 24hr test drive. When we returned it we literally dropped it off and then met with Tyler the following day. During the whole process Tyler was very friendly and professional. As far as everyone else I cannot say the same, Sales manager and GM fall right into the categories of what was mentioned earlier and were skeptical of in the first place. His GM better do what he can to hold onto Tyler for he is by far the MVP of this dealership. Therefore if you go to Ehrlich KIA, it would be in your best interest to ask for Tyler and avoid all the clowns! We ended up purchasing the Sante Fe at a far price and Tyler himself took time to make sure the vehicle was detailed before we left the lot that evening.
None
Grandísimos profesionales. Su conocimiento sobre el medio les permite asesorarte de una manera rápida y, por supuesto, eficaz.
Have only used the service department here for my Nissan. Always friendly and helpful. Very accommodating too.
We were having trouble with our heat pump and called Integrity, they came out within 24 hours, found out what was wrong, and were back the next day to fix it. Later that evening something else went wrong, I called the next morning and they were here within an hour and had the problem fixed. The problem was something that was done by the people who had originally installed the heat pump. Their customer service representatives are friendly and more than willing to help. I would highly recommend this company!
We've been several times, and the food and service are always excellent. It is much busier on Friday nights, but the food came out quickly. My wife loves their eggplant parmesan, and I'm a fan of their Stromboli.
None
We visited Regional for an emergency visit. They were amazing!! I would highly recommend them and return. The staff was courteous and understanding of our situation and went out of their way to make us feel at ease. What a wonderful experience for a not so great situation. We left there feeling great!!
Tired of taking your pet to a busy, noisy clinic? With TLC ONAWC has its pulse on providing pets and owners with caring and nurturing health solutions. Peaceful and fabulously pet friendly unlike other clinics. With them it's not about the number of patients, it's about the quality service they provide to you and your beloved pet.
My first visit to this type of restaurant. Very nice, excellent food. Fun tinge for or anniversary.
This is one of those rare businesses were we actaully enjoy spending money at because you know it is money well spent. In fact, we live 3 hours North of Holland after we moved and will still only take our truck there. Quality people and honest to a fault. Reasonable in pricing and far cheaper than the dealers.
Een goede partner om je online vindbaarheid te vergroten. Geen poespas, klare taal en prima oplossingen.
Discovered this restaurant by luck, and this was the best meal we had in the UK so far !
None
There's about a million Mexican food restaurants in the DFW and I've maybe been to 30% of them. Frescos is BY FAR better than any of them. I got their Bombas as an appetizer (cheese stuffed Fresno peppers wrapped in bacon) which was the BOMB. For my main course I got “The Mexican” Steak Dinner" which I have never seen at a Mexican restaurant. Soooooo goooooooood. I highly recommend trying that. Great place, great food, gotta go.
Amazing, the food is fantastic! Whenever I'm there, I will always order their house egg foo yung along with my meal!
Without a doubt one of my favorite restaurants at yonge & finch. The dimsum is pretty good, but pricewise you get much more bang for your buck with the other menu items. Delicious food for a fair price, and a very large selection. Since moving to the area, it has been one of my most often-visited restaurants
For the price, this hotel was excellent. The people at the front desk were very nice, and the room itself was very clean. We got a great night's sleep there - no problems with noise from the highway, etc. I would highly recommend this as a great place to stay, especially for the price!
Without a doubt my favorite casino! Have been going there on a semi-regular basis for 3 years. Employees are always cheerful and polite, even the cleaning crew is nice with good attitudes. This tells me the management treats them reasonably well. Consistently sour and grumpy employees usually points to mistreatment and bad management, haven't seen that here. Always have a decent to great time there. My only complaint is that over the last year, their Falls Bar has been starting to develop a mold problem from all the moisture in the air from the water that runs down the window-walls to create the falls effect. I can smell it if I go in there to refresh my drink. If I want to hang out at a bar I just choose the Thunder or Mingles bar instead. Lots of roulette available, my favorite game.
I have bought a few vehicles from ATI, that I found first through newspaper ads. They were very helpful in giving me as much backround information as they could, for what I was looking at. These are used cars, so after doing inspections or work on the vehicles, they pretty much knew what was needed, and were honest about it. I like that. I picked up some good deals there. I even sent some of my friends over, and they are still driving around in the cars they bought.
My wife and I went into Hoigaard's for the first time to see if we could set her up with a downhill ski set for a deal. I jumped the gun and ordered mine online (remember this for later). We were able to get her a pair of skis, boots, poles and helmets for both of us all for 25% off. Gary Ball in the ski dept helped us out and didn't even give me crap for getting mine online. He was super knowledgeble and didn't push us towards higher end skis we didn't need. She loves her ski's! Onto myself. I brought in my skis and boots and bindings to get mounted when they arrived via UPS. I asked Gary about the boot size I ordered and he promised me they were a size and a half too big. As a bummer as it was, I trusted his opinion. Unfortunately all shops around town were out of that boot in my size. They offered to call the manufacturer and another store in Milwaukee for me to find them. (Even though I still hadn't purchased anything from them). They ended up finding them and shipped them next day air. Overall I was blown away by the prices, the knowledge of the staff, and the amazing customer service even to a person who didn't originally give them my business. I'm heading there tonight to pick up my completed skis. Hoigaard's has made me a lifetime customer!
Most people in the country had never heard of Moore, Oklahoma before yesterday. Plaza Towers Elementary School was not part of our lives. That all changed. We pray for you, we mourn for you. We have no words that might lift the burden on your hearts for even an instant. May the peace that only God can provide, sustain all of you through this tragedy. The emptiness of your loss will always be there, but through everlasting life with Christ Jesus in Heaven, someday, your lives will again be whole!
None
I love love this place. I like the fact that when I am craving Pho and I'm at the Outlets, I can come here. When I am in a hurry, I call ahead and get it to go. Spring rolls are amazing! So are the frozen mango desserts. I will confess that I've only had Vietnamese food at one other place, Pho Saigon in Oxnard. I loved it there and I love it here. I prefer the atmosphere at Basil and Mint though. More room to relax and have a nice meal on a date night with my wife. We got to meet the owner/chef one night when she came out to the dining room while we were eating and talked to us for a bit to see how we liked the meal. She was so friendly and it was neat to hear the story of why she started the restaurant. Her Vietnamese accent was a bit thick so it was a little hard for me to understand her but I think we got the gist of it. FYI, the restaurant is tucked away in the left corner of the plaza. Get the House Noodle Soup and add lots of lemon... sooo good!
Best Chiro experience I have ever had. Dr Sherrod knows what he is doing. Bulging disc in my neck. This problem has almost brought me to tears several times. 1 single visit to the DR and I was good. He KNOWS WHAT HE IS DOING and is gentle as compared to other old school chiros that just want to yank your neck around!!! I would recommend him to any and all who need help.
Fantastic Agency Great service and reasonable prices. Been here 4 going on 5 years and haven't had a problem.
This is a beautiful range nestled in the mountains near Castle Rock State Park. It is well maintained and the Range Safety Officers are there for YOUR protection. I've seen many families come up here to teach their children to treat guns with respect and learn how to shoot the right way. Definitely a "must" for any gun enthusiast!
None
Awesome repair shop and the guys did high quality work! Helped me take care of everything involved with the repair of my bumper. They called the insurance company to get a re-appraisal, set me up with a rental car and frequently kept me updated with the entire process. I would highly recommend you guys to bring your vehicle over to them without hesitation.
Great food, fun atmosphere- decorated for the season! Good prices! Not a huge menu, but you don't need a huge menu...everything they offer, they do well!
I was very satisfied with the service. It cost me about $10 for a load of laundry that would have cost me about $50 to wash at my hotel. When I picked up the clothes, they were clean and nicely folded. No complaints!
None
After having not eaten here for several years, we ordered dinner to be delivered on a whim. Not only was the food delivered very quickly, but the food was EXCELLENT. Their Kung Pao chicken is to die for, quite literally the best I have ever had.
Amazing experience, have had very few issues going here and those I have had were quickly resolved by management. Highly recommended!
None
Great prices and assortment
I work at GMD and think its team of legal professionals is tops! Clients are the number one focus and the attorneys and staff members work hard to please. Fees are very reasonable and turn-around time is short. I highly recommend this firm!
Its the way to roll!!!
None
Michael was great to work with. Very professional in diagnosing our power failure at the heat pump's outdoor unit and then fixing the problem.
I recently spent three nights at the resort and enjoyed the ocean view, the spacious and very comfortable room, the personnel and the ability to walk both my dogs along the beach. I would very highly recommend this resort to anyone who wishes to enjoy a relaxed environment in a well organized, casual resort.
I'm a fan of this place. I eat here at least once every couple of weeks. I love the brown stew chicken, beef patties, and the curry chicken patties. Try it out.
Cryousa was a welcome relief. I am in my late 30's and constantly put myself to the limit with jiu jitsu. Not only that, being a college athlete and an airborne in the Army, I put a huge beating on myself for the last 20 years.. I could tell the difference in my joints as well as an overall relief from day to day stress. I evened managed to drop a few pounds. I highly recommend this treatment for those weekend warriors and anyone else that is looking for an alternative to painkillers and shots!
None
Been coming here for over 4 years ! Claudia is the best in color and cut. She always seems to take the image out my head and make my idea come to life. i have never been let down in last 4 years of going there. She will tell it to you straight whats possible and whats not. You can always count on her giving you her honest professional opinion
Charmaines cupcakes were recommended to me by a friend for a unique valentines idea - I have since ordered many more from her!! They are beautifully decorated and her attention to detail is immaculate! These cakes are unique, stylish and look so good you want to frame them not eat them!! But once you do taste them they are just as good as they look!! Highly recommended especially as the cakes are as lovely as Charmaine making them.
None
Love this place
None
This is a great place with good food. If you enjoy finding the local places instead of a chain restaurant, this is your place. The kids want to come back tomorrow for more!
Excellent customer service, nice and clean and great rates. Highly recommend!!!
Great food, great people, great time.
Destul de OK restaurantul. Se mananca bine.
Collectors Cache is the premier Card shop in the entire Midwest. Clearly they hold Yugioh Regionals and Magic PTQ inside their huge store. I Have traveled around plenty for pokemon (when I was younger) Yugioh (when I was a teenager and in high school) and I still do for Magic the Gathering. This shop is just the best I promise. If your shopping experience isn't up to snuff just ask them a question or email them. They will promptly respond. If you would like a specific item and they are out of stock just ask, they will order it just for you. They have also added the board game section and Minis including Warhammer 40K and Star wars. The staff is always friendly and are great people persons. The shop is locally owned forever (gosh its been there since 95th and metcalf and I believe before that too... ). As far as pricing goes, you CANNOT beat their sealed product prices (sleeves, boosters, fat packs, booster boxes, legendary collections, tins etc). The singles are priced right at market price most people use Ebay, which is always ever changing and hard to keep up with. In General, When I raise my kids, I would show them this wonderful shop and have fun!
Being a beer nerd/snob/enabler, it is hard to find a passionate, knowledgeable and friendly staff to help explore the ever expanding world of craft beer. Big Hops has all of this and more! Did they mention you can take your beer home with you?!? This is amazing!
kinda pricey but great service and great food
None
Husk - Nashville is a great place to grab lunch or a drink after work. With great service and great atmosphere, this new spot in Nashville will quickly become a favorite of the city. It is already a favorite of mine. I will be taking clients here for lunch for years to come. Try the shrimp and grits! I was very pleased with the quality from top to bottom. It is also worth mentioning that the prices are very reasonable. Try it today!
Lisa planned and put together an amazing trip to Cabo for a bachelor party of 22 of my Fraternity brothers. Getting all my brothers together and on board for this trip was easy but making sure we all get our passports and payments cleared is another thing. Lisa has stayed in contact with all of us as the trip gets closer to make sure we all have everything ready. Being one of the planners in this group of guys, I'm so thankful for Lisa and pro travel. I never could have planned something so extravagant and have it run as smooth as it has. As a group we are extremely excited to celebrate one of brothers getting married and since everything is taken care of all we have to do is show up. THANKS LISA!!!!!!
FreightCenter has been a GREAT partner for our shipping needs. We have been doing business with FC, and working with our agent Scott Brown, for approximately 2 years and the customer service is always excellent. Freight Center, and Scott specifically, ensure that we get the best rates possible and that our shipments arrive on time and intact. They have also been able to provide guidance and assistance on the rare occasion that a shipment has gone awry. Thanks for making shipping as smooth and painless as possible!! -- Wholesome Goodness, LLC
Excellent food and views at a very reasonable price.
Food was delicious and portions were just about right. Create looking restaurant with efficient service that didn't get in the way. Best night out at an Indian restaurant we've had in a long time.
I have nothing but positive things to say about Consolidated Home Repair. Chris was a complete professional and the work he completed on my home far exceeded my expectations. He is a perfectionist and it shows. My neighbors now want him to do work for them as well. I wouldn't hesitate to give him a call if you need an outstanding contractor in the Raleigh area. Good help is hard to find, but that's what you'll get with Chris. Update: Had Chris come back out and fix a couple other issues for me. Super nice guy and very astute at problem solving. I can't speak highly enough about the work he's done for me.
A damn fine haircut from a seriously classy barber shop.
Lovely food, very busy but service was excellent. My brother, who doesn't like Indian food was persuaded to try a few things by our waiter..and he thoroughly enjoyed them....until he got carried away and tried my husbands chicken ceylon (which had a hidden bite back)! One of our dishes was a little too hot , so we were brought another slightly less hot one.Would highly recommend.
Best school in the county fantastic
Bonnes sensations et décors exceptionnels !
Purchasing a vehicle at Covert in Bastrop is a positive experience, no back and forth between sales people and haggle here and there. Buster, by now our personal sales rep. knows what he is talking about, polite, to the point and precise. The finance person Jonathan is cut from the same cloth, very knowledgeable and to the point. We came in, told them what we liked and within a record time where on our way in a new vehicle. The service department too, will go through all the hoops to get you back on the road as fast as possible. Last year we where time bound but had an urgent recall on a Suburban LTZ (2011) and it was taken care of in a quick and highly professional way. Covert, you sure have my business.
None
They were so friendly and easy to work with! I definitely would recommend them to any organization!
Just went in and bought a used Ford Edge from Rob Gartner. He was great to work with, and was able to find my wife and I a great deal, and did a great job to work it into our budget. We ended up with a lot more car than we expected, and at a great price! I highly recommend Rivertown!
I had really bad experiences from childhood with visits to the Dentist. My roommate reccommended Dr. Smithson and so I went to see her. It had been several years since I had gone because of my fear. I was welcomed when I first arrived and made comfortable. Teresa, the hygenist, made me feel very at ease and she explained everything she was going to do before doing it and made my visit more bareable. That was over 5 years ago and now I don't mind going for my regular visits at all !!!!!!! The staff is the best, very friendly, courteous and always making you feel at ease. Going to the Dentist isn't the most desirable thing to do, but now with the experiences with Dr. Smithson's office I can go without any dread. Keep up the great work!!!
I think you guys should post you hours on here! You guys are open sometimes pretty late at night, others you aren't. I'm always craving you guys at like, 3am but you aren't open when I drive by :( Other than that, you guys are awesome.
Fair price for good food. Good brisket and friendly staff.
None
The Saint Jude Retreat House offers a easy to understand self empowerment social education program. The premise of the program is to learn to find happiness without drugs, alcohol and other addictive behaviors.
Nice
None
None
This place is awesome, great food. The person that gave this place 0/3 needs to get over themselves.
None
Perfect getaway coffee shop.
I've had several experiences with Sudsies, so far, all very good. Dry cleaning comes back like brand new. I've had several suits altered and fitted as I've gained and lost weight over the years. But the best is the last minute "I forgot about xyz event and I need this tuxedo by tomorrow"...and they've always come through. I find them to be very reliable and professional.
I love Allstar Kia !!! I bought my 2nd Kia Rio in December, 2011. I bought my first Rio in December, 2009. Both of my car buying experiences were great. I refer anyone who will listen to go to Allstar Kia. The people who work in sales are great! I do not live near Allstar Kia and I originally was not going to have my service done there but they gave me my first service free and after that service, I knew I would make the drive. The people who work in service are great!
One of my FAVORITE lunch spots. Also one of the few Chinese restaurants that have lamb. The lamb and basil lunch special is fantastic, as is the Cantonese fried noodles (not sure if that is the correct name for the crispy noodle dish that i also get). Definitely a must try if you 've never eaten there....... Oh .... great soups too!
Always a pleasure to have Eric (Service Pro) visit our home. He services our AC and heating system twice a year. He is thorough and professional as well as friendly. He is polite and always goes the extra mile. Eric always takes time to greet our dogs and even throw the ball for them before he leaves. I would highly recommend Eric Smith and Comfort Master Heating and Air for all your HVAC needs.
Dr. Ern is outstanding. I need a lot of work and I only just started with him. Can't wait to see the end results since the temporary work is so fine, right out of their on-site lab with no waiting. The practice staff is wonderful too. Everyone is so considerate. MaryAnn, Mo, Marie - taking all the time I need to be comfortable about what are to me very important decisions. I can't thank them enough for making all this so easy and pain-free. Everyone - especially Dr. Ern - thank you so very very much.
Best iced chai in the city. The iced mocha is really excellent too. This is a hidden gem, parking is a bit rough but it's worth the effort.
None
I have attended a few Business Networking events at the Forsgate Country Club. It is a beautiful place, nice atmosphere, and pleasant people. But what stunned me the most – it’s a great food! Last time I was there I have ordered a turkey club sandwich – it was a best sandwich I ever had, and French fries were amazing too. Before that - I had no idea that fries can ever surprise me!
My wife and I recently worked with Rene Ruiz while purchasing our first home and we couldn't be happier. Rene is a phenomenal agent working with a great company. Being first-time homebuyers, we constantly had concerns and questions. Rene was always willing to answer and explain matters in a detailed, and insightful, manner. Rene and Realty Austin are a great choice if you're looking to buy a home. We will definitely be looking to work with them in the future!
This is the 2nd time the tech Adam has done work for us. He has been thorough with the work, patient & responsive to my questions and offers suggestions or ideas to our problems (family home is 60 yrs old w/ galvinized plumbing!) Gene Johnson Plumbing has installed a new hot water tank, new plumbing from the kitchen drain and this last visit was to fix some things in our small half bath (leaking toilet/leaking sink). Adam worked on the last two projects and did a great job. I have to say the customer service is excellent (both via the phone and the techs in person)......and you pay for that. As others mentioned they are not cheap so I expect the work & customer service to be of a higher standard and thus far it is. We need to have all the galvinized replaced in the future and hope that Adam is still available when the time comes.
Zach was very friendly and helpful on move in day. This is the second time we've used Public Storage and will in the future if we need to.
Spartans!
Negozio e staff fantastici...consiglio a tutti di farci anche solo un salto per qualche oretta...non rimarrete assolutamente delusi e ritornerete a casa con una miniatura gratis dipinta da voi stessi...
The food is even better than some famous restaurant. Especially the BBQ Stingray at stall 22, I recommend everyone to go and try. Excellent food!
I got to Fast water heater via Home Depot. I was going to buy and install the water heater myself and for the additional $200.00 or so, it was worth it to have them come and install (bring us up to code) and HAUL AWAY the old unit. Haul away is the biggest pain the the a**... Tanks to Steve (my technician) and Fast Water Heater..
Dads funeral today
This is the place we always stay when we go to Zion's. We love it! The rooms are always clean and quiet. The grounds are beautiful and it's right across the street from a bus stop for the bus that takes you to the gate for Zion National Park. The owners are very nice and accommodating and make the best breakfasts ever! They deliver the breakfasts in baskets right to your door. When you check in, she will ask you all your preferences for your breakfast, so it is custom made. We wouldn't stay anywhere else!
We used the The Pros for our April 2013 wedding, following a recommendation by my sister and her husband, who used them in July 2005. DJ: Exceptional, fun, lively, didn't miss a beat~kept the ceremony music perfect and the party going all night! VIDEO: Did NOT disappoint. We barely knew he was there and caught so many wonderful moments during the entire day. Nicest guy! PHOTO: Wow-each shot was better than the last, made sure he took every shot we planned and then some! fun personality, high energy with our large wedding party PHOTO BOOTH: You gotta add that to the list. Fun props, guests loved it, we came home with copies of every shot-fun to see moments we missed...Highly recommend THE PROS!!
Siempre que voy a comer con mi familia nos atienden con excelencia. Las pastas son las mejores. Siempre contestan el teléfono a tiempo y el servicio es muy rápido.
I have been to just about every indoor range in Tampa and this place is by far the best. The range is clean and has ice cold air conditioning and the staff is very helpful and friendly. I would highly recommend Florida Firearms Academy for shooters of any skill level.
We have used Pipe Wrench plumbing for years and have always had great service. We always ask for the same technician "Chris". We have built a relationship with Chris and will use pipe wrench for all of our property's. We recommend them to all of our friends and family.
Amazing food, great prices and friendly staff. Officially my go to breakfast place!
Amazing place to study, meet friends, or hold a meeting. The new owners are bringing in a lot of new ideas and events to the shop. They make you feel like family.
I've been dining at Rivera's for over ten years, i must say that i'm surprised at some of the bad reviews they've gotten. This food is definitely some of the best in the area and its always hot and fresh, and some complain about the prices but with quality food comes higher prices(which aren't too steep by the way) but the variety of dishes is one of their strong points, i'm always trying something different and I am never let down . The service is friendly and fast and the food doesn't take long either. The margaritas are good and especially worth it on Mondays and Tuesdays when they're $1.99 and Wednesdays they have $2 beers. This place is definitely worth a try and its one of my personal favorite places to eat' so I'd recommend stopping by and seeing for yourselves.
None
We have stayed here twice in recent years and plan to stay again. The rooms are well kept and we look forward to the creative breakfasts the hosts conjure up. They have a pleasant area in the back to sit and relax and enjoy the evening as well. Very reasonable and a short drive to downtown Sandwich.
My root of life
None
We held an outing at Penn Oaks and were thoroughly pleased with the golf course, service and price given. They reacted quickly to all our questions and concerns; we planned the outing in less than 1 month! The course, although off season, was still in great shape. The food was delicious and service outstanding. I won't hesitate to contact them again in the future.Steve took very good care of us.
This ER is very close to home and was not busy. We were the only patients in the office and were seen right away. Everyone was very professional and helpful. Thank you!
Great chip restaurant and takeaway, with food cooked to order, and a simple eat- in area. Im working in York on business and found this a pleasant alternative to restaurant/pub options. Good food, decent prices, lovely staff and clean & tidy premises.
Unfortunately over the years I have had to use the services of Dream Land to care for 7 of my 4 legged children. Kevin and his team are AMAZING & So CARING. They treat your fur babies with the upmost respect and completely understand how your are feeling and what you are going through. They are awesome and I will always use them, but hope not again anytime soon.
By far the best steak in the area, bar none! Have been there twice and service is always excellent. If you are looking for a great steak and great service, this is your place!
None
Very Cozy Place! I love Starbucks!!
Since my wife and I both work 10 hours a day, every once in a while we decide to "have a sandwich" instead of cooking. This Subway location always has nice friendly people working. We NEVER feel like we're getting "The bums rush" to "order and get out!!!", instead we hang back, let others go in front of us as we decide what we want to order. When ready, we always feel like the folks there are not distracted and we have never had to "correct" anything. The only "non excellent" item is the decor - how the heck do you make an "Excellent decor" in a strip mall franchise sandwich shop?? Ahh, whatever ... Good place - Clean, nice people, generous with the veggies. Recommended.
None
Dr Bill is the best Vet I have ever had for my pets. The prices are very reasonable, cheaper than any other vet clinic I checked, and more importantly he was accurate at his diagnosis every time. I don't live in Ann Arbor anymore and having him taking care of my dog is one of the reasons I miss Ann Arbor so much.
thxs for the great reviews i work here in highlands kids {hk} as we call it 
Nathan did an EXCELLENT job painting and performing minor repairs on the exterior of my home. His price was fair and he was very responsive to all my communications. He stayed with me until the job was complete to my satisfaction, coming back to take care of punchlist items, and completely repainting my deck when he wasn't happy with the way it had turned out. I will reccomend this contractor to my neighbors.
المكان الأجمل للقاء الأحبة
None
I thoroughly enjoyed my experience here. Tracy was on point with the scheduling and the length of time required for my service. Tracy and the technicians kept me updated, and were willing to answer any questions I had during the service process. It's a NAPA shop folks! Just as good as OEM, but a bit less out of pocket. Save yourself the aggravation of franchise shops and feel like a real person by getting your service here! Found my home away from home for my truck... Great to have had an awesome first experience with you guys.
None
A roadside wonderland of flavor and creativity! You can't go wrong with anything on the menu, and the owners and wait staff go above and beyond for you! Home of the original "Holy Canoli Pancake", and my own little "Breakfast Club"! Stop in...YOU WON'T BE DISAPPOINTED!
Great place for coffee and treats and pizza and much more. They've got a lot on the menu, and it is all great!
We booked a stay and play over the Easter weekend at this hotel...it was in great shape and the staff was very courteous and friendly...Before booking I had mixed feelings about staying here...glad we took the chance because it was wonderful...food was excellent and by talking with one of the staff we learned it was under a new ownership...we hope to visit again in the near future...it was a great getaway!
GREAT SERVICE! GREAT PEOPLE! I appreciate their enthusiasm and dedication to customer service. I highly recommend you use their services!
I had LASIK here over the summer and I could not be happier with my experience. Not only are the results phenomenal but the entire process, from the first consultation to my most recent check-up (today), has been smooth and easy. Dr. Khanna and his entire office staff are professional, friendly, and accommodating. I would recommend Khanna Vision Institute to anyone considering LASIK - your vision is too valuable to trust just anyone and with Dr. Khanna you can rest assured that you are in great hands.
AMAZING FOOD! I love this place
None
Die Colour Connection ist ein sehr gut ausgestatteter und zuverlässiger Dienstleister im Bereich Digitaldruck & Papierweiterverarbeitung/-Veredelung. Die angefragten Preise kommen schnell und die Colour Connection hat sich immer als äußerst weitsichtig, lösungsorientiert und termintreu gezeigt. Sehr zu empfehlen. Grüße aus München.
last september i made an appointment with aspen dental in peobody,[], i have no insurance and my teeth were a mess,[], I had to have 5 teeth extracted, My story is this,[], in all the years that i have been going to the dentist, I have never found a more carring sincere group of people as the doctors and assistance at the aspen dental in Peobody office.. Dr.Stolch and Mavis and many others have made it possible for me to have that beatiful smile.. So i thank you all from the bottom of my heart for all the work you have done,
None
None
Good food, excellent beer
None
Surprisingly nice place to eat.
While staying at Fort Wilderness Campground I had a problem with a leveling jack not retracting. It was a Sunday and I needed to check out. A Disney employee gave me a list of RV repair company's and I called 5, 3 did not answer and I left a message at 2 others, never got a call back. I located Accurate Mobile RV online, left a message, and he called back in a reasonable time. Ben was able to tell me some things to check over the phone. I called him back him back four times and he walked me through resolving my problem. He was very professional and I will keep his number handy. Since he didn't come out to the site, he did not ask for a fee, however I did send him a check, and was glad to do so. I would definitely recommend him.
The Sun Motel is uder renevation. Yes it has its disadvantages, but what motel doesn't? It also has its advantages. It's quiet, there is a truck stop across the street, subway next door, and working its way to being better then it was when it was built
I really loved going to Berean Baptist Church when I was stationed at Fort Bragg. Pastor Sean's sermons are challenging, thought-provoking, straight out of the Word, and very well put together. I miss this church, not just for the messages, but also for the warmth and friendliness of the congregation, the outreach they do, and the knowledge and passion of all the Biblical leaders there. I am glad I still get to listen to Pastor Sean's podcasts!
Great place owner great !
Wide selection of craft beers, great staff and table tennis. Great for a drink after work
Allan and the staff at Family Medical Clinic are knowledgeable and friendly. They have treated myself and my family for several years and we could not think of going anywhere else. All the staff truly have a heart for people and has always provided the most thorough care we have received. - Danny
This location never disappoints!
I had Master Roofing put a new roof on my house. I had a leak in a valley and some rotten sheathing and rafter tails. They came out August 2012 to do the work. Mikes crew, led by Ed, did a GREAT JOB! They cleaned up every day they where here. They removed two layers of old shingle and sourced the leak to an improperly built chimney. They rebuilt the chimney properly with correct paper and flashing. They replaced the eave sheathing and trimmed back the rafter tails. They also installed 2 new vents over the garage. Ed's skill and knowledge was on full display as he directed his crew in the installation of a beautifully straight, black, three tab shingle roof. The craftsmanship was SUPERB. Mike gave me an estimate that included QUALITY materials, at a FAIR price. Things like 30lb felt instead of 15lb, and vents that are metal not plastic. The best part.....less than $500 above the estimate. That included the extra work on my chimney. I highly recommend MASTER ROOFING. I felt good about the entire process and saw with my own eyes the quality of work done on my house. I'm very pleased with their work. John Middleton
I had a great experience at New Town Automotive. The manager was courteous and professional. The waiting area was clean and comfortable. The prices are reasonable and after you get your work done they was your car.
Super Lage, nettes Personal, günstig und sehr sauber - zudem sehr schick. Gutes Frühstücksbuffet für 7,50€. 100% Weiterempfehlung.
Very nice synagogue, the reception room is fantastic! Great huge chandelier is beautiful.
Awesome food, friendly staff! And the pie!!!! Amazing :)
None
I've been bringing my car to Cliff Stoufer for the past 5 years. He's consistently polite, knowledgable, trustworthy, friendly, and helpful. Service is fast and efficient. Never had any problems with the work, and I love that they always wash my car, even if it's a simple oil change. Never had better service anywhere!
Masinile CNC de la CHIRON sunt ideale pentru prelucrari mecanice complexe si unde este nevoie de precizie, timp de prelucrare foarte scazut in industriile automotive, aerospace, medicala si altele.
If your looking for the best breakfast on the planet, then search no further. Donnas diner is what made this place home!
C bien!
None
Always great food and friendly service.
None
Our experience with Stormfront is nothing short of exceptional. Rob and his team are the very definition of the word 'professional'! They have been very attentive to our vision on all the projects they have created for us. We are always impressed by their customer interaction and quick response to our questions and ideas. The result of their work always exceeds our expectations! Excellent on all levels.
None
None
Candy Blitz is TOTALLY fun! It has lots of choices, the owners are so awesome with their customers and the decor and environment is amazing for kids.....and kids at heart! I would absolutely recommend it for people who live in St. George. And put it on your list for "places to visit" on your trip to Southern Utah!
My husband and I always go to 3D's for our food. We've tried other Jamaican Restaurants in and out of our neighborhood and in Atlanta, GA, but the food was not as good as 3D's. Also, other Jamaican Restaurants seem to run out of food after 6:00 pm. Even though I'm "Jamerican," 3D's always treat me well...oh...they ALWAYS have sweet plantains...a pre-requisite for me.
Sehr tolle Kost, Überdurschnittliches Essen. Serice 1A Preisleistungs verhältnis Note: 2. Ganz besonderst das Schnitzel ist echt Lecker dort weder zu klein noch zu groß. Hier kann man Essen ohne das man angst haben muss zu verhunger oder sich voll zu Futtern. Die Warte Zeit dauert auch nicht lange von der Bestellung bis zum Servieren. Kann es jeden nur Empfellen im Landkreis Bamberg oder für Besucher.
A fantastic experience to deal with Forth Engineering. Very friendly and helpful.
I was recently involved in a car accident and took my 2006 Jeep to be repaired at Jerry Seiner Collision Center in Salt Lake City, Utah. Brian Larremore handled my vehicle was wonderful! He has great communication skills, and the turn around time was as he predicted. I highly recommend anyone who needs auto body repair to visit Brian at Jerry Seiner Collision Center.
I purchased my 2012 GMC Terrain in December at McKinney Buick GMC. I was very pleased with the people at this dealership. My needs were taken into careful consideration when my salesman recommended the Terrain. I walked away with a great vehicle and my monthly payments are right where I needed them to be. I can't complain about the free XM Radio trial or the free OnStar trial either! I would recommmend this dealership if you are in the market for a new or pre-owned car. Ask for Jase Patrick, he will take good care of you.
Dominique did an awesome job
Jay's Valet is an amazing asset to the Community. Not only do they provide amazing, over the top service, but their contributions toward charitable organizations truly make a difference. This is a business that cares about it's clients and the community that surrounds them. I highly recommend them for anybody looking for valet parking or transportation as they provide top notch service held at the highest standard.
Thank you for the great tires you sold me!
I've always had a pleasurable experience when being seen at 32 Dental. The staff is always friendly and helpful and Dr. Gonzalez is a joy to talk to. I highly recommend them for you and your family dental needs.
Wat een super bioscoop met een waanzinnige programmering van mooie films, een aanwinst voor Amsterdam en plek om naar toe te blijven gaan.
None
None
Super a tout point de vue! Accueil chaleureux, petit déjeuner extremement copieux. Chambre très propre. Recommandé!
None
I have to say that it was difficult finding the display room since they are working on putting up signage. Otherwise, I was impressed with Leslie's services. She was thorough and made sure my needs were met from start to finish. As an Internet-based company, she did a great job at helping me find what I needed before I even knew it :). I will definitely recommend Miami Home to people looking for affordable, quality furniture from a company that is looking out for its customers.
Exelentes tacos , se come muy rico , exelente servicio
I absolutely love the care my puppy gets when we go here! The staff is super friendly, and they always work with you to get you discounts on medicine and treatments. The doctors saved our parvo-puppy when we first got him, and they've been continually great, ever since. BTW... as an Alabama fan.. the ONLY time I like to see that many Auburn diplomas in an office is at a Vet. That's a great Vet school, and they have great docs working at Countryside. I recommend them to ANYONE living in our area.
Awesome customer service and they know how to fix a car right. Highly recommend!
None
The owner is very friendly and extremely helpful. They have lots of rare wines at surprisingly reasonable prices, and the atmosphere is great. It's clean and comfortable with a bar to taste at, and there's plenty of room to relax and share a drink with a friend. They even had a few soft comfortable chairs off to the side of the bar. If you love wine, you have to check this place out.
None
Favorite pizza hands down. Service is always great, pizza is crispy and delicious. Never had a bad experience there.
Love The Studio! Lindsay always gives me a great haircut. And if she can make my hair look good? Well, she can work wonders on anyone else!
None
Njami...
I've been going to The Pork Shop for over 7 years and have never had anything but a stellar experience. I've organized events that required hams and this shop really delivered. They even gave me recipes to make the event go better. My kids are in love with the snack sticks, and so am I since they don't make a mess in the car. My personal favorites are the green chile snack sticks, flat ham, jalapeno bologna, and green chile burritos. I don't understand how someone could give The Pork Shop a poor review. I saw someone say they bought a pork bone for a dog and blamed the store. Seriously? If you know so much about dogs, why not blame yourself? BTW, the issue has always been with bird bones. Also, I saw it mentioned that the service is "snippy". That couldn't be farther from the truth. I feel like family when I'm there.
I have never had an issue with Genghis, the waiters have always been nice and friendly. I highly recommend them.
Handles maintenance on a consistant basis. Always can count on the yard being ready for the weekend.
Very community friendly church where Jesus Christ is proclaimed as Lord.
Gian Franco is perfect. The food and wine has been delicious every time we have visited. Pizza is great and the fish specials have been especially good. The ambiance is warm and friendly.
Dan Friedlander is an amazing attorney who practices a range of legal matters from landlord and tenant issues, proper land use, real estate, litigation, appeals and more. He is easy to talk to and you can tell he really cares. He will guide you as necessary and will always give you options as to how handle your situation. Rest assured you can count on him to communicate with you and keep you informed so you know he's there for you.
Such a cool, Awesome Gallary!!
Hometune were able to sort my car out the very next day after ringing and they even sorted out my warrant for free as part of the service. The mechanic was excellent. He didn't do any unauthorised work and kept me completely informed as to what would be required in the future. All this, and at home too!
Muy bn google maps llegare muy facil de esta manera
None
Great food, excellent ever-changing selection of beers, very friendly place to go.
The Barn is the best. Lots of plant material with lots of variety, a staff that is always helpful, and so much more. My family and I have been shopping there almost as long as they have been open and almost exclusively shop there for our garden needs. So much so we also only buy our Christmas trees there too!
Dr. Hanson and his team are far and away a professional and caring staff. They are concerned with the total health of each patient and have a level of professionalism and competency that is rarely seen nowadays. I was treated for ligament damage and had all of the information I needed to help myself become healthy again. They have an amazing way with their patients and I would recommend them to anyone I know for total health recovery, not simply good posture.
Reasonable price Shipping with tracking
Best customer service I have ever experienced. My entire family use this mechanic shop. Always feel like I'm being lied to by other shops just to squeeze more money out of me, not the case with GC Automotive. Everything is explained to me if I don't understand why the work is needed and they will show me why it was replaced/fixed. Will never go anywhere else
Eric was terrific! I took my car to Service King after the hail storm in June. They were swamped but Eric made the experience painless. He kept me informed and answered every question I had. I was able to view pictures of my car online as it progressed through repairs thanks to the Nationwide Auto Watch. When I picked it up yesterday Eric was outside buffing some small areas to be sure it was perfect! I can't recommend them highly enough! Ask for Eric.
Great walk-in clinic. No wait. Nice staff. Great doctor and free parking which is rare in Kits. I'd go back again.
Aki esta bien perrón !!!!?!!
Great dive bar and great staff. 150 micro/import beer bottles! Ask for KC the bartender! The anti-Boca crowd!
None
None
None
None
I have had tried fish tacos at numerous places, but these were the best. My wife said this is her new favorite place to eat in Galena. And that says a lot because we live here and have tried almost every place in town.
I had been shopping around for a new car to lease for my wife. After driving 6 or 7 comparable models It was obvious to me that the 2013 Elantra GT had everything I was hoping to find and with a very reasonable leasing program it was my obvious choice. Ira was very knowledgeable and helpful and made the process very easy. Thanks Ira! My wife loves the car and I have the peace of mind that she is in a solid vehicle for the next few years.
Funnest place to skate!
The service I received was excellent. Prompt and frequent communications to advise where we were regarding the buying and selling process, helpful answers to my questions and a very competitive fee. I will be using their services again.
Probably one of Miami's Best
Our shared building washing machine broke down, so I had to find a coin-op place in the neighborhood fast. I saw that a lot of people had left good reviews about The Laundry Room on Google, so I read them, and that sealed the deal. It's exactly as everyone describes. Kari is awesome, super helpful, and everything is clean, well maintained, and fairly priced. This is the place to go!
This was super exellent
None
Great staff and service. Coffee is better than Starbucks!!!!!
Maria showed me the unit I was interested in, and was very helpful in getting me set up for my storage unit. Maria took time to show me everything , to include how to get in and out of the storage area. Great experience, friendly service. I will recommend others to check out Public storage at Waipio Uka St.
None
We were there onSaturday before mothers day. Was very busy and the service was still excellent. Servers worked very hard to make our visit memorable.
i take my car to tire central & service and get routine maintenance done all of the time. quick, convenient, and punctual service every time on all of my family's vehicles.
The price was the best available. The service was fine. The car was clean and in good shape. Nothing to complain about here.
I was determined to purchase a brand new car as I arrived at Pacific Honda. My original intention was to pick up the Civic Si Sedan and the gentlemen I spoke too (Zaid Darzi) helped me gladly. He did attempt as much as he could to get me the Si as they did not have any in stock. He went through several phone calls and several managers but there were no Si sedans available. After carefully deciding, I chose to go with the 2012 Civic Ex Sedan. It was an excellent choice and great on gas mileage. Zaid was an enormous amount of help throughout the three hours I had spent there. If you plan on purchasing a new car from there, definitely ask for him! He made things easy as was very fast with what I had asked for. Thanks again. Overall, I had a fun great time and was happy with my purchase. When the 2013 Civic Si Sedans come out, I'll definitely come back to take a look.
Very good latte's. Above average and probably the best in the area (not much competition yet)
I've lived here for 40 years and that was the best piece of fish I ever had. My girlfriend had the shitome and it was excellent. My daughter had the mahi mahi, and it was even better. probably the best mahi mahi I've had, I had the pistachio crusted opah, on a bed of tasty bulgar wheat and it was incredible. We didn't have to wait a long time for it either.
I have been going to Balmain Massage since it has opened years back, the level of service and quality of massage with the therapists has always been consistent. From therapeutic to deep tissue- they cater to all muscular needs ... I would highly recommend this centre and often do with my Pilates clients.
I would recommend FlowerAura's to everyone in need. I get someone who has a great personality and a great sense to provide the Service as well. thanks for Sharing this great information.
BEST IN TOWN! By FAR! Dave, the owner himself came out and picked up my friends and I with 2 hour notice. I wouldn't recommend any other limo company in KC!
None
None
Their calzone is amazing, and their white sauce is the best! It may be cheap, but it's very good! My favorite place for pizza and calzone. It's not SUPPOSED to be traditional Italian, so if you're expecting that you'll be disappointed. It's a very unique taste!
Love this church. It's helped me so much. Don't know where I'd be without it, but it wouldn't be pretty.
Me gusta la comida, y el buen servicio.
I've been in need of some dental work for a while but like a lot of people put it off to the point I was very embarrassed about the condition of my teeth. I found NW Smile design on the internet and decided to give them a shot. I was pleasantly surprised. I never felt judged at all, they just said "we can fix that". I really feel like they have my best interest in mind. I've even gotten a few follow up phone calls from Dr.Petersen himself on his lunch break or after hours to check up on me. How often does that happen anymore? Good people, positive attitudes and great service. I no longer dread going to the dentist. Totally satisfied customer, and yes this is a real review, I never knew them before a few months ago. Thank you guys. :)
None
None
Walking through the door I knew this was the right place to go. Kind, friendly, knowledgeable and helpful staff! Thorough testing done before and a nice meeting with the operating doctor. I had Dr. John Mauro, this guy is great really felt comfortable trusting him with my visions future. Surgery went quick and so was the recovery!! I was able to see the next day and go to work. Almost no irritation, just a little light sensitivity... nothing glasses or drops could fix. This is the place to go !!
Beautifull place to stay After Eight.
Great pulled pork at a great price. Nice selection of sauces. Service was great, friendly. Enjoyed the jazz music and motif.
None
A hidden delight. Traditional Italian like momma used to make. Momma is the cook so no surprise. Have eaten here whenever in Rome for the past 20 years and never been disappointed other than when it is closed or fully booked. Booking essential.
We recently bought a 2010 CRV from Honda World Downey and we were very impressed with the service offered there. Having never bought a car from a dealership, we were very wary of being taken advantage of, and our guard was up. However, we were very pleasantly surprised how well we were taken care of. There was some confusion regarding the price of the car, and Saul Hernandez, Vanesa Avellaneda, George Beltran and Ronnie Williams bent over backwards to make sure we were happy. Felix in the loan department also ensured that we were comfortable with the whole process and made it very enjoyable. I would absolutely recommend buying a car from them- we adore our new CRV and couldn't be happier with how it all worked out. We got an amazing deal on a truly great SUV, and Honda World treated us fairly and kindly. Service is clearly a top priority with them, and it shows. Thank you!
Boa firma foi meu primeiro emprego como soldador
2 months in our new house and the sewer backs up! After searching online I found Andrew and saw these great reviews. Unfortunately, he was in North Carolina at the time. I contacted my Home Warranty and they sent "their guy" over. He took one look at the line and said it was definitely tree roots, and it wasn't covered. I immediately text Andrew who said he'd come over as soon as he got back and look at it for free. He got back into town very late Sunday night and was at my house Monday. He actually looked at the problem, blew the line out with his high pressure sprayer and now PROBLEM GONE! All within an hour and much cheaper than what I believe any one else would have done it for. Thanks again Andrew!
Simply the best.
my most memorable times at Bogarts was seeing Type O Negative in Oc.'09 and this February seeing Meshuggah...it's a really cool little venue, i haven't been to many places for concert but of the maybe 5 i've been to i like Bogarts the best. what wins me over is the atmosphere and the bouncer,i usually get to the very front on the left side (and i'm a tiny little 4'10" girl), the bouncer and its always been the same one has always saved me from being crushed against the gate or if people try to push me out of my spot. props to that awesome guy :D
I've been training with Mr. Epps for over five years. Jason is a great martial artist and a top-notch instructor, with loads of integrity.
Asphalt Materials is a wonderful company to work with. They are extremely competitive with there pricing and always work hard to make you happy. We have worked with them for several years an they have always worked very hard to keep us happy.
Joshua Tree's communication - phone and e-mail - is great, their staff is knowledgeable, professional, and meticulous in all of their work on the trees on our property. If you have trees that require regular pruning, thinning, etc., you owe it to yourself AND your trees to call this firm.
I can't say enough about thses guys!! Took my Sebring up to them after hearing an awful sound in my brake area. Come to find out that my brake calipers replaced by another company were not tightened down and were basically flopping around in my wheel. It was under warranty with the other company but Christian Bros. did not feel comfortable with me taking it down there, neither did I. They are only charging for the two bolts ($15) and are going to make sure I am safe. I recommend using these guys for all your vehicle maintenance needs!!
None
Fantastic talent and wonderful customer service. We get compliments everyday on our logo and image. George and his team are top notch professionals!
Good, friendly service. I was in and out with a free car wash too. Love it.
I have a BMW and I have always been very happy with their work. My family has used them multiple times over years for various body work repairs including fender benders and once a deer fan into my car. The repairs and paint work were perfect and pretty fast.
Nilo and staff were awesome. I will ONLY get my hair cut at Fabrizio. Attention to detail, relaxed comfortable interior, great stylist. Can't say enough about this salon
My family has been going to Affinity for years! I love coming up to Estes Park for the relaxation the mountains provide and adding a massage after a hike is always a special treat! All the massage therapists have done a really nice job relieving tension and stress I carry. The environment is always soothing and inviting. I cannot wait to see their new location!
Ótimo!
None
I purchased a 2013 BMW X5 50i from Barry Frucht at Leith, and was so impressed with the way he handled everything. It's such a great dealership and a wonderful car.
Excelente
Love Crystal Car Wash! Love the monthly program too! What a deal! Highly recommend.
None
Great venue with an impressive lineup for 2013 considering Richmond is not a major metropolitan area. I've been out there many times and have never seen or heard the highway even though it is close. If anything it just helps with the traffic flow after an event. I always have an awesome time when I go.
My boyfriend, his friend, and I went to the Chesterfield location roughly a week ago. This was, by far, one of the MOST entertaining times I've had at any chain restaurant, all thanks to our favorite waitress, Donna! So let us set the scene a bit. The three of us stroll in, and we were, I suppose the only way I can say it is "greeted," by a less-than-enthused man who had the "end of shift" attitude (you know, where everything is nearly an inconvenience, rushing you to hurry up, etc). My boyfriend immediately gave me the, "let's just leave and go somewhere else" look, but I ignored him, and we took our place in the tables. It was at this point that we were greeted by our amazing waitress, Donna! I, not looking like I was even close to 21, ordered a glass of wine, and she noticed immediately that I am a WI resident originally from my license. She began to make small talk regarding the area. I remember specifically that she "fake-swore," and I immediately told her that we were a light-hearted group and we didn't care in the least. I believe that, from this (as well as the fact that we were poking fun at my boyfriend), she pegged our group right on the dot. Throughout the rest of the course, she joked around with us all, to a point where I was CRYING from laughing so hard!! She was one of the most entertaining waitresses ever. We were so impressed, we left a nice tip as well as a note for her (which I have never done for ANY waitress/waiter before). Overall an INCREDIBLY fun and entertaining time with Donna as our server. I really hope that the next time we go out there that she is working!
A great dentist, period. Not just professional but careful, even meticulous, taking all the time any procedure requires to achieve not just functionality but excellence. Willing to engage in dialogue and explain options to reach the best solution for the issue in hand, and my teeth have had plenty of issues to discuss, all of them dating back to long before I found Dr. Chan and some of them due to previous dentists, none of them bad, but none of them as good as Dr. Chan. Completely up to date in methods of treatment. Refers to other dentists for some procedures if the result would be better for the patient. I recommend her wholeheartedly to anyone.
Orchid Med Spa is AMAZING! So professional and so nice - she has great people skills. Treatment options are unbelievable - so many peels to choose from. The laser treatments are awesome and she does great specials every month. Dr. Carly took my problem skin and made it clear. Thank you.
Fantastic the atmosphere is amazing, the staff are so friendly, the quality is great. Ask for John and he will be your personal shopper he is so helpful
None
None
None
Appliance Medic, Inc is really an well established and a famous repair service provider company. This company provide you appliance repair like washer , dryers ,refrigerator , oven , range, dishwaher washing machine Repair service at home. and the technician of the Appliance Medic , inc is really well experienced and skilled too.
Excellent local hardware store. Superior quality lumber & tools than the national chain stores in nearby towns. I always check here for what I need first as their prices typically compete with amazon & home depot. Exceptionally friendly service as well.
Moved to Perth from Fitzroy Melbourne (coffee-snob central) but this would be among the top, especially for ambiance and service.
very nice acid jazz music. trendy but seem to be able to back it up.
Great food and very friendly people. Definitely recommend!
Amazed by their service... !
Dear Emma and the wonderful team at Green Parlour. We cannot thank you enough for the fantastic job you did with our wedding flowers. They were simply amazing and we had so many compliments about them. We really appreciated your attention to detail so that they fitted our theme and venue to perfection. You make an amazing team and we would have no hesitation in recommending you to anyone planning a wedding xx
After receiving a frantic call from my wife regarding a chipmunk in our house. I called Pioneer after 5pm hoping that I wouldn't get a recording. The office manager was very helpful and re-assuring. After taking my information, she told me that someone would contact me soon. Within minutes I received a call from Tom, one of the owners. He came right out loaded with Live Traps. Not only was he an expert at setting and strategically placing the traps, he was able to calm down my wife and two small children. Within an hour the chipmunk was caught and released into a nearby park. Pioneer is now my go-to company for not only rodent removal, but pest control as well.
Its is really a very good school. If I ever do something remarkable in my career all my credits would go to this school.
Childcare Center.
None
Loved it when we went! Still remember the amazing scallops, wow
Our experience with Smile Brilliant teeth whitening was a positive. Definitely could tell a difference after just one time . Everything worked just as the directions told us. Step by Step application very easy to use and user friendly. Thanks Smile Brilliant "I received a complimentary teeth whitening kit for review on the blog Living at the Whiteheads Zoo."
Very good photography.
Exceeded expectations. Great service, decent food!
It's always a pleasure to drop into Mickey's on the way home from a day out. The welcome is always warm and friendly, and the food is home-cooked, piping hot, and occasionally more than I can finish comfortably.
My car wouldn't start in an downtown Albany garage. The first place I called wouldn't even come saying they couldn't get into the low-ceilinged garage. Osborne came and the technician walked a portable charger to my car. Turns out it wasn't the battery, but the kind gentleman got my car moving so I could get home on a freezing night. I'm not going to start calling the dispatcher for his sparkling personality, but he got a service guy to me and wasn't rude - what more could I ask for? I am very grateful to the road service guy and Joe's Osborne Street Garage.
Tyler Harrington no longer works at The Hole Thing, He hasn't been here for nearly a year. New talent and great friendly environment. Clean and sober work environment. Great tattoos and piercings come from The Hole Thing!!!
Caffè ottimo. Personale allegro e sempre col sorriso
Best prime rib I have ever had. Been coming here for over twenty years and have never been disappointed.
Best spin studio in Orange County. Studio is clean, staff is friendly, instructors are upbeat and the vibe is great. You can hang out after class on the deck and enjoy cool towels and fresh fruit. Feels like a New York Spin Studio. You have to try it to believe it.
Clean, good food, good service.
This is a great barber shop. It's old fashioned and a place where guys can get a great haircut and straight razor shave. It is by appointment only and they only accept cash but well worth it. You even get a quick back massage when the haircut is finished.
Typical great Chinese restaurant where they put money into the quality of food rather than dazzle you with ambiance! Great food and excellent service!
The Manor is an absolutely great place to live. The property always looks nice, the gym is always clean, and the girls at the front desk are always very friendly. 10/10 would recommend it to a friend.
I have nothing but good things to say about out experience with Crystal. We started out researching above ground pools in February. After visiting all of the local dealers we chose Crystal over the others because, well they were honest. Brad helped us select everything we needed, but did not try to up-sell us on unnecessary add ons, as well as items that would not suit our particular pool situation. Other dealers just wanted to sell, sell, sell. And while I understand that is a salespersons over-all objective, Brad cautioned us on a few things I originally wanted. Brad provided me with all the information we needed to file for a building permit, and we received a call from the installation team in mid-May to schedule. The installation team showed up around 7:30 am and worked until the last detail was complete. They were also accommodating to me by loading up the dirt onto a trailer so I did not need to load it up myself for removal. A few days later Pat came out for our owner orientation. It was starting to rain and just before the storm rolled in he was able to get the pool shocked and chlorinated. I felt bad that he got soaked and his boots were covered in mud from the excavation area. He came back out on a Saturday to complete everything, and thankfully it was sunny. Thanks for everything. The pool is in and we are patiently waiting on construction to begin on our new deck. We will send pictured when the entire project is complete. Justin & Nicole
Came here by myself on a business trip. Nice cozy atmosphere, soft lighting. Had the Oak roasted chicken. It was amazing. Seasoned perfectly along with fingerling potatoes, pine nuts and perfectly cooked asparagus. In addition the food was hot, it obviously came to me direct from the kitchen, no heat lamps involved. I will have to come back and try the pizza.
Thanks Lary. It is wonderful experience working with you. I love the car.
Should try the spare ribs. Delicious!
None
An amazing place to take your pet! Loving and caring individuals who treat your dog like family when you are away. Highly recommended!!!
NY style pizza, what more can u ask for?
We went around Christmas time and it was all decorated. The tour is great!
These guys are awesome. They helped us with our wedding and did an amazing job. They were clean, kind, and couteous. I would recommend them to anyone looking for the right kind of party rental company to work with. make sure you ask for Ryan. he knows what he is talking about!
Seriously, this is a great venue. Quiet atmosphere and an owner who truly appreciates good craft beer. I love the fact that the architecture was maintained throughout.
Junk B Gone did a excellent job. John and David were very helpful and Polite. They held to the quote stated. Would I use them again YES.
None
Very good place. The best restaurant in KY.
For many years, I have worked with the people at Progressive Business Publications on various projects that benefit thousands of students and adults in the Philadelphia area. PBP continues to support educational activities that help prepare our young people for a future in the global marketplace, and also offer opportunities for adults to learn more about the world in which they live. Kudos to Progressive Business Publications for taking an active role in education in our Philadelphia region.
I am used to high end salons, but have been getting some really unusual cuts in the last few years since Wade left the Palms and retired. I occasionally read reviews for stylists. Sara Cooper's name had been floating for a while, I didn't care about the bad review on 2 inches, because cutting 2 inches off long hair and designing an appropriate style is a completely different skill set. I made the appt and was worried because I couldn't decide on a cut, we talked through it looking at magazines, narrowed it down to two and then just took the plunge. It's just hair, it grows back and it gets cut again. The whole time Sara was making sure that I was saying YES to that cut. She was right, it turned out excellent. I must say, I was afraid to pay so little for a hair cut. So the salon itself isn't as Posh as a high end salon, I wasn't looking for that and I won't knock it. I was expecting Sara Cooper to perform, and she did. The real test for me is making another appt without thinking about it, and I did, today. See you soon Sara Cooper, and Thank You.
It seriously blows my mind that I go to this resaurant and it is practically dead every time we go... and we usually go on a Friday or Saturday night. I know they do a lot better in the summer time when they open their bar "garage door" and people are out bar hopping, but this place is so fantastic I feel sad that they aren't packed every weekend. Who knows, maybe I'm going on the wrong days. Anyway... the food... Dale (owner and chef) is a phenomenal culinary artist. Now, maybe it's not as ridiculously fancy as a 5 star New York restaurant, but for small town Waukesha, it's a diamond in the rough. Not only are the dishes unique and full of fantastic flavor contrasts and combinations, the food is attractively plated with colorful garnishes and the portion size is just right... if you want to hate yourself after a meal go to Golden Corral. Overall, this place is so good and I would love to go there and have to wait for a table... cause that would mean people are giving it the recognition it deserves!
I was unaware of Purvis Ford's Owner's Advantage program and found that by participating (at no charge), I could get the safety inspection I was seeking performed at no cost. What's not to like about free services? Wait time was less than 30 minutes. I'm impressed. Thanks!
juste pour vous dire merci, a toute l'équipe de charenton,pour votre sympathie et gentillesse,mon fils a passé par vous ,il bien de avoir son permis,merci encore.
Signed up for a new unit today. The process was easy and fast. The site even stayed open a little late so that I could come in and take care of everything. The site is large, clean, and easy to navigate. Friendly service all around!
Rolltide
Amazing food!!! Everything is delicious but you have to try the Roasted Red Pepper Bisque!!
This is top shelf Mexican Food in a small mom and pop atmosphere. Seriously the best I've had in Albuquerque. The service is friendly and efficient. Plates are made to order so good things come to those that are a bit patient but the chips and salsa are excellent while you wait. The shrimp enchiladas are amazing, Steak Ranchero very tasty (great sauce), Steak pico burrito is solid especially when smothered with red sauce and you won't want to miss the carne adovada enchiladas nor the chile rellenos. There are so many excellent things on the menu you'll have to keep coming back to sample them, like the fish tacos.
My website and google presence were being held hostage by one of the other local internet marketing companies in the area. Telapost rebuilt the site and put it onto their cloud hosting platform, then they assisted me in retrieving my web presence in a professional, ethical manner. I highly recommend them.
None
Despite what most of the people are saying - it's a really good university!
Just purchased an Evergreen Travel Trailer and Nature Coast RV was terrific! They were friendly, cooperative, no pressure sales technique, professional, and met all our needs. Thank you Nature Coast RV for a pleasant experience.
I hired Apex to do a color-match on my 2004 Audi allroad's front bumper, rear bumper and fenders. They did a phenomenal job, especially considering how much work was needed to clean up the wear and tear on the rear bumper. Randy was very nice, gave me a tour of the shop and kept me updated throughout the week-long process. I highly recommend Apex to anyone needing paint or body work.
Had a great experience with Alterra Pest Control. Able to book and get appointment quickly. The Service Pro, Milton and Boyd did a thorough job of spraying around the house. The job was completed in a timely and efficient manner.
Elfogadható árért cserébe segítőkész személyzet, termál medencék, hűsölő medencék, száraz (50-60 °C és 60-70 °C) és vizes szauna, pezsgőfürdő, masszázs stb. egy olyan épületben, ami közel ugyanúgy néz ki (leszámítva a komfort- és higiéniai kiegészítőket), mint ahogyan még 500 évvel ezelőtt a törökök megépítették. Elsőre kicsit időutazásként hat, szóval aki nem akar tízezreket költeni, mégis magas színvonalú szolgáltatásra vágyik, annak merem ajánlani. A bejárat után balra egy kisebb kiállítás fogadja látogatókat, jobbra pedig spirális lépcső vezet felfelé az öltözőkabinokhoz, ahová becuccolhatunk, de erről úgyis mindenki részletes tájékoztatást kap, ha kérdezi. Érdekesség még, hogy a víz és a levegő kicsit kénszagú, ami nagyon jót tehet a légzőszervi megbetegedésben szenvedőknek.
Hello,We have the All sizes Tires from China, Are you interested in it ?
I recently purchased a 2013 Chevrolet Corvette from John Elway Chevrolet and the service was great. They were very friendly and helpful and took the time to show me all the intricacies of my new vehicle and to get the free trials of xm and on star setup for me.
None
They have some awesome cakes!
None
Had a little confusion because I assumed that the numbered meals were "lunch specials", but after I was served what I didn't intend to order, they made it right. Buffet small, but each item on it was awesome. Far better than most buffets 8 x as large. Decor is diner-like prosaic but clean. If I lived or worked closer, I'd certainly be a regular customer.
The service was excellent, there was no pressure on me. I came here with no intention of getting a vehicle, however I left with a new truck and was satisfied with the deal I got on it. I would recommend this dealership to anyone who would like to purchase a vehicle. =0)
None
None
Ryan and Mike have always provided excellent service at very reasonable prices. They did a pre-purchase inspection on my 1997 M3 and saved me $3,000 on my purchase price. They also installed the performance suspension parts on my car and I have been very happy with the results. I highly recommend Ryan and Mike and Nixon Automotive for servicing BMWs.
They really worked hard to get me the car I wanted at a fair price. Loving my new Camry!
Great Show. Even better after they worked out the audio problems. But the content has always been excellent and the hosts are entertaining. I run a small IT company in a competitive market, and their suggestions have done more for my rankings than any of the paid Internet marketers. We also do web-design and the pointers allow us to provide some SEO-lite support to small businesses that cannot afford a full blown SEO company and at the very least we can set up their sites the right way so that in the future they can engage with an SEO without having to do a rewrite. Keep up the Great work, PITF to both of you.
By far, the most beautiful rest stop I have been to on my road trips. Local charity provides free coffee and cookies, and accepts donations. The greenery around the rest stop is beautiful, very photogenic.
I had the opportunity to work with the Samuals team when looking for a new home, They took what is normally a stressful and nerve wracking decision and made it easy, informed and comfortable for me and my family. Rowan & Karen listened to my needs and wants, as a single mother I wanted to find a larger home for my family but needed to stay in the school district my kids were currently in. They understood what was important to me, did not waste my time showing me places "just because" as other realtors do and really zoned in on properties that worked for me. The Samuals team were on top of their game sending daily updated listings, demographics and current news of what each community had to offer. Their proffesionalism combined with their superior knowledge of Naples real estate and amazing personalities made this buying experience great! Thank you!
menu découverte de 8 plats, tous plus magnifiques et goûtus les uns que le autres. un travail précis, des cuissons parfaites, des légumes inconnus et subtils. Cela m'a rappelé le passage 53.
I had a flat tire and took it to Big O - they had the problem fixed in no time and didn't charge me a dime. The guys were incredibly nice and upfront with me. I'll definitely be back in the future.
Best subs in San Antonio real deli
We have used Entertainment Express for several occasions and have had excellent service every time! They are reliable, timely and very professional. The vehicles were always clean and very comfortable. We have chartered them again for an upcoming event later this month and will be using them for prom season again this year as well! They are very supportive of the local community and schools and have been for many years!
Thank you so much West LA Computer Service for fixing our computers! Everyone at the WLACS team was very helpful and knowledgable. They fixed our computers in a professional and timely manner. I would definitely recommend using them for any computer repair.
Friendly and delicious Bangladeshi curries. Fantastic
I drove onto the lot in a car that I was just about sick of and drove out in a car that I'd dreamed of having since I was a little girl and McKaig made that possible. Every single person was as friendly as can be and helped me to get a very nice car to replace the hunk of metal I used to haul around before.
None
Food is great. (The chai tea is amazing) It has a fun atmosphere to it. Only problem is it is a tad pricey but it really isn't too bad. Great place.
None
None
The folks at Davis Repair have been servicing our family's auto for the past 5 years and we couldn't be more satisfied! They charge a fair price for the quality work they provide and more important, they are honest and provide excellent customer service. All in all, Davis repair will be our auto mechanic for many years to come! Highly recommended!
I've had nothing but positive experiences with Down Home Guitars since they opened. Steve, Molly, Amanda and the rest of the store staff are friendly, helpful and knowledgeable. The school portion of the business is wonderful, too. My 12-year-old son started taking bass lessons this past summer with Tom Maslowski and absolutely loves it. Tom clearly knows his stuff and is not afraid to hold his students accountable to high standards for practice, but he also has a passion for playing. From the first lesson, my son talked non-stop about how much he loved learning to play bass and how Tom made it fun even when it was hard. That's the sign of a great teacher. Down Home Guitars is right at home in downtown Frankfort, and I'm happy to give them my business.
I <3 Exclusive Consulting!
I am obsessed with the Chicken Chipotle sub, I make special trips from Richmond to Charlottesville to have the best sub ever!
Great place! Very chill.
This place is the best! They fast-tracked the repair previously replaced iPad digitizer from another Pod Drop location that was not functioning. Not only did they cover the 2nd repair fully, they got it done on a Saturday in under 2 hours. After a week of a wonky screen and then total failure, having my iPad back that quick was beyond my expectations. I will be utilizing the Madison Heights Pod Drop solely for any repairs from now on. Thanks guys!
mejillones para chuparse los dedos ....
Trabajo de Mario
Just ate here today and service was amazingly fast and informative and the food was quite amazing. I would definitely recommend this place to anyone who likes Thai food.
Great facilities, great food, an amazing place to visit and work at.
Some of the best Pizza in Melbourne. Delicious.
The food is always good. Love this place!
I usually take my vehicles to the dealer, but have had bad service/luck with that lately. Continental has the most welcoming staff of the dozens of shops I've visited. From now on, if they fix it, and its broke, I will be taking my vehicle to them. Very Friendly! Legendary service and workmanship.
None
Ashton Service Group is incredibly professional...they were very accommodating in moving my appointment to an earlier time when requested, and Ross arrived right on time. Ross was excellent in assessing our situation, determining the problem and resolving it in a timely manner. I believe another plumber could have easily overlooked the cause of our problem, as it was an unusual situation, but Ross noticed what was actually a simple fix and potentially saved us a lot of time, money and a big headache! I will definitely recommend Ashton to my neighbours, friends and clients. Thank you for turning a stressful situation into a positive experience!
None
Excellent food!
Awesome!
Great sales team! Will definitely do business with them again.
Best steak in town.
أروع جامع .. و أروع شيخ
Fantastic Museum, Wonderful Ongoing Exhibitions. Friendly Staff. Perfect for all ages of Kids through to Adults
Really friendly staff. I had to go get my feet fixed because I run a lot. She took her time and made my feet feel really good.
None
Just got a full tune up for $43 (tax included). Amazing. These guys are passionate about bikes, passionate about good service, friendly, helpful, articulate and RESPONSIBLE. This last one is almost impossible to find these days in a bike shop. Great.
I've attended the Vietnam Veterans of America 16th National Convention last August and stayed at the Hyatt Regency Jacksonville and I have nothing but praise and love for the people and the city of Jacksonville, FL. You truly know the meaning of "Hospitality" and I thank you for it. I'll be back:)
Wow! incredibly easy to deal with. Ned Guarda was my salesperson and he was very knowledgeable, friendly and customer service oriented. The whole deal was handled on the dealership's end in a very professional manner. I wish that all my past car buying experiences were this great. My wife and I bought a 2013 jeep Grand Cherokee Limited and we stopped in to Helfman while on our way to another Jeep dealership. We are very glad we did. If we purchase another Chrysler product it would only be from Ned at Helfman. We financed our car through Helfman even though I had been pre-approved through both USAA and my credit union. Helfman's terms were equal and Juan in the finance department was efficient and professional in the way he handled our deal. I always buy an extended warranty on my vehicles due to the mileage I drive each year and was glad to see that Helfman did not try to sell me some third party warranty but one that is from the manufacturer.
Allure Dental Spa is the best dentist I have had the chance to see. I went in without a lot of Dental Problems that I have been trying to fix for years, and I am finally getting them fixed. I leave Allure Dental Spa with very minimum pain if any. My last visit, I had several cavaties and a crown and knew I would be in a lot of pain after I left. To my suprise, I did not have any pain. The staff is very friendly, and I always feel welcome. The staff always knows my name,and I feel like I can talk to them for hours. Its a very friendly and relaxing environment. The Allure is very flexible to my schedule, and I can tell they want me as a patient. I would highly recommend Allure Dental Spa. I can say enough about the doctor and the staff. I know I have and im still receiving excellent care. I cant wait for the end result.
Very helpful, professional staff - excellent customer service and good value for money.
For all your Home Medical Equipment needs
None
None
Rented a unit for work purposes from Kendra today. Very good experience! I would recommend to a friend!
We drive a long distance to take our beloved dogs to this clinic and it is more than worth it. Extremely competent and genuinely compassionate care. The veterinarians are first rate - highly skilled, extremely knowledgeable, and current.. The staff is very friendly and accommodating, They genuinely care about your pets - I've observed them when they think no one is looking and they love up your pet. We have had the sad experience of having to euthanize our severely injured dog, and one of the young staff members who assisted was teary. Highly recommended.
None
Fantastic place for fresh sandwiches in Ninth Square New Haven and very reasonably priced.
Marcia has a very intuitive approach that is married with the scientific.... love how she gives suggestions that are practical and not too pricey.... she was very generous with her time and we were able to email and call her months after to ask her other questions about the consult. She was a joy to work with and we saw how the cures made some of our financial and business affairs much easier to handle with less struggle and more joj
Great food and superb service.
I stayed there on an assignment for about 8 months. The staff from top to bottom was outstanding and would wife Maria in a heartbeat!!
Bob Burke just left our house and have to state, he was the nicest fella. A friendly hello as I answered the door and not even a shrug or a terse look as I asked him a million questions. He answered them with helpful and insightful tips and suggestions. Very pleased with AAA and will definitely use them from now on.
Wir waren heute mit unseren Kinder da! Lecker, gemütlich & gut!
great atmosphere and food
None
Van's Golf Shop on Camelback is the best place that I've found for selection and service. I always get a great price on clubs and I always leave feeling like I was offered the best solutions with my best interest in mind. Everyone always has their own opinion when it comes to golf. Trust the guys at Van's Golf Shop on Camelback.
None
Been going to Ally for years and could not recommend her higher, just don't keep her to busy so she can still fit me in. :)
This gym is awesome . classes are great. Gym is huge.
I love this place. Good food, cool atmosphere.
Sales Staff of SEO Company on Facebook page are very good. . General conversations it was great.Thanks a lot!
Adventure Graphics designed my website perfectly. The customer service I received (and still do receive!) is outstanding and I'm always very happy to recommend them.
Absolutely delicious.
Great Zoo, my favourite yet, just great!
Bill is the Man!!! Amazing quality work at reasonable prices. He is happy to share his passion and knowledge of bikes with the customers.
Rachel has an unbelievable ability to capture both the personality of her subject and the moment in time. That is exactly what you want in your photographer! Rachel makes her shoots fun and tailors them to the individual. My daughter, who is now 12, still talks about the extended session we had with Rachel when she was 7 or 8! Her professionalism and product is remarkable but her character is what sets her even farther apart.
This restaurant is excellent. Incredibly expensive ($100+ per person), but the food is great, the service is great, and the drinks are great too. The price makes it more of a special occasion place than a regular Friday night type, but it really is great.
None
I use Huff Insurance for all my bonds for Estate Administration. Cheryl Jones takes care of all the details and I just stop by the office to pick up the bond. The service keeps me from sending out my assistant for an hour trip in the middle of our workday. Steven M. Berger, Esq. Law Office of Steven M. Berger, LLC Annapolis, MD
Good food looks better than ever
Great worker nice neat job.
This is a great place to score a good pizza at a great price! Pizza always tastes great, and the crust is great too!
Been coming here for years, and both doctors there are top notch. Staff is great, and their frame selection for glasses is huge!
This place gives Wawa some serious competition. Love the selection. Can't say enough about the baked goods. Old fashioned and fresh.
Stayed there 3 nights and I loved it! They have great customer service. All the employees treated me with great respect. The food was delicious but it was pricey. They only have valet parking which is about $20.00 a day. I would come back again. Thank you for the great experience Fairmont!
I had grown very tired of the bland dreck sold by the big chain pizza places (PH, DomiNOs, Puking Johns, Not-So-Hungry-Now Howies...) so I changed it up and bought a pie from Leaning Tower. Best pizza I have had in a very long time. Normally I'll eat a couple pieces and take the rest to work the next day, but I ate half the pizza before I realized it and had the rest for dinner that same day. Fantastic food, a teeny-tiny bit more expensive (when you break down the comparisons) but you'll be getting QUALITY AND QUANTITY (this was a huge pizza!). Definitely worth revisiting again and again.
None
I used to drink here in 1999 when I first moved to Holland, a guy called Ronnie ran the bar back then, wonder if he's still there??
Very clean...Room Theaters sound very excellent. Concession stand very organized... I do recommend it
The Museum is one of the most interesting and Educating places I have been. What a treat for all of us that went.
None
"My son, who was born three months prematurely and was one and a half years old at the time, was unable to hold his head up straight since birth. His head was in a constant lean to the left and he could not fully straighten it out. I would lift his head and it would drop to the side. Each time I brought my son to the pediatrician regarding the issue he would say, “everything is fine, the muscles are just undeveloped on that side of his neck due to his premature birth and it will get better as he gets older”, This wait and see approach was unacceptable to me and I wanted another opinion. I decided to consult a chiropractor. After an extensive search I was referred to Dr. Peter Marcus. It took Dr. Marcus all of 30 seconds to locate the exact cause of the problem and it wasn’t undeveloped muscles. According to Dr. Marcus it was a spinal misalignment. I was nervous about Dr. Marcus performing an adjustment on my one year old son’s neck but Dr. Marcus assured me that my son would be fine and that it was perfectly safe. I felt confident that he knew what he was doing so I agreed. In one quick adjustment (and a loud pop that I must admit scared me) my son’s neck immediately straightened out and he has never had that problem again. My wife and I were absolutely amazed. My son is now seven and Dr. Marcus is still our family chiropractor. I would recommend Dr. Marcus without hesitation."
None
WE LOVE IT!!!! Beyond best Sushi in town! It taste like when we were in Cali. The service is AMAZING!!! and thats even when you are getting your order to go....
Great people to work with! Always professional, timely & well informed. Very nice group.
A All Animal Control's staff is very knowledgable and professional. I recommend AAAC for all your wildlife problems.
No idea what the clown below is talking about, NO ONE is in this gym wearing anything religious or Pro Muslim, that's just crap!!, this a REAL gym with REAL equipment and I've only ever seen people dedicated and training hard, many women train there and are respected. Terry & Co. run a top notch gym and I've always enjoyed training there and will do for many years to come as I have in the past 4yrs. If you want girly backpacks and skinny Lycra clad plastic people everywhere, this place is not for you, normal to serious people train here even many in their 70's! Everyone has a great time and the staff are the best I have experienced at any gym.
I can always count on Joe Martin to give me simple, honest, answers about my cars. The work done is always top-notch and I know I can trust what he says needs to be done.
By far this is the best dispensary I've been to. The quality is always consistent and the staff are friendly and cool. I have been to a lot of other dispensaries in the past 3 years and this one has always been quality. If you're looking for a good experience that you won't regret, Don't be Dumb, get your chronic "medicine" here.
Excellent food and fine ales
The best Pizza I have found in Scottsdale to date.
Good atmosphere to trelax and have a glass of wine or beer and to meet the locals and a whole lot of variety of people of all ages and races from all corners of Auckland and in Panmure.. =] Plus the staff are great too..
Måske københavns fedeste natklub, lækker mad, DJ´en spiller altid op til lir - og folk rocker på danse gulvet!!!
None
JP Promotional Products understands the value of a business advertising with product placement. They want to associate a product that enhances your business so you remain top of mind with your clients and prospects. Their service is outstanding. They care about your business. Period. From one family business to another, THANK YOU!
None
Seven cheese pizza is our family favorite.
Contractors only. Very helpful and knowledgeable. Solid product lines: Ruud, Fujitsu. Dependable followup.
What a great hardware store! Everyone is really friendly and they even helped me when they were about to close. I called wanting to get 4 x 2x4 pieces of wood to support my aquarium stand and they not only got them done quickly, but accurately. I will definitely be coming back when I make another fish tank stand.
Great Service!
Best prices on scotch in the city. All single malt whiskey priced less than 10% over cost.
None
Страхотни професионалисти и много качествени продукти. Поздравления за работата!
None
Really a beautiful place to dine out...
Fantastic product, fantastic service, fantastic people. I have had numerous orders fulfilled of several different types of products, and have never been disappointed with quality, care, or turnaround time. Cindy has been A++ to work with as a facilitator and takes the utmost care with every concern or inquiry. Highly recommended.
If you're having trouble with your computer, this is the place to go. These guys are really helpful.
One of our best associates!!! @ InvestigationHotline
None
Cosy little "Salon de The". Excellent place for a lunch. Rich collection of harty and sweet pies.
None
None
Spontan denkende und hilfsbereite Mitarbeiter. Ich brauchte für einen Geburtstag eigentlich nur als Gimmik ein altes Laufrad und habe von denen direkt ein ganzes altes Fahrrad bekommen. Hat mich riesig gefreut. Großes Lob!
The staff at A&C have been most helpful with our association legislative efforts in Annapolis. They are explanatory, professional, well-connected, and fairly priced. Several years in our relationship have proven that they make a great team! Jordan Hendler, Executive Director; Washington Metropolitan Auto Body Association
None
Traveled from Helena to stay with Discovery Dental! The congenial and knowledgeable staff are fantastic! Dr. Green is excellent. The latest in technology, fun music, beautiful office, and great people always make it worth the trip!
Un pur moment de bonheur, chaque bouchée est magique, Accueil, lieu, personnels tout est parfait.
None
I would just like to take a moment and let you know what type of service you are going to receive at this establishment. We had the opportunity to purchase a billiard cue case here and found that after approximately a month of use, there was an issue with it. I whole heartedly expected to go to the store to have them tell me that there was nothing that they could do for me. Boy was I surprised. Not only did they offer to replace the case, they allowed us to upgrade the case with no objections. I commend them on the excellent customer service that they provided and I can assure you that whenever we are in the market for supplies, they will be our one stop shop. Thank you for the great service.
ISO of Dilzer financial services is no surprise to me as ever since ( 2003) Dilshad is advising me on financial issues all investments, documents were precisely maintained and meticulously analyzed and despite of away from Bangalore I am continuing my trust itself is testimony of her systematic work. All the best to Dilshad & Dilzer consultancy both.
John Boccaccio was wonderful to work with! He was able to find the exact car I wanted, and was even willing to trade an out of state dealer to get the specific car if need be. This was my first new car purchase and he made the process hassle-free and, walked me through each and every step. John was not pushy and you could tell he genuinely cares about getting customers a car they want, rather than just making a sale. When it's time for another new car, John has my business! Thanks Capital Eurocars for a great experience!
These guys have literally saved my back and wrists. Not only are they excellent within the medical part of their job, but they make everything personal! I have never felt more welcome in a doctors office than I do when I go into All About Potential!
My favorite camping, hiking, paddling, crafting, biking, relaxing place. Off the beaten path, but lot's to do relatively nearby. The scenery is just incredible.
Justin Kelley was the pivotal role in ensuring my vehicle purchase was exactly the way it was supposed to be. He was professional and beyond accommodating. Contact him directly if you have any issues!
Muito bom!
Fantastic results. Quiet though it's close to the markets. I was particularly sore in area, which I told the masseuse, and let afterwards feeling relief where I needed it. Will be back.
Great place. Clean with a lot of charm. The staff was very helpful. Will definitely be back.
I would highly recommend Prestige Diamonds to anyone, the staff where helpful and friendly, and worked within my budget, i was delighted with the service and would certainly go back again.
When I walked in and saw the trompo (vertical spit for the al pastor), I knew I was going to enjoy the experience. The al pastor here is fantastic--best I've had since living in Mexico years ago, in fact. The lengua is delicious as well. There's a great little salsa bar. It isn't the most varied selection, but what's there is solid. And the horchata definitely hits the spot. Service is friendly. I love this place!
Servicio, entorno y comida excelentes. He viajado mucho en países árabes y puedo decir que la comida en este restaurante es autentica y en gran cantidad. No entiendo los otros comentarios, he ido 4 veces en este restaurante y los precios son muy razonables por la calidad y variedad de la comida.
The best food on the east coast. When in town for your convention make it a day to stop by for the best food on the east coast.
I have listened to other podcasts about SEO that promise a lot and deliver nothing. I listen to Chris and Charles every time I am in the Ute driving from Sydney to Canberra (worlds most boring drive made easier), best news is I can now hear it without having to sit beside the speaker. I have zero SEO experience, however like most things with a small start up I cannot afford to pay other people just yet to improve my ranking. The great news is that I have improved my Google organic impressions by 11% and my organic clicks are up 9% this month. I haven't even had time to carry out 10% of the tips that I have learned through listening to E-Webstyle! Thanks for the podcast it has helped keep me on track towards my online vision.
None
Ottimo posto , ottimi i prezzi. La gentilezza e la cortesia della Signora Karin , dei camerieri Manuela , Marlene ed Helmut , sono fantastiche. Il mangiare ottimo ed abbondante. Molto pulite e ampie le camere , con ottima vista sulle dolomiti Ottima la possibilità di rilassarsi , dopo tutto il giorno a passeggio. Consigliato per le Famiglie, i bambini , stanno benissimo Sono 5 anni che vado lì , e non mi stancherò di ritornarci
Epic freaking chicken!!! If Buffalo Wild Wings were a person I would ask it to marry me :-)
The food was good, but underwhelming for the price. For $11 I expected a bigger burger. The taste was great though. All in all I'd consider coming back.
Best sushi in greater Milwaukee in my humble opinion.
This place is the best! Ryan & his family do a wonderful job with everything here! The pulled pork is great! But the ribs & the homemade sauce they use is the killer combo! Totally get a rack of ribs if you come here TO DIE FOR!!!! They just melt off the bone!
Od wielu lat współpracujemy z Markiem, w 100% polecamy jego usługi.
Great place for Hakata-style ramen - soup is made from pork stock, so it's definitely very hearty. There's a wide selection of soups, ingredients, and even noodles. You can pick various thicknesses/textures for noodles for your liking. The wait isn't as crazy as other trendy ramen shops, but there's still a decent queue at night.
Good food
I have moved many times…some good and some nightmares. Moving with Fergusons was not only good, but enjoyable. They were easy to deal with right from my first contact with them. Their estimate was right bang on, they were always on time and they dealt with weird items (like a giant unpackable mirror) with no fuss or angst. Everything arrive in tact and was unloaded by very efficient and friendly men. I wouldn't hesitate to recommend them, hands down, over their competition.
Medusa is just the nicest little bar, nestled on the edge of Ligunea. Try it, you'll love it
The guys at Just Tires are excellent. They turned me on to the ComforTred a number of years ago and I am a fan. It is the only tire I will buy now. I drive a lot and so I bought the tire protection plan, which I recommend if you drive very much. I have had a number of major issues due to pot holes or big nails and have used the plan several times and always been really happy I had it. As well, one time, when a friend of mine was visiting from Germany, he got a big nail in the tire of his rental car. We took it over to the guys at Just Tires and they fixed it for us for free. They certainly didn't have to do that, but they knew we were in a hurry and they just took care of us. I appreciate that my loyalty to them is rewarded in ways like that. I recommend this Just Tires location. I also recommend the Comfortred, great, great ride.
What a wonderful check in experience, very professional, pleasant, and helpful. Rachel provided great customer service! Thank you.
None
For the past couple of months I have been getting the best manicures and pedicures I've ever had from Megan at Aziz. Perfectly shaped nails, all precisely the same length. Polish that is smooth with no ridge at the cuticle. I love the pedicure room with clean bowls and and a simple bench--no pounding massage pedicure chair! Megan is so personable and kind to me! She is SO gentle. So worth the few extra dollars! I liked Megan and Aziz so much, I decided to have a haircut there. Jason gave me a fabulous haircut! I have curly hair and it is so difficult to find a stylist who really has a feel for curls. Jason does...in spades! He shaped my hair so beautifully! Plus, he did not push me to color my white-streaked late 50's hair. AND...he was totally amenable to cutting my hair so I could wear my rather dorky barrettes on either side of my head. In fact, the way he cut my hair makes the barrettes look stylish! He didn't insist on blow-drying my hair. He let me style my own hair after the cut, brought me the product I needed, and watched me carefully as I did it...I assumed so he could get a sense for how he could give me an even better cut the next time! If he can give me an even better cut, I will pronounce him a genius! I NEVER write these kind of public reviews, but Megan and Jason deserve kudos and raises. Ask for them at Aziz and tip them well!
These eye doctors are really good. Come in, got my eye exam and my Optometrist was kind, thoughtful and then I discovered they even have eye specialists here. I met the young eye specialist on my way out - super nice guy. But the reason I am writing this review is because I came in, spent over an hour looking at Versace, Gucci, and some Christian Dior frames and the woman who helped me was so patient and kind. I am impressed. This is my new eye clinic and eyeglass store from NOW ON! So very nice and I love supporting good and nice people who treat me fairly and give me great service.
Tough to find a better pour-over without cruising to Venice. Super friendly staff and a charming little location. Not to mention all kinds of tasty brew.
If I lived in Vermont, this is where I would take my vehicle. I was traveling from out of town with a vehicle whose company is no longer (Saab). After a couple failed attempts at starting my car, I had it towed to this garage. The quickly diagnosed the problem (bad starter), had a dealer part overnight'd, and had the repair complete as expected. I returned the next day because my brake light was on. Apparently a bleeder valve was not tightened all the way from a prior service with my mechanic at home. They took me in without an appointment and remedied this problem while I waited. As a father of three girls, I could appreciate the vibe of the shop.
Sienna tan has friendly and knowledgeable staff who are always willing to help. Very clean facilities-great for first time users and veterans!
We just return from rishikesh last month and this hotel is such on a good location the view from room is like we are floating in holy river ganga, hotel is situated right next to ganga. Open air restaurant is just made for us, food was great , service was excellent and hotel staff was really helpful they made our one day tour with rafting. Such a pleasant stay that was totally unforgettable, Highly Recommend
Rzetelnie i fachowo. Polecam.
Great atmosphere. Order the wings and a cocktail. Go from there. Perfect Portland.
Blown away. Great vendors, awesome prices and fresh, local food. Can't beat it!
I absolutely love the new Jungle Jim's Eastgate. Our family had been anxiously awaiting their opening and we haven't been disappointed. The selection, from beer to cheeses to the salsa bar, to hot sauces to fresh produce..., is incredible The service has been very good every time we've gone. It has become our primary grocery store which I frequent at least a couple times a week.
The folks in this place are SOOPER friendly and courteous!!! I Love The Place!!!!!
One of my favorite places in Westchester. They take their beer and their food seriously, always something new and notable on tap. The food is creative, fresh and well prepared high end pub food. This is what a grown up pub is supposed to be like: great food, great beer and great service. Be warned, something this good gets crowded fast so arrive early or relax with a beer at the bar and settle in.
This is by far the best Chinese food I've had in the Des Moines area. I usually order there once a week, and get delivery. They're quick, the food arrives nice and hot, and is always delicious!
Wonderful food, service and ambience. I will go there as often as I can, when ever I am in San Francisco...Slightly pricey though
I love this place. They are always very, very nice and polite and do a fantastic job. The prices are very reasonable as well: $13 Manicure $27 Pedicure or $37 for both.
Great place. I absolutely LOVE their dumplings and the service is pretty fast. Only sad thing is the minimum charge for a credit/debit card is $10 and getting only their dumplings is a little less than $6
I'm finally excited about working out again! I joined WOW for 2 reasons: the team training classes, and the 24 hour access. I love knowing I can go workout whenever I want - including on Holidays if I so desire. The team training classes are amazing. I have gone through the class with various trainers and they are all amazing. They all push in different, but equally challenging & supportive ways. I can't afford a trainer, but with these classes, I get the benefits of a trainer at a price I can afford!! Oh, and I am a huge fan of the steam room... so wonderful after an intense workout or run. The staff are easy to talk to and always willing to help. I live about 25 minutes away from WOW and still think the drive it totally worth it!!
Dave the owner at the PP is awesome! He's an expert on everything spices. They have spices from around the world to help with cooking ideas and specialty cookware and utensils. A must stop in Salem to take a piece of Salem home with you.
Excellent masjid.
Open arrangement, delicious food, friendly staff & a wide variety of food. Ocean's bar & grill had really great food & great prices. Their beer is tasty & the feel of it make's you never want to leave. What I really loved is that I ordered a banana dessert & the waiter actually ran next door to grab some, fresh off the tree. If you're looking for a place to sit back, watch some sports, drink beer & eat nachos, then Ocean's is where it's at.
Real people with great boat knowledge. We got a great deal on a very nice pre-owned boat. Thanks Roger for your help every step of the way including all the great referrals your have given us to assist in other boating needs. We love our new boat & are glad to have made a cool friend! Brent
Chango's has a unique take on mexican food - you won't find anything like it anywhere else in town. Couple that with the fact that it's also really good, and you've got a clear win. The taco's often garner the most attention, but the burritos have always been the draw for me. Go with the mashed black beans. Far and away the best burrito in town. Any time you buck the trend and create your own flavor, it's certain not to hit the mark for everyone. But for me, Chango's is a solid bulls eye.
It's an ATM!
Prices are exactly as they quote you, no fees, no nonsense. Carpets look and feel just like new. With the 3 room and a hall special, they beat out their competitors by a large margin. Next time our carpet needs to be cleaned again, I know who I'm going to trust with the job. Definitely recommend these guys over anyone else out there.
None
DWR (Breshkie Gardizi) is absolutely an amazing organization. The love and care they show towards these amazing dogs is unbelievable! I have now adopted two dogs from DWR. My first was Nikki who is an absolute amazing Catahoula mix. She is an alpha female and fit into my home with my older Brittany Spaniel and cat perfectly. When I lost my Brittany to old age last year, I waited a while before deciding to adopt a playmate for Nikki. When I was ready, I contacted DWR with my long list of criteria for a new dog. With them knowing Nikki, they knew what to look for in a match for both Nikki and myself. They had been out to my home and knew what kind of life a new pup would have. After a few days, they emailed me to let me know they had found the girl for us. Ida (Valentine her rescue name) came to us on foster to perm basis. She is a doll and I can't imagine my life without her. DWR also matched my boss with the perfect dog for his family. They are also so happy with their dog. My boss often talks about how wonderful DWR is to save these wonderful dogs and all that they go through to do so. I would highly recommend adopting from DWR. Remember the $350 is a minute amount compared to what they spend to get them out of these kill shelters and off the streets. Thank you DWR and all their incredible volunteers!!!
This place is great! They are great with the animals and really show them love and care that they deserve. The place is beautiful! Its super clean and looks comfy, even I wouldn't mind staying there. ha ha. The staff is really friendly and polite, which is a plus. I definitely recommend bringing your pets here, they will love it.
Brought my car in for an oil change from the Groupon Brooks Huff ran recently. I've received great service! They discovered a burned out brake light and a nail in one of my tires. The waiting area is clean, and they even have a Keurig. A lot of mechanic shops are not pleasant places to wait-this is not one of those shops. I would definitely come back here, even if I wasn't using a Groupon. Tim and Eric provided me with great service-polite, friendly and prompt. Thank you!
I have 2 units at AAAA in the climate-controlled areas and I am very happy with them. The units are new, clean, and there is always a hand truck available in every section to help you pack or unpack. Another big plus is that they have Sunday office hours (many of their competitors do not). You don't need the office to be open to get to your unit, but you do need the office to be open if you want to get a new unit (which I have now done two different times, both on Sundays, which would have been impossible if I had chosen most of their competitors).
Look for Denis Luebke and James Daher, they make a perfect team to help you all the way. My experienced witht he both of them is just excellent.
open 24 hours again!!
We love the library!! It has TONS of books, music, and movies. We have been able to check out new releases easily; also, we request books, CDs and movies from other libraries and they come quickly. We also love how late it stays open, til 9pm. We go to the Rec Center and then the library all throughout the week. Also, love the easy self-check-out, with plenty of computers to check our stuff out.
I have worked with A-1 Coastal Lock and Key for years. I own and operate Active Care Chiropractic. Eric has been professional and prompt every time. I had him replace locks at two of my offices. Reasonably priced, quick service, and knows his stuff. Thanks Eric, Dr. McGraw
High quality care is the trademark of this clinic. I received an accurate diagnosis and treatment. A follow-up call was also made. I highly recommend Doctors Care in NMB.
Huge Thanks again McCarthy's for taking in that homeless hedgehog to live his life in a nice place instead of a cage.. i know he will be safe and well cared for by your knowledgeable and loving staff :) Thanks for all you do.
Nice Job
I have found Executive Dental Arts on Google when we moved to this area. I feel that it was a lucky find. Dr. Spivak is a wonderful dentist. Extremely knowledgeable and attentive. Explains every details about any procedure. My wife and I already use his office and our son will be going there when he turns 2. His assistant Julie is great and always with a smile ready to help. His office is new, clean and spacious. His equipment is new and well maintained. It is a pleasure to provide a personal recommendation to Dr. Spivak and Executive Dental Arts.
Great food. I love the buffalo chicken! Our order was done on time, friendly staff.
! Great place!
None
The beef (and beef with sausage) sandwiches here are absolutely AMAZING. Get it wet with the peppers and you won't regret it. Probably the best sandwich I have eaten in Grand Rapids area. Worth the trip. I can't tell you how much you need to eat this place's food.
None
None
LOVE going to Wild Adventures with our family and friends! It is a wonderful experience for all ages. It gets bigger every year. Our family has been going since it opened and we get to share this wonderful experience with each generation! If there were the option of 100 stars I would chose that as a rating with out a doubt!
We had 11 in the group and everyone agreed that this was some of the best authentic Italian food they ever had. We are visiting from California, we will maybe never get to enjoy this establishment again. Keep providing fine establishment customer service.
Words cannot describe how pleased I was working with this fast signs. As a real estate broker I always have a need for signs, riders, and other marketing material. In past experiences with other companies my order took days and were always pricey. fast signs had everything done same day and at a better price than their competitors. I'm a customer for life!
Since 2002, several members of my family and I had been admitted into this hospital more than once under different departments due to various surgeries. My mother had been under the able care of the Late Dr Sanjeev Dhawan for over 12 years. Barring a few small incidents, our stay in this hospital had been mostly satisfactory. Even today, several members of my family are under the care of its various doctors. I wish SGRH a bright future!
What an awesome resort. My wife and I stayed here Monday to Friday for our honeymoon. The staff was over-the-top courteous, the hot breakfasts were excellent as was the dinner we ate here. We did have to sign for extra towels, but there was no charge. The gardens were beautiful. The location was great being so close to multiple wineries, silver falls, and only an hour and a half from the coast. If we ever travel to Oregon again, we will definitely stay here!
I highly recommend Dr. Edelson. I had the pleasure of working with him in a previous practice. He is very knowledgable, professional, and really cares about helping his patients.
Hats off to Alan and staff for the ambience, unfailing courtesy and being so friendly. Wonderful lawn and gardens at all times of the year. Of course, not forgetting the food. We eat there most weeks (Sunday Lunch) and with an ever-changing menu there is no chance of getting bored. Try the cheesecake! Excellent wines!
Fantastic coaching. Especially when compared with larger chain gyms. Coaching that actually takes notice of you and tailors your training for you and your goals, whatever they may be. Always looks to train in a way that suits you in order to keep things interesting, too. Training here and following the principles set before me I've seen massive improvements in my strength and fitness levels. These are still continuing as I'll be looking to smash personal records within the coming week. Spacious and versatile making it perfect for any form of physical training you'd undertake. Plus it's always nice to not have to wait for a bar like I've had to in commercial chain gyms. I can't praise it enough, it's fantastic to come back here when I can.
Awesome experience all-around. They definitely care about their patients... highly recommended!
Dr. Jody and her massage therapists took excellent care of me. They got me out of pain and able to move and sit again without pain. I highly recommend them to everyone who asks. I can't urge you strongly enough to use their services. The people that work there are awesome!!!!!
pampam"
None
Lupe is the best. Ask for her! 3 reasons: She listens well (and also speaks English) Knows what she is doing (and can hold a non-awkward conversation) Takes her time (while smiling) My $14 haircut was reasonable, and she deserved the tip I gave her.
Wonderful food absolutely delicious
Got a really great deal on a memory foam mattress that was half the cost of what I almost spent at mattress discounters thanks
None
Dr Zabell is at the top of his field. Offices are lovely and neighborhood is fun to visit!
None
Drop in for a bite with four for dinner. The staff made room for us immediately. Appetizers arrived with in minutes, just after the beer and water. Excellent service all around. Main courses arrived hot, fresh and yummy. Large portions with plenty of sauces and good fresh rice for the table. I ordered the Tandori platter which arrived sizzling wth plenty on it. Fresh lemon, tomatoes and onions. Non? The flat bread was excellent and fresh made. Thank you for a wonderful fast and inexpensive meal.
Fantastic pizza by the slice. Joe's is a regular lunch time destination at the office. It's good food, cheap and fast. We're usually is and out in 30 minutes. I highly recommend the "meat pie". One pound of meat per slice.
Nice hotel with huge varieties
Mr. Fixit Fast was very prompt after we contacted them. They sent over Frank who was very competent and professional. They provided an accurate quote and Frank did an excellent job repairing the back fascia around the window. It was a delicate job because the wood was rotten around the window and a previous contractor had already broken the very large window. We are very happy with their work and will recommend Mr. Fixit Fast to anybody.
Had an amazing pulled pork plate here, and a tasty smoothie for desert :) Very friendly staff and good "vibe" too...
My husband just called me after he had "the best experience at any store EVER!" Thank you for being so accommodating and taking such pride in your work. He told me that John Q. helped him and that the service was above and beyond what he expected and has received anywhere else. From now on, we will patronize and refer to Grangier whenever possible!
The service is extremely good!
昨日友達のお誘いで行ってみました。開店2ヶ月だから、新しくて綺麗な四階建てのお店です。フロンドのお姉さんも優しい人で、親切に案内してくれました。私たちは色々なコースの中から、定番の足裏マッサージに決めました。マッサージの先生が丁寧にやりながら説明しますので、少し勉強になりました。ちょうど肩こりもあって足も疲れたから行ってよかったと思います。永康街の近くなので、永康街の散策が終わってからちょっと足をのばして行ってね！おすすめです。
None
Good coffee, friendly staff, cozy setting. There is seating inside and out. Art by local artists decorates the shop and is for sale as well. Highly recommended.
None
None
Positive: Brilliant library, helpful staff, wonderful experience, I recommend this. To improve: would be even better if we had more quite rooms for discussions or for teens to reduce noise level .
Friendly and excellent service. Made reservations for Mother's Day . The shrimp, walnut, melon dish was simply fabulous. Received a $10 off coupon for a Mother's Day gift. A superb dining experience!
I LOVE this place. The location is great, food is amazing, and the decor is clean, modern and fresh. It is a great place to have business meetings have a drink with your girlfriends at the bar! The 817 Club Salad is my favorite, but I am very eager to try their Fried Chicken with Siracha butter.... I just might go try that today! Another great item on the menu is the baked potato salad! Everything you get on a loaded baked potato, but its in potato salad form. Who can resist that!? If you haven't been here before, check it out with a group of your friends, and you won't be disappointed!
It would be my privilege to recommend Deandra Grant as an Attorney to any of our clients or friends. She is very professional, and considered an expert in the field of DUI/DWI. She goes beyond expectations for her clients, and works extremely on there behalf.-Jade Joplin, Joplin Private Investigations
I recently leased an apartment with the help of Rachel Flores....she was extremely helpful and patient with me. I had very specific location and other requirements that I was looking for and she even helped me get a few other discounts with the complex that I wasn't aware of. I would recommend this service and Rachel specifically to anyone looking for an apartment and will use her again in the future!
Bought a 2013 Toyota Corolla LE. My first new car, and first time buying at a dealership. This was a great experience. William Hudgins was extremely friendly and helpful through the whole process - he went over the top to make it convenient and enjoyable. The process whole process was quick and painless. Would recommend Leith Toyota and William Hudgins to anybody.
Best vet ever!!! The staff really cares about our little pet family. Would recommend them to anyone and everyone!
None
Small, sweet and delightful. This applies to the building, staff and food. Perfect portions wonderfully cooked. Definitely recommend it.
Parádní zahrádka s výhledem. Skvělý a obětavý personal. A k tomu velmi dobré jídlo. Až pojedu opět kolem,určitě se zastavím..
None
游泳池,spa,羽球場，網球場，免費參觀化石館，物超所質
Had a great experience working with Jordon's. The inventory was great, lots to choose from. Once I order the sofa, chair and ottoman (price was reasonable) they were delivered when they said they would be. The installation/movers set everything up making sure all the hardwood floors were projected and took away all the packing materials when they were done. I would recommend Jordon's again. Thanks
Went in to register today without no problem whatsoever and greeted with friendly, professional staff and assisted with the forms without even having to ask.
Great place..great ambience..
Beautiful architecture... nice people.... nice buffets all day!
None
None
I have attended college in Baltimore for a year now and always went back home to my local barber for a mediocre cut and long wait. I finally decided to find a Barbershop in the area and found Royal Razor. I was greeted by a chipper small dog, there was no wait, great customer service, great quality cut, and a very well designed. This is the BEST BARBERSHOP I have EVER been to! I will definitely be back.
Superbe vue pour souper ou simplement prendre un café...
None
None
None
Always have a good attitude willing to help you solve you rental needs!
It is my friend's hotel. it is a very beautiful.
None
If you would like to have beautiful bookcases made, you should visit Michael Verny.
Almost fast food, but in a good way. Love heading here when I'm hungry and want food quick. Never spend more than ten per person, usually less. Food is fresh and some is even local. Good stuff!
Tehuacán la ciudad mas hermosa del mundo!
We love Bald Knob First Assembly of God! Bro. Piker always greets you with a hug or handshake. The welcoming atmosphere was one of the main reasons we made the decision to become members.
Just called to book our new little puppy in, amazing customer service!!!
Awesome food & service
We had a really good experience with my boyfriend. We booked a private double room and was pretty new and neat. Toilets Cleanliness was very good too. Staff attention as well. Location is very central and good too, across the TV tower, easy to move around. Nice breakfast! I´d definitely highly recommend it!
I purchased a truck from this location on Monday and was more than pleased! Everyone was super friendly and accommodating. Joe Strazzeri was the salesman who helped me and he was absolutely amazing. He listened to exactly what I was looking for and delivered! I love my truck and will go back when I purchase my next vehicle! Thank you Wesley Chapel Honda!
Great coffee and great service
Excellent service for very good fees. Sold my house for 25% of the cost compared to some other companies. Can highly recommend
Great place.
Great service. Came in about 35 minutes after I called, and good customer service. $55 to unlock, and $5 to use a card.
This place is everything they said and more. Comfortable beds, great scenery, an excellent breakfast delivered to the room. Everything you could need for a pleasant stay. We will be coming back.
None
Wine was amazing!! Atmosphere is great and people are incredible. Will be back for sure!
We have been so fortunate with the wonderful teachers at NE Flower Mound Primrose. They truly care for our daughter as if she was their own by providing a positive, safe and loving environment.
Twist is my spot. When I used to visit Atlanta I always made sure I stopped by Twist. Its a great atmosphere, food is great and the music is always cool. Drinks are also made very well. Now that I live in Atlanta, Twist will be a go to spot.
Dr. Aaron Donde is extremely thorough and detail oriented in his assessments. I feel confident referring my clients to him, knowing they will receive competent evaluations and care.
Great service. They answered all my questions and delivered my items ahead of time. Will do business with again.
Ryan hooked me up with a sweet tattoo in late July 2011. Didn't have any issues with customer service as some reviewers had. I will most likely be back in the next week or so to get more work done. Thanks again Ryan for the tattoo of the crowns with my kids names on it.
From the beginning this was a great place to buy our new Honda. I sent a quote request via Email and in just a few minutes Ken sent me the quote in plain English. No hidden costs or concerns. We looked into their inventory and found the car that we wanted to test drive, I sent it to Ken and made an appointment to meet. Once we got there the car was parked waiting for us. The finance team was great as well, no pushing to buy stuff that we don't need very respectful. This team is like no other, I trust them. My new mini Van is awesome.
Played today for the first time and was pleasently suprised. From the sign-in desk to the starter to the beverage lady it was top notch. And, this course is really fun and nicely laid out. The price was extremely favorable. 5 stars from me.
I have never laughed so hard at the Dentist. Keep up the good work!
None
He was great!! :) My engine light came on and he got me in the day after I made the appointment. He was honest and pretty fair. I have a 2010 VW TDI and he knew how to take care of her, its not easy finding a mechanic that knows how to work on German cars. My engine needed a glow plug replaced, it was suppose to take an hour but it only took him 30 minutes and he adjusted the quoted price and gave me a break on the installation of the glow plug because it didn't take him as long. Plus he replaced the battery in my fob and replaced a blown fuse for pretty cheap. He even showed me the glow plug that he was putting in, pretty cool. He charges less for labor then the dealers,and he was very reasonable on the parts. I was very impressed with my experience, he even let me go back into the shop to show me the filters that he was replacing. He took great care of my car. :) While I was waiting a gentleman came in and asked if he worked on Mercedes he told the gentleman that He doesn't work on Mercedes, but he will tell you that up front so he didn't waste his money or his time. The guy is pretty good and he is pretty honest. I recommend him to all my friends and anyone who has a VW, Audi, Mini, or BMW's. :)
Keith Forbes was my salesmen and he got me into a new 2013 T&C. THis is a great mini van, I traded in my 2010 for this new one and Keith got me into this new one with the same payment. He did a great job keeping my payment the same and got me to drive away in my brand new T&C. I also get all my oil changes at this dealership; customer service is great and the waiting room is excellent. Passes the time quickly.
Very nice atmosphere in a central location.
None
I recently had my engagement ring resized, cleaned, and polished by Barbara Oliver and Co. Barbara squeezed my order in on short notice to have it ready in time for my wedding day. She even finished it a day earlier than projected. Just picked up the ring, and it looks perfect. I am so impressed by the quality of Barbara's work, and the service was fantastic. I will definitely use Barbara again, and I would recommend her to anyone without hesitation.
Bombay flames has the Best Indian Food in Alpharetta! Chef Sandeep does an amazing providing a variety of entrees for vegans, vegetarians and those that enjoy meat. The food is flavorful and Chef Sandeep is always available to answer questions about the food on the buffet. There is no where in Atlanta where you can enjoy a buffet for under $10 with amazing service too. I've gone on the weekday and weekends with my daughters' and each time was so impressed. Oh and the fried cauliflower is the best I have ever had! You will absolutely enjoy this restaurant.
None
Awsome hour spent everytime ,I try to go once a month or more, best fix for my lower back issues! Great start for the new month.
Had the auce catfish, everything was served hot and fresh, staff was excellent!
None
Super great place super people to help you even if its for just an 8 cent part...I recomend them highly, as they have helped the LOVE family for over 30 years.
None
None
I got a chance to have Indra shot for me at one of the weddings. I'm very impress with his personality and professionalism. He was there on time as scheduled. Very courteous to the guest. He pays attention to detail & surrounding. I truly believe that he put 110 percent in everything that he does and 120 percent in the things that he truly loves. I saw that he is passionate in Photography and the desire to give his client the best images that he knows how. Last but not least, he is educated & and reliable. What more do you ask from a photographer.
We seek out Five Guys when traveling, a little more than In N Out Burger but bigger and better. Really tasty hand cut fries. Always outstanding customer service and this location was no exception. I uploaded a picture as it didn't show up when we were searching Google Places.
This is a first class tree service business. We are very happy and will call Jim again!
10/10 would get eyes checked again
Great service!
We were helped by Alex, and had an amazing experience. My wife loves her Camry! I would recommend Mayfield, and especially Alex to anyone.
The Best Food and Wine Ever :*
After having had Edison Electric perform some previous work for us, we decided to have them back out for a much-needed bigger project. Joe and Dyle were prompt, courteous and efficient, and were able to get everything we needed done on-time and well within our budget. We'll definitely call Edison again the next time we need electrical work.
Super fast service,honest people,I highly recommend this place they have been in business since 2002 and i like that ,clean office ,So if you need a smog check or registration this is the place i drive all the way from San Marcos,its worth the drive ,i would call see if they have any deals going on and i would run over there.
Bungalow Joe's is a great place to enjoy good food and friends.
We arrived and were seated right away. Unfortunately, we were seated under a line of about 8 air vents that were blowing cold air (cold day). We asked our current server to be seated elsewhere and she said that was no problem. She told us we would have to go back into line and wait for another open seat (they didn't look that busy) when one became available. She then went to another table of about 6 or 8 and began taking their orders. Since it was so cold, we flagged down another employee to get the manager so we could be reseated sooner and NOT have to wait in line again. The manager came and we explained our situation. Within about a minute, we were asked by an employee to follow him to our new table which was MUCH better. Problems over.............well, not really. We ordered our food and when it came, my steak was perfect. My fathers steak was medium (lots of pink inside) when he ordered medium well (barely any pink). They offered to redo his steak and he kept his baked potato. The next steak came and it was medium rare (lots of pink with a hint of blue). The server admitted it looked worse than the first one. It got sent back again and he kept the second potato. The same steak was refired and when we got it back, it was beyond well done (no pink, all grey and very dry). No potato this time. My father then asked for a chopped steak instead. The chopped steak came and was done perfectly along with a new potato. Now, you might question why we rated the service and food as excellent. The food was excellent when done correctly. The service was spectacular as there was absolutely NO issue with our server or with the manager with having to serve one dinner 4 times. We told them that it's not always the mistake that is made, but how you handle the mistake. These guys handled it very professionally and with courtesy. In the end, my fathers meal was comp'd but we tipped well as result. The manager realized that they cooks in the back needed further training and we agreed. This particular issue was handled 100% correctly and professionally so that is why service gets an excellent rating.
Über friendly waitstaff and killer prime rib make this my #1 destination anytime I come through town. Do not miss!
The best burger in East Texas.
Muy interesante
The people are terrific and friendly. And the teaching in God's Word extraordinary. We'll be here until we go to heaven.
None
They are making good quality software and software.
This place has so much charm and character. We loved it!!
Best prices. Great food
Love this place. Great food... salads are wonderful, hamburger is remarkable. Good service, would highly recommend.
What a wonderful place!!! My fiance' and I visited for the first time recently and really enjoyed ourselves. No studio fee, the prices are very reasonable and Linda was so sweet! We'll definitely be coming in more often and telling all of our friends about this place. I've already told ten people about it and I plan to send her more business soon. :)
Nicest hotels I have ever stayed in. Top out of 1000's. Great job on everything from service to decor to ambience to comfort. Amenities and modern features make this hotel perfect for business or family.
Being from Kansas, I can say that I tasted seafood for the first time here. Awesome!
My family and I stayed in the Killeen Townhomes, the Abigail Drive location for 3 months. We truly loved our experience living there in a fully furnished unit. It had all the "bells and whistles", affordable, comfortable, and spacious. The office staff and the manager were personable, helpful and understanding. I will recommend this living experience to anyone looking for temporary housing, or for those who plan on staying in the Greater Killeen/Fort Hood area for any length of time.
Service was great! Ted helped me with my rifle purchase. He's the best!
We stayed at this hotel after a long road trip on the Harley and the staff was outstanding! The hotel is beautiful, rooms are clean, and King bed was very comfortable. The front desk staff suggested we park our bike out front where the staff could keep an eye on it overnight. We were very impressed by the staff and hotel. Would definitely recommend to anyone!
Just turned 40. First time needing glasses. Tried out Elite Vision Care. Beautiful facility, friendly and helpful staff. Patient with my questions and didn't break the bank when it came time to settle up for lenses and frames. Insurance saved a pretty penny...but I was never steered toward the "high end" glasses in any way. Would recommend them to others.
For all manner of two-wheeled delights. I bought a bike from these guys over 5 years ago and returned today to look at a folding bike for the commute. After several test rides around Oxford Circus I ended up riding away with a fabulous Strida. Great shop, very knowledgable staff and one of the finest collections of off-centre bikes in the UK.
Ascent Builder's prides themselves on impeccable customer service and have a true desire to work with you to get what you want with your budget in mind! Jason is honest, a wealth of knowledge and so wonderful to work with from design to finished project! Lynn Sheffield
my company has been in business for 10 years when I interviewed Paperstreet along with 3 other web design companies..right from the start I knew Paperstreet was a different caliber of web design company compared to what we had in the past. From the initial sales and proposal process, design and, also set up. Nothing but professional from step one all the way to the launch. We continue to use their services for SEO work and we are making good climbs in the search engine rankings.. We continue to work closely with Paperstreet to make sure we our company website evolves as the market evolves. after the launch of our site Paperstreet submitted our site to IMA and the Aliant payments website won best in class for business to business web sites. that pretty much says it all. Eric Brown CEO Aliant Payment Systems Inc.
None
We moved to Concord three years ago, and it took me several tries to find my go to auto repair service. Once I found Brother, I've not gone to anyone else. Quality service, quality work, and friendly. This is an old fashioned family owned business. In the past three years they've replaced my tires, flush transmissions, fixed lights, gas lines, rattling exhaust, changed oils, gosh I know I am forgetting some... With three "older" cars, I am glad I've found them for all my car needs! I highly recommend it to anyone.
Best and most real place in NYC, hands down. And they even are selling records now too, for the people into house music.....
None
i shop jo-ann fabrics for all my sewing and crafts!! wonderful place to shop! Great customer service. i will continue to shop locally for all my needs!
i love this place not a week goes by that im not in there for somthing. The selection is hugh biggest shop ive seen, the selection is also hugh somthing they have i havent seen anywhere else and the prices you cant beat,ive added more pieces since i started going there than ever before just because the selection and prices if you get a chance go in you wont be sorry
I am very happy with my experience using Metro Garage Door. My garage door broke in the evening. I made the call and someone answered right away. I explained what had happened and she told me someone would be out the very next day to fix my door. The technician called me the next day to let me know exactly when he would be at my house...he was not late! He was very friendly, knowledgable, and fast. I couldn't have asked for better service. Thank you Metro Garage Door for fixing my door and making my day!!
Extremely great food.... Been eating here for about 12 years now :) love it
K.A. cares about their students, promoting growth of both mind and body, with a dose of fun mixed in. Respect for others, and oneself, is one of the top lessons.
None
Great bagels!
Potomac Point Winery is an absolute gem, hidden back in the Widewater area of Stafford County. I have been several times this year, sometimes for specific events, and sometimes just for a nice meal or glass of wine. Every time I have left knowing that I would be back. You can always just have a cheese plate, but you'd be missing out on Chef Oz and his culinary delights. Their Thursday theme nights are a great way to try some of the great food, and prices are reasonable with entrees priced around $9.99. (The strawberry-rhubarb pie is simply to die for!) Ask for Johnathan, he's been our server more than once and is always helpful and attentive. The wines are also a delight. No matter what type of wine you prefer, you'll find one that you'll enjoy at Potomac Point. The La Belle Vie white is a lovely summer wine, light and crisp, with just the right touch of sweetness. The Viognier is one of the best Virginia has to offer, in my opinion. Abbinato is a great red, regardless of whether you tend to like red wine - it's a light bodied wine with subtle tannins, easy to drink. If you are a fan of port, the Rabelos port is not to be missed. Rich and full flavored, with a hint of the smoky nature of the bourbon barrels in which it was aged. Whether you're stopping in for a light snack, a meal, glass of wine, or just to look around, stop in and see for yourself; Potomac Point Winery is a great place to visit.
One of the most amazing things I've done. BEAUTIFUL!
None
My total experience with Jeremy House and his assistant Alexis was the most professional and thorough transaction I've ever had when purchasing a home. Their method was simple, yet every detail was handled and explained in a way I could understand. I received the documention I needed without an overload of complex paperwork and fine print to leave me second guessing what I just signed. It isn't often I experience a business encounter that I can say I am completely satisfied with; this was the exception. Thank you so much!
None
Been going here for years. Always love my visit with the girls!
Coffee: The thing I need most.
This is obviously not a gourmet restaurant. We came there only because the cafe at the MARQ museum (check that out!) was closed. It looks shabby from the outside, the menu in english is very limited and that goes for the owners as well. BUT - we had some of the best seafood on the trip for a very reasonable price. And there was surely enough of it with the two of us having a healthy appetite. The second time we came, because we just had to, we were greeted with warmth. After pointing to a large poster showing Alicante in 1962, he came back with a stack of old photos from Alicante, and we had the pleasure of going through those. Our warmest recommendations for some good, honest, tasty and plentiful food for a reasonable prise - a most authentic experience :)
We loved it! The French onion soup is to die for, amazing!
Great shop to stop in, friendly staff, easy to work with, wonderful delivery experience, wish I had a bigger house to fill.
Amazing job and dedication! I had given up on my dead yard that had more rocks and dirt than a quarry. Go Forth brought it back to life and now it looks great! The technician even made a courtesy stop just to ask how the yard was looking and if there was anything he could do! What's even more awesome is that I can enjoy it at night and not have to worry about mosquitoes thanks to Go Forth's mosquito reduction service!
Nice friendly staff. Good food and huge menu!
Best burgers I have ever eaten and a huge range
Great professional service. One of the places where you feel doctor is really care about you and your health. If you have any health issues and you are looking for immediate assistance I would highly recommend this place.
Awesome space - to hang out at to have meetings at - anything. One of my all-time favorite locations.
Our son has been taking lessons from Stages for three years and has also attended three of their amazing rock workshops. His skill and confidence have grown tremendously! I highly recommend Stages for all your lesson, equipment, and rental needs. George, Pauli and the rest of the staff are very helpful and great to work with.
Excellant customer service. Good ole fashion Cheeseburger, soft serve ice cream, free refills, and my two favorites chicken salad sandwich and the tuna melt is super! I have yet to ask for a chicken salad melt!!!
Excellent steaks and seafood, and the atmosphere is unbeatable. Great for large parties.
As a single mom and not knowing what to expect, I walked in nervous into Burlington Chevy. I was greeted immediately, and was put at ease. Kevin was very helpful and personable. I told my him what I was able to pay, and he worked with me to get the best deal possible. I couldn't be happier with Kevin and the rest of the Burlington Chevrolet staff they were all very wonderful.
The staff is very helpful & fun! They have a great sense of humor, try to keep the atmosphere safe & professional. Despite a dicey customer base, the items available are quality & they offer returns under certain conditions. They have been in the Temecula/ Murrieta area for well over 15 years, and have never done wrong by me.
Highly recommend!!!
Great take out! High quality and lots of options.
Had a great time buying our new Polaris 2Up from Jason. And everyone involved!
Grew up here... What else I could say... Miss it so much now. Been in USA for 7 years... So far but still its in my heart
Jim Lanahan is one of the sharpest direct mail experts in the area. He showed me how I could cull my list, pay less money and get better results.
We recently ordered a Corvette through Gordon Chevrolet. the sales staff was awesome. We had many concerns about our order due to the complexity, but all worries were put to ease by the sales staff. They triple checked everything and even made calls to Chevrolet to make sure the car was going to be delivered as ordered. They also kept us up to date on the progress of our order at every turn. They made us feel very at ease and welcome. The Finance Dept was equally helpful. Finance had all of our paperwork in order and made everything very seamless. The cooperation between the different departments of the dealership was truly impressive. I highly recommend them if you are looking for a new car.
None
I use Palomar Signs for all my signage needs for my Day Spa for almost 2 years now. Being Day Spas, the quality has to be perfect and the Rob has always delivered top quality. He will always go the extra mile to make sure everything is perfect as well. He is fast and always gives us a fair price.
Muy buena atención y con amplia variedad de productos
I was absolutely astonished by the repair work done on my car. The overall body came back looking like new. It was a minor fender bender and a tiny bumper dent but the entire car was treated with care and polished and buffed out. The lil dings and scratches all around disappeared after it was all done for no extra fee. Who doesn't like FREE! Just superb. I will definitely be recommending this shop to any of my friends in the future. Amen.
Dr Lee Weiner and the Oceanside Wellness Center's staff has been truly amazing through the years keeping me going strong. Arthritis has tried to slow me down, but Dr Lee has consistently helped manage the pain. I want anyone searching to feel better to try their services. Thank you again!!!
visited the cockle shell in Gorseinon with 23 Beaver Scouts (age 6-8 yrs) as part of there Healthy Eating Badge ,must say the management and staff were outstanding with the kids we had a tour of the kitchen and stores area and must say it was clean to a very high standard i will defiantly be revisiting the cockle shell
very good sushi. very recommend it. At 2 weeks me and my friend were 4 times. It is not pricy too. 10 20 bucks depend how many sushi you it :)
Steve was great to work with. Fast, friendly, and a great price! Very satisfied.
I was in a rush to get a suit tailored. I called to other places around the area but they all told me they couldn't make the time crunch that I was in. Then I called Northgate Alterations. Not only did they take care of my request, they also refused to take additional money for the trouble I caused them. I offered to pay whatever it takes to get it back in time and they said not to worry about it. Hands down, they deserve every penny of my business.
Not a bad choice for a comfortable Friday night.
None
Barry's Tickets have such great service and tickets for everyone to buy and enjoy. As a Clipper fan, I enjoy receiving such great seats to watch my team.
I have been using RPM to manage my property for a year now and have been very pleased with the service. They were able to find a tenant quickly and handle all of the tenants needs in a professional and timely manner. I like that I have the ability to communicate with them via their website but if I have questions I need answered right away they always return my calls immediately. I would recommend them to property owners and tenants alike.
Absolutely worthwhile and amazing service! Nowhere else like it. Definitely recommend to everyone.
Get thee to a hackerspace. This is the kind of place where you'll see programmers making art and artists doing science. You'll learn a lot by hanging out here. The community of awesome and smart people is what makes this place really great, but when it comes to tools here are some of the highlights: laser cutter 3D printers small CNC router vinyl cutter large format printer full woodshop with nice table saw full machine shop with nice lathe sheet metal brake, shears, slip roller corner notcher small propane forge and anvil welders (both MIG and TIG) plasma torch vacuum former industrial sewing machine & serger electronic knitting machine scanning electron microscope full electronics shop with scopes, meters, power supplies, irons and zillion components ... this list goes on but I should probably stop here. Since joining a few years ago I've learned to use all of the tools listed above, and also learned some math, basic computer science, and brewing/extracting. It's changed my life. Get thee to a hackerspace.
My first time, the fries weren't great so I didn't get them the second time. From what I could tell though, they looked better on the plates of other patrons - a little more fried and crispy rather than the first go around. Let's get down to the burger, though. This burger was incredible. The meat was ridiculously hot but not at all burned - ideal for any burger. The sauces and toppings were really generous. The red onion strings were cut just right so that they can actually be bitten through instead of dragging everything out of the burger. The Bleu Cheese that I normally get on my burgers at other places is pretty wimpy but this place went to town! Lastly, the bun, which normally seems like an afterthought was incredibly flavorful. In summary, you know those hole-in-the-wall places with delicious cheap food that are all too few and far between? This is one of them. It's a gem of a burger shack that will outperform the overpriced Hugo's and the mediocre Grub's.
Nice large place great sales and big selection of clothes and furniture also refrigerators, stoves, but NOT a large selection childrens clothes or shoes .love they're 50%off everything sales..
Amazing plates at great prices that include the appetizer! Outdoor patio dining is very beautiful!
Cada vez mas cerca al objetivo trazado ya vamos llegando
I was very pleased and satisfied with the service received. Thank you so much. I will always come back when I need service in your area.
Mr. Peppas did an excellent job on my car for a very reasonable price. He was able to get out a dent that another dent repair company had been unable to get out. He was very professional, reasonable, efficient and did quality work. I would highly recommend him.
...At least when you're in Damariscotta. Please note that the Google "pointer" is not quite where it should be. The library is located about a half-block to the east on Main Street. The "pointer" has us located at the intersection of Maine & Theater Streets, looking at the Maine Book Shop & Cafe--one of our neighbors, where you can get a nice cuppa and a sandwich, wi-fi, and a great selection of books and what-not. --The Skidompha Team
None
My wonderful partner, Roland, took me to Limekiln for my 45th birthday. It was marvelous. We had site #15 by the river. The hiking was great. The cute little bats flew int the campsite all evening and morning. I loved them! I'd love to go back again.
I have a 2007 Chevrolet Suburban and I had an oil change and tire rotation. As always I got the quick and great service. Thanks Craig!
Gave me a loaner. Nice
This place is beautiful. Inside decor is stylish, outdoor roof deck is unique. Check out the fire features and torches. Love the food. Service is good, but sometimes takes a while.
Great prices, great selection, really couldnt be happier shopping here!
We are a private school in Abu Dhabi and wanted a professional system for our auditorium but couldn't afford to purchase all new equipment. Solaris helped us to locate the pieces we needed in a market that matched our requirements, contacted the seller and helped us to complete the sale and arrange for the documentation so that shipping could begin. When the product arrived, we were able to quickly clear customs and bring it to our site. We tested the items and found everything as described. We have since utilized our auditorium for many gatherings and the equipment we purchased through Solaris has performed as expected. We will definitely use Solaris' services for future equipment purchases! Aaron Grandon Merryland International School Abu Dhabi, UAE
i buy Nissan Altima 2013 and I m want to say that no one can beat to Colonial Nissan. It's 100% right the moto of Colonoal Nissan "If u can't make deal with us ,You can't make a deal with anybody" and sales consultants, sales & finance manager so friendly. We guys enjoy so much and fun. I want to thanks to Colonial Nissan for great deal. It's amazing experience. I refers all friends to choose Colonial Nissan. bye
Nice hotel
The thing I have always hated to do was to visit a car lot. Any car lot! However, I recently visited Texas Direct to look for a new car for a friend who lost theirs in a fire. I was overwhelmed by the vastness of this place! Brian Starnes was my salesman and he was awesome! He was very knowledgeable and made my experience a very smooth one. And, I'm not sure what I appreciated most, his patience, since I didn't really know what car I wanted to look for, or that he didn't creep out my girlfriend. :) Would definitely go back! Oh, if you're a muscle car freak like me, you have to drop by to at least check out the rare American Motors Rebel. Worth the trip alone.
Greg, a master mechanic and the Flying Dog owner, and Dan, office manager and the master of ceremonies, are a pair of the nicest, smartest, most hardworking guys you'll ever meet. They can't help but do right by you and your car. They know more about your car than you ever will, but they'll never make you feel dumb about that simple fact, and you'll never doubt that you're getting the best automotive service in southwest Michigan. They take the painful sting out of the second-most difficult exchange of goods and services known to man or woman: auto repairs. (First-most difficult: haircut.) On top of it all, they're fun-loving. They're the Penn and Teller of auto repair (Greg is Teller), amusingly dispelling the illusion and trickery of what other shady mechanics do, or don't do. For the past three years, in addition to any repairs we've needed, we've also driven all the way from Bedford Township, 40 minutes one way, just to get our oil changed and visit with them. The better you get to know them, and the better they get to know your car, the more you come to realize you'll never again need, or want, another mechanic.
Valeu. Preco bom.Melhor rodízio de Fortaleza.
Excellent service, personable, and very NON pushy! We were very pleased with our Horne Kia's experience and will recommend!
Fabulous sandwiches. Get the El Guapo.
Best
It's always a pleasure to take a vehicle to Dennis'. They go the extra mile to make the experience pleasant, as convenient as possible, and are always so friendly.
I've been using CAPS for my rental properties and personal homes for years. I recommend them to anyone. They have the best customer service, the girls up front are sweet and efficient. The prices are quite possibly the cheapest in town, and if not, they are right there with the cheapest, but don't lack service. Give them a shot, you'll be glad you did!
Very good.
Freundliche und gute Behandlung, vertrauenserweckend. Empfehlung!
Nice shopping experience, friendly people nice selection of antiques
Frida!! simplemente es Frida!!
This place has excellent ambiance and the BEST LATTES EVER!!! They have super comfy wingback leather chairs, a fireplace, tasteful decor, friendly staff - 5 stars all around. Their Turkesh Hazelnut Lattee is the best - a seasonal item, so it's not on the menu, but they can make it anytime!
Muito boa comida e u ótimo atendimento,vale a pena visitar
mola
I am new to martial arts but I know what I wanted. An art that is more function and less flash. That is exactly what I found when I started the Kali Combat program at FKA in Margate. This is a top notch program with a legacy to go with it. We train weapons and open hand close quarter combat. We focus more on offense and less on defense. Like we say... "It's always MY turn!" Challenging my body and my mind!!! Thanks guys you rock!
The staff at Beddington Trial were incredibly responsive and accommodating, especially with a matter that needed urgent attention. It's also easy to see that both doctors, Dr. Meno and Dr. Atal really love the animals that they care for and treat, which is the main reason why I don't hesitate to drive across town, well past other more convenient veterinary locations. And yes, you can't beat their extremely reasonable fees.
The transmission went out in my 97 4runner so I brought her in for them to look at. They took the time to drive the vehicle and give her a free inspection. I left her in their hands and they did not disappoint This Aamco went out of their way to get me what I needed and was able to work with me financially. The Truck has never run better and I am 100% satisfied with the care they showed to me and my vehicle. I will say the only drawback is the sites location does offer limited parking but other than that they will take care of you. They’re good people!!!
Dr Fairlamb cares very deeply about his patients and is willing to work hard to help them. Both my father and I see him and he is the greatest Doctor I know.
None
The staff is very friendly and courteous, and they don't surround you like hawks as is the practice at their competitors. Overall, I recommend this store for the very good quality of products and the staff's professionalism.
Even though we did not get our piercing done at Miss Heidi's, Lacey saw us anyway. She helped us clean up the mess the other piecing shop had made of my son's first piercing. She was very helpful to us and very professional. I highly recommend Lacey if you want to get a piercing done.
Francisco Mora makes a tremendous difference, He is courteous, efficient, clear and very pleasant. He is always informed about past and future maintenance items. He follows up when he says he will and always right on the mark. I have been taking my vehicles to this dealership/service center for the last 3 years and although I am far away I continue to do so because of the great service they provide.
MedSpring offers quality care in a very serene atmosphere. The facility is beautiful and the staff really cares about their patients. I would highly recommend MedSpring to all my family and friends. What a positive difference this company is making in healthcare.
None
Owners and employees are always nice, fast service even when very busy. Wife calls this the hidden gem of Cutler Bay.
None
This is a gem of place for paper crafters! Was blown away at the UNIQUE and one of kind a products they stock. Lots of custom work in house that is AWESOME! GO THERE! Julie Creek
My second brazilian wax was by Monika. I went to see her for almost 4 years. Because she always did the wax in quick, nice and clean. She uses organic hard wax on me and no ingrown hairs problems. I highly recommended her to anyone who is still looking for a good quality waxer but at affordable prices. By the way, she works at Vita Day Spa now but still the same price.
Awesome service! Quick, thorough and very friendly!
After a failed attempt and treating my shoulder injury with another Physiotherapist, I came in to see Sean and the team at Healthfix Physiotherapy, McMahons Point. What I love about Healthfix is their passion and approach to treating your problem addressing the issues from a bio-mechanical perspective then working with various techniques (postural, massage, stretching etc) to correct the problem. I was due for shoulder surgery but after only 3 visits I'm feeling more confident that I won't have to go under the knife at all! I still have a long way to go but I feel confident I'm in good hands with my journey to recovery in a much more conservative manner! Sean even spent the time talking through my diagnosis with my personal trainer at the gym as to avoid aggravating it and called my Orthopedic surgeon's rooms to get a report on my exact symptoms and condition so he could treat me accordingly. I would definitely recommend Healthfix Physiotherapy to anyone who want's results from a physio who genuinely cares about your recovery and not one that just wants your money and to push you out the door! Peter Hatzidimitriou
AC Disco did the lights for my wedding and they were absolutely stunning. James was so professional and so friendly, and he came up with some really brilliant ideas and provided them at a great price. The whole event looked amazing. Totally, totally recommend them.
None
I like Kung Pao Chicken over Rice; I like to discuss history with Thompson as well. Both the food and the family are very nice. -Tom
I am always looking for the best coverage for my clients at the best prices. Florida Insurance Specialist deliver! They get quotes out quickly and are very efficient when it comes to writing the policy. My clients have always been pleased.
None
Great prices and best location! I used to drive 20 miles to King Market in west Anaheim for similar food items, it's great that Wholesome Choice is here less than 2 miles from my house. Love it!!!
Ich habe vor weniger als einem halben Jahr einen AKG-Kopfhörer über einen Amazon-Händler gekauft und benutze ihn seither sehr häufig. Nun hat die Polsterung begonnen, sich aufzulösen. Da ich die Kopfhörer nicht wieder nach Deutschland senden wollte, habe ich sie einfach beim Portier von AKG zusammen mit meinem ausgedruckten Kaufbeleg in der Lemböckgasse abgegeben um die Gewährleistung geltend zu machen (ich war recht spät dort, aber der Portier ist rund um die Uhr da). Innerhalb weniger Tage war die Reperatur erledigt und ich wurde angerufen, dass ich mir den Kopfhörer wieder abholen könne. Da ich nicht zu den Öffnungszeiten erscheinen konnte, wurden die Kopfhörer wieder beim freundlichen Portier hinterlegt. Nun sind meine Kopfhörer wieder wie neu und ich freue mich über den zuvorkommenden und einmalig guten Service!
This place is absolutely wonderful. Food is amazing. Best pho I have tasted! Staff is very friendly and always have a smile on their face and very eager to please!
Really tastey chicken and a great place for the whole family to go.
the office is very helpful....dr.maus is the best vet. she has been there for my yorkies. always a smile and a warm feeling when we leave. like family.......thank you all for such good care. mary swaidner
Great place, clean, very friendly staff.
I recently atended a wedding where the bride and groom hired Mr. Johnson as the DJ. As a wedding planner I see quite a few DJ's over the course of a year, some are good and some are not. Chuck was wonderful! He kept the party moving from the beginning to the end and was very professional and friendly while he did it. I would strongly recommend him as a DJ for any of your weddings or events!
We had a refrigerator whose circuit boards were whacking out. I called on a weeknight and received an immediate response the following morning, with an offer to come check out the fridge that afternoon. The inspection was done, the parts were ordered and received, and the repair was complete three days after the original call. We were very happy with the result. Chuck called a few weeks later to follow up and make sure everything was still working to our satisfaction. Highly recommend.
This place has great prime rib and worth a visit for supper. I normally order the Queens-cut and always have had a great portion of excellent quality. It can be busy in the summer so call ahead for reservations!
우리집♥
I just spent the weekend at the Red Clover on a "girls getaway" with eight of my closest friends. What a great time we had! The Inn itself is beautiful. The staff are excellent--they took care of anything we asked for, and the food was terrific. Snow-shoeing, cross country skiing and downhill are all just a few miles away, but we were all so happy to return to the Inn at night. We ate one dinner on the casual side of the restaurant and the next we sat on the more formal side and did a "chef's tasting" with each course matched with the perfect wine--a definite recommendation! This place was great for a group and would be a romantic setting for couples as well.
None
Ok
This place is absolutely amazing. Noticed here for awhile but never tried it, the food is excellent and very friendly staff. If you are looking for great take out Chinese quickly and not to expensive you will not be disappointed!
None
Great restaurant, great service, Very good food.
I discovered this wonderful indoor "garage" sale store in Longmont while I was spring cleaning! They buy, sell and trade almost everything! I highly suggest you check it out before paying retail for your home furnishings, tools and/or lawn equipment!
None
Great food, pizza, and place.
Great service, staff were very helpful. Got a good deal too
Perfect
None
We bought an RV from here and were treated to amazing customer service. Everyone we dealt with was friendly and informative. This was a big purchase and they made it as smooth as possible. We were happy with everything.
None
Bin langjähriger Stammkunde und werde ausnahmslos mit frischen und orignellen Blumengestecken für unsere Hochzeitspaare versorgt. Die Auftragsannahme ist unkompliziert, die Lieferung selbst zu schwierigen Zeiten immer pünktlich. Insgesamt ein sehr gutes Preis/Leistungsverhältnis mit einem tollen Service, der Spaß zur Zusammenarbeit macht. Und suuuuuuper Parkmöglichkeiten im Hof;-)
E' un albergo diverso a Venezia. Comodo perché vicino alla Stazione dei Treni ma al contempo ti trasporta appieno nell'atmosfera veneziana più intrigante. 22 Suite ben curate, arredo con pezzi d'antiquariato esotico. Giardino fronte canale. Adatto anche ai matrimoni.
I've had to use these guys twice now and I have to say they have the best customer service of any locksmith I've ever done business with, I would recommend them to anyone who asks
We are so happy that we switch to SRPH, it has been an awesome experience. The staff is very professional and polite. They answer all our questions. Buffy's Dr is so sweet and caring. Thank you Annette, Rob Hidalgo Buffy too
None
Great Sushi; good prices; cozy atmosphere
My experience at Arch King West has been great thus far! From booking my husband and I's initial appointment , meeting the staff and completion of services has been professional, efficient and most of all the staff is so welcoming and friendly I felt I have been going there for years! Thank you for making our experience so easy!
This is my business and I pride myself on giving a great service. If you have any constructive feedback, whether it be positive or negative, please leave it here. Cheers Jono
I had a great experience. Terri was very accommodating, Curly was my instructor, he was amazing I felt very safe with him. I would continue to dive with this company.
The best university of engineering in the world.
Wir haben schön öfter mit den Jungs zusammengearbeitet. Die Beratung war immer kompetent und umfassend. Auch für kleine und mittlere Notfälle war immer sofort zeit. Wenn Hilfe im SEO-Bereich notwendig ist, unbedingt an Tiracon wenden!
We love this place! Super nice staff and great, inexpensive donuts.
Best and most authentic around
None
One of the best times of my life. I've never been camping before, and I brought my fiancee, and two daughters with me. On day 3, we went to Swain County and got married, and spent our honeymoon at your campground, and decided to stay an extra day because it was so wonderful!!! I'm looking at some of the negative reviews and just can't fathom that these naysayers went to the same place. The staff was beyond friendly and very helpful, they answered all of my questions, and all of the amenities worked and were clean. Their on-site store had all of the emergency groceries we needed (the closest grocery store, Food Lion, is about a 20-minute drive from the campground).
I LOVE their yogurt! The luscious lemon is wonderful, but the red velvet cake is too. Haven't had one I didn;t like yet and the topping are great too, especially the warm peanut butter. Great place!
Upper Playground is to street art culture what RVCA is to the skate/surf crowd. The apparel there embodies the style and originality of the urban art scene. Think less backpacker fashion and more authentic creative clothing. Supporting this cultural identity is the Fifty24 gallery located just next door that has exhibitions by some of the most famous artists such as Jeremy Fish, Sam Flores and David Choe to name a few.
Raymond Slocum is the epitome of how we feel an outstanding service representative should be described. He is polite, courteous, patient, and thorough. Raymond offered suggestions and instructions on how best to use and maintain our system. You are to be commended on an outstanding hire. If possible, we would appreciate it if we could have Raymond on all future calls. Thank you! Mo & Betty Murdock
This flower shop exceeded my expectations in every way. I needed a last minute birthday gift and the staff at this shop took the time to put together the most amazing flower arrangement. My girlfriend absolutley loved the flowers and when I told her where I got them she said she should have known because thats where she gets all her flowers. Thankyou to all the staff at Treehouse who were so friendly and helpful to me. Highly recommend this shop..
a wonderful place to be...
Un vrai plaisir ! Le meilleur restaurant de Niort !
None
Excellent! My wife & I both shop here for all of our hair care supplies.
Excellent steaks! Stylish atmosphere, two floors (nonsmoking/smoking), poor WC.
Amy is my hair stylist at the Winchester Rd location. She and everyone else at this location are very nice. The salon is always festive looking and I've always been able to get my hair done even when I forget to make an appointment. Amy is always accommodating. From someone who used to get her hair done at a fancy high priced salon, I've enjoyed my visits and been pleased with the results from Amy at Cuts by Us.
It's inside the "path mark sav-a-center" located at the same address
Great view of the Mill Pond. The Old Mill is just a neat building to begin with, and the renovations they've done have only added to it's character. Wonderful place and food.
I am writing to recommend Artistic Smiles Dentistry. Just yesterday I had my first experience as a patient there and it was truly wonderful. I had a broken/hurt tooth that needed to be fixed right away, so I called Artistic Smiles to see when they could fit me in. They were able to have me come in yesterday right away, and they were able to take X-rays, a 360 degree scan of my mouth, do a root canal on the tooth and put in a crown all in one visit. Dr. Kenneth Khoo did a wonderful job- him and his assistant Stephanie were constantly making sure I was comfortable and keeping me informed of the process. Today I am pain free with a beautiful white crown in my mouth. I have already scheduled my next appointment with them. Thanks Artistic Smiles!
Alex Jeffries and his staff at the Christy Sports were the best folks I have dealt with at any ski rental place I ever visited in past 10 yrs from France to US. The Ptarmigan Inn location and the ski storage is like a personal valet service, very convenient too. The ski in level is one above the store and as soon as you are either ready to get on the slopes are back to store, they are up in a jiffy as soon as you are there !! I don't know how they manage, going up and down the stairs, but the service is fast, efficient and above par, kudos !!!
Good location fantastic service
Thank you Dr. Torday, for all of your assistance it is much appriciated.
None
老合山职业技术学院是个好地方，这里有中等偏上的mm，邋遢犀利的wsn，还有价廉可口的留食，更有水军泛滥的88，98。以求是之名，爱浙大～
Blackland Prairie District of BSA Capitol Area Council does two camps here every year, and the sites are outstanding. Beautifully trimmed and plenty of shade under the pecan groves. The hike and bike trail is well maintained and educational. We always spot wild life and the boys have a great time! Ranger Tim Spyer is helpful and very friendly. And being so close to Pflugerville, Hutto, and RR drop off and pick up of the kids is a breeze.
Buen lugar para visitar un domingo! 10/10
I love the Salt Lake Express. It makes traveling hassle and stress free. Thanks for the service!
Kool Ambiance at the Tarra.......
One of the best academic libraries...
None
None
Last week, I began my search for the vehicle I have been wanting to own for some time now. I searched many internet sites for a Pre-Owned Jeep Wrangler Sahara Unlimited around the 2007, 2008 model years. A few came up, but the one that really caught my eye was a metallic olive green model with only 21K miles which was right in my price range. I initiated contact through the web with the dealership and within minutes I got a response Lisa, an Internet Sales Consultant at Westbury Jeep. After a couple of email exchanges with Lisa, she set me up with an appoint for the next day to come and see the vehicle and to meet with one of the Sales Associates to discuss possibly buying the vehicle if I liked what I saw. The next day, I met with a gentleman by the name of Anthony Dinelaris SR and I'm glad I did! Anthony was not only an extremely knowledgeable saleman about not only his own product, but the car industry in general, and he made my experience at Westbury Jeep one that I will always cherish. Anthony took me to see the vehicle, answered all my questions and basically made the entire sales process an enjoyable experience. I wrapped up the purchase of my 2007 Jeep in 1 day and I truly thank Anthony, and everyone at Westbury Jeep for such a wonderful car buying experience! Respectfully, Mike Pierro
We woke up in the morning to discover our heat was off. We called our usual a/c and heating company but they were all booked. Luckily, we went online and found Aire Serv. We are so happy we called them! The women who scheduled us was friendly and efficient. The technician who came to our home was also friendly and more importantly professional. He fixed our issue that day. Then the next day he called us to make sure everything was still good. Outstanding!!
I can really only say that the quality of their pastries is outrageous. However it wouldn't let me only share my enjoyment of the food. The company I worked for received a holiday tray with an assortment of their goodies. I have to admit the cream puffs are to die for. Can't wait to see the place myself. Enjoy
It is always a great view and atmosphere. It is supposed to be rustic. The salad bar is one of the better in town. There is not a lot options on the bar, but they are of good quality. Everybody should go at least once though. More of an experience with a great meal.
Sin City is a beautiful store. They have a huge selection of wine, liquor, and other stuff. The owner suggested a pre-made frozen drink that was DELICIOUS! I also liked their cigar selection. I was pleasantly surprised to find a Romeo & Julieta Cigar there. The staff was super friendly and the overall feel of the store is inviting. I would definitely recommend Sin City to my friends and family. Oh, and I also like the name! Very cool!
None
We've had the service since moving in over a year ago. Great service! In addition to the scheduled services, I've contacted them twice. Once to get rid of bees that took over a hole in the back yard and once for an ant treatment after they found a way into the house. Both times, they responded quickly and solved the problem in one visit. I've been extremely happy with Insight.
Great for FFL transfers! Reliable communications throughout the entire process. Will definitely use them again.
Excellent service. Great atmosphere. All around great place
Been bringing my Lab there for years and never had a bad experience. Always accommodating, friendly and reasonably priced. Plus, unlike many "chain" kennels I've looked at in the Norwalk/Stamford area, they don't charge extra for bringing your own food for the dog (seriously, some places do), giving medications, or letting your pooch out in the yard to play with other dogs once or twice a day. Unlike Camp Bow Wow, they don't make you pay in advance for stays during peak times of the year or not refund you if you have to cancel at the last-minute. Two paws up, Passage East!
I am one of the Estheticians at Bliss Spa and I just love working there. Our Staff is amazing and we do our best to accomodate everyones style and taste. Come in and see me (Shelley) and you will receive 10% off your 1st visit. After visiting our Spa you will never go anywhere else. It's like home away from home.
None
I love Beth and Mike for their awesome inviting atmosphere and wicked vegan food!! You guys are wonderful company and I'm feeling like some of that awesome 'Meat'Loaf right now.......
This guys are great, friendly, and know what they are doing. It has never been easier to get an older out of production part! Before finding these guys it would take hours talking to very grumpy wrecking yard people. They stood behind every part we've purchased with out hesitation.
Took my 5 year old for her first appointment, The whole office is fantastic. Dr.Bearden was very good with my daughter and spent extra time with her to make her feel comfortable in her office. All of the office staff is wonderful and very helpful. Best Eye doctor in time!
I have had the pleasure of working with Matt for quite some time now. Not only do I refer my clients to Matt, I am also a client. He is very much customer service driven and takes great care of everyone he deals with. I would recommend Matt to anyone looking for Auto, Home or LIfe insurance.
Paul from Reasonable Renovations painted our master bedroom and bathroom which turned out wonderful. The lines are straight and the trim and walls looks professionally done along with his team being easy to communicate with. I recommend Reasonable Renovations for your next painting job
From the minute I arrived, Chris and Shannon were great. Chris was very understanding of my needs and helped me get the deal I wanted. Chris' people skills were untouchable! The entire experience was a great one to remember. I have plans to use Bulldog Kia for all my future car needs. Chris is a huge asset to the Bulldog kia team and I wish him the best success. Thank you so much, Chris! The finance guy that handled my purchase also deserves a shout-out. Steve Carter is the man to go see at Bulldog kia, I've never met such a great finance guy, ever! Chris and Steve went far and beyond the call of duty and I can not say thank you enough! You guys ROCK!!!
My girlfriend and I went in in February and we wanted to get a simple infinity symbol on each of our left wrists. We were greeted by very friendly people and attended to in a very quick fashion. The shop was clean and inviting and Rick was more than polite! This was my very first tattoo and when we discussed the design of our tattoos he came up with very original ideas. He was a true professional, yet very friendly and accommodating. I felt very comfortable the entire time. The tattoo healed up super fast and I had no complications with it at all. It was overall a really nice experience. If you live in the Overland Park, Olathe area you should definitely go there.
I have been re-designing the Function Fitness website for several months now. In that time, it has become clear that Jeff Miller has total commitment to excellence in his profession, and complete dedication to his clients' success. Visit the new site and read the testimonials his clients have written. I think you'll become convinced that Jeff should be your only choice for golf fitness instruction, active aging coaching, corporate wellness programs, rehabilitative fitness traoning, and just about any other purpose for which you miht require a personal fitness instructor.
I have used them for a variety of reasons during the past years. Firstly, they have done a splendid job in terms of accommodating a number of high ranking officials for 3 different Medical conferences with their quality service, backed by luxurious vehicles such as Mercedes S550 and Cadillac Escalade. In addition, I have also used them twice (and recommended them to friends and family members) for transportation to and fro, from Port Canaveral to Orlando Airport. Furthermore, they have a huge fleet of limo's including Hummer H2 to special occasions (a destination wedding in my case) with phenomenal service. All in all, their prices are competitive, the service is extraordinary, their drivers are personable and I would'nt choose anybody else over them within the Central Florida Area.
Very good food
Amber at Massey Insurance is an excellent agent and takes care of all our insurance needs!
Great Grocery store. Very friendly and helpful staff. I'd travel 5 miles to grocery shop here every week. Great selection and freshest meats and produce.
None
Great variety. Wonderful service and I love their new and improved location.
None
One of my best meal in england yet :D Came today 21/07/2013, had a roast beef stripe and this meal was simply amazing. Meat was full of flavors, very nice sauce, not drowning the meat. Cauliflowers with a nice cheese sauce <3 carrots/parsnip nicely roasted. The only "bad" part was the potatoes, wasn't a big fan of it but still ate it. Had a bread and custard dessert and this was to die for. Definitly going back and looking forward to wedding meal there in september :D Place does look great and neat, big size parking. Staff is friendly and available with a nice frenchman :D Thank you.
Best place to get a spray tan! She's so sweet and I felt like it was the best color that I've ever gotten from a spray tan.
I stayed here for business at UNLV, and could not be happier. The room was very large (especially for 1 person) and included a living room area and large flat-screen tv. The bathroom was a little small and shabby, but the rest of the room MORE than made up for it. The bed was comfortable and the room even included a minibar and refrigerator. It is a great place to get some work done in a crazy city...and best of all, the staff was very helpful. I am stuck in town for at least an extra night (weather), and they helped me in every way possible.
Unexpectedly great French food along the beach.
英国的酒店就是偏小啦
i've been here a couple different times, and had two quite different experience. the first time, i ordered the chicken sandwich and it was delicious. the second time, i got the roast beef and, quiet frankly it was raw. it was still pretty good, but i wouldn't risk that again.
Don is so knowledgeable. Made the experience so much easier than we thought it would be! All at the right price.
None
I have purchased 3 new vehicles in the last couple of years from Gaudin Ford. I have always been treated with respect at Gaudin, been given timely information, and have never had a hint of a problem in their service department. A nice change over some of the pressure cookers that used to be around!
Perfect resort
Narrow chasm where the sun reaches only at midday. Beautiful and stunning. 1.2km walk to get there, and the last bit is a bit of a scramble, but not difficult and so worth it.
One of the best coffee shops on the westside. Service always rocks & coffee is served in a actual cup opposed to a paper carry out when staying in. Pastries are quality & love the charming nod to Oliver Perry.
I bought an old car without taking it to a mechanic first thinking I would risk it and possibly save some money. I took it to two mechanics and found they had different stories about what was wrong with it and what they would fix. I didn't feel comfortable with either of them. Their explanations didn't seem to make sense. Their offices were busy and crowded and the employees seemed frantic and over-worked. We took the car here and I am so glad we did! Our appointment was honored. The space was clean and calm. Ryan lifted up the car and showed us everything that was wrong and explained to us what needed to be fixed right away and what didn't. That made all the difference. The car runs like a dream and I trust I received quality service and that the car will run for years longer because of them.
None
A Plus rebuilt the transmission in my '03 Avalon last year and recently it had developed a small leak. Even though I was past my warranty by nearly a thousand miles, they replaced the transmission pan gasket and changed the fluid (which is synthetic on mine, usually a $99 service) for FREE!! They also replaced a defective sensor mounted to the transmission housing which technically wasn't even covered under the warranty at no charge--WOW! Scott, the service manager, is awesome to deal with and the car was ready when he said it would be. I'm an A Plus customer for life!
Someone Shit in my McDonalds soda it added that special something
Love CK's. There is always a diverse crowd, great service, cheap beer, and the food is pretty good. They always have Blue Moon on special, and being that it's walking distance from my house, it's nearly the perfect bar!
Awesome!
Excellent food and lightning-fast service! Salsa is superb.
These guys are great. They treat people with respect and are good honest people. My experience with them so far has been great!
None
Great little place in the middle of a beautiful historic market town. Stayed here not too long ago after a wedding nearby and would definitely recommend it. Great food, inside of the hotel was extremely well kept and tidy. Also have to give it a 5* service as the people were so friendly. Great location for walks around Knaresborough too!
One of my favourite...
Devoli's is our favorite restaurant. They bend over backwards to serve you well. The food is good and if you don't see something you like on the menu, Frank can throw something together for you. The atmosphere is good and the music is fantastic.
I stopped by Tomoko Shima hair salon when I had some time to kill. I went in to check it out, and the place looked great. I thought, "I need a hair cut" and Tomoko was so nice I figured why not? Honestly, it's the best hair cut I have ever gotten. Tomoko is a super talented hair stylist, because lemme tell you, my hair requires real talent to make look like anything, and she did a great job.
Nikki (service coordinator) came up with a competitive cost for the work, had the part / parts needed and scheduled me in for the same day. As it turned out it was less than estimated. She was warm, understanding and professional. Nikki is a great asset to Go's company.
Great location, It was relaxing and Everyone was very friendly. I will come back.
One of my favorite pizza places. Love the Edgar Allen Poe and Green Hornet but one of my favorite things is their salad. Craisins, Pine nuts, feta and their great dressing make it a wonderful, light meal.
Food is good but the beer selection is GREAT! That's pretty much the main reason why I come here.
Everyone super helpful. Take Marine vs Rosecranes to access store. A lot less traffic.
LOVE this salon. Great atmosphere and trendy stylists that not only make you feel comfortable, but work with you to get exactly what you want. Also, I like that it is open later to accommodate clients' schedules like mine.
J is very professional and hard working. He invests a great deal of time into each of his clients to ensure they are happy and informed. His attention to detail will make sure the closing happens as quickly and smoothly as possible. I highly recommend J Lewis for your real estate needs.
Great service and great food!
I highly recommend Savath, she does exactly what I want and she never cut off more than I wanted her to. (most stylist I went to before did). I always go to her and I have my daughters haircuts by her as well.
Amazing Service
Chard's
This hotel was AMAZING! Not only was it VERY easy to find and close to the airport, but the staff was helpful, the rooms were beautiful, breakfast AND dinner were all delicious, and we couldn't have asked for a better hotel to stay at! Breakfasts are nice and hot - we had eggs, hash, hashbrowns, sausage, bacon, waffles, etc. Dinners (which are served Monday - Thursday) were really good, too! My husband especially liked the free Bud Light! :) Our teenage kids really appreciated the pool table and we, as a family, had a great time with the Giant Jenga game we checked out from the front desk - they also have a basketball court (you can check out a basketball), ladder ball, bean bag toss, footballs, and soccer balls. We stayed in a two bedroom suite with two bathrooms, a living room, and a full kitchen. One night we grilled chicken out on the grills (which are beautiful and available for guests to use) and ran out of time to wash the dished up afterwards. When we got back to the room later that day, everything was clean and washed up for us - dishwasher running. :) It was amazing! We've talked to other people that stayed in other hotels for the Marine Corp graduation ceremony and they couldn't believe our hotel offered all the things they offered - they all wish they had stayed in our hotel! I HIGHLY recommend this hotel! We can't wait to go on vacation again so we can stay in these hotels again!
All about building cycling around the community. The store freely offers advice for improving riding experiences and becoming a better rider. Equipment is all top notch, road-tested, but accessibly priced.
None
Awesome pizza with very reasonable places. Staff and ownership are very pleasant... love giving them my business
When Mike is working in the kitchen food is always perfect. He is a great asset to the company.
My husband and I are planning to move from Kentucky to Arizona sometime in April 2014. Having only been to Arizona once, and loving it, I have no idea where to look and I'm not the easiest person to please. However, Aaron has been so patient, understanding as well as helpful in explaining things to me. If for some reason I can't find a place it will be due to my indecisiveness because Aaron as done everything except poor gasoline on his head and run through a burning building. Good work Aaron, I'm getting close. Eugene / Beverlyn Smith.
The first juice Centre of Vizag. Just come over your bike/car or stand in front of the shop on road, the serving men will come over to you, ask you order and take the payment. Try the milkshakes.
None
Awesome!!!
I have been a customer at this location for a few years now. It's clean and secure, I don't mind keeping my valuables in there. Tracy who I normally deal with there is friendly and always helpful. I would recommend this place to anyone in the area that needs a secure and easy to work with storage facility.
不加味精也很好吃
It was a nice carefree local burger joint. The burger was fresh and it was prepared relatively quickly.
Jon Parker goes the extra mile for his clients. As a referral source, he has been very helpful. Thank you Jon.
None
Vary goqod service. Friendly .vary clean .nice place to hang your hat. Smokey
I ordered baby announcement balloons for my son and daughter-in-law for their front lawn when they came home with their first baby. The balloons looked great, I received more balloons then were actually ordered and my children were thrilled. Neighbors go by and honk their owns in congratulations. They were well worth the money.
Been going here for a long while and have only great things to say. Jamie and Jessica are friendly and professional and do a great job. Why would you want to go anywhere else? Get going people!
For the past seven years the sale from Mark, and the service has been outstanding.
None
I am new to the area and was looking for a new Nissan dealership to service my 2013 Altima. After contacting a couple dealerships in my area, I decided on Larry H Miller's dealership. Three main things made that decision, promptness to my email inquires, competitive pricing on services and a friendly environment. I recommend Larry H Miller's dealership.
None
Heidi Clark was the most amazing sales associate. I was shopping for several different models and makes of cars. Heidi's no nonsense, supportive approach. I sincerely felt like her number one goal in my purchase was to get me into the right vehicle to fit my lifestyle and transportation needs. I was treated with respect during the whole transaction. I cannot thank Heidi and the Fusz team enough for the ease of this process. I can honestly say that I was not treated this way at the other dealerships that I visited. I have had my Kia Soul since July. I love it! It is a joy to drive and I can really load some serious cargo in the back. Thanks again to Heidi for her caring and professional service. Sincerely, Sherry Smith
I am currently receiving treatment with the inman aligner with Dr Safa at the Care Dental Practise. I was really nervous about having a brace, but Dr Safa has been AMAZING throughout the process. She is friendly, efficient, kind and really puts me at ease. Most importantly though she is an exceptional orthodontist and I like her so much that she is now my dentist too. The treatment is working really well and i am really pleased with the results so far. I highly recommend it to anybody wanting to get their teeth straightened. The rest of the staff at the practice are friendly efficient and helpful. I cannot recommend the Care Dental Practise strongly enough.
We went for a dessert tea which was delicious! The pastries and cakes were amazing. Then we had a great time exploring the house.
None
None
I was a long time patient of Dr. Chen's but after a change in insurance I decided to go with a "Plan Dentist" to save money. So started a series of discouraging and disappointing visits with other dentists in the area. Not only were their facilities not as clean and modern as Dr. Chen's, but I ended PAYING MORE than I did with Dr. Chen. I also did not have the trust in these other dentists that Dr. Chen had earned with me. So I am no HAPPILY back with Dr. Chen and his incredible staff!
I had a deadline to meet and only an idea in my head. Shannon worked over the weekend to make sure the artwork was exactly what I wanted. The results were nothing short of amazing. Thank you Tim and Shannon. Excellent work!
I always have a great experience going to this shop...they sell quality products, and Neil is always so nice and helpful! It makes my bike breakdowns not seem so bad :)
Wow I love KFC
Ww have had pizzas and burgers noth where excellent. The waitress was pleasant and checked on frequently. Love the decor.
Always has good food and good service. The people who wrote bad reviews are crazy, I love this place!!
None
Great bakery, sandwitches. Amazing tuna pizza
Couldn't think of a better experience for our first skydive! Not only is it the best view you could image, but the instructors made us feel completely comfortable. You can tell they love what they do!
I went to Dr. Greenberg as an adult patient. I wore braces as a child but my wisdom teeth weren't removed till I was 17 ruining all the work that had been done previously. Deciding to have braces for a second time as an adult was the best decision I ever made. I would do it again! Louise Tice
Best ever
None
Needed a new matteress and I bought my previously one from Jordan's. I like the variety and the customer care is always the best. My previous matteress failed and customer service could not offer me a repair because the company had gone out of business but they did extend me a discount to purchase another matteress which I happily did. Great customer service.
A place for good relaxation or time out wif fwnds, fantastic !!
I love my new vision! I'd been going to Makar for a year. I trusted them enough to have them set up Lasik for me. It went beautifully, no regrets! Dr. Lane very patiently explained every step in the procedure and thoroughly answered all my post-op questions.. Everyone else I met at the office was very friendly. Highly recommended!
This is our favorite local restaurant and where we always go for special occasions. The Seafood Gambero is wonderful, although I ask for it to be less spicy. The steaks and grilled chicken fillet are also great. Best thing ever tho is the kids mac and cheese. It costs extra to have it as the side dish for an adult meal - but well worth it. Or cosy up to a kid who doesn't eat much!
Lovely cozy family run pub! very friendly and the owners who have just returned are working hard to reinstate the excellent reputation! will be coming here next week again for my weekly sunday roast! new chef new menu-its well worth seeking out to this lovely pub-
Great service, very quick and enjoyable for a car buying experience. Highly recommend.
I wrote THIS personal email to Cody at EDC. I wanted to share it as my review because it is not everyday that you can email someone and have him respond in such a personal and professional manner: Happy Holidays to you Cody, I never had the chance to truly thank you for the help and insight you gave during my brief time over at EDC upgrading my wife's ring. I was the guy with the twins if you remember? Obviously, via this email address, I work in the Arts at UD... anyway, you were such a champ man and my wife is finally getting a chance to wear it after the birth of our daughter. Its gorgeous and I am ecstatic (as is she). Anyway, I just wanted to say thank you to you and the entire EDC family..... As you can see, the personal touch was amazing and the sharing of each others time and information made the experience flawless.
I went to fix my car here and i was so happy with mikes the manager. He was so kind and far with me. Thanks Mike
Excellent in every way!
They have an unmatched level of care for my dental health. The service is genuine, total care and I always feel welcome, like visiting family! They never rush me and I leave feeling 100% sure I got the best possible care.
Bryan P. did a smart, friendly and value added service today! He provided answers and clarity to all the questions that I had and provided additional information about new services and features. Bryan made sure that we were happy with what we were looking for and provided some recommendations as well. We wish continued success for Bryan and great customer service career ahead of him!
great deals good food
NICE
I had dinner here recently with my family. It wasn't my first time here, so I knew what to expect. I ordered the lamb and asked that it be cooked medium rare. While we waited, the wines, the ambiance, the service - they were all wonderful, and made for a great dining experience. When the food came out, I cut into a lamb chop and noticed it was medium. If you're like me (which I assume most of you are if you're looking for a steakhouse) - then you're particular about how things are cooked. The maitre d' immediately noticed my concern, and approached me. I told him that it was medium, and that I had requested medium rare - he looked at the lamb and said, you're right. Immediately it was taken back, and a few minutes later the general manager was over to say they were personally overseeing the lamb and would have it out asap. In less than 10 minutes, they had a new plate of lamb out for me, cooked perfectly. I was very pleased with the care and integrity they had in making my meal right. If it's not right, they will fix it, and quickly - and btw, the rest of my family ordered steaks, and they were all cooked to perfection. Overall, the food is delicious and I would recommend Uncle Jack's to anyone looking for an all around great meal, at a price worth the value.
None
A wonderful experience and a great selection of both food and drinks. Very much enjoyed.
Darren is a master at web design and SEO. There is nothing he does not understand or cannot learn quickly. Reliable service and reasonable prices.
Parts was a great help today. Thanks Rick!
I bought a Tundra a few months ago from Larry H. Miller and though I loved the truck, I had begun driving much more than expected and needed a more economical commuter. I asked Tyson Holley (my Tundra salesman) for a recommendation and he steered me towards a Scion iq that had quite a bit of incentives attached to it. He worked with my budget, let me drive it, and when the time came to buy it, I drove straight from the mountain (snowboarding) to sign the papers. It was hassle-free, honest, and painless. So different from what I have witnessed with other salespeople or dealerships. I have sent a number of my friends and family to Tyson and cannot recommend Larry H Miller Toyota enough.
None
None
I just had my back glass replaced by Ideal Auto Glass and i'm so glad i did. These guys are amazing. They cleaned the front and the back of my car out!! All i did was drop my car off at 9am at their shop in Richfield and 3 hours later it was done. I couldn't ask for anything better.. Thanks guys Nick R~
My power went out today when it was around 104 degrees. When I called Haddox and Sons, the owner, Chris, answered and suggested I try a couple things first before telling me he could be here in a couple of hours. Since what he suggested didn't work, I had Chris come out. He had the problem fixed in a very short period of time and gave me an estimate on replacing the whole electrical box since it's so old. I will definitely be calling Haddox and Sons to replace the box and strongly recommend this company to anyone who needs a friendly and professional electrician!
As a single female, dealing in the world of buying and selling cars is worse than going to the dentist. I steel myself before entering a dealership, knowing I will be treated "less-than" a man and that every attempt will be made to take advantage of my naivete. Well I was in for quite a surprise when I walked in to Lithia Toyota. I was immediately referred to Jerry McKeen who put me at ease right away. I spent the next hour and a half with Jerry as he worked to try to work out a mutually agreeable deal. He understood what I wanted, where I needed to go financially, what I was attempting to accomplish. Although I was not looking for a brand new car or anything that was going to net him a big sale and commission, he treated me with the utmost professionalism and kindness. Jerry was absolutely wonderful. I have always been a Honda girl, but after today I may be crossing over to Toyota! Thanks, Sonja R.
Great store to mail your stuff... Friendly and professional.
One of the best restaurants in Owen Sound. Locally sourced ingredients and a unique menu makes this an excellent alternative to the usual fair available. Don't miss the dumplings!!
The staff at A-American storage is wonderful. The owners play an active role in ensuring the best of service, quality, and security of their facility. They also play an active role in helping our community organizations and making the world a better place. I would 100% recommend that their facilities be placed under the highest regard if you are looking for storage units.
best time ever
None
I needed to go pick up my daughter in South Carolina on Monday so I came in on Sunday to get my oil changed and they told me that my tires might not make it due to aging cracks on my tires. The Pep Boys on Baymeadows did not have them in stock but found that the store on San Jose had them. So I went to that store and they had me taken care of and was phenomenal in the way they took care of me! Very happy with them and will definetly be back!!
Abwechslungsreiche und sehr leckere Mittagsmenüs zu fairen Preisen. Der Biergarten hinter der Alm wird übrigens *nicht* von der selben Küche bedient wie das Wirtshaus. Trotzdem kann man hier schön unter Kastanienbäumen sitzen, aber seine Brotzeit sollte man besser selber mitbringen. ;)
Outstanding product selection, great prices and helpful, friendly service!
Ein kompetenter Partner im Bereich Messe und Innenausbau!
after trying tens of dozens of other oriental restraunts and moving away from the area I still seem to end up here great food served by nice staff as for the review about gloopy old fasion food I have no idea how anyone could describe the emporers food like that? the only downside is it can get very busy
None
I really like this dentist and office/staff. They have taken great care of my teeth over the past couple years. Their office staff is friendly. Dr Canepa takes the time to listen to what you want, and then works out a plan that fits you and your teeth. The office itself is clean, and nicely designed.
I love the practical skill I have learned at GCC to live a sustainable christian life.
The quality of service we received from Glass Act was beyond our initial expectation. We received same day service at our place of residence and the job was completed in less than 45 minutes. The work is guaranteed and their prices are extremely competitive, which was great news for someone who just had their car broken into and their wallet stolen. Very professional, exceptionally prompt, and highly recommended without hesitation!
If I Could Sum Up GLENDALE NISSAN In 1 Word It Be......"UNTOUCHABLE". The Sales Staff & Managing Department Is By Far 1 in a Million!! I visited Several Nissan Dealership's in the So. Cal all month long. From Puente Hills to Metro, Cerritos to OC, No Nissan Dealership even came close to GLENDALE NISSAN!! Our Sales Rep REINA was very patient & understanding, test driving us in any vehicle with ALL SMILES ;0) When It Came to Discussing Number's, No Manager I have ever worked with in my entire life of finances, was as "To The Penny & As Genuine" as MARTIN CUEVAS. HE REALLY KNOWS HOW TO ROLL OUT THE RED CARPET!!! I would recommend this dealership and it's staff to all my friends and family!! If your looking for a great deal & exceptional customer service, GLENDALE NISSAN is where it's at!!
Great staff with great food!
My entire family has been seeing Dr. Harry for years. Doc is very thorough and Andrea out front helps us look our best and suggests frames that will look best with our shape and coloring. Even if we have to stop in for an adjustment, we are treated and sent on our way. A great doctor and office!
Love the shop. I discovered the art of Eric Ravillious in there. They've got some reproductions of his superb watercolours as well as some of the books published by James Russell. The objects in the shop seem to be carefully chosen. Great for gifts or simply to indulge.
This is the best place I have ever been too .- Hugo Martinez Jr
Some of the best food in Janesville and best bar scene around if you ask me. Great prices and awesome experience
Dr. Festa has been my chiropractor since I had my son and, due to complications during my pregnancy, I experienced extreme lower back pain. Since seeing Dr. Festa my back pain has completely subsided leaving me feeling much better than I ever did!!
Tried the $40 per person chef's sampler (7 dishes). Everything was freshly prepared... each dish came with a brief explanation so you knew what you were having... the food is Spanish/California fusion... a gourmet experience...
Great happy hrs. and daily weekday specials - 1/2 price sushi, 1/2 off Thurs mbrs day, great appetizers & salads.
Tivemos uma lua de mel inesquecível neste lugar... Muito recomendável!
Muy profesional y bien precio
They've got volleyball courts, bocce ball, gym, racquetball court, cafe, swimming pool with hot hot hot-tub, not to mention 12 well maintained hard courts with very friendly members and staff. A safe, family friendly place to drop off your active kids. The place to go for tennis in Chico!
My wife and I were looking for a new van in January. We found one at Fury in Stillwater. Ryan found us the perfect van. It had all the features we wanted and more, it was newer and lower miles than what we had been looking at. Although the price was higher than what we had planed on, they were able to get us better financing rates and terms than what we were able to get through our credit union. Our experience at Fury was great! Fury Stillwater is a great location for us, conveniently located. I have had my other vehicles serviced here as well. They have done great work for me and my wife!
None
Exquisite design and attention to detail
None
연인이 함께 하기에 쾌적하고 안락한 장소. 이층의 독립적인 아담한 룸에 편안한 쿠션의 쇼파. 장소에비해 저렴한 가격. 아기자기한 인테리어. 연인을위한 카페입니다 쵝오!!!! 추가로...올레 아이파이죤이구 콘센트가 있다는점. 학생 또는 직장인의 작업 장소로도 굿굿굿~
Great staff, great facility, great experience! I am a regular customer here for many years. All of my dental health needs are handled with confident skill.
We are in Salida just about every weekend and have tried many of the restaurants in the downtown area and the Boathouse Cantina is my favorite! I am a gluten free vegan and I have never left this place unsatisfied! I am completely addicted to the cilantro vinaigrette as well as the jalapeno-cilantro sauce. As a matter of fact, I had to go in and get little to go containers of both of them before we left Salida to return to Denver - I can't go a full week without it! The portebella sandwich is great - the gluten free buns are nothing to be excited about, but that isn't their fault - gluten free buns in general suck - maybe if they toast them, they would be better...Oh - and for the non-gluten free people in your group, the Boathouse folks are serious about their beers! They have many great beers on tap and they serve them in the proper glass (something about the best glass for the bubbles...) And the house Cab is great, too! This is the only place I want to go to anymore when we are in Salida (with the occasional dinner at Little Cambodia when she makes me my veggie pho broth!). Definitely check this place out, it is AWESOME!
El papel de los funcionarios del Consulado Mexicano en Chicago es "deprimente" e incluso llega ser ofensivo en la manera en que se dirigen hacia las personas, tachandonos de ignorantes y haciendo todo lo posible (como el no dar la informacion adecuada completa) para asi hacernos ver como ignorantes y ellos lucir su altaneria.. "Es un Insulto para todos los ciudadanos mexicanos Mi pregunta es y la que todos los mexicanos que vivimos en este pais nos hacemos cada dia, Es que No pueden ocupar los Consulados funcionarios con preparacion, educacion, inteligencia y respeto hacia los demas?? Ya suficiente tenemos los mexicanos en este pais con todos los abusos verbales y el racismo como para tener que recibir el mismo trato de nuestra propia raza.
None
Brown's Toyota is wonderful! They always work with me to get the service appointments I need and provide great service for my Highlander. Thank you so much to James Brown and the service team at Brown's.
Best place around hands down, great friendly staff and perfect atmosphere! Junior takes care of his customers!
None
We've been going to Whitie's for almost fifteen years. I trust them completely, and they're the only mechanics we go to. I trust them so much that I'd rather buy a used car and have them work on it than a new car and be forced to use a dealer's mechanic for the warranty. They always call with accurate estimates, and they tell you how much life you can expect out of things like brakes or tires. The mechanics have done great work, the front desk staff are all friendly and professional, and the owner can speak "Car Guys" so you can narrow down the problem on the phone alone.
I'm not from around the area but I tried this place out because it had good ratings and a great selection of food. I'm big on Buffalo and Barbeque sauce mixed together and these guys made a sandwich that did it justice. If I find myself back in tewksbury, I will definitely be back.
Cleanest bathrooms we've ever seen at a campground. Very well maintained sites and trails. Staff was friendly and polite, even when we lost track of time and checked out late.
Not the best Japanese food, but pretty good for this area. The restaurant is very pretty though!
Stayed here during a business trip. The service was excellent. Front desk was very friendly and helpful. The room was clean and well kept. Breakfast was satisfying. Definitely would stay here again.
Matt Muler You are my hero! I am recently divorced and was very nervous about buying a car by myself. I felt very comfortable with your knowledge of the cars and did not feel pressured to purchase a car. You answered all of my questions and I felt very confident that I made the right choice with MY Honda Accord! I will be telling EVERYONE about the great service at Walser! Thanks again!!
Alper Automotive performed like champs once again: they had the parts, got the work done quickly and my Old Girl is running nicely. I ALWAYS have a good experience with Alper.
The last two times I have been in for service, John Salassi has assisted me. And I must say that those two time have the the best experiences I have had at this dealership. Prior to working with John I was very unsatisfied with the service department. Thank You John!!!!
THE best dentist I have ever met. Dr. Marvin Cruz is a professional who really cares about his clients. Really. The waiting lounge is also very accommodating and serene. I will definitely be back soon for my cavity filling. Thank you, Doc!
Zeer mooie, ruime locatie. Praktische en nette inrichting. Inclusief prima boten. Met de vereniging een erg gezellig weekend gehad, zowel binnen als buiten voldoende ruimte voor activiteiten.
None
They removed gum from my really nice button up shirt. It took them 5 minutes, and no cost! Simply amazing.
I've worked with Joel and Anne in the past and they are the most helpful and honest folks you'd ever want to meet. Extremely knowledgeable and reliable. They do what they say...no games!
Wave cinema is awsome
Visit the FAU (architecture) building by Vilanova Artigas
Good fish! Great alligator! A pain in the butt to get to if new to Louisiana.
None
Great food and great staff!
We have been using Accelerate Marketing for roughly a year. The difference that it has made to our business has been really noticeable. We have won business that 12 months ago we would only be considered if we drastically reduced our fees. It has boosted staff morale as the recognition that we previously got is now being posted online and making a difference in our new business attraction. I would highly recommend Ryan and his team if you are serious about putting your business on the map.
Jordan is the best! His helpful tips and smiling face make every visit to Bruegger's reason for a return trip.
Fantastic down home cooking and great friendly service
This Firehouse location is wonderful. They were friendly and fast. The food tasted great and was just the way I requested.
Top noche college of Karachi (Y)
The BEST weekend in Michigan! Of course it's crowded.....that's what makes it fun. I love the display of patriotism, the amazing firework display on Saturday night, the carnival, the ships to explore, the art fair.....NOTHING about it I would say I didn't like! Check it out for yourself, and NO...I do not live in the area or have a vested interest in the success of this Festival; just have gone to it for many years and wouldn't miss it!
Go here, you will not be disappointed!
I stopped at the lot a few days ago and was looking for a used suv. I spotted a Ford edge that I loved. since this was my first stop in the car search I left and kept looking. After looking at several lots and even looking online at all used ford edges within a 80 mile radius, I found that Kreiger had the one I liked the most it was in the best condition and was the best price. I did a credit app. online and got a call first thing the next mornig from Dennis Fritz. I told him what I was looking for and he kept me posted while I was at work how he could finance me, ( with great help from Harold, he made the magic happen) and everthing I would need to drive away with my car as soon as I got off work. I drove to the lot and my car was cleaned and detailed and ready for me. Paper work was all done and within 15 minutes I was signing on the dotted line and driving away in my new car. Dennis was so helpful and Harold was very nice and helpful getting everthing approved. I will recomend this dealership and these gentlemen to all who ask. Thanks guys, time for a joy ride! - REGAN CURRY
Muy buen trato, excelente comida y precio muy asequible.Local acogedor para quedar con los amigos, con tu pareja o llevar a la familia.
Awesome place to learn and to work with.
Good hotel! The pool and whirlpool are also very good. We liked our stay here.
If you're a fan of chile con queso then you have to visit El Pinto. That's just one of the fine reasons to eat at New Mexico's largest restaurants. It's atmosphere, healthy food (yes you can make healthy Mexican food without sacrificing a thing) and it's helpful, friendly staff make this the winner in every "Best of Albuquerque" publication around. The queso is made with real chilies and everyone loves El Pinto's salsa and chips, made fresh on the premises each day. If you're coming from I-25 make sure to obey the posted speed limits. You pass through the Sandia Pueblo area and the police there love to write tickets. Have fun.
Nicole was a great help in both bensalem and edgewater.
Brilliant. The burgers are the biggest and tastiest you will ever have, but it is a bit pricey but if you got the dough and want great big meal, come here.
I have been using them for 30 years. Best service of almost any business I have been to. If you don't think they are giving a 100% effort to please their customers, you aren't paying attention! Thanks Skip
None
Everytime Im In Joliet This Is Where I Come 2 Buy Or Fix Products. Building Very Well Put Together Great Laughs While You Wait & More! Good Service Time. Many Items 2 Choose From. Gave Me a Loaner Phone Fixed My Phone! Found Out Whats Wrong With My Laptop Fixed That. great sevice and very friendly and knowledgeable.
Dar een wagat yuz asaf dawa-i-paighambar-imikunad. Sal panjah wa chahar. Aishan yuzu paighambar-i-bani israil ast.
I have been here many times and always receive great service. The staff is genuine and kinda. Beautiful facility-spacious and clean. Gorgeous Shower suites for personalized use. I love that! Best spa in the Loop!
My children have been attending this school since 2011, I love this school. I have three children attending this year and they are doing awesome. The teachers are awesome. I especially love my daughters third grade teacher Mrs. Bleamaster, she is excellent. My kids love the school and I couldn't be more pleased with this school.
My wife's 2002 Lexus RX300 had 158,000 well used miles, ran well but looked its age. After a consult with Brian and Body Works, we made the decision to have them do a cosmetic makeover.After some paintwork, trim work, new leather arm rests, and detailing, the car looked brand new. My wife originally wanted a new car but now is pleased to have a car she knows and looks as new as the day she bought it. Thanks Body Works Plus.
Супер-потрясенно!
Markels was GREAT!! They started working on my car, literally within minutes. They redid my entire convertible top in less than 2 days! Dennis was very nice and gave me a great deal! I would definitely recommend them to anyone who needs repair on their convertible top!
Did an out standing job, no wrinkles or bubbles, had a great time chatting with him about old Dodge muscle cars and he even took me out to his garage to see some of his cars. He's a great guy and does nice work at a fair price.
Great place for ice cream. It is all we ever get there, so I can't recommend anything else.
Had a dead horn on one floor monitor. I took it out and he ran some tests. He wasn't confident the problem was strictly with the horn, but knew I was in a hurry for sound at a memorial service. He GAVE me a replacement horn. When I tried to give him money he waved it off saying he gets them too cheap for me to worry about it. You would never see this with a big company or on the internet--support local shops!
Really friendly service and an outstanding variety of gourmet, fresh sushi and many other fantastic looking dishes. Made fresh to order to dine there and take away too. Very happy to return!
Doughnuts and their service
Vi har for nyligt brugt Dansk Tøris Teknik til et arrangement, hvor vi havde flere store baljer til at stå med drikkevarer i. Her brugte vi tøris til at holde drikkevarerne kolde, og det var en stor succes, da der også kom flotte og spændende effekter fra tørisen. Vi kan derfor kun anbefale at bruge Dansk Tøris til alle, der går med samme tanker, og gerne vil have nogle flotte effekter til festen. Tøris er perfekt til dette - det skaber en god stemning på flere måder.
Le strutture dell'albergo sono superlative, con un'attenzione particolare al design, al biologico e al wellness. Le camere sono comode, belle e silenziose. La cucina è ottima, forse a volte leggermente sofisticata. I buffet sono di qualità eccellente. L'area sauna e piscina tra le migliori che ho trovato in Alto Adige. Lo staff è simpatico, pronto e cordiale. L'impostazione generale dell'hotel rivela una cura del dettaglio più piccolo che sorprende e gratifica, ma soprattutto non fa rimpiangere la spesa, meritata fino all'ultimo centesimo.
My wife and I stayed here for a late winter weekend getaway and had a wonderful time. The proprietors made us feel at home while still affording us a lot of privacy. The room was cozy and comfortable, and in-room spa lived was the best I've every seen--very plush accommodations with nice little extras. Breakfast was delicious, and the inn even provided discounts to local restaurants. We are planning our next trip here right now. Can't wait for our next visit!
I agree it looks really nice. I always look over there and admire the building and landscaping whenever I am driving by on Highway 1.
In town for a few days and went here for a long overdue cut on a whim. Couldn't have been happier. Fast service and great attention to detail. Will keep them in mind if I am back in the Orlando area.
None
New spotless dealership with nice coffee bar and friendly staff overall experience 10+
Great Service friendly staff
Lots of good deals
This is a family favorite! Try the pizza and musaka! Great food good service nice family friendly place.
My wife and I spent our first anniversary here almost four years ago. When the staff learned this they seemed to roll out the red carpet for us. There was an ice storm that night and because we couldn't leave until it finished the staff had all of us who were stranded there watch a documentary by Ben Stein. Great faith-building materials here too!
They handled my car with care and the people were honest and friendly. I'd go back for sure.
Great Prime Rib.
Just an amazing place for birthday or wedding party.
best gold store in dallas. i got some quotes on a bracelet and they were by far the best and they gave me cash., no check.
Me and my wife loves this place
I was physiologically rattled after a collision, Chris sought compensation for injuries and losses I experienced. I wanted to get the pain, memory, and losses behind me. Mr. Mayo made sure I got the help I needed, and handled the situation quickly, and effectively without interference with my day to day life. Sincere Thanks to Chris and his staff.
Best dentist I've ever had! Don't even consider going to another dentist. The staff are friendly and attentive, they have a great location just off of 66, and none of my visits have ever lasted more than 20 minutes! And not because they try to get me in and out as quick as possible like some places. Dr. Ali takes time to answer my questions and they all make sure I'm comfortable. My visits there feel like a walk in the park. There's a reason for their name. Seriously, I would recommend this place to anyone.
The staff is always very friendly, all of the rooms and facilities are sparkling every trip we make here. The whirlpool tub in the room was nice and relaxing as well. The staff even cleaned my car off from the snow that fell overnight. My wife and I enjoy this hotel very much!
Yeahhhhhhh
Had an excellent Dinner at the Indian Whisper! Not often do you find a local indian restaurant that looks classy, has great indian at affordable prices and very friendly and quick service. We felt very comfortable and well looked after for our first visit and will definitely return again soon. Highly recommended
Compared to other Honda dealers in the area, you guys are 5 stars!
Magnificant
No wait, all kind of Japanese food like Shabu Shabu, Sushi and Ramen. I liked the restaurant due to the friendly staff, prompt service and of course the quality of the food.
None
Great bar awesome prices great food just with that they had more Two Brothers Brewery beer on TAP!!! i.e. Sidekick, Heavy Handed, Outlaw, Ebel Weiss, Cane & Ebel, Domaine Dupage, Bitter End and soon to come Night Cat.
Hood River has plenty of wind to learn how to kite board! Kiteboarding lessons at New Wind was fun and exciting! 4sure the spot to learn!
The staff at Fitness 19 in Parma has been excellent. I just recently became a member and I got a great deal on my membership and immensely enjoy working out there. I live nearby in the neighborhood, so it is very convenient as the location is accessible from many different neighborhoods on the east side of Parma. I've met folks that come over from adjacent communities, Seven Hills, and Independence. What makes this gym so great is the diversity of people that come in on a regular basis and the quality of the staff which is very helpful and will give you tips and tricks on improving the quality of your workout. I highly recommend getting a membership there and enjoying the benefits of this club.
Awesome!
THERES SOMETHING VERY UNIQUE. MORE THAN WORDS.
These guys are a godsend, I kid you NOT! A year ago my Avalon was overheating. I took the car to two other places, including a Toyota dealership and NO ONE could figure out the issue, even though I had spent $$$$. I was at the end of my rope and very angry over the lack of results, especially from the vehicle's manufacture. I found ACA (I affectionately call them that for short) online and decided to try them out. They went to bat for me and never gave up. What's even more phenomenal is that they found the issue in the FIRST TEST. Soon enough my car was fixed and I was on the road again. There is so much more to this story than I can write here, but believe me when I say that you can trust them...and they give great car advice. I've been going to them for my auto issues for nearly two years now. I've NEVER been disappointed!
None
I had a few other loan officers try to approve us for home loans and re-fiances and because I am self employed there was to much hassle and it was to no avail. Alan knows his stuff and his staff was very easy to work with. From start to finish it was only a few short weeks. I would recommend Capital Financial even to my mother in law.
Great place, friendly people, always willing to help and teach. I've never been to a hobby shop where the owner is so involved and ready to help with just about everything. I couldn't imagine going to a hobby shop that could help me out better with my hobby needs.
BEST ENGINEERING COLLEGE AT PALAKKAD
This has got to be the best hotel in the region. Suite #7 is probably the best designed room in the entire place. Rustic old world Filipino charm! Gives you a feeling of being in another era! The staff ate very polite and they all seem very professional. Quite a pleasant surprise for a smallish hotel. :)
Amazing Food, Ambience and Service.. Very well priced and great waterfront view of Tin City and the Bay.
I bought a Groupon for Structure and went in with minimal expectations, as my previous massage Groupon experiences at other massage establishments had be less than exciting. Robin actually worked on the areas that needed worked on, and provided much needed relief. I was very surprised and very excited to have found someone that was so in tune with my body. I have returned several times, and will continue to go as often as I can.
I purchased takeout for myself and friends when they were helping me move into my new house in Barnstead and had my girlfriend pick it up. They were really nice to her, respectful, and even brought all the pizzas out to the car. They also provided information on other great services in the area. Not sure about the interior because I didn't go, but great food at a great price and very friendly people!
None
Awesome place ,good food & drinks ,outstanding vibe
Resto sympa, c'est bon et j'adooooooooooooooore la terrasse l'été!!!
I stopped by to Antoney and simply SAY HELLO. He was in the middle of a Wine Display and stopped everything to give me a guided tour. Not only does Antoney have an awesome Selection of Fine Wines, exotic beers, which are on Tap but he has two meeting rooms that he opens up to the Rotary Club and the Toastmasters pf Lake Mary. Antoney, is even planning on special appetizer foods for his Guests. Thanks Antoney for your tour of Fine Wines and Meeting Rooms.
Wonderful experience! We started having trouble with our old a/c system and started shopping around for a new system. Waychoff was able to give us the best unit for what we were able to spend, offered a great 0% financing deal, and never made us feel pressured to choose them. The installers were professional and courteous and had both new units (one upstairs, one downstairs) installed quickly. We're saving a ton on our electric bill monthly, got a credit from the electric company, and a tax credit for our new system too! We definitely recommend them and would use them again.
The restaurant mangages to combine three quite rare features; exceptional food, a pleasant atmosphere and good prices (45 USD for a three course meal and bottle of wine starting from 35USD). The only thing that could be a problem is that they only accept danish payment cards, so bring some cash.
Dan & Kim at GotYaPhoto shot our engagement & wedding photos. We felt right at ease working with them, spending the whole engagement shoot laughing and enjoying ourselves. They were constant professionals and were extremely flexible to our schedule and did an amazing job the day of the wedding. The photos were in a word: 'incredible' and I would highly recommend Dan & Kim in a heartbeat for any of your photography needs.
Steve S and Geordan B were right on time and did an excellent job for us. They were friendly and professional.
None
None
By far the best first car buying experience I could've wished for! Tony Whiteman did a great job in finding the perfect car for my needs and then walked me through the process step by step so I understood what was going on. From the moment I walked into the door until I drove away in my first new car, Tony answered every question I had. I couldn't have asked for a better salesman! I would highly recommend to anyone (whether it's your first car or not) to drive over to Liberty Chevrolet and ask to see Tony Whiteman.
Amazing facility... if you can't afford it please don't stay and complain about the little extra charges...
Great fun!
I'm reviewing the food, not the family. Chens is not as good as it used to be.
None
Childcare network has been such a lifesaver for me! I love Mr. Simmons, he had my son potty trained in two weeks! Thank you to everyone here, the teachers are fantastic and so friendly. I get daily reports and activities my son does and they accept and love every child. My son has sensory processing disorder and they love him and care for him and all of his needs. They take him by the hand and help him through daily activities and frustrations. I love this place, thank you so much Childcare Network! I love the hours and the price! And most of all, you are fantastic Mr. Simmons, its been such a pleasure speaking with you and helping make my son feel comfortable in a scary world.
They are great my daughter loves it here!
Thank you sanford Infiniti and Especially Steven Graham. I met with Steven about options for my lease coming up in a year and he helped me a great deal. Ill will definitely return to Sanford Infiniti to buy my next car.
They were reasonably priced, had the part in his van, fixed it very quickly and was super nice. He even gave free maintenance advice. I would recommend using this company!
Being the klutz that I am, I smashed an Android phone's front screen up really good. Which is bad. So, as I wept loudly, clenching my once beautiful $350 phone, I began looking for screen repair options. The local shops were conspicuous and the websites of other online services looked shoddy and barely had any reviews. I originally was going to go with another company, but I saw iResQ recommended in an article and decided to look at the site. Then, I saw this: "Note: If you see a lower price somewhere else, check their reviews then check ours. There are other companies that use cheap, knockoff parts in an attempt to offer lower pricing. Make sure you do your research before deciding on a repair company." I raised my eyebrow, did some research, and decided that the extra $40 or so could be worth it. Boy, was I ever right! I needed my phone fast and iResQ had the shipping option to match that need. I shipped it out, they did their magic, and the phone was back in my hand, looking very, very sexy, just two days after shipping it in. I must commend iResQ for their speedy service, professionalism, and charming business cards. Thanks! Christopher P.
Wonderful people, great customer service with affordable prices on fixtures and fittings. Nabile and his wife, Julio and the rest of the crew worked tirelessly to design and build Doc's pharmacy interior. I'm grateful to them and will recommend them to any small business owner on a budget to gets things done.
Cathy did a great job of putting me immediately at ease when I went to her for my first massage, I've gone to her for both general relaxation and for specific shoulder issues, and have come away refreshed, loose, and balanced each time. For several years now, I've made Cathy's massages a part of my regular regimen and general well-being. I highly recommend you do the same!
I am studying at The University of Salford Manchester since 2006, starting as a undergraduate and continuing as a postgrad and GTA. Salford Business School helped me find my real abilities and pursue my dream of doing what I enjoy most in life: business, digital technologies and its application in other fields...As a foreign student with English second language and a cultural shock, the first days were quite challenging but the lecturers helped me settle in and provided the support I needed. As a result I have completed my studies with a first honour degree and numerous awards. Follow to that, I was employed by the University as a KTP and now, finally I am studying my PhD - at Salford!!! I have recommended the University to many friends and family and I will continue to do so..This is a place where you can develop your social and technical skills, find friends and have the support you need!!! In return you are expected to work hard, be committed and ask for help! Fair enough!!!
Everyone there seemed proud of their food and service. Truly one of my favorite dining experiences with superlative service, food and hospitality.
The good people at FRSport are truly the kind to go above and beyond for you, I called to inquire about a certain style and color of steering wheel adaptor that I didn't see on their site. Not only did they get it, they got it posted on their site before I was off the phone with them so I could get my order finished. Great people and amazing customer service.
I was told my car repairs would cost over $1,700 from a tire shop in Moreno Valley so I decided to shop around. After reading all the reviews I chose Ramona Tire in Moreno Valley and lt was a great decision. Ramona Tire provided fast professional service and SAVED ME $300! Thank you Ramona Tire.
Best school for Muslims... And they giving best education to make a brilliant student... All I know cause I studied on this school.....
I had a terrific visit at the Garland park with my niece and nephew. The park was clean, the bathrooms were clean and smelled nice, and we had a lot of fun on the various slides. I was impressed by the friendliness of the staff, who went out of their way to help. While I was at the wave pool, a lifeguard saw a boy in trouble, and I was amazed at how fast everyone reacted. The horn blew to stop the waves, two lifeguards were in the water while a third kept watch on the pool, and a man in an EMT shirt was there immediately. The only fault I find is that the uncovered sidewalks are too hot for bare feet. I have no other complaints and expect to go back many times.
This is my second time buying from this dealer and I always leave with a smile on my face. Got the same guy that helped me back in 2012, Lan Phan. Very quick and listened to what you want in a car and he'll get it for you. Love the staffs. They do your paper work really quick.
I absolutely love this dentist and his office staff. I will continue to drive all the way from Dallas to see them as I think they are one in a million. I appreciate that I feel like I can trust Dr. Smith to take good care of me, but not suggest unnecessary work that keeps it affordable. He took extra time to talk with me and I didn't feel rushed at all. I felt very at home in their office by one of the very sweet and friendly dental hygienists and also found out we had mutual friends at Denton Bible church. I will definitely be back for their friendly small-town hospitality and great dental care.
My Company, H.E.L.P., has had units at Extra Space Storage on Eastern for over 5 years and though Management has changed, I still get great service. I even left the shed unlocked once and they called within 1/2 hour to let me know what happened and put a spare lock on for me. Above and beyond...
Recent work performed by electrician John Miller was top grade. He explained his recommendations clearly and executed with a high level of quality. The estimate was fair and accurate; the interaction was pleasant; and the results were professional. These folks take evident pride in their work and know how to deliver.
By far my most favorite place for fresh seafood
Great food, friendly staff, fast service and reasonable prices what more could you ask for? By far the best Chinese food in the area.
None
Faisal was very accommodating in helping us decide which size of storage would be adequate for our needs. The total experience in leasing storage was made very easy since we have never leased a storage before.
- Rapidly developing infrastructure around it. - Largest open space compare to other schemes.
Excellent food and beer.
None
The rooms were beautiful and clean. We did have an issue with an overzealous housekeeper; we hung the "do not disturb" sign on the door after coming in late the previous night, and the housekeeper woke us up twice just to check that we were still there.
I take my two boxers to Just Dogs on a regular basis. My dogs love it and the staff clearly pays close attention to the dogs. Yes, there is a restrictive interview process. That's part of the benefit, actually. They don't just leave them in a cage all day - the dogs actually play and interact with each other over the course of the day. That's why they have to check each dog out before allowing them to join. And, of course, there is a premium to pay for all of this. Is it more expensive than other boarding places? Yes. Is it harder to get in? Yes. Is it worth it? When I see how much my dogs enjoy it, absolutely.
Hotel staff always friendly. The ping pong bar is very nice. The rooftop bar has the best view in downtown LA. The djs in both bars are outstanding. The ground floor lounge usually has live singers on Thursday nights and you can always get pretty good food at the restaurant which has an outside patio for dining. Want to chill in your room for the night? No worries, room service is quick and friendly. I've stayed here 4 times on business trips and will always stay here when in LA!
None
I've eaten here twice in the past month and will eat here again. The servers are very friendly and efficient. Try all six of their sauces. Bandana's ribs are HUGE!
Very good experience. The staff and doctors were friendly and listened to all the symptoms. Wait was minimal but time with doctor was great. Doctor took the time to listen and empathetic to the pain.
Dr. Webster is an outstanding and compassionate physician. His contributions to the field of pain medicine are countless. A genuinely good person doing great things.
I called Aaron at 10PM when my cousin got arrested. Shortly after he was able to post bail for him and he got him out very quickly. I recommend Aaron's Bail Bonds to anyone looking for an emergency bail agent.
This lawyer has MEGA LOW fees!!! AMAZING!!!
Just joined the gym all of the staff that I have had to deal with are very friendly and helpful the gym is very clean and staff seam eager to please. And its open 24 7 you can not argue with that.
There's really no need to write another 5-star review for this restaurant. Amazing from first to last. Try the Kolambi fry and Lamb Rogan Josh.
Awesome facility to record at. Very talented instructors and strong equipment . Highly Recommend it!
I recently purchased a new 2013 GMC Terrain from Dennis at Prime Buick GMC in Hanover. I was very impressed with the facility, along with the helpfulness of Dennis. He spent plenty of time with me, making sure I purchased the vehicle that would fit me the best. On the day I took delivery of my Terrain, Dennis also spent a good amount of time with me, setting up my OnStar, BlueTooth, and showing me how everything else works. I never felt rushed or pushed into any purchase at any time. Additionally, Dennis has continued to contact me, making sure I am completely satisifed with my purchase; which I am. I would recommend Dennis to anyone who is in the market to buy a new or pre-owned vehicle!
None
Chad and Tye are very responsive, and smart. Our pool looks great!
En av vasastans bästa lunchrestauranger!
None
Parfait, un régal, de la bouffe Japonaise cuisinée avec compétence, toujours servie en bonnes proportions. A ne pas louper !
Normally I do not write these reviews, I simply review them. However after reading all the negative reviews I still made the decision to give them a try. My problem was my Galaxy S3 screen went out. I called first to ask a question about my phone, the lady that answered was polite and helpful. She did not know the answer to my question but asked me to please call back when their tech ariived. She told me his name and when he arrived. I called back, spoke with the tech who was also polite and helpful. He said that they do $10 diagnosis in house and it only takes 45-60 minutes. I brought the phone in at noon that day. I called back probably around 2pm. They told me that the screen was bad but they had replacements if i chose to go that route. They quoted a price and because i had already researched the price of my screen I knew their quote was spot on. Labor was nothing...and they have a 10% coupon on their site. The entire staff was helpful, polite and timely. My phone was fixed that day as promised. I even have the numbe for the tech just incase something happens again. Thanks so much to everyone at the store!!!!!!!!
None
your customer service is exellent. I needed help with training and Chris walked me through everything with ease .The program seems very easy to learn,and the support team is exellent. Thanks so much ! Lisa Murray South commercial auto albany or
It's always a pleasure doing business here. Another satisfied customer.
Excellent dealership. Great experience.
4 yılımın geçtiği ergenlik çağımı atlattığım lise :) öğretmenlerimin çoğu çok doğru insanlardı ve çok kalitelilerdi. spor faliyetlerinde her yıl şenlikler düzenlenirdi ama bir bahar şenliği düzenleyememiştik. ilk geldiğim sene yurt dışına öğrenci göndermişlerdi. ben mezun olduktan sonra da göndermişler. çok şanslıydım :D ben de çok büyük önemi var STFA'nın. Hayatımdaki miladım.
The feel of this place is great, lots of large tables and couches for large groups and plenty of smaller areas for smaller groups as well. Everyone who works there is polite and professional. The quality of coffee is wonderful and definitely blows Starbucks out of the water.
I have a 98 Toyota Camry and the transmission had completely went out on my husband on his way to the grocery store. I have an extreme attachment to this car and was not going to trust it to just anyone. I mean this is the car that I bought new and all three of my children learned to drive in this car, so it was like family and very reliable. I went in to see my mechanic to find out what it would take to fix my Camry. I was so surprised at his response when he actually told me "If you want it done right, with a great price and back in a few days, take it to Best Western at Citidal". I have a great mechanic and he knows the family and the car. I trust his opinion and he has never failed us when it come to this car. Not only that, he told me this with another customer right there and that customer totally agreed with him as he shared his experience with Best Western. To make a long story short, we wound up calling Best Western to get a quote for a rebuild on the transmission and they were actually comparable if not better than all of the other quotes in the city. They came out that night and towed our car to there shop at no extra charge and Jesse kept us informed every step of the way in this repair. Something I thought was great is that when we went to pay for it, it was the price they had quoted us. WOW, that never happen when getting the car fixed, it is always more. Not only that, we were told to bring it back in for no charge when the car reached 100 plus miles so they could check it out and make sure there were no problems with fluids and such. I am so happy that we decided to take our car to Best Western. Thanks Jesse and crew for your honesty, compassion and diligent work, the Camry is back on the road and drives like it always did. I highly recommend them if you are in need of a transmission repair.
genial
From our experience, this is the company to partner with. For all the competition, the folks at Marcy Design have proof of their ability to help us accomplish what we need to be doing... many many awards, a thousand websites, and ongoing relevance to an ever-changing real-world work environment. Near the end of "Up in the Air" (George Clooney, 2010, Paramount), the narrative is "I'm surprised you haven't already offered her a position with your firm!" Same here -- Marcy Design can relate your business on the Web, with social media, marketing, and so much more. Have you signed Marcy up for your current projects?
AnyJunk have been great for all the times i have used them. There are arrive on time and take anything you want away. They come straight to the property to take the item away which is brilliant and means you don't to struggle moving the item yourself outside your house. I will definitely use them again and have recommend them to all my friends and family.
The Place is Super Clean and the Staff is really nice. the waitresses Bri and Shelby always have big smiles on their faces and do a good job. The food is excellent and I don't sing Karaoke my self but everyone else seem to be having a really good time. A+ Establishment.
Super nice, personable staff. Highly recommend the technician Anuish who patiently took all the time I needed to explain the procedure and what I could expect. That laser KILLS tattoos, and my ridiculous mark of shame was completely removed in much less time than expected. Thanks, Precision Laser Tattoo Removal -- excellent service. I can't wait to get another tattoo to have you remove it a month later, lol.
My purchase experience with Mc Donald's for a 2012 Passat was excellent. Luke Egolf is very knowledgable and explained every possible detail during the test drive and the overall sales experience with Luke and Tim was very pleasant.
I love going to NWS. Anytime I need to get snowboarding or longboarding supplies I venture out to the Olympian store. They have the best customer service and better deals than other related stores in the area. They helped me buy my first longboard and helped me with all my snowboarding supplies. I highly recommend them!
Everyone was polite and helpful today when I traded in my old car seat for 25% off of a new one!!
None
Super friendly staff and great sales!
They have a shake machine!
The best restaurants I have ever eaten at don't have a whole lot of "atmosphere." They are known for the GREAT FOOD, the cleanliness and caring of the staff and facilities, and the great prices. Kenny's is one of those restaurants. If you want to eat mouth-watering food where you go back for second and third helpings, are served by caring staff, and are surprised at the price you pay, then Kenny's is the place to go. If you have Kenny cater your event, look forward to plenty of compliments on your choice of caterer. You can be sure that the people who attend your event will remember it and tell you (even months later) how great the food was--and that they got plenty of it.
OC Designer Source are a fantastic group of people to work with. I am an artist and they have been representing my work for some time now. I have found them to be extremely proactive, creative and a genuine pleasure to work with. The quality of their work is world class, so if you want an organisation to give your location the "WOW" factor, then I can highly recommend OCDS.
The thing that caught my eye about this place was the trailer with a smoker attached out front. I thought, "Someone's serious about BBQ". I was right. I came back later with my family and got there just before closing time. We thought maybe we should go and let them close, but the owners were very welcoming and happy to serve us. I'm glad they did, because they had the BEST BBQ we've had in years. The beef brisket was awesome; tender, juicy, with great flavor. The ribs were falling off the bone and the sauce was incredible. Also, they have the best collards besides the ones my grandmother used to make. The owner is a great guy and should be proud of what he makes. I'll definitely be spending my BBQ dollars here. Highly recommended.
Such a cool little store. They have something for every cook. This is a great place to buy gifts for your favorite cook. The ladies that run this store are the absolute best- in 5 minutes you will have 10 great ideas and the inspiration to see them through!
If you would rather keep shaving, keep waxing, keep plucking and continually pay for all those processes or if you would rather do something about it and get back all those hours, days, years and costs then call up the gals at Lexington Laser Spa. Friendly staff that is helpful, understanding and knowledgeable. I recommend the laser hair removal process as the best way to eliminate unwanted hair. In my case the irritation was no more than what I had with waxing! DO IT! DO IT! DO IT!
One Guy's is awesome.
I had John take in a few button down shirts for me. Simple task, but the service was quick (5 mins to pin 3 shirts and a weeks wait to get them back), friendly, and fairly priced. Thanks John!
I recently bought a 2010 Jaguar XFR that Baron BMW had taken in on trade. I was able to work out everything on the phone with Frank & Steve ahead of time. Living in DFW, I had to fly in to pick up the car and was picked up by my sales rep, Frank at the airport. They had my car detailed with a full tank of gas and I was out of the dealership in about an hour. The dealership is a nice facility and the staff was very professional throughout the entire transaction.
AMAZING! This is an incredible place to hold meetings. We had about 150 people in the ball room for our annual club party and we felt like the whole building was to ourselves. When we left I learned that more that 3 other large groups felt the same. We never knew each other was there. What a great design. We will definitely be back! Thank you!!
I had Public Storage for over 3 years. Property Manager Cryssi was very patience and understanding. She helped us in any way that she could.
You know, I see some of the negative reviews here, but I have been in twice and never had anything but great service. Now, Dave is the store manager and both times he helped me......So maybe that makes a difference. The cars were clean, not smoked in and I thought the rate was fair. It wasn't dirt cheap, but it was fair for what I was getting......Which was a car with 4,000 miles on it.
Gut bürgerlich. Sehr leckere deutsche Küche. Preise angenehm.
By far the best car buying experience. After all, purchasing a new vehicle should be fun right? My wife and I walked in about 45mins before they closed on a Saturday and asked if we could look around. Allison greeted us in the front and let us browse the inventory on our own telling us if there was anything we were interested in to let her know. We found the car we loved and Allison had someone pull it around for us. When we returned Allison asked what we thought. Never being pushy or reminding us they closed soon. I asked If I could talk to the finance folks about purchasing and I then found out that everyone in there does everything. Allison took us to her office, found us a great interest rate and 15 minutes later we were leaving in our new car :) --- believe it or not I don't typically leave reviews but this place is so awesome I will refer everyone I know--- Thanks Allison, we love our new ride.
What an awesome fun park - rides to suit everyone and the best wet play ground I've seen, plus helpful staff, good facilities, and good food options - worth every second of the drive :)
My children have been at Childcare Network on Caplin Drive for just over a year and half. I have been very pleased with the time and attention the staff has given to my children. Especially the staff for the toddler room and after school program
Good food very nice people
None
I like WDIV Local 4. I really like the news coverage and the website, and coverage of the Olympics in 2012. I live in southwestern Ontario Canada and I receive WDIV on Cogeco cable on channel 5 cable.
Good food, great service
Honest, quick, and saved my dog's life! My dog needed intestinal surgery after eating dental floss, the doctor gave me my options and was very upfront and honest about her abilities, the cost, etc. All said and done, it was expensive but saved his life!
The salesman did not pressure us, but he knew we were in the market for the van. At first they said our credit wasn't good enough for a loan that size, but the finance people worked it out and we got a loan at 2.9%. We were delighted
A good place 2 rock life
I have been to Mesa Hydroponics a few times and every time the person there is very helpful and knowledgeable. There is never any pressure to buy. Great place to shop and get helpful information. I highly recommend Mesa Hydroponics, a friendly place to shop.
Kristie, the property manager, has always been a great help. I have used this location for over two years and I feel that she is a trustworthy and hard working individual. She always remembers me and I would say that this is quality service. Plus, she always has a great smile which means, a great attitude.
Had our wedding here, the place was gorgeous and the staff was amazing. Together they made our day perfect!
None
They were awesome!!! The guys were polite and kind. They got our ducts cleaned as well as our carpets :D They worked fast, and got the job done right! I will definitely recommend them. :D
None
I took my Timberland boots to this shop to have them cleaned. I was amazed at how they turned out. They were good as new !!!!
Buenisimo
None
I can't say enough great things about Dr. King and Jen!! They are knowledgeable, friendly, and very accommodating.
LOVE LOVE LOVE...I can't get enough. Their pizza is utterly delicious. Restaurant is family-friendly and it's awesome to dine in for special occasions. My favorites: Mopsy’s Kalua Pork Pie and Vegan. Also, their staff are beyond kind and helpful. They truly know how to treat their patrons.
Great experience! From the time I walked in I felt right at home. The staff and Dr. Perison are all simply wonderful! Very friendly, personable atmosphere and the staff are all thorough, making sure you leave fully-informed. Definitely would recommend!
I acutally enjoy coming to this dentist office! The assistant & front desk are so friendly & always so concerned with my needs & well being. I had major sensitivity to sweets & a previous doctor told me that I just needed to use sensodyne toothpaste. I'm so happy I came & received a second look from Dr. Lousignont because I ended up needing a root canal! The crown they put on matches perfectly & you can't even tell it's fake. I'd HIGHLY recommend this office/company to any one looking for general or cosmetic dentistry.
Eggcellent staff, great product selection, fun group runs!
I have been going to Dr. Andresen at Andresen Active Healthcare for one year and I am very happy at this practice. They are very flexible and accommodating in terms of scheduling - I am able to make same-day appointments. The office is well-equipped, welcoming and clean. The staff is always very friendly. Dr. Andresen himself is the ultimate professional and very in-tune with the needs of his patients. It's a no-pressure practice - Dr. Andresen doesn't push package "deals" or treatments you don't need, like other chiropractors sometimes do. Dr. Andresen treated me when I was pregnant (from about 22-37 weeks) and has also treated my infant daughter, so I really trust him. The optional hour-long massages are heavenly and a great value.
This place has it all! Nice quiet camping sites, both for tenters & those with campers; lots of activities for the kids; amenities for adults, even a kafe!
None
Shane is the pimp master of pizza.
Very nice park for walking, relaxing and gazing at the buffalo
Just finished my first commute to work in my new 2013 Passat TDI, and got 50 mpg! I can't say enough how pleasant the buying experience was. Non confrontational and very straight forward. If they said it, they did it. I give my highest recommendation to Brian in sales and Luis in the business office. Both are a credit to VW and to Fitzgerald. Thanks again.
Rhodes Auto Sales is a great Dealership. I have several friends I have sent there and the always thank me for referring them. In my opinion they are the best buy here pay here dealership in Houston. A lot of in house financing dealerships treat the customers poorly, but not Rhodes Auto Sales. The owner started out at Lexus and makes sure that all of his staff treat the customers just like they were customers at Lexus. Rhodes Auto Sales is the best in house financing dealership in Houston in my book. Thank you Rhodes Auto Sales!
FOB Saint Louis is one of the best Boutiques in St Louis. For floral, home décor, furniture, jewelry and gifts it provides a wide selection and a satisfied customer. Kay Wallace is warm, friendly and most helpful. When you walk in this wonderland you eyes will be darting all over the place looking at all the inviting goodies. You will be greeted with a cheery hello and offered assistance or the joy of browsing. Don't miss this experience, you won't regret it and will want to return many more times.
I've been going to Dr. Berry and this location for almost ten years now. He is a great at what he does and I've always had a nice experience coming here. The staff is amiable and professional.
Food was amazing, manager seated us and since we had never been they took the time to walk us through the process. I wish they had one in Lewisville / Flower Mound.
i lived there before it became a school.
Brian is very knowledgeable and helpful. Thanks for answering all of my questioms.
Super easy to buy, fast delivery and very well packed
I've had a good experience with Metropolis to date. They are friendly and knowledgeable. I've just passed my full bike test with them inside ten days, four days intensive for Module I and a two day course for Module II. I had three different trainers during this time - Chris, Pedro and Mark. Each had a different style but all were helpful, friendly and full of useful information on how to pass. I really couldn't fault them. I've also just purchased a new Honda NC from Sean in sales, he was very helpful in suggesting the right bike for my needs; even kept it to one side for a month whilst I tested. I've been a scooter rider for a year and have used Metropolis service department for oil changes, manufacturers recall and to fit an apron, all completed on time and to a high standard. I suppose the best thing about Metropolis is their massive range of stock and disciplines, it really is a one stop shop for all your biking needs. Don't be put off by a few poor reviews; these guys really know what they're doing.
Wonderfull experiance. Food was good and prices resonable..
Approximately 6 months ago I bought a GMC pick up truck from Premier Motor Group. They were great to deal with and sold me a truck that runs very well and has needed no work since I purchased it. They sold me the truck at a fair price and I have not had any regrets. When the time comes to buy another vehicle, I will return to Premier Motor Group, with out any hesitation. They always seem to have a nice selection of used cars and trucks and they are fairly priced.
Excellent service and really help my shop.
I love going! If I don't go, it feels like I am missing out! :) A great way to "end" the summer...
I took my boyfriend out for lunch to SP Kebab and we were both so impressed by the excellent quality of food and service. My boyfriend lives in New York and has pretty high standards for restaurants. He said it was the best kebab he's ever eaten. I normally don't write reviews for places, but I would recommend SP Kebab to everyone!
None
Judy is awesome! She knows just about everything you need to know about Hatton Garden Jewellery. She is so helpful when I needed a certain jewellery repair but was coming up empty handed. Now all fixed
About as close to good Mexican in the States that we've found in Germany. The complimentary frozen strawberry margarita shot was a nice touch. We will definitely be back.
I chose Heart 2 Heart halfway through my pregnancy when my husband and I decided to go all natural. I was so thankful for the knowledgeable and caring attention of the midwives and support staff. I looked forward to every appointment, and I felt more like family than a patient. I do not have a single negative memory as I look back on my labor and delivery. They took great care of me and baby, and my husband was welcomed and encouraged to participate in the process. I will be using Heart 2 Heart when it is time for baby #2.
The staff at Somer Dental has been the finest lot of people I have come across in a long time. I was seen promptly, and care was given to ensure I was comfortable even though I had to be seen urgently for a painful situation. My appointment was made last minute, and I can't thank them enough for being so understanding and genuinely kind.
The coaches at CrossFit Vic know coaching like no one else. Years of athletics and personal training were redefined to a new level of excellence. Highly recommend the coaches at CF Victoria if you find yourself looking for training in Melbourne!
An exceptional healthcare practice. As a person who is in healthcare industry I can appreciate the way Dr. Esposito and Dr. Olivera run their practice. Great care. Great service. I also like the fact that the practice is always on the cutting edge of the latest treatments in pain care as well as general well being. I refer anyone who needs their services in North Jersey to ARJC.
None
None
None
Dr. Sampson is excellent at what he does. He not only works with bones, but also the underlying cause. As a massage therapist, I highly recommend him!
I met with Tony, Bruce and the rest of the staff recently and I was very impressed with them and the work they do. No matter if you need a windshield repaired or any type of auto glass replaced, professional window tinting, sound system installed or an auto start for your vehicle for those cold mornings they have you covered. They even tint exotic cars as well.
Outstanding experience! As my wife and I walked up, there was a nice lady making fresh tortillas near the entrance. We were seated and promptly brought warm fresh tortillas, salsa and our drinks. I had enchiladas and my wife had the seafood fajitas. Both of us really enjoyed our meals! Tony (our server) was awesome and kept our drinks full and kept bringing us freshly made tortillas. We will definitely be back again! Only bad thing could be parking, but that is common in that part of town.
Best sushi in town, great happy hour and the beer selection rocks. Look for the beer specialty Friday night events, especially if you like IPAs.
Maybe the BEST car buying experience I've had! I found an incredible deal on a brand new car just by going to the web site. They honored what I thought was a lost leader and did not try to up-sell at all. In and out in no time, no haggle, great service, and they followed up with me in less than a week. Highly recommended!!
None
What a great night we had last night at Sardi's, I understand why it is famous the world over.
The most professional, curteous family run wrecker service I have had the pleasure to deal with. HIGHLY RECOMEND!!
I just went to this place for the first time last night and it was great! Really good atmosphere, staff was busy but were pleasant and the food was to die for! I had the ribs and they had plenty of meat on them. Their sauce was great (I had the texas pit sauce) and so was the potato salad (a personal favorite). Highly recommend!
I went for brunch today with a group and it was a great experience for all. Four of us were first timers at Blue Hill, the other two repeat customers. I had the breakfast tostada and it was really good and really filling. I tasted the potato soup which was great as well. The table shared an order of Pumpkin Fritters at the end of the meal - yum! Still warm and accompanied by a dipping sauce - I definitely recommend them. The decor was beautiful - I love the blue & brown. I'm looking forward to returning soon to try out the rest of the menu.
Really chill atmosphere, the girls are really friendly. Plenty of beautiful black women!!!! Love this spot nice little hole in the wall. $10 cover charge. BYOB and no dress code
Lo mejor de todas las gasolineras
My children and I use to go through Oak Creek Canyon in the late 1980s and the 1990s traveling to and from Parker, AZ. The entire canyon area was a splendid example of God's generosity toward His creation! The slide rock area the first time I found it was like a fantasy! That was way back before the parking lots and then the State Park title was bestowed and removed much of the magic from the area!! We all remember our side trips to Oak Creek as wonderful adventures, especially the times we camped and relaxed near the Creek. For those who have come after, well, they just can't truly experience slide rock or the Canyon... Now It is 'civilized' and has a 'price' on what was once free... Too bad! Same think for Jerome, AZ! What a mecca it too was at one time!!
Great service at a great price!
Pure Ink is THE PLACE to go for your tattoo. Whether it's your first or your 100th, these guys are talented, professional, have an awesome sense of humor and know how to run a successful business! I have had 2 tattoo's done by Danny Pain and am planning to have my 3rd done by him again at the end of January. If you want an amazing experience, see this talented team of artists. You won't be disappointed! Thank you Danny and the Pure Ink team for a great experience! I can't wait to see you guys again in a few weeks!
Dave is an excellent photographer and true professional. I would recommend him to anyone planning their wedding.
A beautiful place of worship. The members are kind and friendly, and always waiting with helping hands. The ambience is wonderful, and there are many activities they put on throughout the year, like the nativity pageant at christmas time, summer camps for young men and women, winter camps for the young men, service projects with the men and women's groups. Stop by and say hello on a Sunday if you're around, you won't regret it.
Morton's Moo has excellent home made ice cream. Best ice cream I've had in DownEast Maine.
None
Can't say enough great things about this place. I had just gone to get my eyes checked this morning, after a lazy 5 years of not doing so, at a different optician who prescribed me very expensive Astigmatism contacts for each eye. I had only called this place to check if they had them in stock and the price, just to shop around a bit since they were so pricey. I spoke with Floyd on the phone and after a short chat he invited me down to help me find the right contacts. After he spent some time with me checking my eyes again, he explained that I would actually be fine with regular contacts and had the perfect fit the first time i tried them on. He ended up saving me about 150 dollars, and didn't even charge me extra for spending the time with me and being so extremely helpful and informative. You can really tell that they are more concerned about your eye health and the perfect prescription rather than making another quick buck. I will keep going here as long as i need anything for my eyes. Thanks Floyd!
Last I had food here was six years ago. I can't wait to again have their meat lasagna---I haven't found anything like that anywhere else! ----- Hace seis años que no como aca, pero no puedo olvidar su lasaña de carne. No he encontrado nada parecido. Actualizare este review cuando vuelva a este lugar.
7 girlfriends and I booked a table last Friday night for a few cocktails during happy hour. We loved how personable the staff was considering how busy the bar was, service was very good. Our table was at the very back of the bar which allowed us to have our own little corner but still were able to interact with others. I will admit, we were jealous of the birthday party guests and their hats and poppers. Will definitely be booking for parties in the future.
None
A true cinema experience. If you want the huge emotionally cold buildings with bad parking then the multiplexes are for you. If you want a human experience with quirky presentation. I highly recommend!! And Go out for tea in Woodhall Spa before hand!!
Kan alltid lita på att MediaMarkt har det jag letar efter. När man en dag kommer på en elektonikvara som behövs är MediaMarkt det första som dyker upp i mitt huvud.
Friendly peolple o
Mark & "new guy" Dan came to take care of our large living/dining room area for now and give me pricing for the rest of the house. I was skeptical and thought I'd be a "we did the best we could" experience for them. The house is a rental, and the carpet was in bad shape when we moved in with a 5 yr old and 2 dogs. WOW...just...WOW! I am in shock. I plan on laying on the carpet for much of the evening...just because I can. Oh, and that's not even touching on the fantastic punctuality, how QUICK the cleaning was, and how professional, thorough, and concerned the guys were. I would give TEN stars if I had the option!
Great staff and atmosphere. I really like the fish fry and salad bar has great soups. You can watch trains go by while you eat, and they have a full size bar. Nice place...
Best food in town.
I was on vacation and the skis I brought were under-performing. The only store in town that I could find that sells AT and Telemark gear was this place. I went in at 4:30 pm and Doug worked out a great price for me. Rich and Laughlin got them mounted waxed and ready to go the same night. Great service, pleasant people and good selection. These guys salvaged my ski vacation. Thanks.
Surprisingly good to go place to eat!
Very nice property located in the city center of St George with the big plus of having more than adequate free parking. Our room was nicely appointed with free high speed internet. The included breakfast was very good. The property has both an indoor and outdoor pool. Check-in was fast, efficient and courteous. From this location you can easily walk to many of the historical sites and there are many restaurants to choose from. The price makes this property a very good choice.
The new Tesco Watford store blows every other UK supermarket out of the water! Sainsburys, Morrisons, Asda, Lidl etc etc - they all look like backstreet dumps imo compared to the newlook Tesco Extra. The US has been an expensive detour, but I suspect that Tesco has learnt a thing or two from our American cousins. Not such a disaster after all, perhaps.
Its the best sports bar in bangkok that I've found. Loads of screens, plenty of food and proper beer and ale as well!
None
I had dinner here the other night. It was really busy, but the service and food was great. No complaints at all.
Nonsense on the dirty review below-- don't know what Blondie0023 experinced, but I have been there many times and it's totally clean. Great local bar and food. Great prices and service.
Carbon Bar is an all around classy joint! Walking into the space I immediately asked the hostess "What used to be in this building?" To my surprise learnt that it used to house the original Electric Circus Nightclub, CityTV and a dance recital hall for Disney's cruise ships! The new hip restaurant pays tribute to each past tenant in creative ways ;) Heavy on the meat dishes, Carbon Bar has a packed menu with everything from a beef cheek burger to mushroom and grits! The beer selection is fun with local and imported offerings galore. My fav however was the peanut slaw side that my buddies and I shared. It had the perfect crunch and zing to compliment our dinners. The icing on the cake was the rib samples that arrived at our table...compliments of the chef of course. Even though I don't eat meat, twas a nice gesture!
I went to GL Ford to speak with a Sales Associate to get discuss my options once I returned by car to Courtesy Ford. The minute I walked into the building I was treated with the best customer service since Saturn of Okemos. The manager Chris came out and was talking with me while I was waiting for Rob to assist me. They offered me coffee and conversation. Rob Beckwith is an awesome sales associate he asked what I liked about my Fiesta and what I didn't and showed me a Focus I was not happy with the color then he showed me the sharpest ruby red 2014 focus hatchback ever! He had me at that point, he and his manager made me an offer I could not refuse and were the greatest team ever. I spoke with two other employees during my two day venture and they we as awesome as Rob. I think I have become a GL Ford lady; all they have to do now is wash my car and put a flower on my dash when I bring it in for service and that will be the frosting on the cake. Really go there and find our for yourself you will not be disappointed and don't forget to ask for Rob!
Ours was a complicated case involving the death of my father. He recieved a head injury due to a fall while in the care of a facility. Chris was so kind to my sister and mother and I . He led us throught this process and made it as easy as he could on our mother. The case got very complicated and ended in a 5 hour Arbitration. He informed us of every detail along the way and was there with us throughout the ordeal. My sister and I both commented that he would e-mail us at all times of the night with questions and we often wondered when he slept. In the end he tried to prepare us for all prospective out comes, and was as delighted as we were when the Arbitration ended in our favor. We could not be happier with our experience with Chris.
Consistency of quality makes it winner. Same taste all this years.
None
Can't get enough of this place! It is a little price and the portions might be a little smaller on some items that you're used to (but no smaller than actual tapas from Espana), but the quality and flavor is nothing short of amazing. Great place to bring friends from out of town to "show off" Asheville. Great wines too. Can't wait to come back!
Great place to have dinner, and then unwind at the bar listening to some great live music.
Excelente lugar de relax
Always a friendly atmosphere with wonderful food and drink specials. The employees will take care of you till the moment you leave, giving you a satisfying feeling. I highly recommend!
Pizza was delicious and service was excellent.
My husband and I recently worked with Leslie Vandivier of Reilly Realtors. As first time home buyers, we were very anxious about the process. Leslie managed to find us our dream home and guide us through the home buying process. She was there every step of the way, pointing us in the right direction. We will definetly return for any future real estate needs.
Alexanders is a wonderful family pub, with decent prices, fantastic food and an unbelievable location - right on the beach! Who could ask for more? The staff are uber friendly and make you feel like friends, without being overly imposing or hanging around your table every two seconds. When my husband sussed it out for the first time he told me that he had found his favourite pub in the whole world. Considering he's British, that's saying something!
Great, Easy
In my 45 years of driving, I have had 14 cars/vans of varying descriptions and sizes. Of those 14, 12 have seen the inside of All Weather Tire. I have ALWAYS recieved fair, quick, courteous service from the folks at All Weather. My family isn't allowed to go anywhere else! They also seem to be recognized throughout the Northeast.
My experience here has been excellent. Very helpful staff, everyone has been extremely pleasant. The entire process was quick and painless. I would definitely come back here to purchase another vehicle. I can't really describe how pleased I am with this place. I was surprised I got approved for a loan but you guys made it happen. I will defi9nitely recommend you guys to everyone I know.
The very knowledgable staff got me in and out quickly, with high quality prints.
Enviro USA are great to work with. Their staff is friendly, knowledgeable and professional. I have also found their prices to be some of the best in the Turbidity Barrier industry.
Peaceful and clean environment
I wave been looking for a great plumber to help us out with our home in Murrieta. I found Dana's Plumbing from a friend who had used them in the past and said they were an excellent plumbing contractor. I decided to give them a call. They showed up on time and got right to work. I had previously had another plumber come in to our house in Murrieta to do some drain cleaning. They only stayed for about 30 minutes and charged us for a full hour. With Dana's this was not the case. They had explained to me the root problem of my plumbing problems was some blocked up pipe passages and that if I did not replace the existing plumbing it would result in a burst pipe or possible flooding. They fixed the problem immediately and were very affordable. I highly recommend Dana's plumbing to anybody in the Murrieta and Temecula area.
Great time. Went here by chance staying in a nearby hotel. Awesome food, would like to try everything on the menu! We will go out of our way when we are on Hwy 80 to come back to this place. If you live in Suisun City or Fairfield, support this place!
I bought a 2008 BMW 528xi from Dave this past summer. Dave's knowledge of the various vehicles we discussed targeting to purchase, and his ability to locate the one that we landed on, was impressive. He really believes in providing a full service and personalized package. Dave was able to get me an extended warranty, which gave me peace of mind. The car itself was in mint condition and I love it. The price he sold it to me at was as good or better than all of the same cars that I researched on the internet. Dave will work hard to find you a great car at a great price. This takes a lot of the effort and stress out of the used car buying process for you, so I urge you to give him a try!
These guys are great.... They almost always have everyting I need in stock. If they have to special order it usually it's there within 24 hours. I've been buying from them for years.
I love this place I go here all the time and visit my friend who works there it's a great place you should try it they have all kinds of different foods and lots of different foods to try. Everyone else on here is just like this is some little gay bar but its more than that men don't even start dancing at there until like 9 o'clock for the rest of the time before that its just the family fun place
None
Excelente memo Morán Rodríguez
Just ate here with my wife and 4 children....it can be an adventure eating out with this many kids but the staff was amazing and the food was delicious. The staff went above and beyond! Thank you for he delicious breakfast!
My girlfriends and I rented The Cabin for the Christmas weekend last year. The Cabin is situated right next to a beautiful creek, and it had a hot tube (a requirement for a girl's weekend!). We had a great time hiking the trails around the cabin (it was a mild winter), stilling around a campfire and celebrating the holiday in true country fashion! All in all it was peaceful and relaxing and a great opportunity for us girls, who live in separate states, to re-connect and make some great new memories!
I have been to two other body shops here in Yakima and was not satisfied with my experience so I just popped in to get one more estimate on my truck (which is 12 years old by the way). L.P. gave me the best estimate of the other body shops so I decided to try them. I also asked them to buff my entire truck afterwards. I couldn't believe my eyes after I got my vehicle back. I had several of my people at work ask me, "did you get new rims on your truck" and "did you get it painted?" A great body shop and I will also let you know I went back a second time for my wife's car and they did just as well.
We recently bought a 2013 Hyundai Elantra from this dealership. At first, our experience was not pleasant due to the salesperson. Had we not already put down a deposit on a vehicle we had ordered, we would have take our business somewhere else. We went to the management to discuss what was happening and the management team, led by Sales Manager Ariel, could not have been more helpful. Since we were expecting to have the vehicle on a certain date, and had made arrangements based on that, they made sure we had a courtesy car to use until our car arrived. Ariel addressed all of our concerns and made it right. His customer service was top notch. He was respectful and helpful throughout our car-buying experience. Despite our issue with the salesperson, we are giving this 5 stars because Ariel really went above and beyond. We're glad we stayed with this dealership and we have no hesitations in recommending buying a car from Ariel. Also, we love our new Hyundai!
When I want to be pampered and just feel luxurious, this is the place I like to come to. The massages are fantastic! I don't know how you can be completely relaxed and rejuvenated at the same time. When you are done, relax in the lounge with a cup of tea and enjoy the ambient music. Lovely experience every time.
I travel almost 200 miles to Bird Farm for my meat. Best meat I have ever had. I am gluten intolerant now and can only have grass fed meats. Bird Farm is worth the travel for me.
I love, love, love Zadi at Sweethread! Before I found her my eyebrows were irritated from waxing and my face was a broken out mess. I see her every two weeks and could not be happier with the results. My eyebrows are always beautifully shaped and my face is smooth and glowing. Thank you, Zadi, for your amazing skills!!!
Just pure, "Googlicious Love" here.
They tripled my customer base from last year. currently over 70% of my new customers come from the internet and that's thanks to Bert! Thanks!
Great RV park to stay at if visiting OC or Disneyland. Bathrooms were clean & each had it's own private toilet, sink & shower. Grounds were kept up very nicely & clean. Office staff is very pleasant & helpful. Has shuttle stop to Disneyland Resort & many other attractions. You get complimentary muffins, coffee & newspaper each morning of your stay. Nice & quiet.
Comida mexicana de verdad, picante y sabrosa. El servicio bueno, es un lugar pequeño, y normlamente lleno de gente, lo cual de seguridad y sensación de que la gente frecuenta el lugar ya que el ambiente es bueno y por supuesto la comida también. Restaurante de referencia en Berlín si se quiere comer comida mexicana como si en México se estuviera.
None
Had the All You Can Eat Buffet. Great value, fantastic food and excellent service - thanks for a great meal, will be coming back soon.
They were amazing. From the start they greeted with a smile and did everything they could to get me what I wanted. By the way Barb was great because I am not easy to please, I bet I had her pull every ring out of the cabinet and she never blinked an eye. And Ashley you were amazing and I do think you from the bottom of my heart for the huge favor you did for me. Thank you to you all and I will be back.
Faith Redemption Center is an excellent place to worship and fellowship with People who really love God, His Word, and others. Worship services are vibrant and heartfelt, while the speakers there minister directly from the Bible. The FRC family is Pentecostal in nature, and conveys a deep belief in the power and necessity of the Holy Spirit, which effected the resurrection and empowers believers today to live Godly in this present world. Superintendent Clyde Jones Jr. and 1st Lady Missionary Barbara A. Jones founded the FRC ministry in 1987, and although they have moved to a much larger Church Building, It continues to be a "Spirit Filled" "family oriented" Church where the Love of Christ is richly felt and shared. The Faith Redemption Center has a saying..."Once you have walked with us, You have truly walked in Faith." Come visit the FRC family for a joyous time in the Lord.
They are prompt, knowledgeable, and have excellent customer service! Safelite is the best!
I love this in out. Lots of parking. Great employees. And great food
Mauricios is our favorite restaurant in Cookeville and most likely our favorite anywhere. We have celebrated anniversaries , birthdays or just enjoyed a date night here. The food is delicious, the ambiance is inviting and comfortable. The owners and staff are gracious and very accomodating. I highly recommend Mauricios, for any ocassion or to show off Cookeville to out of towners!
SueAnn has transformed my hair from senior citizen style to an easy to manage style with flair. I like that the Sublime experience is more than just a hair cut for me. It is a time to step into a special place and have my stylist really listen to the concerns I have about my hair. The atmosphere is upscale, but not snooty....welcoming to all kinds of customers. Bumble products are the best! Courtney helped me pay out - She is courteous and worked skillfully to set up future appointments.
Excellent food and perfect service at good price.
The 22nd annual Burnham Donkey Derby was held in Burnham Park on Saturday the 25th of May 2013 and attended by about 4,000 people. Organised by the Rotary Club of Burnham Beeches, the event featured a host of stalls, funfair rides and games to keep everyone entertained, with proceeds from the day donated to a host of charities including Marie Curie Cancer Care and the Alexander Devine Children's Hospice Service. JoAnne Good & Anna Webb aka the Barking Blondes opened our special day this year and the centrepiece of the afternoon's activities was a special arena where a range of donkey races took place while members of the public took a punt on who would win. The animals were kept busy throughout the day as children queued up for donkey rides, while a falconry show by Xtreme Falconry and Bollywood dancing from the Dancing Nikita Company provided entertainment between races. The Rotary Club of Burnham Beeches and all our stallholders would like to thank all the members of the public that came out to enjoy the Burnham Donkey Derby! We hope to see you again in 2014!﻿
Peaceful...
I live for Mexican food and eat it constantly when we go out. I've tried many places from Texas city to league city. This is by far my favorite! Before this, nothing beat going to San Antonio for Mi Tierra...but this restaurant is just as good! The food is excellent...margaritas amazing... and the staff is stupendous! We know the waiters, waitresses, and other staff by name now, they know what we like, and are prompt to make sure we haven't changed our minds for that day then get everything out to us in great time. Bar section in front is smoking so i love going there since its one of the few places i can still have Margaritas and smoke without having to go outside. They don't make you feel Rushed there... we usually spend a good hour and a half with them about once a week.
Went in to just ask a few questions about a tune up and the guys were very helpful and willing to share information. I will be taking in my wife's bike in for a tune up soon!
I personally eat at Emo's once a week. I love this style of pizza. I get the Lunch Special: veggie pizza (no tomatoes), 1/2 salad, and a drink. ($9.00 before 4pm). I never get tired of this and look forward to my one day at Emo's. And the staff when I go is very friendly, of course they are busy making pizzas to go, but I manage to get their attention by talking to them first. The manager always has time to sit and talk awhile. (He's a very young man and I am closing in on 60 so I am not a young pretty thing someone would hit on believe me. It's just a friendly little place. Since there is NO ALCOHOL, it is a kid friendly place. So take your kids.......for a great experience. PIZZA YEAH!
AMP is an amazing company! Best stats in the industry. If you are looking for a great job this summer or a great alarm company--AMP Security is the way to go! I have greatly enjoyed my employment with them. The owners are men of their word and will bend over backwards to make sure that they provide you the best opportunity and program to succeed in. I would highly recommend AMP Security to anyone! A ++++
My favorite used bookstore in town. While studying at Western, I often frequented Michael's rather than pay the exhorbitant campus bookstore rates. Their selection is good, the layout is easy to navigate, the staff is extremely friendly and knowledgeable, and I always walked out with at least two books I hand't planned on buying. Also, as a bonus, they have a free pile that turns up the occasional gem--I once found a book by Rudyard Kipling that had been published in 1912! Michael's specializes in BOOKS, so if you're expecting the sort of accoutrements (read: JUNK) that other places display to augment their collections, you should look another place.
None
None
If there is anyone who has a fear of the Dentist, they should go here. Their fears will all be laid to rest. I have had two major procedures that I thought would leave me in pain. The dentist and assistant told me I might be in a little bit of pain when leaving the office. Both times, I went home pain free. No pain while there, no lingering pain after. The ENTIRE staff is very friendly. Not just customer service polite, but actually friendly. Dr. Collier is friendly and straightforward. I do not ever feel as if I am being told I need something done just because it is going to add to the bill. If they tell me I need something done, they explain exactly why and what it takes to have it done. The reception area is always clean and neat and comfy (though I have never spent much time there). The exam rooms are clean and neat. The assistant or receptionist always asks if I want the TV on a certain channel. I would recommend Dr. Collier to everyone.
I had a great experience and would recommend anyone here. James Oldham was my salesman and I also recommend him. He worked with me on what I was looking for, and made sure I was happy with everything even after he made the sale. If you want a fast, easy, pain less, and great experience go to Greenway Ford and see James Oldham.
I have reviewed the Channel Guest House on my website
Eigen is the "go to" shop in Paisley for stylish, quality interior accessories for your home. Established in 1995, the business continues to grow and is located on the High Street, opposite Paisley Museum. The owners and staff are very knowledgeable, friendly and provide top rate customer service. (You will find a selection of beautiful Harris Tweed Clocks in store!)
I get carry out a few times a month from here and everything has been quite delicious. Great mix of food and very nice owners.
It's the best diagnostic centre as per my opinion. Thanks to Dr. Venkatappa sir.
Excellent service from excellent people. I had all four of my wisdoms extracted and had heard horror stories of the pain and discomfort. Not only did I not have any pain thanks to the masterful precision of the doctor, but he also did the surgery on his day off. The follow up was also very quick and took virtually no time out of my day. All in all I'm very impressed and would recommend there services to anyone seeking top notch dential and oral surgery.
William Powell took excellent care of us! I would recommend him to anyone. Ask for him when you go to purchase your new care. You wont' regret it. He was informative, up front and catered to our every need. This is my second purchase at Hawkinson Kia and it was just as good as the first time. We were even recommending more people as soon as we got home with our new car. Which is a 2013 Kia Optima. Absolutely love it! Everyone at this dealership is extremely friendly and very helpful. Fun place to be at while you are waiting. Even the other salesman were helping and talking to us between their customer's. We never felt forgotten or neglected. Excellent kudos to William and Hawkinson Kia.
We've been bringing our cats here for ten years. I recommend their services highly. All three vets are excellent and the office staff is friendly and accommodating. After reading some of the other reviews, I especially wanted to add something about my family's excellent experiences with Dr. Swann. Dr. Swann is the vet who usually sees our cats and he's always gentle, thorough, and very helpful with my questions. When our 19-year-old kitty had to be put to sleep after years of being treated for renal failure, Dr. Swann let us stay with him and hold him throughout the procedure and gave my husband and me time alone with him both before afterwards to say our goodbyes. He and his staff even helped us make arrangements for cremation. When we pulled ourselves together and went to check out, we were grateful and astonished to find out that there was no charge. A few days later Dr. Swann sent us a book about grieving for a pet, along with a lovely hand-written letter reassuring us that the extra care we'd given our cat had added two good years to his life. That's the kind of personalized service one rarely finds these days, and one of the reasons we love Dr. Swann and The Vet House.
None
We got our initial pest control visit on 5/14 and not only was Donald Fleming quick and efficient he was very courteous and took the time out to explain everything in detail. My husband (Ricardo) and I were very impressed with the service provided by the Alterra employees.
Best Ice Cream shop around! Love the atmosphere, and the flavors are incredibly creative. Great place!!
One of the best schools in kgf .. Have lots of memories there ..
The best food palace
Mike is outstanding. He's done our house inside and out. Perfection is his middle name. On time, On Budget, and quality paint and results. Mike and his team made the whole process easy, They are very clean... No over-spray anywhere, and took care of our flowers and shrubs. I appreciate the little things he did. The scraping, caulking, the priming, made the house look amazing... Thank You Mike.
Best of da best
An amazing family dental practice with the most genuine and caring staff you can expect. I'm told they have patients that drive in from Washington, Oregon, and Nevada for dental care. Once you meet them, you'll understand why.
None
Great American food. Excellent and friendly service.
Excellent service, fast and reliable. We chose Emergicare because it was the only one we found to be opened until 9 pm on Friday. The waiting time was 15 minutes; test results (strep throat) took around 10 minutes; purchased medicine at their facility, very convenient. Dr. Beecroft was very polite and great with both of my children.
John H. did a great job explaining what was needed and completed the job quickly and with no mess. Very good experience.
None
Wow- we have been in our new home for a month now and are extremely happy that we chose Danny to help us through this process. He stuck by us over the last year as we slowly narrowed our search toward the perfect house. We felt as though we were dragging Danny around the metro with the many (30? 50? I lost count!) homes we wished to see throughout our search, but he was always positive and made us feel like we were his only clients at the time. Danny went (as others have said) above and beyond our expectations. If he couldn't answer our phone call he would check back with us almost immediately. He listened to our concerns and worked hard to get the various offers we made ready within hours. We will without a doubt be checking back with Danny for future real estate business.
LOVE this place. All of the staff are so nice and friendly. Everything is so new and clean. I have had nothing but great experiences here. DDS Kapadia is the nicest lady you'll ever meet and every visit is personal. She remembers you and your stories, asks about your family, etc... She's also GREAT at what she does. Cavity fillings are no longer scary; she makes them a breeze! Even after we moved 30 minutes away, I was unwilling to find a new dentist. Kirk Family Dentistry is worth the drive!
Serving quality and taste
Dr. Brooks at Brooks Chiropractic was amazing! He is very kind and caring and has the unique ability to make you feel right at home. I started seeing Dr. Brooks for headaches that had persisted for as long as I can remember and within a few treatments I was feeling great. Thanks for your help!
Best Authentic Mexican in the area! Love the Adobada!
Visited last night with 4 friends. Very nice ambiance, friendly staff and great food. Thouroughly recommended.
Nice, professional atmosphere. Easy in and out service, needed fingerprints for my real estate license which had to be done twice and both times, I was the only person being helped and the 2nd time, no charge!
Our first visit, definitely wasn't our last. Great flavor selections, and awesome toppings. Whenever we're craving something sweet after lunch or work, this Yopop is our place. Definitely enjoy the variety of flavor options, and typical toppings available. You can't go wrong here.
The service at Tibbitts is outstanding. I had to have my car towed, they had the tow truck out quickly and my car serviced by the next day. The staff is very friendly and the repair costs are very reasonable.
Zamek jest bardzo ładny, położony na wzgórzu. Pięknie prezentuje się od strony odkrytych basenów. Polecam spanie w pensjonacie przy rondzie w Bojnicach. Wspaniała okolica i bardzo ciepły klimat.
None
While visiting Port St. Lucie, Florida we were looking for a place to get some pizza. We asked someone for a recommendation and she suggested Frank and Al's. We were very happy we tried them. They have great NY style pizza with an exceptional crust and the pizza was nice and hot when it came to our table.
I went to Woodbury Dental after I decided to look for a new dental clinic. The entire operation from the moment I walked in the door until the time I left was ultra positive. I had three kids with, who loved the lobby play place so much that they didn't want to leave. The technician was very easy to talk to, and did a great job with my cleaning. The entire office is very clean and comfortable, as well as technologically advanced. All the staff was very personable. We will definitely be back!!
THANK YOU!!! I appreciate all that you did with my car AND gave me an affordable price. You went over and beyond to help me out. You're honesty, trustworthiness and fine work will not go unmentioned! I'm passing the word. The truck is running like a dream....Finally! No more vibration, no pulling, no rubbing sounds. Wish I came to you guys first. You guys are great! Ron’s Automotive has been the most affordable, honest, knowledgeable, repair facility for all my vehicles domestic and import.
The best place for shoping
None
Brian K. came by this morning, he was very courteous, informed me of what he was going to do, asked if we had any special concerns. He stayed for a good half-hour, checking around, removing cobwebs and applying products. It seems to me he did a very thorough job. We've been using Alterra for a little bit over a year now and have been very pleased with the service.
Friendly people who try to get you what you want. New construction, so interior is nice. Parking is limited, strange parking lot arrangement. Site is also difficult to get to. New ownership has staff come into dining area to offer to get refills or whatever for you. New chef-style uniforms make them look higher grade.
When we moved recently our mortgage broker recommended Ben at Cottonwood Insurance. We figured it wouldn't hurt to get some quotes. Ben promptly gave us quotes that were better than anything else we had found. We were very pleased. His service didn't stop with selling the policy - my wife was recently involved in an accident and Ben helped facilitate the claim with Mutual of Enumclaw Insurance. Her car was totaled and I had lots of people telling me horror stories of bad settlements, etc. Both Ben and Mutual of Enumclaw couldn't have been easier to work with. I hope we don't ever have to use our policies like this again, but if so, I'm confident we'll get the service we need. I highly recommend Ben Bagley and Cottonwood Insurance!
I love this open space. Fields to run in, ponds to swim in, forest and hills to hike. Lovely all around and many other dogs for socializing.
Great bnb. Mary and her husband were extremely friendly and accommodating ( especially since we had nowhere booked on a very wet night in high season) We got their last room which was a family room. it consisted of 2 double beds and a single , great size. Would highly recommend.
Melody has done our taxes for 3 straight years now, she is very thorough and very professional. She does a great job and has always taken the time to explain everything. I would highly recommend AAA Tax Services.
My beautiful relationship with Peter and Traci began a little more than two years ago. I was traumatized and truly clueless when it came to dealing with a car crash let alone an entire trial to follow; Peter and Traci were enthusiastic, supportive, and clear. P&T would break things down for me; primarily the law mumbo jumbo that went straight over my head. They were always positive but never tried to sugar coat any possible rough realities, which I deeply appreciated. I quickly bonded with the Anderson team and felt comfortable depicting my opinions and emotions. When the day came to physically go to trial I was beside myself with fear and apprehension. I do not think I could have walked in the court room had it not been for Traci and Peter's coaching. We practiced and mocked the trial process, they told me what sort of feelings to expect and not be surprised about, and they provided me with a few gizmos to calm myself incase my nerves went haywire! I could not thank Peter, Traci, and Kim enough; I am confident that no better people could have taken care of me during such an intense process! Love you all!
“I got lucky and stumbled across your demo day at Walker with a bunch of bikes you all had setup to test ride. It was an amazing day to try new bikes and see what worked for me and my riding style. I didn't wind up buying anything but everyone was very helpful and I will wind up buying a bunch of parts to setup my current bikes better after riding the bikes you had setup. Great fun! ”
Hot Hot Hot wings yum
Very pleased, nice and professional! Clean carpet while I at work and was blown away when I came home! Best deal in town!
S&S was great from start to finish everything was easy. They worked with me on price and I was able to get the deal that I wanted. I highly recommend them and look forward to enjoy this car for years to come. Call and ask for Nick! 04 Lexus is300
LOCAL MAGNIFICO FIQUEI ENCANTADO VALE APENA. APAIXONANTE!!!!!
None
None
Always a great selection, with awesome employees. I live right down the street from Gator Cycle, so it's the most convenient bike store in Gainesville for me. Luckily, it is also one of, if not the best, shops in town. They staff is extremely knowledgable and has always helped me out, from buying lights to getting new locks or even fixing up my bike. If you ever need to buy something for your bike, or need help fixing something, then don't hesitate to hit up Gator Cycle!
Noman, Amber, and Soo were incredible customer service representatives. They made my birthday, which I didn't even bring up, memorable. They gave me free drinks, let all my co-workers know, and made me feel special. Those three made me a Crowne fan for life.
wish i was theereeeeeeeeee
I bought my Prius over 2 years ago at Toyota of Hollywood and I've been getting service there ever since. My service manager Victor Oajaca is the best! He's always friendly and makes sure that I am getting the best deal. The service is fast at Toyota of Hollywood and I am always more than satisfied! I love my Prius so much and I feel safe because my car gets the care it needs.
Great in every aspects!!!
２０１３年１０月１５日友達と一緒に行った台北の中心にある焼き鳥屋。 日本の味と余り変わらないお店、美味しかった。 メニューが半分日本語半分中国語（焼き鳥の方は日本語だけど、メニューの後ろの方は中国語だけ）。 沖縄からの生オリオンビールもあるし。
Very good food all around! If they have Buffalo Calamari on special it is a must have! I love their fish tacos!
At elfara3na
Stopped in for a bite and was amazed with the freshness of the seafood and the quality of the service very friendly and helpful. I would definitely recommend this place.
Very hospitable managment, good facilities, and water/electricity at tent sites. Will return anytime I'm back up this way!
None
Actually used the University as a hotel when in Ottawa this past summer. Though there was lots of construction the staff were clear, the rooms were clean, the AC worked GREAT, the food system and the quality of the food was amazing. Highly recommend it for those holidaying in Ottawa. Lots of public transit access to the rest of the city including amazing bike paths that lead everywhere. Plus the Target has just opened up so if you want to prepare food in your rooms to keep costs down you have a stove, microwave, fridge and table with chairs separate from your sleeping areas. Ideal for families with TV lounges just down the hall. AND you get to watch the troops that do the changing of the guard practice cause they stay on campus.
good service . I was trying to book the ticket but my session expired but they called me booked the same seat. travel's owner was very kind and gentlemen, All staffs over there were good . The travel was very good.
Kim and the other yoga instructors have wonderful, spiritually based yoga that can be modified to your level. I highly recommend this studio
Great job with my 2010 Acura TL. He was fast and my car looks great. Thanks
The staff are kind, and the prices are much more reasonable than most salons in London. Now I know where I'll go for my next haircut.
None
I called them and in 1/2 hour their Electrician was at my door. 1 hour later all of my power was back on and my Mothers oxygen machine worked! They provided temporary power while doing the repair. This company cares about their customers.
Dr. Swift spends a great of time getting to know her patients. She does not simply look at symptoms, she looks at her patients' entire health histories. She leaves no stone unturned. She is warm, kind, and a great listener. As a result, she is able to prescribe treatment for the cause of most complaints, and when she can't, she refers patients to medical doctors.
This is such a gorgeous shop with so many beautiful books. I particularly love the kids' section with many older books in great nick. Lovely, helpful staff. Definitely recommend checking out this gem!
Small space big taste, I dont normally try new restaurant's that I find on google maps but im glad I tried this one. Eats good 33 isnt in the greatest location but dont let that deter you, this small restaurant had the best food ive had for long time. With a spanish-american theme eats good 33 try and stay on the healthy track with no fried food and very little butter. If your in the mood for a healthy and delicious meal than head over to good eats for some good eats.
None
None
dang fine pizza
Nice picture quality and sound system
My first experience of the Practice was last year when I put my back out. I could barely walk, but over the course of 5 sessions, Ian fixed the problems and my back is largely fine nowadays. I'm back in there at the moment having some work done on my neck & shoulders, and again the standard is fantastic. Ian's frankly a genius (and a top bloke to boot) - and the rest of the staff are welcoming & friendly. I would highly recommend the practice to anyone.
Sympa sur tt le wifi est part tts
I eat her quite regularly is its next to the office, very reasonably priced for the lunch time special, recommend the humorously named bums are hot, a spicy noodle dish.
Greek feta pizza is awesome!
I’m a single female who knows what I wanted and needed it in a very short period of time. My vehicle was totaled in early December; by the time I received the check from the insurance company – Christmas was within days. I needed an AWD vehicle with a remote control car starter. Those were my only two requirements. With the holidays quickly approaching, I was worried that a dealership wouldn’t be able to install the remote controller starter before I took the vehicle off the lot. I was wrong! The car was prepped and ready to go when I needed it! I walked in, completed all the paperwork and was on the road within less than an hour and it was late evening on a Friday night. Even though it was close to closing time – John, Fred and Roy were very professional and made sure I had all my answers before leaving the lot without feeling rushed.
Great service and friendly atmoshpere! Mr Duckworth understands what the service industry is all about!
My wife and I had a great experience purchasing our vehicle from Blade Chevy. We were able to get a great deal on our trade in with little to no negotiation. I would recomend Blade to anybody looking for a new or used car especially if you have a trade in.
Really great service, waitress was really nice and when my fiancee asked for fried clams even though they didn't have them on the menu we got them for a great deal. My wings were really good.
الله على زمن الملوك
None
We shop here every week, for tools, parts, supplies, and feed. The store saves us enormous amount of time, as opposed to driving into town, and the prices are reasonable and often lower than the big stores. Kevin Coe, the owner, is friendly and knowledgeable. He will special-order anything we need, and checks with customers about what stock to order for new seasons.
None
Andy is an excellent and capable instructor. A very informative class and small enough to really obtain hands on instruction. I highly recommend this class and absolutely loved the chocolate chip cookies that Andy's wife made!
This place is really good! Been here 3 times. Never a complaint except they should really think about expanding. They have plenty of customers!
None
Me and my family had to go for a local trip.I searched for limo service provider in the town and chose Dallas Limo 4 You because I found their fleet fantastic and also the charges were quite reasonable than others.We hired a Hummer and went to the trip last Sunday.I loved the complimentary soft drinks and bottled water.We are really happy with you guys for making our trip successful.Its all because of your help.Thank you very much.
accueil chaleureux, conseils avisés, choix et qualité.
Cross gates mall is the best
it's fast , friendly, professional...& just plain cool. Just walk right in & get a great cut and or shave... if you are a guy and you have not been to a Barber shop since you were a little kid (like me) I highly recommend you do so.
The staff at David Maus VW North Orlando is FABULOUS. I called and started with Hadi in sales who is FAB and he turned me over to Matt the Batt,sales manager, that knew I didn't have time for nonsense, Matt and David L, set everything up for me to come in and sign & drive. And Paola is kind and caring, she takes care of everything for you appointments, tickets to Universal , yes really!!!! The staff at David Maus Volkswagen has SWAG BABY.......
Excellent service, very accomodating and knowledgeable.
After doing much research on many vehicles, I found one that I wanted at Mark Christopher. I like the instant messaging on the website to chat with a sales person without picking up the phone. I got to ask about the vehicle I was interested in, and get my questions answered before travelling an hour and half to the dealership. Scott McDonough was very professional, low pressure and helped us through the process as quickly as possible on a busy holiday weekend. I would say that was the easiest car buying experience I have ever had. Thank you.
None
Great music and a great atmosphere! Drinks are a bit pricey but this really isn't that kind of place where you go to get drunk anyways. Its a place to just go chill, listen to good music and have fun.
This was an amazing rental cabin!! We rented it for the weekend so we could have our first vacation as a blended family. I have to say, AWESOME!! The cabin was clean, beautiful, spacious, and very well supplied. It was a home away from home. Our 14 yr old daughter even said "You can tell someone loves this cabin by how warm and inviting it is." Thank you Clear Sky Ridge for the awesome space and generous cabin. We will be back!
I gave the rating because the service department was superb. They were friendly, helpful, informative and gave me the best deal possible. I highly recommend Toyota Dublin dealer in California. amber
I was in town to volunteer for a Blue Skies retreat on behalf of families dealing with pediatric cancer. I stopped here with several volunteer on our first night in town. The food was delicious! I noticed that a few (not all) of the servers struggled to provide service in good English, but if you have the right attitude, that can add to the charm and the fun. Later, these guys demonstrated their commitment to their community by donating 100 servings of rice, beans, chips, and salsa for our guest and volunteer families to enjoy one night. I was very moved by this generosity and will support them as a customer whenever I am back!
None
These guys were right on time and extremely helpful. I expect to use them again for more spring cleaning.
I stopped by for lunch for the first time recently and the food was outstanding.
I love this place. I try to come here every day, this staff is friendly and the coffee is well made.
We were so excited to have a Thai restaurant in the neighborhood and then it turns out the food is really really good and the prices and portions are quite reasonable. We've done take out three times and every time it was fantastic. We've tried several other Thai restaurants around town and this is hands-down our favorite. Glad it is so close too.
None
None
matthew santmyers was very professional and courteous!!
One of the best pre school in bangalore with creative workshops for kids.
The staff were extremely attentive and very helpful. Would definitely recommend a visit when in Dubai !
I have had the honor and pleasure of working with Denise for 7 years. She is pleasant, reliable and extremely diligent in helping all of her co-workers with any task at hand. Denise always looks to take the initiative, offering her insight on how we can improve productivity within our office and maintain the highest level of patient care. I find Denise to be very professional and I know first hand that I can depend on her to be punctual and attentive to the needs of the patients and staff. She is a true asset to our team.
Best place in Skokie. Open late and a huge selection, they carry those pocket shot things which are great for concerts. And as far as I can tell they are the only liquor store in the area that is online, so good job Austin Liquors!
Been to several screenings at the new Drafthouse, Excellent food, great staff, nice theater lay out, and super fun events. Great atmosphere if you like movies (no bright cell phone screens, no whispering, and no screaming kids for most showings). ohh and beer . . beer and milkshakes.
Lovely Sunday evening oyster and octopus chorizo :)
My whole family has seen Dr. Patel, and we are all thrilled with her and the office staff. My children, husband, grandfather, and father in law, including myself,have all seen Dr. Patel for various things throughout the years and have nothing but good things to say. She made sure that every question was addressed and never felt rushed. I really appreciate that. I also liked that she can see all ages of my family from the kids to the grandparents. I recommend her to everyone I know. The staff is friendly and helpful which goes a long way with me.
I had read about the battery issue, so I wasn't too surprised to see it popup as an action item for my new vehicle. (Not sure why it wasn't done before sale; guess there isn't much incentive to check vehicles on the lots.) Brought it in for the appointed service and picked up the loaner. Nice way to check out other models, by the way. My Service Rep handled this well and I am content with the recall repair. Thanks for making this as smooth a process as possible.
Customer Service Is Fantastic. Helpful and attentive, will try to get it done for you!
Ashley and her crew at Knockout impressed me over and over during the process of getting my car repaired - from their friendly service to handling all the details with my insurance and getting us a rental car - we were well taken care of. I would recommend Knockout to anyone and wouldn't hesitate to take another car there.
Phenomenal facilities; Personal staff; Beautiful surroundings. I have participated in many of their offered retreats and camps and I have never walked away feeling like I wasted a buck or that Miracle Camp didn't treat me like a valuable guest. Would recommend MC to any and many!
Quick, professional, completed within estimated time. Friendly cashiers.
None
Absolutely the friendliest bunch of people I have ever met! I just walked in without an appointment and they took me in. Rosa is the sweetest Italian woman ever! We shared stories the whole time, which was only 15 minutes, I thought it would take longer. She did a fantastic job! I'm always skeptical of online reviews, but I have to say, they are all true! I will be going back again!
Great service. Highly recommended.
Had an excellent time here on my first trip to Vegas. Thanks guys!
None
Was just were planning to stay in Ottawa as a resting spot on our way to Quebec City. This hotel changed our plans and we spent more time exploring the city. Everything was perfect here from the check in to the beautiful 6th floor room with a balcony to the great location. We got this hotel on Hotwire so paid substantially less than regular rate but I think the regular rate is a great deal.
We always have a good time and great service at BJ's. Join the membership club.
You have shown me respect and consideration since I first walked through your door. Your prices are are good, and your product is amazing. Overall, I will be coming back to your store my tobacco purchases. Thank you :)
None
Everyone in this office is so nice. Little by little, Dr. Hill has skillfully managed to give me my smile back. Dr. Hill and the hygienists perform excellent work, to say the least. I love the technology too. I have never been so happy with a dental office, and I have been to many of them. I look forward to going to my appointments!
I have been getting my lashes done by Sierra since she started and absolutely love them! She is so precise in her work and fulfills her clients' wishes. I got so many compliments on them, multiple people have told me they were the best they'd ever seen! I highly recommend her!
Bill is a terrific Realtor who does a great job with all his clients. His website and blog are easily found online giving his clients fantastic exposure! I have observed for years what a hard worker he is.
Best school in the Northwest, an excellent staff and a strength coach specialist that the kids absolutely adore….very good school.
None
Peirce provides a great educational option for working adult learners in a flexible and convenient way.
Es un bar con gente muy amable... Deportes todo el día en la tv, y un billar para compartir con sus ricas pizzas
Bram and Gary and the whole Gramatan Management team are terrific. They have managed our building -- and our eclectic Coop Board -- with ease and patience. Our building has been well maintained, the lobby is spotless and everyone in the 7 story property loves our Super, hired by Gramatan. We are very pleased with their response time, handling of our property inside and out and overall professionalism. GREAT! ~ Shannon Sheperd
Looking Glass Photo is a good neighborhood store that stocks a wide variety of equipment and materials at fair prices. They also do digital printing, and sell Mac set-ups for photographers. Not as cheap as the NYC online stores, but the service makes up for it, and they're open 7 days a week for instant gratification.
Quaint, cozy, warm and friendly all describe this lovely little store.
They answer the phone!! They meet the delivery schedules that they commit to and the quality is outstanding.
I'm not sure what type of experience the other reviewers on here had - but I LOVE my I pad skin (go Lakers!). Furthermore, their customer service handled my shipping question quickly and were very courteous.
Our old refrigerator died so we bought a new french door refrigerator from Leroy's Appliances. They delivered it the same day and moved out the old one. Later we saw a similar model much cheaper. We expected to pay a little more at Leroy's and was willing to given the quality of service and honesty we have always received from them. Leroy's has been good to us in the past and went the extra mile with other incentives to let us know they appreciated our business. We will continue to buy from them knowing they are competitive.
None
I love this place well I should say my daughter loves this place. They are always on time my daughter looks forward to her appointments on Tuesdays and Thursdays. The staff is very friendly. The best part is that I see how my daughter's is progressing and they do it with much love. Truly recommend this office...
None
Nice place would come back for sure
None
Total home is incredible. I was able to watch a whole home transformation they designed and constructed. A drab, outdated residence, became an open, spacious contemporary house anyone would be thrilled to call home.
Best Reflections came to our house and tinted my truck. Super friendly, very professional and truck tint was high quality and looks awesome! Would recommend them to anyone and everyone.
In de korte periode dat ik met Advertbanner samenwerk ben ik zeer tevreden over de werkwijze en de professionaliteit waarmee projecten opgepakt worden. De communicatie over projecten loopt vlekkeloos en is vooral helder voor beide partijen. Advertbanner kijkt altijd mee en is betrokken bij alle fasen van een project. Ik zou iedereen die op zoek is naar een specialist op het gebied van ontwerp, bouw en onderhoud van websites Advertbanner willen aanbevelen.
I work for a builder, and I had a client drive by Apex one day and stop to walk around their yard. My client called and told me I had to visit, so I made the hour long drive to Sealy to have a look and I was pleasantly surprised. There aren't very many stone yards that go to the trouble to install the stone in such a way that you get a real feeling for the final install. Apex has a beautiful yard that goes past sample walls which really helps people who need help visualizing their final look. They did take a little while to come out and check on us, but nothing outrageous, and they were very helpful in explaining the varieties and options on the stone. They also provided us with addresses of homes or companies that had used the particular variety of stone my clients were interested in so that we could go and see the product installed. I have had no problems with either customer service, or delivery, and I would recommend Apex to any of my future clients.
Best pizza in Addison.
I arrived at the dealership service department and was greeted immediately by Casey. He worked quickly to get my car checked in for service. My car is due for the big 30,000 but I was there just for a oil/filter change. Casey asked me if I would like a information sheet explaining what the service department does during the Civic K service. He was helpful and to the point with the questions I had. I leased this 12 Civic from Bend Honda and had a great experience.....and continue to have excellent service to this day. Spoke to Larry on the lot while I was waiting for my ride and actually enjoyed the conversation and did not feel like I was be sold a pitch.....nice fella.
LOVE this hair studio. They take walk ins but if there is a stylist you prefer, they take appointments too. They do an excellent job! It's a great, affordable place and they are fun and friendly and helpful. They always do EXACTLY what I'm asking for.
I really enjoyed my visit to Ideal Dental in Forney. The staff was friendly and knowledgeable, care was quick and efficient, but the best part was being able to go on a Saturday instead of having to take time off work.
What a great place to get my LASIK done at! Great environment, staff, doctors, and results! I can see 20/10 now and couldn't be happier.
About a 15 minute walk from either Mainz Hilton, Rosis has excellent food and great beer with a warm and inviting staff and atmosphere. Husband Werner (?) is the waiter and wife Rosie (?) is the chef. One of their signature meals is the "Big Ed" or schweinehaxe, but everything on the menu is fantastic. Small yet inviting with only about 7 tables, I recommend reservations especially on Friday and Saturday nights. Additional outside seating is available during the summer months.
I like deep massages, not the oil pushing kind and I got my money's worth here. It was the first time I had a Thai massage so it was surprising at first since I didn't know what to expect, but in the end I felt better. My body needed that kneading and stretching.
Danny and Andy came to help me with a project. These guys are just so professional, it's unbelievable. Thank y'all. I feel very safe working with them and not once had a thought that they might want to rip me off. This is the way to go!
Always enjoy going here! Customer service is great; never feel rushed :-)
Wir waren sehr zufrieden. Selbst gemachter Kuchen und Tomatensuppe waren sehr lecker. Die Bedienung sehr freundlich und zuvorkommend. Die gemütliche Atmosphäre lädt zum Verweilen ein.
I have nothing but good things to say about this place. I first inquired online about the price and selection of the Focus ST's, and within 5 minutes I had an automated response, and 5 minutes after that, I had a personal response and buying options from Hugh Monahan. He was incredibly quick to respond, his answers were succinct and informative, and he was very personable. I work graveyard shift, so any time I need to get something done (like buy a car!), it means I'm staying up well past when I should be sleeping. It was preferable to me to be able to complete the process in one day, and they came through. Hugh transferred the car I wanted up from Olympia that same afternoon! That was HUGE! Also, I traded in my '06 Mazda 3, and they were very fair with the trade in pricing. That also influenced my decision to go ahead with the deal. I didn't NEED a car, but with the price I got for my current car, and the financing/price I got on the new one, it was an easy choice.
Mon école idéale !
Welllllll, I had pretty bad teeth growing up and it wasn't until I was about 16 my parents finally got the message that I needed braces. So we came here (mainly out of convenience) and, well, pretty much everything was awesome. The staff are extremely friendly - knew you by name and face - and were always ready to help you out. They were always readily available and knew exactly what they were doing. It's never too busy (e.g., they've never overbooked on appointments) so your wait time in the lobby is about five minutes at the longest, and once you're in the chair, it seemed to me like smooth sailing - in and out in half an hour many times. Never felt any pain in my mouth while they worked on my braces (and to boot, the Christian radio they have playing always seems to relax me). Anyways, it was pretty awesome here. Never understood why others would whine about going to the orthodontist's because, honestly, this place is really amazing. :)
Great place to take family and friends.
Simple menu, expertly done. Service is good and fast, even when the place was rammed. You can pay more for a better steak in London, but only in a few places, and at least twice the price. Don't forget to venture downstairs for an excellent old fashioned, you can watch them carve you off a piece of crystal clear ice for your glass right in front of you. Arrive early. My part of 4 got there at 6 and we got one of the last tables.
This shop is by far the best penny sweetie shop for miles, over 260 varieties......changing all the time - if they aint got it then they soon will have - just ask..... 7 day a week news & magazine delivery weekend rolls & milk delivery OPen daily from 5am
I was in a car accident in December of 2011 hit from behind what fun. After 3 months and 20 sessions of physical therapy at two differant places. I still had pain and swelling in my neck and shoulder. I found Dr Woodmansee on the internet, after three weeks of his chiropractic therapy at his Midvalley Clinic in West Jordan Utah I have no pain and the swelling has stopped. Wish I would have gone to Doctor Woodmansee in the first place. His office staff is very friendly and easy to work with.
Awesome CPA. Very professional. Did my taxes for me once. Extremely thorough and explained everything very clearly.
Staff was great and friendly. Very knowledgeable about their inventory. Would recommend to anyone.
La Mission was recommended to us by a friend. We really liked it. For $25 I had a seafood plater included soup, a nice fish filet, lobster tail, shrimp and a desert to share. The staff was very friendly and happy to converse in English. Drinks were also reasonably priced. Need a reservation for evenings. I'd go back again.
Bästa, fixar alltid en avsugning oavsett tid på dagen.
Best restaurant in Atlanta! Asya and Skye loved it!
We had been told by another shop that our motor needed to be replaced and that it would cost somewhere in the $5000 dollar range to replace it. We had it towed to Christian Brothers in Bartlett. The motor was in fact not repairable, but they quoted us a much more reasonable price. When we decided to replace my car, they had a Salvage yard come and appraise it. After the appraisal, they offered us the same amount with the idea that they would rebuild it and try to sell it to someone (and not just sit in a salvage yard). After we sold it to them, they wrote off the towing fee and the inspection fee. Additionally, we took them the car we planned on replacing ours with for a pre-purchase inspection. They were very thorough and gave us a great deal of confidence about the condition of the car. The staff at Christian Brothers is very friendly and professional. I dealt mainly with Scott and Chris, and will definitely be using them again.
The Camino Real makes a person feel like dressing up,and as if they lived in the elegant time.After arriving on the Amtrak train(which in it's self is class act)you feel there is no other parts of the city you need to see or any other places to be.I like the view from the 16th floor at night.Iam the type of man that thinks every day's a holiday and every meal's a banquet so there will be no nambie bambie, nit picking from me.the place is 100 years young and still has a dance or two left in her,I be to thinking.If you like your arraingments top drawer without losing sight of a period in time when people came to El Paso to experience the rough and tumble west and not sleep in the sand.enconsed in elegance I was happy to pay the dignfied gentry, of a bygone era that went the way of the buffalo and when men were men and women were happier for it.
None
Great food, friendly staff. This is always part of our annual journey to Ogunquit in December.
Lovely morning this morning at The Boars Head to 'celebrate' MacMillan Coffee Morning. Friendly staff, nice coffee and yummy cakes. Have eaten here on numerous occasions. The food has always been good and there is always a friendly welcome and at least one smiling face behind the bar. Looking forward to my next visit.
I am on my 3rd Honda at Honda of Gainesville and I keep coming back because of the helpful staff and super service! Brad happens to be the service manager that has been assigned to me and he is really accomodating, flexible and helpful.
None
Mike is a great mechanic, he explains everything in detail, and does not begin the job without first calling you and letting you know what needs to be repaired and the cost to repair it. I always recommend Mike, him and his wife run a great shop!
Rather good pizza. LOTS of toppings, good taste. Have had a few from here now and have never had a bad one. Recommended
None
Troy was very professional and did a great job on my car windows. He did an excellent job of explaining everything, including what to expect and what my best options were- and his price was great!! I definitely recommend Choice Window Tinting!
Great food, great services
Knowledgeable salesperson, huge inventory, great deal, completely satisfied.
I have visited this hotel on business now on three occasions. Each time I have been extremely impressed with the standard of service and friendliness of the staff. This hotel appears to be run very professional whereby the staff genuinely seem to care. The hospitality and food are always superb and I wouldn't hesitate in recommending the Alveston House Hotel to any of my contacts. Keep up the good work and thank you.
We used Amplify Entertainment for our reception and we were not disappointed! First off, you can't beat the value; we shopped around and Nate's prices are a steal for the professional service you get. It's obvious that he loves what he does and has a vast knowledge of all kinds of music. Nate made sure he knew exactly what kind of vibe we wanted and his Hey DJ system was really cool! Kept our guests dancing all night!! I would absolutely recommend Amplify Entertainment!!!
Amazing staff! Great service and very friendly. Food was great!
Dr. Dressler and his staff are fantastic. They are now taking car of my son's braces after doing a wonderful job for my daughter. It is obvious that they really care about the kids. I highly recommend using Dr. Dressler.
My steak was done perfectly. It was actually better than some steakhouses around here that claim it as their speciality. Everything made it to the table fresh and hot. Our waiter was attentive, but unobtrusive.
Une très belle aventure en France et au Québec
Last summer while I was in Southern California visiting family, my wife’s aunt asked if I’d do her a favor and take her Cooper in for a service. I checked the local listings and found MINI of Universal City. I called and was please to get an appointment for the very next day. Being it was my first time at the dealer and their service area and that I’m not a Mini owner myself, I didn’t know what to expect. What I discovered was just how warm, friendly and prompt everyone was. From the young women at the service desk who checked me in to one of the young service managers (a Mr. Hall I believe was his name). Not only was I in and out of there on time, but the price they quoted me was also the price I ended up paying for the service. I informed my aunt and now she continues to take her car to this very dealer and has found out first hand what exceptional service they offer. Thank you MINI of Universal City.
these guys are honest folks, i highly recommend this place.i know ill go back for service on my car if im in the area. keep up the good work!
I've had a membership at Aspire for a year... it is a good place. They have great child care that's included with a membership, which is awesome for me. Other than that, its a pretty standard, full-featured gym... It gets busy around 6ish in the morning, and between 5-6 p.m... which is pretty typical at any gym. All-in-all... a good, solid gym.
I had the breakfast plate with the SOS on the hash and it was pretty good. The scone was awesome, the bacon crispy, and I was eating within minutes of ordering.
Jain has been my insurance agent for years and I couldn't be happier. She, along with her friendly and helpful staff, has always been there to help me figure out exactly what I needed and more importantly, what I don't. I never realized how great their service was until I moved to LA. I figured I'd have to find a new agent down here, but no, Jain has amazingly been able to provide the same great service and handle all my insurance needs. I definitely recommend this office!
I asked for a London Fog..they did not know the drink, but happily made it with my instructions. Yummy
None
Fantastic food and atmosphere, good service
Thinking pizza? Think again, hot wings are the way to go at Pizza Hut especially on their 'wing Wednesday' on which they offer 50¢ wings!!
I went here tonight with my family for dinner, the service was very prompt, and the atmosphere was inviting. They also offer a selection of fresh squeezed juices along with a regular beverage selection. The food arrived relatively quickly, The appetizers and soup came within 5 minutes, I tried the lamb chili, which was very good. For the main course, I had the sampler platter, which was very well presented and flavorful, my only gripe would be, that they seemed to be out of many items that were on the menu, there was no meat pie with my sampler platter, which was disappointing, but the rest of the meal made up for it, It was delicious. Also, they were out of half of the desserts on the menu, which was also pretty disappointing. However, it was an overall good experience, as the service was prompt and courteous, which more than made up for the items they ran out of. I will most likely be attending again!
Recommandé. Ève sait être à l'écoute et exécute avec brio.
Your work is innovative and informative. Joplin Decorating Center received several new customers from outlying areas which we had never reached before with conventional advertising. We highly recommend the website advertising approach. Kate’s expertise will pay off!
I LOVE LOVE LOVE this restaurant! I got the soup, salad, and sandwich combo, which was both delicious and a great deal at $9.95. I selected a whole BLT with a side of garlic aioli (yum!), a salad with veggies and ranch, and for my soup I mixed tomato and clam chowder. The sandwich was perfection, the soups are always great, and our server was very friendly, helpful and attentive. Not only will I be back, I will be bringing friends!
Hervorragende Beratung in einem sehr angenehmen Umfeld. Wer in dieses Geschäft geht und dort seine Ringe nicht findet, wird sie niemals finden. Würde ich immer wieder empfehlen!
My family and I went there for dinner, the atmosphere isn't much but it doesn't need to be. You order at the counter have a seat and eat the best pizza in the area hands down. We will be back.
my girlfriend and were craving sushi like no other, and took our first trip to Hapi Sushi in Laguna Beach. The place is old and homely, but the chef is very friendly and even made us custom rolls since my girlfriend is very picky about her sushi. The rolls were delicious and different that anything I've had in orange county. We stayed for 2 hours until closing, and they didn't once try to push us out the door like i've read about at places like mosun. we arrived at 8pm on a saturday night, and were served immediately. The #69 roll with strawberry is amaaaaaaazing! the japanese burrito roll is straight up EXOTIC. these guys are ahead of the game and very creative with their sushi. They've been in laguna beach for over 20 years, and the chef is a master sushi chef without a doubt. This is by no means so trendy sushi joint that distracts you with fancy decor while mexicans make your sushi.
They are wonderful! Always help me with my loans and very friendly!
My mother, Dora Paz, and father, Robert Paz, asked me to write this review about Alex Canales. They had their treatment done on Saturday. They said that this was the 2nd time their home was treatment from the inside. they were very happy with the service he provided. He was very nice and professional. He explained everything he was doing. They only want Alex to do their services from now on!
We have used Sydney Pet Resort for numerous daycare and long term stays since the beginning of 2012. After viewing a few places which had the dogs kept in tiny 4 walls and concrete floor kennels with no where to play for 80% of their stay, there was no way we would let our dog stay anywhere else. It is a true 'resort' for the animals. At no time is Izzy kept in a cage. She has free run of a huge paddock with dogs her own size and at night she gets to cuddle up with them securely inside. The staff are amazing and as a new dog owner, have always been helpful, friendly and passing on advice and knowledge. I only wish that there were more places available for animals to be looked after in this environment.
Wonderful experience! Love the new addition to Morningside! The staff was very friendly, and the atmosphere was very inviting. Our server most definitely made the experience top-notch! She was very helpful, friendly, and knowledgeable of the menu. The starters were VERY delicious, so make sure you don't overlook them! The beer is inexpensive, and they have housemade sodas. The pizzas have very tasty, unique ingredients. Very delicious! I highly recommend this restaurant, and I will most definitely be heading back to Timone's!
I am sorry we don't have a reason to return to Toowoomba now. The spotted Cow is a great pub with an amazing array of beers and excellent food. I like it when the owner stops by for a chat!
Not only was our Honda repaired at a great price in a short time period, but the staff was friendly and kept us in the loop throughout the process! Outstanding auto service and excellent customer service. When they realized how serious the problem was, they had us come over immediately and worked our car into their busy schedule. Phenomenal experience and highly recommended!
Most welcome in our lodge!!!for good service and confortable accomodation in Arusha Tanzania. Brian the G.M. Karibu Tanzania.
None
None
Very professional staff, excellent conditions and helpful advice offered
Ate here last last saturday, OUTSTANDING! I had the Mahi Loco Moco and one macadamia nut pancake, I tried all the syrups, my favorite was the coconut!!! The Mahi was grilled, seasoned perfectly and was fresh!! My friend had the Spam Loco Moco and loved it! Clean, Fast Service, Delish food!! I was very impressed!! We have high standards in our own family run cafe, so my standards are a bit high and I just can't say enough great things about this restaurant!! Keep up the great work Ken's!!
Amazing jazz!
This is the first time we have every had a pest control service come out to our house. We live in the Henderson area and have a lot of those lovely scorpions. I called Bulwark because of that big scorpion on the trucks. That really got my attention. Bulwark sent a tech by the name of Sione T to our house for the first service. He did a really good job on spraying our whole yard and in the garage. He also came in the house and did some stuff. By the time Sione was done spraying our backyard, we already started seeing the bugs dying. What a good site that is... Sione was very friendly and took care of any request we had. Thanks Sione for the great work that was completed today at our house. We really do appreciate it.
The beach was empty today the perfect place to be.
Estuve en el hotel Casa del Capitel Nazarí en noviembre con una oferta por la que te reservaban las entradas para la Alhambra y también entraba el desayuno y una invitación a sus bodegas. Todo me pareció estupendo, la habitación confortable y muy limpia, el desayuno muy completo y muy bueno todo, la bodega también y el personal muy amable y eficiente en su trabajo. La ubicación es ideal para visitar el centro de Granada, pues está próximo al Albayzin, de hecho desde alguna habitación se ve la alhambra, a la que puedes subir tardando unos 15 minutos. Sin duda repetiría sin pensarlo, el hotel es precioso, como un patio andaluz, os lo recomiendo!
None
My name is Deborah Comstock and yesterday I bought a 2010 Chevy Impala. I worked with Randy Kahl. What an easy salesperson to work with. I didn't want to put any money down and he worked specifically for me to make that happen. All in all, it was a very nice experience and I would recommend him to anyone looking to buy a car. Thanks again.
From the time we took our Zeus to Haskell Valley Dr. Wiseman and all were great. When Zeus was diagnosed sometime later with diabetes, we did all we could do with all their help. They would keep Zeusy if we went away and always took awesome care of him. When he suffered a blood clot from his heart to his legs we were on the phone a lot with Dr. Mount who took the time on a Sunday to help us and stay with us. We did as she told us and we took him to Orchard Park Hosp. and stayed there the day until we made the decision along with Dr. Mount's help and the vets at Orchard Park to let him go. That was in Feb. 2013 and still mourn over our Zeusy but Haskell consoled us for the next few days...then sent a lovely sympathy card. We miss our Zeusy every day but would always stay with Haskell Valley if we ever decide to get another cat...They are the best in pet care and some of the most dedicqted people who truly love animals and stay with you no matter what!!
I had never been to a BookMans, I was use to going to BookStop in Texas. Anyway, I had a great experience here. The staff were very helpful and even lead me to the books I was unable to find. They were all curteous and knowledgeable. I have not sold anything there so as far as their pricing and items of that specific nature I have no clue; however, my overall experience was great. Clean store, great staff and awesome items! Will return.
Super delicious sushi. Definitely recommended. its not all you can eat so you will be out cheaper.
JMM at the Klinke was so friendly and helpful, as I came in wearing a bit of soy sauce that was on my business suit, tie, shirt, and pants. (Luckily, my gym clothes were in my car.) And quicker than Clark Kent in a telephone booth (or photo booth, or whatever he uses nowadays), my clothes were checked in with the needed special instructions for the stain's removal. The text message that my clothes were ready for pick up arrived more than 4 hours early the next day. I'm looking forward to trying their drive-through service next time, using Klinke's express bag system.
Westshore Pizza has excellent pizza and calzones. Very quick delivery!
I am associated with Saras Prayas since beginning and really cannot explain the feeling of pride it gives to me being a part of such an association.. This group is all about doing every possible effort to improve or create confidence in socially deprived children/people.. Taking part in activities had made me aware about how talented the people of ignored world are and how it could be of use to this current general world in which we live in.. This group has taught me how important and usefull it is to be simple, helpful and what the joy of giving is.. Thanks to the team of SP... Plz come and join...:)
Metro Garage came out to fix our drive-in dock garage door at our warehouse. They were prompt, very professional and a great value. I would definitely recommend them for anyone looking for any help in this area.
We have stayed at quite a few properties on the Monterey Bay Peninsula including the famed Pebble Beach Hotel; however, The Portola Hotel and Spa is by far our favorite. We love walking into the tree lit lobby. The atmosphere is so warm and welcoming. The Staff caters to your every whim. The concierge, Ann, is a wealth of information; any event, restaurant, etc... You name it, she can direct you. We love getting a nice warm baked cookie upon arrival after driving... Just an extra nice touch. The rooms have a nautical flair which is so apropos as the view is overlooking the wharf and the yacht harbor. The beds are divine in fact we asked the management where to purchase them. The bathrooms are spacious with all the modern conveniences. We have celebrated my birthday and Christmas 2 years in a row. The restaurant in the hotel, Jack's, is fabulous with dark woods and throne like booths which reminds me of San Francisco. The food is absolutely wonderful to say the least. It is prepared to perfection. The restaurant features an enclosed glass paned dining room which is where we have celebrated my birthday and Christmas. On Friday nights you can taste wines from various different wineries compliments of the hotel. One of the best places to enjoy the wine at the hotel is sitting around the outside fire pit. During the holiday season, there is an outdoor ice skating rink where skaters can enjoy the festivities. What more could you ask for? In fact we are going back this weekend to celebrate my birthday again. The Portola is the best!
I love this place. The best has the best live music and eating in the city, PERIOD!
None
Mooie, trendy koffer gekocht voor trip naar USA. Hele goede service!
Another first class meal served by first class customer care staff. I have been to a few Indian Restaurants in Fife, and can honestly say this is THE best in Fife, and maybe even in Scotland. The quality, quantity, presentation, and taste of food was absolutely spot on. (Peas Pilau Rice is to die for, my wife reckons the garlic naan is too garlicy??......you can never get enough garlic!) I have eaten there about half a dozen times in the past couple of years and have never been disappointed.....really should go more often.
It is huge pleasure to have Mariah at my home. Very careful woman, very friendly. Not only does she put everything where it belongs but also with her around, the house is more full. I live by myself and it's very social to have someone around from time to time. Thank you again for your service for all these years. Best wishes Gregor
Mimi's brought out a new menu last month and it is fabulous! The company I work for holds events at restaurants regularly and the wait staff and management at Mimi's are by far the best. I haven't tried the whole menu, but I've seen a lot of it brought out to our guests and it all looks and smells incredible. Bravo on becoming my new favorite restaurant! And you can't beat their half off bottles of wine on Wednesdays,... I recommend the shiraz!
None
I was referred to All About Pets by my Vet (Lyndon Animal Clinic) and have taken my dogs (shepherd size) there for more than 11 years for grooming and boarding. In all these years, I have NEVER had a single issue, complaint or problem with the facility or its staff. Each of the employees know my pets by name and have a true concern for their welbeing. I have repeatedly toured the kennel facilities and can say they are clean and smell good - no urine or feces odor at all. I would recommend this kennel and the groomers without any reservation whatsoever! Their prices are very competitive! And finally, my dogs seem happy to go to the kennel/groomer. They are never reluctant or nervous, and this tells me a lot because my pets do not lie!
None
Endroit hors du temps, avec un accueil exceptionnel ...
Family owned and operated, you'll get that hometown feel and home cooked flavor. This is ribs at their finest. This is ribs that are affordable but taste like they're not. This is it! Brisket baked beans are to die for. Sweet potato pies better than mom used to make and my mom was a fantastic cook. This is date night, this is family night. You must come here for the BBQ and stay for the kind atmosphere. --Murrieta Bankruptcy Attorney David Nelson
None
Awesome children's program, incredible worship, and the messages are always life changing!
Wonderful
Awesome product line, great designs, perfect printing. Orders arrive on time as shipping is done quickly and efffectively. Great customer service. Note to all ordering from Wordans, your in for a wonderful experience. Thanks Wordans you guys rock!!!
Always fantastic. Great food, service, happy to accommodate. My new favorite.
None
I love this place!! Wear a coat, though. The vents can be a bit drafty when its cold outside. But the food is awesome and authentic. Though, I never had jalapenos with my kalbi in Korea. It was still as close as I have had here. =)
did the work assigned well with reasonable rates-good tech for wiring and telephone system work-will use him again-timely response and courtious
Even after reading the poor review here for Best Western, I decided to go ahead and take a gamble. I'm glad I did. The hotel seems like it's brand new. The rooms were bigger than most I've stayed in. The bed was comfortable. Breakfast was wonderful (they even have a Texas-shaped waffle maker). The A/C in our room worked wonderfully (it actually made the room cold!). If it didn't say "Best Western" on the front, I would have thought it was a Hampton Inn or something. I would definitely stay here again.
Frank and his staff are amazing!!! We hosted our parents 50th anniversary party @ Cappuccino recently and everything was perfect, not one glitch! Serving 100 guests simultaneously and in a timely manner is difficult, Cappuccino made it look easy. We had a wonderful day with family and friends, we actually visited and enjoyed our event because Cappuccino handled everything from start to finish-Menu (wonderful choices), Bar service, even the cake plus an additional dessert. Thank you again Frank!!!
An Angie's List deal pointed me in the direction of A to Z for my chimney cleaning and repairs. They were GREAT! The technician explained what he was doing during each step of the inspection and cleaning. He identified three issues, which he believed needed to be addressed. He was honest that one of the issues should be addressed soon while the other two issues could wait. I felt comfortable with his assessment and had him repair two of the three issues. The technician was amazing! He took every precaution to make sure the area around the fireplace was covered with tarps and there was no mess whatsoever I asked how often the chimney should be cleaned and the technician indicated that, given my pattern of use, once every three years would be sufficient. He had me self-address a post card so that A to Z could remind me about the next cleaning IN THREE YEARS! A to Z offers FANTASTIC customer service!!! I would recommend A to Z for all of your chimney cleaning and repairs! I know I'll be using them again!!!
Very, very easy process. Called Lee, went in, test drove the car, he answered all my questions without being pushy, and two days later I bought my Prius! Everyone was super helpful and made the experience painless. Would definitely recommend buying your next car here! And ask for Lee! He was great!
None
perfect ... mera collg ;-)
Good quality
Everything was awesome! One of the best dining experiences I have had in along time. all of the food is made in house-nothing is pre-made and purchased front mass distributors. I didn't think I wanted fires but once I tasted my friends, I just had to have the special Greek Fries. The Baklava Cheesecake is to die for! Creamy cheesecake in a homemade graham cracker shell topped with honey and homemade Baklava. All well worth eh 45 minute drive! I will be back there SOON! The customer is treated like a member of the family in the easy atmosphere.
They are THE BEST! Very professional everywhere, the front desk, assistants, business manager, and especially the Doctor! I cannot say enough about this place. They are even affordable! You will see the same dentist every time. They will take care of you, and they will be there in the future. Go there, you will not be disappointed.
None
Johnny: Did a superb job of getting me to arrange things in the house and for me to get rid of many items in the out building so the new buyers were willing to get a mortgage and to buy my property, after I had moved everything out of my house November 1, 2013. I was very happy to close 21 February 2014. A good job well done. Weston W. Haskell
My husband, dog and I moved to Solera in April. We are so happy to live here. The staff is friendly, professional & quick to fix any problems that may arise. They have a great maintenance & cleaning staff. The building is kept very clean. They also are very pet friendly which has been a huge blessing to us. There are professionals of every age that live here so everyone fits in! The location is great. We feel very safe and can walk everywhere. We never thought we would spend so much time outdoors while living downtown. We have a beautiful, updated apartment and are enjoying our time here. Thank you Solera for doing it right!
So Good
None
None
I'm very impressed with this hotel. The price was a bit higher than what I'm used to (89.99) but its worth it. The room was clean and very nice. The workers have been nice and helped me get in and out of the hotel quickly. I would recommend staying here, it's very nice.
None
Chick Fil A is always good, regardless of location. Delicious, cheap and friendly service. If you expect more, than go home to mama.
None
I needed to take care of my guests on my wedding and i used Diamond limo for that. It was pleasant experience. All my guests and friends liked their services. Very nice and thank you Diamond limo.
Dr. Eduard Burt is a very competent chiropractor. He has done excellent work on my back. I had an injury on November 2nd, which for me, at least, was fairly extreme and dealt a blow to my back, causing a misalignment, one inch on the top and one inch on the bottom. He carefully assists in its realignment. I am glad for this.
My girl loves this place!!!
If you need a visa or anything to do not with a passport, this is a wrong place, it's confusing, but the right place is just around the corner 15 Whitehall London SW1A 2DD. Also make sure that you're there by 8:30 if you don't want to spend ages in queue
Bought a new Mac. First one. Needed a software to do DVD's . The one I wanted is no longer sold by Apple. however the kind staff took the time and loaded me up with the software I needed. Answered all my questions. Service Rocked.
We have had the pleasure of working with Sivan and other photographers at Studio Adorn. The studio is gorgeous and has an array of elegant and unique settings that are perfect for boudoir, portrait, family/group or head shots. The atmosphere is inviting and relaxing. There is even a great area for artists, like us, to get clients ready and for clients to feel at ease changing outfits. It is a must see for any photographer needing a quality studio!
Beh, come si fa a non dare 5 stelle di valutazione?!? 1a Stella: Ho chiamato il centralino per un'informazione e sono stati cordiali e precisi. 2a Stella: In meno di 24ore dall'ordine la merce è arrivata. 3a Stella: Imballo perfetto. 4a Stella: Merce perfetta. 5a Stella: Chupa chups! Bravi, sicuramente comprerò ancora!
Great food, friendly, fast service! My family and I have been going here since they opened and never have been unsatisfied.
My Sister and I are BOTH getting married. Only a few months apart from each other. We decided it would be easiest (for our Parents) if we dress shopped together. (picture 2 girls fighting over a dress....) Circle Park Bridal was the very first stop on our busy day of Bridal appointments. The women opened the shop with smiling faces and laughter, it was very welcoming for 2 brides that were a tad bit worried about finding the PERFECT dress. The shop is super cute!! decor/ design/ dress layout. The process of finding a dress was super easy! LOTS OF BEAUTIFUL DRESSES to choose from. We had so much fun trying on dress and coming out of our dressing rooms to show our Mother. Turns out we had very different tastes... so it was fun to see what sort of dress my sister would have on when we would come out of the dressing room. In the end, we BOTH found our dream dress!!! in only a 2 hour time frame. The ladies were so very helpful and polite! They really made each of us feel special in our own way, and gave us the wedding dress shopping experience we had always dreamed of. THANK YOU CIRCLE PARK BRIDAL!
works super great try it some time
One of the best Business schools in Mumbai
Reverently celebrated liturgies that express the majesty of God and the solemnity of heavenly worship. The liturgy is usually celebrated in the Ordinary Form guided the principles outlined in the Second Vatican Council. It's a supreme example of celebrating the reform of the liturgy in continuity with tradition.
I studied all of the then available options for starting out my styling business in Port Charlotte and settled on the best available option. A Select Salon is a unique concept of individual private studios manned by only the best stylist available, offering a wide range of services at reasonable prices. If I had not opened my own salon, I would still be there. A Select Salon is a class act from the Ceiling to the Floor and I am proud to still call Mindy my friend and not a competitor.
Mundo Chuches es de lo mejorcito
I needed to change out my windshield last week because I was on the 405 and a rock hit it. I could've gotten that fixed but why not replace it since it's not much difference in cost. I ended up calling these guys and they came right to my home and did it. It took less than an hour and I got a new windshield. It looks great plus they have lifetime warranty.
This is a great place to buy cheap good quality products.
Very helpful staff. I bought a snake plant and they had great recommendations for potting and care.
Super awesome local diner with home made biscuits and gravy
None
None
love what he is doing, very professional
I have been going to 100% Chiropractic - East (Dr. Ryan) for 3 years. I came to Dr. Ryan not believing in the healing powers of Chiropractic and after my first visit I believed. Within 3 months of seeing Dr. Ryan twice a week, my, collarbone went from being slanted to aligned in a proper way. My back has improved, and I can play basketball pain free and loving the freedom that has been restored in my life. My wife was recently in an accident and once I told Dr. Ryan the details he offered to come to my house and do a treatment on her to ensure no structural damage had been done. This is the type of care you can expect to receive in Dr. Ryan's office. His staff is top notch and a joy to talk too! I appreciate the excellent care and friendship that has developed and I would recommend anyone having spinal, neck, collarbone, leg, etc issues to take the drive to 100% Chiropractic - East and visit Dr. Ryan Betz and his team. Dr. Ryan thank you for giving me my life back!
Заказал все сантехнические работы в новой квартире в этой компании. Работа была выполнена на высоком уровне. Никаких нареканий нет. Очень порядочные, квалифицированные специалисты. Смело могу советовать их.
Great company to work for!
Excellent place to be
None
Straightforward, reasonable people. Good service without the "smarmy attitude" you find at so many places. These are guys you'd have a burger/beer with. They take care of their business without giving the impression they're nickel or diming you. They stand by what they say and were willing to do some legwork on our behalf.
I love this place!
Great Breakfast. Try the Puerco carnitas!
This is a great pet store! My experience was excellent. The staff was attentive and I was able to locate all the products I was looking for. They had a wide variety of products and services for my dog. I shop at both location often as they are on my way home from work and I am always happy with the service provided.
None
Personalized service, professional product and I usually don't have to wait! Unlike most places I've been I don't have to deal with botched orders and the quality is very high. I recommend this to anyone in the area looking for a pick me up
EXCELLENT CUSTOMER SERVICE
The BEST hoagies in the area! Period!
My husband took our dog to Copper View Animal Hospital after her normal allergies got worse and we discovered she had a serious ear infection. We had mixed feelings about previous vets we had been to over the past 10 years in the area and after seeing the positive reviews, we decided to give Copper View a try. The professional staff was very thorough in explaining the course of treatment. They set up a follow-up appointment for our dog at no charge. The vet spent a great deal of time explaining the options to control her allergies but we felt no pressure to pursue one over the other. Fees were reasonable. Best of all, we have had good success in treating our dog's allergies with the course of treatment Copper View recommended. I was very happy with our experience at Copper View.
None
The food is good, the people who work there are very nice and there is barely a time where they don't have a bagel or a food you'd like to order! Also they will deliver as early as 7:00 am ...
La mejor lasaña al horno de toda Guadalajara!, Riquisimo y súper barato.
A great family restaurant!
Austin gave me a great cut and style. This was the first time in a long time that I didn't have to "fix" my bangs when I got home. I would recommend this place for sure. Plus, it is a fun, funky, and clean environment.
We have a love story with Coach House. My husband used to live in the pink building right acroos the street. This was more than 20 years ago, and he went everyday to Couch House to have a cup of cofee. It was the place where, 12 years ago, my fiancee, proposed to me. It was the very first place, 9 years ago, where we went after our baby girl was born. It is the place where we celebrate our birthdays, anniversaries, graduations and even when our family comes from overseas. It is the place we still go with our friends to get together and talk about our lives. It is the the best place in the area. We love the food, the decoration and the service. Everything is beautiful!!!
Very friendly great customer service and the food was prompt and tasty
We love this place! The food always tastes so fresh, the buffet is beautiful, or you can order from the menu. The couple that runs it is the nicest couple in the world, always welcoming, great service! Highly recommended to Columbia residents and visitors!
Good stuff, fair price, locally owned franchise. Stop here every chance I get. Try the Kickin' Chicken and Zax sauce with the fries!
I want to thank Alan and all the staff at Top Notch Collision!!! When I first discovered you were a company with true integrity, I saved you under my favorites in my phone. Little did I know I would be calling you so soon. Accidents are traumatic, but you came to the rescue. My car looks AMAZING!!! I was so shocked when I got there to pick it up. You were done faster than you even estimated. This is the only company I will use for my car needs. Trust and amazing work along with a fantastic staff...none better!!!!
The service experience was good. Visiting some relatives in the area, saw their Yelp! score and decided to stop by on the reccomendation of a friend. Friendly employees, good prices make this place nice. But what really stood out to me was the actual amenities. Would like to see more service centers like this in Chicago.
Fantastic coffee. Go here now!
None
Peaceful, clean hostel with all the facilities to self cook your meals. Friendly staff willing to help you in any situation. Conveniently locate near to tram stops and other facilities, you can literally walk to any location within the central business area easily from hostel.
Do you need a great deck builder? Call Keith now!
Great service and we all know the best fast food place around. This is the only McDonald's I eat at because all of the employees are so professional and courteous.
A good place to invite friends to it.
This place is off the charts fun! Amazing bartenders, excellent pours, great food, and a ton of fun every time! The seasonal decorations are off the hook, the locals are so friendly, the outdoor patio is super comfy, and it's a crazy party if your looking for it. It's big and they have magicians too so its great for family's as well! Don't pass up this place....
Mr. Vanorder truly creates a trustworthy relationship with you. He helped us along the entire way. He was always there to answer our questions. I would highly recommend him.
Ski Base is full of friendly faces and good customer service. I have personally rented equipment many times throughout many years. We always recommend Ski Base for our customers.
The team there is so friendly and make you feel comfortable. I got laser hair removal and was slightly nervous about the pain and outcome but they tell you everything you want to know. They also try to work with you if you are thinking about getting multiple areas done. I never had to wait long and they try very hard to fit your appointments in at a time best for you. I am definitely planning to go back soon and have suggested to friends to check them out.
Very nice place to stay! Ambient atmosphere, great people, really nice structures! Feels different to stay here, not at all Mumbai like, it's special!
It was worth every penny. Rebecca was super nice and professional. I will be back!!!
None
Brighten & Jo came out today (5/22/13) to treat the property for pests. I was impressed with their customer service skills, that is a rarity these days. The only reason I hired them today was because they exhibited a high level of professionalism. I refuse to give my money to worthless scumbags. Thanks for having the guts to sell service door to door Moxie, but more importantly, thanks for doing it right.
Great beach view, great beach access, nice outdoor pool! Good parking. Been going for years.
Really friendly staff. good food nothing to shout about but tasty, hot and a good selection. Free parking Military 10% discount and after your first meal on a returning vist bring your receipt and get a 20% discount. To top it all off there is a good size play gym to entertain the children while the adults eat in peace.
Awesome bike tour. Three of us went on the 9:45 am bike tour on a Sunday. Took about three hours. Not too strenuous, but at the same time, I felt we covered plenty of ground too. The guide Teddy was great, the bikes were great, and the whole experience was great. This bike tour was the perfect way to explore New Orleans and soak in many of the sights. I highly recommend this bike tour to anyone visiting New Orleans.
Great people, well run!!
My car purchasing experience from BMW of Sterling was absolutely wonderful. Often times being a young women I am not treated at car dealerships and shops as fairly as a grown man. Not at this dealership. They treated me with dignity and respect, a respect that I can trust them with all of my car needs. Jim Eddie has been the service manager of my car for 11 years, and he was over the top helpful and also put me in the hands of Karl Mackey, who helped me with my new car purchase. Both gentlemen are personable and friendly, but also professional and extremely knowledgable. Not once were they pushy and/or arrogant, which I truly appreciated. After my car purchased, they called a few days later to see how everything was going with the car and myself. This was an extremely nice and sincere gesture. I highly recommend these gentlemen and the dealership.
Love the selection here. Lots of vegan friendly foods, as well as healthy alternatives to mass produced things. But the store also carries a number of mass produced and easy options (after all, you can't cook dinner every day, sometimes you need something fast!). Great moral center to this store also.
Excelente atención y muy buena guía de parte del capitán Victor Barrera.
None
None
None
My experience with Gophermods has been amazing. I am a returning customer! My PS3 went out this summer, and for a cheap price they were able to repair it no problem! Also, I had dropped my phone in the toilet and it had water damage, and a purple screen, I thought the phone was done for. I received a phone call from Gophermods shortly after it's arrival telling me that nothing was wrong with the phone! It was a miracle! They kept it overnight to test it to make sure. They could have easily told me they fixed it and sent it back and taken the money, but they didn't! They gave me a total refund! These people are amazing, honest people and I recommend them to anyone! Great great company and great people!
None
Great golf course, great deals on homes, fabulous place to live. Highly recommend Toll Brother's Jupiter CC.
None
None
I must admit when I first thought about this place being a "medical spa" I thought it would be like sitting in a doctors office. NOT SO! This place is AMAZING! Very comfortable and pleasing to the eye. See for yourself by clicking "See Inside". From the time you first walk in you're greeted by a warm and friendly staff. From check in to check out they use the latest cutting edge technology to make sure you are well taken care of. And I have to say that if you haven't met Dr. Dickerson you're missing out. He's extremely knowledgeable and a great person all around. Just stop in and introduce yourself you'll see what I mean. Cape Fear Aesthetics also has great events every week that are entertaining yet educational. This is a top notch Med Spa for sure....check it out!
Don't let the $3 sushi rolls foul you! They are wonderful! Once you get to know the owner, you'll venture off the specials. He completely understands what food profiles go together. The decor is simple, but it also is clean. I don't often give a 5 star rating, but Blue Bamboo deserves it.
Very courteous and polite group of people! They very graciously accommodated my mother (who is a senior citizen) while she waited. I would definitely refer them to anyone who may find themselves in need of this kind of assistance.
Erin is simply AMAZING! Not only has she guided me towards more direction and focus in my business she has given me the confidence to push myself even harder. This week we were talking about the strengths and weaknesses of my FB page and Erin heard my ideas and interpreted them so well that she was able to create a fantastic new business cover photo for me and hit right on my ideas with very little time/edits etc. I now have business colors, branding and something that I'm very proud of on my FB business page. Thank you Erin. I'm enjoying working with you and gaining so much in very little time.
Incredible food and a great atmosphere. Would recommend to gastro pub lovers everywhere!
Great place to get games way better than the Gamestop on new halls ferry rd excellent customer service and alphabetized games so you don't have to look
Wow is all i have to say this is a great place to work with a exceptional staff , that truly cares about the customer and there needs ,
I was referred to Fitness Together by a friend. She had tremendous weight loss success with the trainers at FT; specifically Eli. My method of staying fit was running but I had recently hit a plateau in my fitness level. Was I a hire-a-personal-trainer-type of person? I wasn't sure but was convinced to try it out. After 13 weeks at Fitness Together, I wonder what took me so long. I feel stronger and have dropped two dress sizes. All the trainers are wonderful in their specific training style. My primary trainer, Eli, has encouraged me and taken a personal interest in me and all his clients. The results are priceless.
I can't say enough good about Green Brooms and the prolific and sincere talent that built and runs it. I started taking classes only this past December, and have developed an understanding and talent in the art of song beyond my expectations thanks in part to Rebecca - a most personable and accomplished instructor - and Manuel and Gyllian, who have made their dream a reality, and continue to do so with the utmost integrity in musical development and care for their students and staff. I've been intimidated by the prospect of entering the world of music for years -- and now, a mere 7 months later, I consider myself a confident and competent singer. Making the decision to learn music has changed my life, which sounds like a daunting task - but making the decision to do so at Green Brooms took care of that. I had my first recital last night, and I couldn't have been happier with the series of events. The overwhelming positive feedback from my friends and family, and various staff and students at Green Brooms Music Academy, was both intensely humbling and inspiring. I can now finally give myself credit where I suppose it's due, and recognize my efforts as not only successful, but also appreciated in the world of art that is song. I now plan on making music a much more integral part of my life, and sharing as much of it as I can with my friends and family. There are no word to express what it feels to have overcome the intimidation and self-doubt that held me back from these pursuits all these years.
Ordered 120 box lunches for meeting and had them delivered. Timing was perfect and everything was "to order". Will definitely order again next time we have a meeting.
None
I like the taste its nice...
I just got h1b extension past H1B-6 years limit, Harun is pretty familar with what he is doing. Can accurately tell you the application processing time and result base on your case. If this is what you expect for your immigration, I would recommend he is the right one.
Jahitannya super
We have eaten at several Saltgrasses, and this one is by far the best! They have THE best steaks and the sauted mushrooms are fabulous. I have never had a problem with the Saltgrass in Round Rock and would recommend it to anyone.
Had sampler beer so got to taste it all. Overall good beers. Had a sesame crusted tuna sandwich from the specials menu...AMAZING! Waiter was great! Bartender was nice. Good meal.
On time, professional, and reasonably priced. I would recommend this company without any reservations. A 5 out of 5...
Beautiful Haddock supper. Chips double fried in beef dripping........tasty.
None
Very friendly and easy to rent
Great People......Great Atmosphere!!!
I love the original Empire Palace, but the new one is also awesome! Great food and try some of the new dishes on the menu, the dim sum are really good. The place is very clean and the service is fast and always very friendly. I will keep going back again and again, they make great food and are very nice people, not to mention you always have enough for leftovers. :)
Alpha has detailed my cars, boat and my awesome indian motorcycle. He is terrrffic and does wonderful work. A nicer many you'll never meet.
Hi I've known Andy for over two years. He is a total professional and makes the workouts fun but also very hard or I wouldn't still be going! No matter what the circumstances Andy always has a smile but don't be fooled he makes you work! I hated sport with a passion and was a bit of a couch potato but I knew like we all do that this wasn't a recipe for a healthy life style so I bit the bullet and got started and I have no regrets I'm fitter know that I have ever been..........don't wait thinking I don't want people to see me exercising pick the phone up and ring it's your body after all if you think you could do more exercise don't be embarrassed just call.
Best for learning as a starter
I went there because I was having lower back problems. After the therapeutic massage I was totally in a different lane. The masseuse was nice and courteous and he helped my pain along with giving me tips. The doctor even came to assess my situation. I usually go to spas salons when I need a massage. However this is a place I would definitely go back to.
Uno dei migliori!
I highly recommend McMinnville Honda. I got a great car, they were fair with my trade-in, and all the business easily and in a very friendly way. Gary is very good to work with, I will probably do business with him again.
They have a nice staff and a beautiful facility. I would recommend Animal Care Clinic to anyone. Today was my first visit and I was impressed.
None
Great service with a honest sales approach.Over all huggins honda and ms. Jackie were very helping with our first car buying experience. Thank you !!!!!!!!!!- Posted as a service & under authority of this business, comment shown as expressed by a true customer of this dealer.
muy buena atencion, y lo mas importante variedad de peces a buenos precios
This place is great. I went to a doctor at Sams Club and then picked out a pair of glasses at See. The glasses I picked up were no good though and See said to go back to my doctor. I did and the doctor said the prescription was right. I went back to See and they had their doctor examine me for free and it turns out the doctor at See didn't know what they were doing. See redid my glasses for free and they are perfect.
The food is always delicous. But normally you have to come at the right time beacuse the shop is always quite crowded. Personally I don't like the drinks there much. But hey you can't complain the food is damm good.Just bring your own drinks. Actually the one drink that is nice is the soya bean bottle drink. The hakka noodles are my favourite dish. -John Smith
I'm not even a patient of Dr. Chisholm, but when I was on family vacation in Ontario, I called him because my frames broke. They had no problem with it, and scheduled me immediately to get in a get it taken care of. They got me in the next day and repaired them on the spot, no questions asked. Dr. Chisholm has a beautiful office, and if he treats all his patients like he treated me, I will have to move to Ontario!!
None
Despite the rising competition on Finchley Road for the guys at eye emporium I stick with them as I feel looked after and reworded for my fidelity. I'm a contact lens user and Salim, the optometrist, is meticulous and always keen to offer the best solution for my eyes without pushing for the most expensive product. Salim, the store manager (yes, same name!), is very customer oriented, friendly and approaches each customer as an individual rather than a number that fills its budget.
I took my yoga teacher training through Shanti and loved every minute of it. The studio itself is beautiful - clean, full of light and right downtown close to everything. The owner, Rene Johnson, is an inspiring teacher and creates a friendly, supportive atmosphere for all levels. I would never have been able to take the YogaWorks teacher training with Catherine Munro if it hadn't been for Rene's kindness, and my personal practice is infinitely richer as a result. Thank you Shanti!
My favourite blood donor centre. Staff are great. Free wifi
None
Wow An authentic ghanaian bar
None
My husband and I were looking for a vehicle that has high fuel efficiency. The 2013 Chevy Spark stood out among all the choices because of its affordable price, stylish appearance, and of course its mpg ratings. When it comes to car shopping, we never rush to make a decision since a large amount of money is involved. After visiting two other Chevy dealerships in the DFW metroplex, we decided to make a stop at Young Chevrolet after knowing that they have a variety of Sparks in their inventory. My husband and I both test drove a 2013 Spark 1LT in Denim (love the color!) and we agreed that it was the right car for us. Our sales representative Pablo Miramontes and his manager Dennis Steele did their best to work with us on the price, and guess what, we now have a brand new car to cruise around town! Oh, and the Finance Manager Bob Tyndall was also very friendly and helping in getting us set up with a low interest monthly payment plan. It has been almost a month since we purchased the Spark and we really enjoy all the features this little car is packed with, especially the MyLink touchscreen radio! We also really appreciate the after-sale customer services and follow-up e-mails/calls provided by various staff members at Young Chevrolet to ensure that we are satisfied with the vehicle. Buying the Spark from Young Chevrolet is certainly the most stress-free car shopping experience we've had in a while and I strongly recommend anyone who's looking for a car to stop by Young Chevrolet. You won't be disappointed!
First thing I noticed about Anna Maria's was the comfortable environment with ample room where you're not sitting right on top of the next person. The menu is very unique and the service is very personable. Anna Maria does a lot of the cooking and has quite a few "signature" dishes. She takes the time to go out and visit with the customers to socialize, get feedback and make suggestions based on what the customer is desiring. Highly recommend and I'm heading back!
I called Noosa when I started hearing critters in the attic and in the walls of our home. They came over and took care of the problem quickly and courteously. They've been monitoring ever since and we've been bug free ever since. Their staff is friendly and efficient. Juggling three kids, I love their hand off monitoring. They tell me when they will come, the take care of things quickly and quietly. I get the report and all is good in the world again!
My husband & I have been camping here since they opened in 1970. Our youngest daughter met her husband at Leelanau Pines. It is by far the nicest campgrounds we have ever visited. The kids love the lake, the creek, the playground, heyride, walking on the cool nature trails. It's 15 minutes from Lake Michigan, smack in the middle of Michigan wine country and best of all has NO MOSQUITOS!!! Best times to camp are early May until Mid June for a more open feeling and less campers. September & October are awesome, too. Summer is wonderful but crowded because everyone loves "The Pines".
None
None
Fyi - this is now called The Rivers
The prices were reasonable for such good pizza. It's right off the Brooklyn Bridge and has down the street from the East River boardwalk. I really enjoyed our server and how attentive he was. I would definitely come back to Grimaldi's
Amazing! - Wind in the willows
A great, growing church in the heart of Manayunk. Tons of energetic young people. Unique, city-centered outreach. Gospel-centered community. Great teaching and worship, but the best thing about the church is the welcoming, genuine people.
Free Wifi, superb cocktails, what's there not to like :)
None
Good price and great service for 4 city bikes for the week.
Good food, Good value, fast and friendly service :-)
Para nosotros uno de los mejores restaurantes de la ciudad. Un trato excelente muy profesional y la comida está muy buena, tanto el cochinillo como el solomillo con bacon estaban riquisimos. Además tienen una estupenda bodega de vinos
Sok jó étel, gyors kiszolgálás.
None
Divain....pura vida
None
I really enjoyed being entertained by Joe. He kept the attention of the whole room in amazement. Not only is Joe a fantastic magician and entertainer but he is a nice guy too.
Beauty of love
Quality English education
None
None
Excellent espresso.
This is a wonderful family-owned, local farm. The people are nice and make sure that what you want is what you get. They can order anything you want and they deliver! This will be the only place we go from now on!!!
Muy bueno
When I moved to the area, I started a membership so that I could access the 100 yard range for rifle load development and handgun practice in the pistol bays. I enjoy going out to the range (range officers keep the noobs in check and ensure safety and all), and I also enjoy coming back to the "lobby" where they usually have coffee/bathrooms, and plenty of merchandise to buy/check out, and plenty of hunting stories to share. I recently attended one of Steve's private CHL courses that we had organized for my SQ. Aside from a good marketing pitch, Steven spent much time combing through state laws in the classroom portion and running through scenarios with us on the range portion and left no question unanswered. Other than that, they always greet me verbally when I walk in, and that is just really cool when you visit a laid back gun store. I am looking forward to the range expansion coming up!
Awesome food, relaxing environment
None
I have been a true customer for about 4 years, if you need the job done correctly with top notice service and respect, this is the place to go. They stand behind all their out even after sale. Never had an issue that was not corrected, owner is hands on and truly cares about his customers. A+
None
Electrical problems is def not my cup of tea. I was having some electrical problems at my home i called Fondas Electric and they were able to fix the problem . Thank You Fondas Electric i have your number saved on my Fridge. Lord only knows what Electrical problems i will have next with these two Growing boys Touching and testing everything!
This past week I had to take my dogs in for a check up because my one dog had been scratching her ears non stop. I called the office and the person said that I could bring them in asap if I wanted too. My dog had been whining since 4 am that morning, so I did. The vet was so cool she met me at the reception area and brought the dogs in to give them a check up. My dogs were very scared to be there, which was apparent by their behavior . The vet sat on the floor with them to get them comfortable and then did the check up. She was gentle and caring and she took care of them. I was very pleased. I admit it was different from other vet experience, in other offices, which I have experienced in the past. The other offices seem to have been very sterile and conforming. This doctor was so caring and I would for sure bring them back to this vet office. Thank you and I appreciate a caring doctor with very reasonable rates.
I had a real carpet "emergency" when our large dog got sick all over our brand new area rug less than 24 hours before a house full of company arrived. I called Right & Clean and Raphael was at my house within 15 minutes - this was at 7 p.m. on a Tuesday. He did a thorough job cleaning and treating the rug and charged me a fair price. It was worth every penny to have a clean, odor-free rug for my family and our company. I will use Right & Clean for all my rug and upholstery cleaning from now on.
Mamiii me voy a vivir con Harold! no me esperen para cenar! xdd
Whether a first-timer or a returning guest, Southern Shores truly knows how to roll out the red carpet. Their website is very easy to navigate, the pictures are very enticing, and the staff is very welcoming. From the moment we walked into our first Southern Shores cottage 17 years ago, we felt welcomed, and it's been consistent through the years, whether renting for a four day winter getaway, or being informed that we could rent "our" dream cottage for two weeks in a row! Rest assured, you'll receive the best service and accommodations with Southern Shores.
Muy buena pajina.y.útil. gracias
Best high school in all of Queensland, and possibly Australia! It has awesome staff that are really helpful and a great principal :D
La comida abundante y de precio bien. Muy recomendable.
My laptop as well as desktop both had several issues, I'm not computer savy in any means. It's nice to know that I can count on Danny and Chris to be there to help me with my computer needs! Amazing prices and service, i highly recommend them to anyone!
This team is wonderful. This is the second time I have used them to move. This time, it was for a longer distance move, so I hired them to load my moving truck. I hired movers in a different state to unload the truck and even they commented on how great of a job A Woman's Touch did loading up my truck. I never take the time to write reviews, but this group truly deserves applause. Excellent service.
I was very apprensive about hiring a limousine company i had not used before to drive us from Oregon City, Oregon to Tulalip Resort and Casino in Everett, Washington. It went perfectly!! Michael picked us up promptly at noon on Friday from our home and we were able to listen to music and watch DVD's, enjoy cocktails and snacks on the trip up. Ron picked us up from the casino on Sunday right after the Seahawks playoff game he was waiting out front. Again, perfect trip home. Both Ron and Michael were so nice to us and the limousine ride became part of a wonderful weekend rather than the daunting drive we usually do ourselves. I rate this company as EXCELLENT and will definitely use them anytime and recommend them highly to anyone else!! Thanks again Ron and Michael it was PERFECT surprise birthday for my husband!
Rustico Tile and Stone recently installed an absolute beautiful Travertine floor and shower in my master bath. The transformation is remarkable and I am incredibly happy with the craftsmanship. The guys that worked on it were prompt, efficient, respectful, and did a fantastic job. I have absolutely no reservations recommending this company. Thank you to Ray, Melanie, and the rest of the crew at Rustico. I cannot wait to have my kitchen backsplash done by them!
餛飩很好吃~不過服務人員都挺隨興的，聽到他喊你叫的食物要趕快舉手
It's a great place to eat during lunch, great food and quick service. :)
Our experience with Bank Street Kia has been awesome. We purchased a 2013 Soul U2 on a Wednesday, signed the documents on the Thursday evening and picked up our vehicle the same night. Krystof and Frank were very thorough, accommodating and a pleasure to deal with. I also own a 2008 Kia Rio, which I purchased at Kia in Kanata, I wasn't pleased with the service so I switched the servicing of my vehicle to Kia Bank Street in 2009; the service has been excellent. Just one of the many reasons why we wanted to keep our business at Kia Bank Street. Krystof and Frank have continued to demonstrate what true service is all about. Thank you to everyone at Bank Street Kia. Debbie & Rob Erdos
Excellent place to work.
The charming, friendly owners of this place know everything there is to know about tea. This is obviously their dream shop.
None
Technician Jim M. was very informative and helpful. Setting the appointment with the company was not as smooth as I would have liked but when we did get them there the next day Jim was great!
Camping in Buxton and got a discount via the campsite so thought we would give it a go. Ordered the sizzling steak and had a lovely pint while I waited. Food came out quickly and was lovely, the steak was cooked as I had asked and was really tasty. Very polite and friendly staff, recommend!
As a history buff the location drew me in but the outstanding wine sold me on The Winery at Bull Run. The Winery at Bull Run combines history and wine in an amazing setting. This is a welcoming, family-oriented winery appealing to a wide variety of visitors. The decor is in keeping with its surroundings and along with the delicious wine great attention is given to the magnitude of historic events that occurred at Bull Run. History buffs and wine lovers alike will enjoy sitting and sipping in the rustic-style tasting room or out on the patio. I highly recommend a visit to this wonderful winery with an amazing story to tell. I also suggest trying their Norton - a fabulous offering made from a historic Virginia grape! Cheers!
Love the honey chicken
Everyday Joe's is a rare find on the over saturated coffee house landscape in Fort Collins. The shop is very large with lots of room. Always quiet even when the room has a lot of people. A great place for a business meeting or studying. But the best part is the community that can be found at Joe's. It is often compared to Cheers, the fictional sitcom bar where everybody knows your name.
This group went out of their way to give me a great experience. I had several things wrong with my bike, and they fixed them all at a much lower price than where I planned to take it. I'm back in town after 10 years in Madison, and the only bike shop I remembered was the one on University. After reading reviews on Google (Thanks, Google), I took it here, instead. Well, you can't judge a book by its cover. These people are a true "mom n pop" shop, working out of their home. The other is a new, very expensive store on a busy street. These people (Baker's) get great reviews, and I experienced great service first hand. I had a small problem after the repair, with no transportation there, and they came and got me, solved the problem free of charge and I was on my way. I can't imagine any of the other shops would have done that. They obviously stand behind their service. Remember, don't go for the poshest looking shop, go for the reviews.
None
Having always been something of a nervous patient I decided to take the plunge and made the decision to fix my smile in 2014. The reception team were really helpful when I called and quickly helped book me in for my consultation. The consultation (conducted by James) was very thorough and he was fantastic at alleviating my historic fears while explaining different options open to me. I've since been twice and, while still not the most fearless patient, would definitely recommend Bow Lane Dental Group to any other nervous patients out there.
Strickland Funeral Home is an A+ funeral home. Sean and the other staff members were very kind and took me under their wings. Sean took control of everything and my family was so glad. My Mom(Billie Dove Hopkins Wood) died October 2004 and my sister (Valerie Kay Wood Dillard) died May 2004. Strickland handed both funerals. My Dad (Joseph Daniel Wood) passed away February 20 2012. Guess who did the funeral? If you said Strickland, you are right. When I leave this world I know Sean will help Tom, Matt and Kenya, Melissa and Justin and my sweet,[], sweet grandchild Julianne.
Fantastic!
Was a Chevy guy my whole life until salesman Bob Stahl showed me the F150 Ecoboost. Awesome truck, Awesome Staff. I live in MI, bought the truck in Franklin on my way to Arkansas. Fast, Friendly Service. Would highly recommend the purchasing experience at Ford Lincoln of Franklin.
None
Yup this place is the tint shop to go to, reliable, fast, and always will be able to fit you into the day. They don't bullshit you, and they will treat your car likes it's there own. Highly recommended. I love the way my car looks!
I've been going to Direct Optical for over 10 years and always have a good experience. The prices are the best as well. One year when my insurance was no longer in their network I went somewhere else and ended up paying even more for the same contacts than if I'd just gone their out of network route. When my toddler twisted my old glasses, bought years prior, they bent them back no charge the same day. One time when my contact supply was going to be slightly delayed in arriving they gave me 3 months worth extra for free. I just got back from my appt. today and it was super quick & pleasant and despite me arriving 5 minutes late I had not wait. The staff was friendly & welcoming and charmed my shy 4yr old too. I was even given a rebate and a discounted exam price, which really helps now that I no longer have vision coverage. I can't recommend them enough.
Sickdyy sick
Aquaman is by far the best pool service we have used. Well worth the money and least expensive service we have had in the last 10 years.
As far as I'm concerned Gailor Animal Hospital is the best vet in the city of Louisville. They have been tremendously helpful with my two special need fur babies... They have provided excellent care for both of them, even on an emergency basis and they even extended my black lab's life by 2 years after she had a spinal injury. When we had to put her down at the beginning of this year, I have never felt so much love in one room. It was extremely touching. I think this whole practice is amazingly awesome.
If I had to choose between Fremont St. & The Strip, Freemont wins every time
I was driving through Washington and had a coolant leak on my GTI. I needed a water pump replaced and it was a long weekend. They told me it would be Monday. Got me a loaner vehicle. Then, 5 hours later, they called me with the great news that they got it done. They got me back on the road the same day (Friday). The service was amazing. This is a great new dealership with great service. I haven't been to a more competent VW dealership.
One of the best pizza places I have been to. They have large slices for a decent price and their sauce is excellent
My favorite place to see the best local bands. Love ya T-Bird!
Nothing but good things to say about the Gardners Inn. The renovations are really nice. Rooms are comfortable and of good size. Bathrooms were in top notch! The manager was very pleasant and went out of his way to make sure my family was looked after. Facilities were excellent, food was excellent, breakfast was excellent. Recommend it to anyone. Well done to management.
I've always had a great experience with Ashley Furniture, from the sales team to the delivery, everything went smoothly. My salesman was very courteous, patiently followed me around the store several times helping me find what I wanted to buy, and didn't pressure me to buy way more than I needed to. The Delivery went just as well, again both men were very courteous, and help me move out some old furniture, and me arrange the new furniture the way I wanted it. I highly recommend Ashley, and will continue to buy from them in the future.
My mother, 83, received expert care at the hospital when she broke her hip during our visit there in Summer 2012. She received a partial hip replacement, and everyone, from attendants to the hospital's social worker, nurses, doctors and chief surgeon all gave optimum care to my mother, and kept me, her daughter, who was with her at the time, continually informed in detail about my mom's needs and the procedures she would undergo before, during and after. We were and remain grateful to the expert medical team at Maui Memorial. Mahalo, one and all!
None
A best place to live in! Its like a small city within a city. 603 flats, diversified community and everything is available within the apartment (right from groceries to ration to stitching to computer classes, etc.)
Gemeinsam mit meiner Frau habe ich im Landhotel Stemp das Tageswellnessangebot genutzt. Wir haben uns ausgesprochen wohl gefühlt und kommen sicher wieder. Vielen Dank an Familie Stemp!
One the best if not the best of Hull's Old World Pubs
I accidentally discovered Georges by mistake, but since doing so I have been hooked, the food is very good and plenty of it you will not be hungry or disapointed when you leave, and they do infact stand behind any dish served, without argument or haste, this is in my book a very enjoyable restaurant to eat there or get it to go either way, I highly recommend eating there and you must try there hot pastrami sub its the best, I have now been a customer for the past 6 months. The burgers are char broiled and thick, bring big hands with you because you will need them both....enjoy
'We've just finished recording 'GoGo Penguins' latest work at 80 HERTZ, signed to Gondwana Records, after the success of recording my own album there last year. The live room has a great vibe and acoustic, with the benefit of line of sight. Love the sound of the Neve Genesys board - looking forward to getting back in soon!'
None
Very loving and caring community!
None
New York summer can be brutal, so my heart stopped when my A/C stopped working last month. A buddy mentioned Evergreen, so I called them up to come fix the machine. An hour later, a technician was on my doorstep, and two hours later my apartment was cooled to perfection. The repair was surprisingly affordable considering it's New York, and I was impressed by how quickly the job was done. I'd definitely recommend them to anyone looking for a quality A/C repair service. Prompt, professional, and pleasant - the three P's of any good service in my opinion.
Be sure to try the Apollo Fish here.
This was my first time to visit this clinic, the staff was very friendly, very organized and reasonable priced. Also the dentist was very professional and did not hurt and he was really nice. I will be telling other people about it and i will return when i need too. Thank you and may God bless you Kathy Lewis
You know they are doing something right when the weekend prime time hours wait time for a table is 90 minutes.
None
None
The yummiest food in Auckland! Best chef!
The best available in trivandrum city
None
Went over and beyond!!! Great service. Stayed late to get me back on the road after a break down on the Suncoast Tollway. Did his BEST to help out a complete stranger, tried to save me a car rental, but no, I had to do it my way. Worked WAY past normal hours. Just drove two hours home so the problem is fixed, at a reasonable rate. HIGHLY recommend his business ethics and his work.
I've been to Xtreme Tint on multiple occasions for multiple reasons. They've done a sound system in my boat, vent visors and weather tech mats on two of my trucks, and on my daily driver they've done tint, exhaust, weather tech mats, HID headlights, leveling kit, and 35" mud tires over the course of the last year. Every time I go in there they are all very helpful in suggesting quality brands, time frames on when work can be done, and most of all beating everyone else's prices. They're knowledge and skill with all brands of auto accessories across the board are unmatched in this area. Needless to say I will be returning for future business whenever I am ready for the next accessory on my vehicles.
We have had great experiences so far at Lil' Smiles. The office is designed to be fun for kids and everyone is very friendly. My 3 year old loves going to the dentist!
Best chicken in Lexington. OMG that sauce!!!
Within two weeks of following her recommendations, Mary has given me much of my energy back. She was kind, knowledgeable and effective with meetings. To top it off, the front desk staff are helpful, attentive & quick. Thank you ladies!
Very good and a lot of fun. Great family place...
Spent almost 2 weeks there and loved every minute of it. The nicest people you could ever want to stay with. helpful, gave me great ideas for places to go, when I dropped my camera in a puddle of water my first day there, they gave me their camera to use the whole time! Brilliant place! A working farm, grow their own beef, veggies, have all kinds of classes, walks, right on the river to fish, great home cooked meals, quiet. I can't say enough good about it. Ber & Kevin are your hosts and will try to accomodate anything you need! I can't wait to go back!
I talked with Mike DeLaCerda today and he was very helpful. He was very knowledgeable and was able to give me information about the cars on the lot as well as cars they could get for me. Holmes European has a friendly staff and a great stock of beautiful cars! Definitely recomend buying your next car from them!
I'm tempted to give them a bad review because I don't want them to get so busy I have to wait too long! But we go here almost weekly. Every now and then the food will be a little sub-par or not like it normally is. I used to get the #4, but it had become too dry or overcooked so I avoided it. But I keep to my regulars and it's usually fine. So you might have bad luck and have the less-than-great food they serve about 7% of the time. But the other 93% is worth the 7%. Margarita's are strong but still taste good - expensive but worth the money. A few times we have gotten unflavored when we requested flavored, or on the rocks when we ask for frozen - but hey, they're margaritas so we just drink them anyway. Although once we requested peach and it tatsed like lime. They skimped us quite a bit. A few of the waiters could afford to learn a little more English in regards to their menu because we think sometimes errors have been made because they're too busy and don't take the half-second to really listen to what we're ordering. But the payoff is typically extremely fast service and food. IN SHORT, eat there. The longest we've had to wait when they are packed (Friday's from about 7-830pm) is still only about 15 minutes or so.
This is the 3rd BMW I have purchased at Grayson. My sales person Andrea DeMarco is professional and knows the products very well. The entire finance staff is professional and mindful of my time and needs. I would recommend Grayson to Anyone in search of a new or used vehicle. 
None
Ich bin schon seit mehr als 10 Jahren immer wieder in der Praxis, um mir Linderung bei meines chronischen Rückenleiden zu verschaffen. Die Praxis ist hell und freundlich und hat eine warme Atmosphäre. Schon der Empfang bei Sabine Crisp ist stets warmherzig und kompetent. Unnötige Wartezeit gibt es fast nie. Das Team um Christine Drieske herum ist äußerst erfahren und leistungsstark. Jeder hat seine besondere Stärken, und es wird auch darauf geachtet, dies den jeweiligen Patienten und ihren speziellen Leiden zukommen zu lassen. So landet man beispielsweise nicht "bei irgendwem", sondern fast immer beim vereinbarten Physiotherapeuten. Christine als Chefin zeichnet sich durch besondere Erfahrung und langjährige Fortbildungen in den unterschiedlichsten Behandlungsmethoden aus, die sie gezielt auf die jeweiligen Krankheitsbilder anwendet. In der Praxis Drieske wird man also nicht nach Schema F und nur einer Behandlungsmethode abgefertigt, wie ich das anderwo erlebt habe. Die individuellen Ansätze ergeben dabei den größtmöglichen Erfolg. Ganz selbstverständlich werden auch chiropraktische Griffe angewendet, so dass der Bewegungsapparat hinterher wieder frei ist und die Schmerzen verschwunden sind. Selbstverständlich kann man keine Wunder erwarten, aber optimale Versorgung und Anleitung zu Hausübungen, die die Behandlung in der Praxis sinnvoll ergänzen. Das Ganze wird abgerundet durch weitere Behandlungsmethoden wie Schröpfen, Reizstrom, Akupunktur, Aushängen, Wärme- und Fangobehandlungen, Übungen auf dem Powrx-Vibrationstrainer, um nur die zu nennen, die ich bereits selbst ausprobiert habe. Insgesamt kann ich uneingeschränkt empfehlen, sich in dieser Praxis in heilende Hände zu begeben!
I visited the White Magnolia at their Tampa location. The store manager, Ashley, was absolutely amazing! I brought a pretty big crowd with me, but she acclimated them just fine and made everyone feel welcome and comfortable. We tried on SO many dresses, but Ashley didn't mind. She was fast at helping me and keeping the store looking neat at the same time. She was so sweet and knew exactly when to say something to help me decide between a couple dresses. I was able to narrow it down to about 3 and was really torn. Ashley didn't rush me and said just the right things to help me make up my mind, all without being pushy! It was an amazing experience and I definitely would recommend this place to any and every bride I know!
Fantastic salad bar
None
I love this place. I can have anyone in the shop cut my hair (and I have) and they always make it look great. You can schedule an appointment online now, which is great for me, since I'm horrible about that. I work just around the corner, and it has been especially neat growing with them as they mature both professionally and in their own lives.
Wonderful food and great service! Loved that they could make the eggplant parm vegan!! Loved all the vegan choices!
Staff was very helpful and friendly. Rooms were exceptionally clean and well maintained. I had a wonderful experience. Would stay again if within 20 miles of the area.
Ein wirklich tolles Apartmenthaus, von welchen man in wenigen Schritten in der Altstadt ist.
I really enjoyed my jump. The staff is nice, explained well how everything would go and joked around to release the tension. The waiting area was nice too with a canopy to stay in the shade. Only issue was that one of their plane was being repaired and they had a lot of people jumping so the wait was long. Be prepared to spend a while there.
Very safe, Very clean, polite staff, fast shuttle. Military discounts.
My wife and I love this place. We usually have lunch there once or twice a month. It is definitely a step above the majority of Mexican restaurants in the area. My favorites are Tacos de carne asada, Fajitas, Burritos de carne asada. Their salsas are fresh, and we always get friendly service!
None
None
Absolutely the best psychiatrist in the green bay area. She takes the time to talk to patients as a counselor would before making medication decisions. This is something that is very uncommon with psychiatrists but is the key to being a good one. On top of that, she is neither "liberal" nor "conservative" with prescribing - she simply does what is good for the patient. She's quite spacey, yes, but I'd rather have an absolutely excellent doctor who doesn't always return calls than have a mediocre one who does. :) By the way, she's at aurora in depere now.
Do it again forever
I stopped in to have a tire mounted on my way riding from Nashville to Oregon. I was a customer these guys would never see again and they went out of their way to help me. If I lived in Nashville this would be my Honda shop.
Agave is one of my favorite places to eat. The first thing you notice when you walk in the door is the amazing smell of fire grilled meat. The atmosphere and decor set the vibe perfectly. Rustic beams, rich earth tones, and over-sized booths. You can have one of over 200 kinds of tequila or any of the multitude of margarita flavors in addition to a full bar. Be sure to order the table-side prepared GUACAMOLE. They make it precisely to your liking. It pairs well with the smoky, home-made salsa and chips which come free with your meal. If you come during happy hour and sit at the bar, there are great deals on appetizers and drinks. Finally, save room for the tres leches, which is the best I've ever had. If you love Agave as much as me, be sure to ask for their Amigo card. I recently earned a free Sunday brunch for two (value about $50). Reservations are not usually needed, but during the winter months when Naples population doubles, you should put one in. On a side note, the parking is abundant, close, and free.
This place is spectacular. It's drycleaning anytime you want it. I live right up the street and Pressbox allows you to drop off and pick up your dry cleaning ANYTIME by offering you secure access to your own designated laundry locker. I love it. Not only is Pressbox an excellent concept but my laundry was very well cleaned at a reasonable price. Happy customer and definitely will be back!
This is our favorite local family restaraunt. We eat here all the time. The nightly specials are awesome values and it's a cozy, friendly, welcoming 'ol timey American style kind of neighborhood place for locals to relax and eat a nice affordable square meal after a hard days work. We also enjoy stopping by on weekend mornings for a quick and easy breakfast on the way out to recreational and or entertainment pursuits. The bloody Marys and biscuits and gravy are good hang over fare and all of the waitresses are great...just don't be lame and ask stupid questions if you can see they're busy or not in the mood for dealing with BS.
None
I started going here as part of a Groupon deal. Loved the energy these ladies have. They explained everything and were extremely patient and encouraging. I work up quite a sweat in the 45 minute classes than I did in a lot of other hour long circuit classes elsewhere. All the classes have different formats too, so you never get stuck with a boring routine. The facility itself is really unique and in a convenient location. Definitely recommend if you want better arms!!
I really do enjoy this pet store. They seem to always have what I need, and if not, they know when it will be in or where else I can find it. The staff is always friendly, courteous and knowledgeable. I have been going here for almost a year and it's simply awesome.
CPA Accounting and Tax Solutions really does have the solution to all of your accounting and tax concerns. They are a great group of professionals that are happy to help any way they can! Very friendly and timely service, I would recommend them to anyone!﻿
Great Library in the Plano area. A good selection of books, audio/ video and magazines. One can sign up with no hassles in 5 mins. The self checkout too is very efficient once you get it.
awesome place with beautiful women!!
Kellie Belles is so friendly and polite, she's very helpful and reminds me when my payments are due, she goes above and beyond to make the customer happy!
Absolutely love this place. Some of the best breakfast food I have ever had.The very best Huevos Rancheros in the known galaxy.
None
None
Great flavors and the giant open door provides a great environment
I tend to be quite anxious about going under anesthesia, and I had put off having my wisdom tooth removed for a long time. When my dentist told me it had to be removed or would damage my other back teeth, I went to see Dr. Grellner. He and his staff definitely put me at ease during the consultation. I had general anesthesia for the surgery, and it went very smoothly. Dr. Grellner and his staff are kind, knowledgeable, and professional, and the office is beautiful. Although my tooth was difficult to extract, I had minimal swelling and an easy recovery. When I did have a question after hours, I received a return call quickly. I would highly recommend Dr. Grellner to anyone who needs wisdom teeth removed.
Great office. Enjoyed coming here for my cleaning and dental work. Nice staff. Super friendly. Don't forget to use the massage chair in the waiting room. It's free. Cleanest most beautiful bathroom in a office I have ever seen. They have and utilize all the latest and greatest dental equipment. No old school here! The Dr. Nguyen is fast and efficient. Super friendly and pretty receptionists quickly get you in and out with all paperwork. Highly recommended. ----- Return visit to get old fillings replaced. Done quickly and painlessly. No lingering issues. The next day, Dr. Nguyen actually called me to check in on me. Yes, the doctor called me. That's customer service. He's totally got my patronage!
Ich fand es richtig gut. Fuer 32 chf ohne Zeitbegrenzung baden in diversen Becken, auf dem Dach und im Dampfbad schwitzen. Ich werde wieder kommen!
Tintal 2 etapa 6
We have been clients at Acredale Animal Hospital since we moved to Virginia Beach twenty years ago. We have always found them to be extremely caring, friendly, knowledgeable, and always there when we needed them. The vets are wonderful, the office staff extremely helpful, and the attendants friendly and courteous. We wouldn't dream of going anywhere else!
I was here for 4 weeks back in 2009, and have recently stayed again. Very comfortable, quiet and conveniant. Right across the road (3 mins walk) from the shinjuku South exit. Easy walking distance to yoyogi, harajuku and also shibuya. Right on the Yamanote line so you can travel anywhere in Tokyo (metro) with ease. I loved it so much, I moved to Japan to live :D.
None
None
For nine years (2 cars), I have been going to University Volkswagen for service because of the excellent service that Jon Fass and his team of great technicians have performed on my cars. I appreciate the honest and straight forward advice on maintenance that has over the long run saved me money on repairs. When my car was in need of a repair the price was very reasonable. They have a first rate organization and have always treated me with excellent service, even after car was long out of warranty. Jon truly cares about customer service and that makes a huge difference.
好所在；值得推薦
My husband and I love stopping at Sweet Frog to top off our evening out. My favorite yogurt flavors are the Coconut and Cake Batter- so delicious. A wide choice of tasty toppings and the friendly service make it even better! A wonderful addition to our neighborhood!
I went for a consultation about getting an ombre color done to my hair. Everyone there was smiling and happy when I arrived and the stylist I met with was so bubbly and excited. She told me exactly how she would do my hair as her hair was close to what I wanted. She moved her schedule around to allow more than enough time to ensure my hair color and cut would be perfect. I am super excited to continue to go to this salon.
When I was picking an insurance agent, I wanted someone who had my best interest in mind. Matt takes the time to find out what is important to you and your famliy and then explains the policies/plans he feels will benefit you. It's nice to have an agent you can trust. I would recommend him to anyone looking for Insurance or Financial needs.
None
The unknown of what's going to happen is the scary part, but Judy helped put my mind to ease until I had to go to court. She was very amazing and professional in court and let's just say that I left the courtroom as if nothing ever happened. I've learned from my mistake and more importantly my case was dismissed and I owe it all to Judy Kim and her team!!!
Absolutely this is the best Thaifood restaurant I have ever been to in me life, with pretty decorating and delicious food, as well as good environment. Seafood here is strongly recommended, also the cocktail would surprise you!
Me and wife had the best wedding ever. Diane and Richie went beyond our expectations and delivered an outstanding service. Highly detail oriented with an amazing vision. We had no idea where to start but they happily walked us through the planning process and showed us beautiful recent pictures as well as pictures from decades of magnificent events. Their flower selection is unbelievable, we were able to find and use flowers and greenery from around the world to match our theme. Highly recommend X-QUISITE FLOWERS & EVENTS. Truly an A+ event company. Thank you X-Quisite for ever lasting memories. (Sept,2012)
I was visiting a friend in Herndon last weekend and the first night there we decided to go for pizza. Well, I like my pizza a little more authentic, so we bypassed the chain establishments and landed at Piero's Corner. OH. MY. GOODNESS! This place is awesome!!! The cheese was fresh, the crust was crisp and the veggies were garden fresh. In fact, it was so good I picked up a pie on my way home! This time I got Italian sausage, mushroom, onion and pepper with extra cheese. It was delish! One word of caution, though, only order extra cheese if you really like extra cheese because they are generous with the toppings!
None
Terrific facilities, with great service by the staff, and it's all-inclusive [that includes all types of beverages!] so it is really a pleasure. Highly recommended, and I hope we go back next year.
None
The BEST Shrimp N Grits on the Strand! Delectable vegetable sides with dinner entrees. Delicious Breakfasts, too. This is no greasy spoon perched on the Pier. The view is lovely, the place is clean, the service is very good and friendly. A true local delight!
Never crowded, very friendly staff
None
Grupo de Oração Bom Jesus do Matosinhos!
I think that this restaurant is doing very well. The food: Very Good Staff: Excellent Decor and Decoration: Very Good Overall: Excellent Please go to, and try it out.
Had Trina and her crew take some photos of our family. Pictures turned out wonderful and the experience was pleasant even with 3 kids. Thanks Trina for your professionalism.
I needed a lawyer and didn't know what to do. My friend told me to call Alcock and Associates. So after reviewing their website and other lawyers sites. I decided to schedule an appointment. I was surprise about the attention I was given by the receptionist and even more surprise when they told me it was a free consultation. So l met with Attorney Nick Alcock and one of his associates. He was the total opposite of what I was expecting. Very respectful, down to earth and straight to the point. I didn't even have to ask him questions because that's how specific and detailed they were. I would definitely refer him to my friends and family.
This place was just what I needed. A long day of work on business here in Phoenix having come in from San Diego a day earlier. They had the substantive, flavorful beers I was looking for... hard to find when you're traveling and in a city you don't know. Had a G'Night Imperial Red double IPA... in. a. m-fing can... which is unusual, but quite tasty. And the chipotle cheese steak was on point. Nice subtle flavors in there along with the flavorful cheese steak with the nice, salty homemade chips. nice conversations over a sweet 90's to 2000+ hip-hop soundtrack... chatting with the locals including the owner's wife, bartender and co-manager as well as trinidadian-venezuelan hip-hop producer @mackdrama. In Phoenix? Hit up the Main Ingredient.
احلى قسم
None
Lunch was amazing. Great lunch specials, food was so good! Doner salad was so tasteful, and my husband loved his adona kebab. A must try. We will be back
The food is flavourlicious! It's so good it makes you feel healthy. Great range of Asian Fusion style meals cooked with care and to perfection and quick. Service is excellent with a lovely atmosphere. Highly recommended! Keep coming back for more!
This is a great little find. The cupcakes are sweet and they have a large variety to choose from. I never thought that one cupcake would take care of my sweet tooth but these sure do. They always seem to have a special cupcake flavor to try. I recommend this to all my friends and often take my out of town guests there too.
David (the owner) goes out of his way to make the stay easy! We love the pool, the site, and the ambiance of the campground.
When we were looking for a Amarillo landscaping company, Texas Tree and Lawn ended up being the least expensive out of four bids. Great work and excellent prices! Recommended
Nick Mildfelt was the sales person that helped us. He is awesome at what he does, made us feel welcomed. He took his time with us and answered all of our question. This was our first time visiting Rusty Eck Ford and will not be our last. Thank you Nick and everyone else that helped us in my daughters first car buying experience!
Dr.Vargas is a good and decent man. His office may not come with all the bells and whistles of a new office but the man helps people and he cares about people. He is a competent doctor, and he has helped me more than words can express. Offers discounted rates for the uninsured and isnt stingy with drug samples for people without perscription coverage.
Klebæk højene hører landets fornemste minder fra vikingetiden, selvom stedet er blevet noget ødelagt af, at Hærvejen blev ført direkte igennem. Runestenen, højene og skibssætningen har mange paralleller til Jelling højene og hører blandt de steder, som alle, der er interesseret i vikingetiden nødvendigvis må besøge. Jeg selv er heldig at være vokset op i dette utroligt naturskønne område og har leget der meget som barn. For mig er der stadig lige smukt.
אופיר הוא ידיד יקר. מכל שיחה איתו אני יוצאת עם תובנות ומחשבות מעניינות חדשות. יש לו הבנה עמוקה בנושא של התפתחות אישית, והמון המון ידע פרקטי בתחומים רבים. אופיר עזר לי פעמים רבות בהחלטות והתלבטויות. ממליצה לדבר איתו.
None
Fantastic little coffee shop on 5th Avenue that sells great Mayan chocolates. There's an AC room that makes it a nice break if you were shopping along 5th in the blazing heat like I was!
Great service and selection, lots of knowledge and friendly people.
None
None
None
None
This Liquor/Wine Store has a tremendous selection of beverages to choose from. Very classy stuff and fair prices. Must be the new management because the cashiers and attendants are very friendly and helpful. Whenever I'm in the area I always pick up a bottle of something new.
None
None
Called Jerry and he responded by phone in short time period. Very informative and extremely pleasant over the telephone. Came out and did a superb job of not only repairing my immediate problem of no heated air but changed out drum cable and pulley as well and much cheaper than everyone else. I will always use this guy because he is FIRST CLASS!!
Nice place to meet friends if not sure they'll turn up.:?
It's a good place for relaxing.
My experience with East Colonial Self Storage was Excellent. It was a very clean, professional and welcoming enviroment. The staff are the friendliest in town. The price of the the space was best price. They had awesome deals, I could not refuse. A great and spacious area. Hours of operation were perfect. I am very please to do business with ECSS! Great thanks to ECSS!
The level of customer service that you will receive through Portland Badge is EXCEPTIONAL! Other businesses should be contacting them to find out "how they do it". As a business consultant I wish every business cared as much as these people do about creating a winning customer experience. 5 Stars Plus!
It has been 8 years since purchasing a new vehicle and that by itself can be very tedious and taxing but I can certainly say that my experience in purchasing another car was very pleasant and most of all informative. Tony broke down the numbers for me that made so much sense which alllowed me to maximize my money's worth in the vehicle in which I purchased (2013 Honda Civic LX). Tony is very knowlegable in what he knows and he exudes that through his passion which he showed the entire time. I would not hesitate to send referrals to him by any means. The attributes that he displayed are the ones that I esteem highly in a world of Customer Service. I also had the opportunity to work with Mr. Hawkins on the finance side of the house and my experience with him was pleasant as well. Overall from 0 to 10, my experience has been rated at a 10. Again, Boyd Auto thanks for your kindness, it will certainly go along ways.
Our pizza was excellent, a special treat. Will be back.
None
This place is huge and fun to walk through. If you enjoy blending styles to create your own look, you'll find some inspiration here - from funky farmhouse to industrial edgy to Chinese zen. There are lots of small things as well as major pieces, and in general it's good value for the price, (not expensive but not cheap either). Nothing bad to say here, the staff are extremely helpful and friendly. Win win win!
None
None
None
None
Candice is a great broker and I never hesitate to recommend her because my clients are always impressed with her professionalism, competence and results. Jacky van der Ven - realtor - Century 21 Foothills
I had to have a pretty complicated, multi-step procedure (at least it seemed complicated to me) done with Dr. Heller. I tend to be pretty nervous about dental work, and he was the most amazing person to work with. Everyone there was always very helpful and attentive, and I always felt completely taken care of.
Heather Wagner could not have made it easier. Faxed over info and what kind of car I was looking for. Then Bam I get a call back saying I got your car and it is being shipped from Dallas. Thanks Heather and thank you Earl Jones (in Dallas office) for taking care of the paperwork and driving car down.
super lecker, immer frisch, nette Atmosphäre als wäre man direkt in Portugal! Nur für Fisch und Knoblauch Liebhaber :-)
None
This place "gets" romance. Our 6th stay. Service unmatched. The dive team is 6-star, though Jamaican reefs may only be 2-3 star, at best. GO! I promise you won't regret it
Iron Man was Very COOL!!!!!!!
None
Prompt service nice and warm lobby
None
None
Excellent, sympa, carte intéressante. Prix sympas. Vins très corrects avec rapport qualité prix au top. Merci pour cette bonne soirée
Can you say ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!!! My best friend referred me to this place and thank god I listened!!! The employees are phenomenal!!!! Always greeted with a smile and they make you feel right at home!!! I'm on my 3rd treatment of laser hair removal and I cannot say enough how my face feels and looks outstanding!!!! I've referred all of my coworkers here and they have all booked their appointments and so should YOU!!! If you want a Spa with awesome customer service, amazing technicians and an overall "home" feeling when you walk through the doors, then Image Medical Spa is the place to go!!! Book your appointment now and I promise you it'll be worth it!!! I wish I can give them 10 stars cause they are beyond the 5 that yelp offers!!!!!
There are two Arts Market locations in Toronto, and they both offer an amazing (and ever evolving) assortment of quality hand crafted items. One location is in Leslieville, and the other is just West of Ossington and College. Artists/craftspeople rent their space and get 100% of sales they've made. The Arts Market supports their vendors 100%, and I love that about them! Plus, the owner Daniel is one rad dude!
Fantastic dentists.....I like that they can assist in finding financing.........
Serbian restaurant great place
Excellent food and service!!
Jessica is an absolute pleasure to work with. She is very knowledgeable and does a fantastic job of interpreting information quickly, which is helpful when trying to accomplish tasks in a timely manner. We've used her a few times and will absolutely use her again in the future!
The Gow Team are friendly, knowledgeable, thoughtful, accommodating, honest, approachable, funny, and straight with you. I can't think of a team I would rather have handling my finances.
Great venue...service...only spot with a 2nd story outside patio..great spot for a rendezvous!
Everyone that I had contact with was very courteous and thorough. They were not the closest dealer to me, but I felt more comfortable here than the other dealer.
Setting outdoors and enjoying fine food
Very quick and friendly staff!
Karen saw that we were lost in the Dymocks building and introduced herself as a jeweller. In the end she gave us a fantastic deal for our wedding rings. The price she got us was extremely competitive and she blew us over with her in-depth knowledge. Karen is a lovely lady and very approachable. We greatly recommend her for anyone wanting to find that perfect ring
Nice
I love the Love Dog Cafe! This quaint cafe on Lopez Island is always on our list of places to eat when we visit the island. I am amazed at the wide variety of choices the Love Dog offers including many vegan and gluten free options. Our family includes carnivores, vegetarians, seafood lovers and those with gluten allergies. The Love Dog menu offers multiple choices for each person in our party no matter their dietary restrictions or preferences - including a kids menu. Plus, all of the ingredients are fresh, local and, when ever possible, organic. The Love Dog offers high quality food and many choices - which is surprising considering the size of the island. Some of my family's favorite dishes are the portabella mushroom burger, the handmade pizzas, the salmon burger (gluten free bread option) and the house salad. The Love Dog Salad Dressing is out of this world delicious (had to get a bottle to take home). The Pot-of-Chocolate dessert is a wonderful (very) rich treat that we enjoy sharing. The weather was beautiful this evening so we chose to sit outside to enjoy the sunset throughout our meal. We had a lovely meal with a great atmosphere and good service. We will be back soon!
LOVE..Love...love this dentist office. My son has been going there since he was an infant and now he is 4. My daughter just started going to him, and I would not have it any other way. The staff is great, and Dr. Edwards is patient, and engages in the kids so that it is a calmly experience for them.
We were treated with excellent service.they had a warmed waiting room that was available to wait in.they even carried the tire out to the car for us.I will definitely be back.
My home town lovely place and would love to live for forever
We were hoping for a Chinese restaurant to deliver to us since we live kind of far from most places. One day we got a flyer in the mail, so we called to order. We were very impressed with both their food, the packaging that the food came in, and the quick service we received. Their prices are excellent also for the quality of food that they produce. I had never been there before so I don't know about previous management, but this was only a month ago and I couldn't say enough about how great our experience was then. We are pretty picky about food too and were not pleased with any other Chinese restaurant in Greensburg. Thanks for your great service! ps: I really have no idea about the decor since we had delivery services (since google asks us to rate that too..)
Amazing service, great food, and a very quick lunch! One of my favorite Thai Lunch stops in the valley
Very friendly guys, and they know what they are doing. To top it off, great price!
What an awesome fun place! Now that it's under new management, it's amazing!
I just bought a beautiful 2004 Mercedes C230 for my beautiful wife. I had always thought that cars like this were out of my reach but Doug showed me that it’s very possible to get a quality, luxury car at a great affordable price at Blizzard Motors. My wife deserves a car like this and Doug made the car buying experience a pleasure, not to mention his service after the sale. I highly recommend Doug to anyone looking for a quality pre owned car.
I had a great experience purchasing my used Ford Focus at Drive America. This is surly a gem for car dealers in the Watertown area. Both Al and Cam are great and assisted me in test driving a few different models. Cam was very knowledgable about each car I tried and answered any questions I had. They were truly interested what was the right "fit" for me and didn't try to push a more expensive model or car when the Focus was obviously the right fit.. Very Respectful!!! Thank you Drive America for being so kind and providing a service a step above other dealers. I will sure be back again.
I believe Alexander is a very talented and determined photographer. He is also talented in dealing with people and lots of personal charm!
Outstanding service, excellent food. The shrimp could have be cooked a little more, but the calamari and tapas were wonderful.
Zoom!!! My soon-to-be husband and I just had Zoom Teeth Whitening done. It was not at all painful and they took their time making sure that the procedure went as expected. Lesley is especially thoughtful and kind. Whenever I book an appointment I ask for her to be the assistant on the job. Dr. Yee is so thorough and really keeps his focus on not costing you too much money if at all possible. He always gives you all the options and let's you choose how to proceed. Teddy is a really great dental hygienist. He explains things so well - like no other hygienist has in all the years I've been going to see the dentist. I highly recommend them! ps the front desk is kind, considerate and very very welcoming!
I was always skeptical about buying parts from a salvage yard but after talking to them on the phone for a few minutes I decided to give it a go after asking them how many miles the part had on it and they assured me that all of the vehicles they buy have under 100,000 miles. I went in to pick up an axle and differential for my Ford F150 and was amazed at all of the parts that were all in great shape that they had stocked on the shelves. You can get anything here everything from engines and doors to gas caps and light bulbs. Anything you need from a ford lincoln mercury and they probably have it. The guy at the desk told me it would be just a few minutes because they were trying to find the best one they had. Then they found one and ended up taking it back and getting a different one because they didn't like that one. So it was very reassuring that they give you the best part available if possible. The other thing is price. The prices were great. I priced the same part at 4 or 5 different salvage yards and they had the best prices by far. Not to mention all of the other salvage yards were not only charging more, but they also had anywhere from 50,000 to over 100,000 more miles than the one I got from Clays Warford. Also the service was great. Everyone in there was on top of their game. Getting me the part I needed quickly, had another guy asking if I'd been helped. Friendly service. Even the guys back in the salvage yard were crackin jokes with me. Now back to the part, I bolted up the axle and diff to my truck with no problem. Everything was in great shape. Even better shape than my original. It even removed some slop from my driveshaft that was there long before the gears blew up in my old one. Also the brake shoes were almost brand new. I'll definitely do business with them in the future.
What a great shopping experience!!
I went in to visit Dr. Fabbiano with very bad neck and back pain. After a few treatments my pain was reduced about 50%. I have now been going to Dr. Fabbiano for about 2 months and my pain in BOTH my neck and back are completely GONE!! He is a miracle worker and really knows his stuff. I had been to chiropractors before and the experience at those particular offices didn't even compare to what you get at Valrico Spine and Rehab Center. From the moment you walk in the entire staff is amazing. Dr. Fabbiano takes time and explains each and every joint, bone or muscle that is not in the right place and then tells you what he is going to do to help you. He then gives you a regimen of what you can do at home to help yourself even more. Dr. Fabbiano really knows his stuff!!! I will continue to go to Valrico Spine and Rehab and will continue to refer everybody I know that has any kind of pain. Thank you!
Steve at the Nimnicht GMC on Phillips Hwy in Jacksonville, Florida has been our routine person for my 2007 Saturn Outlook for years. He's awesome. :) I always forget to fill out the surveys and this time I realized I needed to do it. Whether its an oil change, or repairing my a/c that was an 800+ dollar pain! He always is friendly, fast, he rented me a car and I always get a gorgeous new one to rent :) Thanks Steve - you're the best! From Ronique and Garrick Gibson.. you make coming to get service done not as bad as people make it to be.
None
None
“Five Plus Stars!” I just had Lacey do my youth soccer team’s photos! She did and awesome job! She is very affordable and has the right idea for making each girls photos unique to them and their personality (even if they dont like their pictures taken). She manages her business with a professional and fun atmosphere. I will be using her for all my photo needs!- Sam Hardin
I heard about the good plumbing services of Five Star Plumbing & Drain in st perters, MO before. Suddenly, I had to get my faucet repaired that day, and I called these guys. They were so faster and gave me wonderful plumbing service. Thanks guys. Recommended for all.
My purchase of a 2006 CLK350 at Flectcher Jones Fremont was quite simply the best car buying experience I have ever had. I purchased the vehicle before it was detailed or has any work done on it and the entire buying process was based on the promises made by the sales team. They not only delivered on every promise they made, they actually went beyond that. I truly appreciate Sam's professionalism, knowledge and his ability to honor all the commitments he's made. I would also like to thank Mike Ramish (Sales manager), Greg Nichols (Used Car Manager) and Joe DeFreitas (Service Adviser) for their effort and involvements in making the entire process a pleasant and enjoyable.
The people are great and very helpful. Big selection of bikes (who knew?) and an especially helpful bike folks.
None
What a terrific resort in Candidasa! Superb accommodations, attentive staff, on the ocean and probably the best value of any hotel in the area. Make sure you upgrade to a suite for the best experience.
Was very helpful. Prompt service.
Loved the Chicken Fajita's, melted in my mouth and the peppers were mouth watering. Our server although I don't remember her name was very busy but fast with our service and friendly. Thank you~ See you next week.
Jenny in the front office is awesome and always on top of things. Dr Kim is gentle but at the same time does not mince words. he tells it to you straight what you need and why. always gives you all the options available and always trys to work with insurance companies and within peoples budget. Brittany is really good dental hygenist or assistant, pleasent and really helps explains things nicely and is gentle with a positive attitude always. There office makes you feel comfortable always and happy to serve. Dr Kim does good work and is efficient, gentle, quick and clean. Also taking the patients needs and wants and comfort into consideration always. He uses the latest dental technologies and thinks of things from a whole body approach, integrative dentistry and that is why we chose him in the first place.
Nunggu cuci mobil. Mampir ke mbak dyah
Smartvalue is Best Platform in The World
I believe it's one of the top three restaurants in Columbus. Not Indian restaurants, restaurants period. The food is spectacular, and although I'm not from India, I can say it's probably authentic to some part of India. The bar is great and serves Palma Louca.
Great food and early bird specials as long as you don't mind a horde of senior citizens
I already bough two cars here and the service is exceptional.
I use their services for year and a half already and I'm satisfied. They made my hair great and I will try the make - up artist there soon.
Excelente hotel! Gostei de tudo, tudo muito bom, desde o quarto, o atendimento, funcionários muito atenciosos. O café da manhã é maravilhoso, tem a moça que faz uma tapioca divina... tudo nota 1000. Recomendo.
None
Took my fiance' out for a much overdue date. Not only was our server fantastic, put the steaks were cooked perfectly. (We both had the Filet with Wild Mushroom Sauce). I've never had poor service at this Outback, and definitely recommend this store to everyone!
Great Stuff! We love the quality and creativity of the ProspectsPLUS products and services! We recommend them to all of our Floyd Wickman Program students and even use their services ourselves in our corporate marketing campaigns. They are efficient, friendly and right on target! Everything today's agents and brokers need!
If you're driving, this is the starbucks for you. Just off the link road, this store has a drive through (the first in the UK), it's open and airy inside, with a patio if it's not raining. Consistently good coffee and food, well stocked and the barrista's aren't hard on the eye either. Staffed by fairly young people, the staff are friendly and bubbly lending a real kick to the atmosphere.
They have cheap rentals and nice prices and soda and snack.
“We had a great experience with our maintenance person, Vern. He was very professional and was flexible with helping us with all our needs!”
I have only been here one time, with friends. Service was outstanding, food was great. I really enjoyed the atmosphere. I have friends coming in from out of town tomorrow and this was the first place I thought about when thinking of where to take them
If you live in the Brandon area and like Thai food I would highly recommend Lemon Grass Thai Kitchen. The service is excellent with friendly and helpful staff. They seem to really care about your experience. My wife and I went to try it out for lunch and where very pleased with the whole experience. If you've never tried Thai food give their buffet a try. It's clean and well managed and will give you the opportunity to try many different offerings to see what you like best. If you prefer not to eat at a buffet they have a full menu as well. You really can't go wrong. We can't wait to go again.
None
Yesterday we had dinner for 5 people. We ‘ve ordered 5 different appetizers, 5 main courses and 2 deserts. Everything was very delicious without exception! Cocktails were very good! Great service also! In addition there is a very pleasant ambiance; nice music and it’s quiet enough to keep conversation. Definitely we’ll come again!
Best Micro Brewpub in Louisville. We love this type of place and were really happy to locate Cumberland Brews right here in Louisville and only a short walk to Bardstown road from home. They have a great atmosphere, an awesome staff, excellent pub fare food - we love the Ky Bison Burger and we always enjoy their great beer. If you get a chance check out the upstairs area, very cozy and nice.
Great food,service and very good atmosphere
None
Great place for baked goods or lunch!
None
Brought my 2010 Impreza in for a routine oil change and tire rotation. The service team informed me my brakes and rotors were worn out, and needed replacing. They took care of the brakes a couple days later, and offered me a courtesy shuttle to and from a nearby coffee shop while I waited. Both procedures took a bit longer than I expected, but my service consultant, David, was nice enough to apply a 10% discount coupon at both appointments--a huge help, especially for the brakes/rotors, which weren't cheap. All in all, the staff were polite, knowledgeable, and professional, and more than made up for any delays. As for the car: it's running great!
10,000 Cellphones was a life saver. My daughter broke her iPad and they fixed it same day. Thanks to them i am still alive.
I've been seeing Dr. Dave Fleischmann and crew for years now and I couldn't be happier with their quality of service, attention to my needs, and professionalism. I look forward to my appointments with the hygienist Shelly and even when I have to get work done by the good doctor. Excellent...
This certainly has not been my experience. I've gone nowhere BUT Wear Master and always get a good deal. A lot of people don't know they also honor to beat other shop prices. I've brought a couple in and they always match or top it.
Amazing
Got a great deal on a G35 Journey from the internet sales team Jeff & Rafael. Dealership was friendly, clean, and was overall a much better experience than dealing with CarMax. Loving the car more and more everyday!
We recently needed a new transmission put into our 2003 Acura MDX. The guys at Transco were a pleasure to work with and provided a great experience for a great price! I will definitely recommend them to all of my friends, family and colleagues!
None
Typically, anybody who visits an autobody shop is having a bad day. In my case, my car had been vandalized. The owner, Joe, was very professional and helped me get everything rolling quickly with my insurance company. The damage to my car required a total paint job (except the roof). When my car was finished it looked better than brand new! I would 100% recommend Royal Collision for any body repair, they were fast, professional, and fairly priced.
For the past 4 years, I've been working with Terramar. Russ is consistently prompt and thorough which is great in the ever-changing online environment. But what I love most are all of his great ideas! Whether it's suggestions on how to make my site more user friendly or sharing tips and tricks on the latest web tools or social media integration available--Russ is constantly helping me learn and develop as well!
The nicest people in the world. A true neighborhood cafe.
Sara Croley is amazing at FIS! Even on her day off, she called and answered prayers to save us hundreds by finding a car insurance policy that was better than what we currently had. Thank you!
Excellent facility, outstanding trainer, and RESULTS!!!!!!
None
None
Scott is a thoughtful agent that focuses on what his clients need. Too many times we see insurance agents who are always trying to sell products. Scott is about people, not products.
My experience with Castle Chevrolet was as followed. I knew that I wanted a Chevy Camaro 2LS in all black. I looked at about 10 Chicagoland Chevy dealers. For some reason the internet sales guy Xavier Cruz was understanding of exactly what I wanted, and knew that I already had my financing in place. After about 3-4 weeks of communications I called and spoke to a sales manager by the name of Mike Rodriquez. After about 2 phone calls we struck a deal! Very pleasant and easy going. I called him to have the invoice sent to my financing company and Mike told me to call back and let him know when I wanted to come in to pick up the vehicle. I called him at about 3 pm and he said he would have the car cleaned and gased up. Upon arriving at Castle Chevrolet I dealt with a salesman by the name of Erick Schneuker. This was the most pleasant part of my experience. Erick was told by Mike that all the numbers were already in place. I test drove the vehicle (which was clean, full tank of glass, and exactly how it looked in the pictures), went back in at sat at Ericks desk for about half an hour and talked about sports and he told me the details of the Chevy Camaro and about how Castle cares about their customers unlike some dealers. after about half an hour I was prompted to go into the finance managers office to sign paper work, this was the only part of my Castle experience that I wasn't too happy about. He wasn't a friendly guy at all, He said "please sign here, here, here, here, would you like a warranty, ok no, sign here, Thanks for doing business at castle Chevy enjoy your car" and that was all in the matter of less than sixty seconds. Not sure if it just wasn't his day, or the fact that I wasn't doing my finance through him. Whatever the case be I would give Castle Chevy a 10/10 and give the finance guy the benefit of doubt. The other thing that bothered me is the "Castle Difference" all online it is advertised as Free oil changes, nitrogen fill up, car wash, and FREE TIRES, yet when I get to the dealer they tell me that the tire part isn't included for the Camaro. Very misleading and that was one of the main reasons why I chose to do business with Castle due to "the castle difference", wasn't too happy about that. But big thank you to Xavier Cruz, Mike Rodriguez, and especially Erick Schneuker!
A great place to learn about plants!
Kevin was very patient and helpful. I had to come back the second day, and he did a bang up job on the device
This place is by far the best comedy club in Myrtle Beach! Sidenote: This is literally one of the only reviews that I have ever taken the time to write, on anything!! Thats how good this place is. They have a variety of top comedians from around the country and they also display many of the local comics trying to get to the next level. The location is fantastic, the service is great, and I have pretty much tried everything on the menu at this point and it has all been good. Next time you go in there, ask for Jeff or Larry, the owners, and they would be glad to meet you and make sure that you have a great experience.
Bijzonder mooie plek met alles er op en er aan
The ATM is in the Walgreens.
Had Lasix 7 years ago with such a positive experience! The staff is so welcoming. The doctors are so caring and tell you whats going on every step of the way. Came back recently for an eye exam and still have 20/15 vision...7 years later and with an astigmatism in both eyes! Would recommend Dr. Dello Russo to anyone who wants to get rid of the burden of eyeglasses or contacts.
omg soo good i love this place
Great hotel. With lovely staffs and awesome services
I hired Alexander Heating and Air Conditioning Service and they arrived on time, were respectful of my property, time, and the price was excellent! Since my unit had not been serviced in a couple of years, I expected them to find something that was going to cost me a great deal of money. Instead, I was pleasantly surprised when it only needed a low cost capacitor. Even though they did not have the lower cost one in their truck, they put in the higher priced one in case I needed to use the air conditioning before I could find time to have them return with the lower priced one. When they returned, there wasn't even an additional charge for switching out the part and the return visit. Highly recommend them!
They did an awesome job detailing the interior of my car. The customer service was great, the price was fair, and the people at SPLASH are friendly and knowledgeable. I wouldn't hesitate to recommend them for car detailing, and I'll be trying their window tinting service as well.
Just back from the dunadry hotel after a fabulous wedding, staff were very polite and helpful and hotel was beautiful. Would recommend this hotel.
From the moment we met Jonathan, we were so impressed with his desire to hear our story and capture every moment of our special day. Jonathan is professional, easy to relate to and so easy to work with. We felt incredibly blessed to work with Jonathan and he made every effort to go above and beyond - not only with our photos, but with the whole wedding and preparation experience. When we received our photos, we were blown away by how natural and beautiful they looked. We can look back on our wedding as if we are standing there on the day thanks to his amazing work. Thank you Jonathan for the commitment, care and fun you brought to our wedding day. We are immensely grateful.
Don't bother shopping around because you have found the place. Very knowledgeable and friendly staff that strives for customer satisfaction.
Love their pizza especially the crust. I love that the crust is not crunchy, the sauce isn't spicy. Delivery service is always great and on time!
I had contacted three other roofers for an estimate and none showed up... Fortunately for me a Roof Crafters technician came in less than two hours after I called and provided the estimate! Thanks!!!
I stayed here a few weeks ago when I was doing some work nearby. I was initially unsure of how many nights I would be staying but in the end I staying for four nights I think. The B&B is lovely and all mod cons are provided. I found the host particularly helpful and friendly.
The 2 guys ther, I think they are brothers, really helped me out with my event. The didn't charge me any set-up or programming for my design and that saved me a bundle
Great experience!!! ill be a long time customer.
Master Choe is an amazing instructor! He is an 8th degree black belt and always has something new to teach us. I've attended three martial arts schools prior to this, and the instruction here has been the best of all of them. Master Choe is also very good with children, and he will foster a sense of discipline in them that many parents have appreciated. I highly recommend!
None
Their work was definitely impressive. My car was repaired as if there were no accident. Also they finished their work one day earlier than expected. Although they are not cheap, it deserves.
In all the 30 plus years I have been doing business at Sentry I have been pleased with all aspects of this fine organization from the sales force through an especially including the extremely competent and friendly service department. I cannot see doing business with any other dealership.
well what can i say about combat paintball. a very well run site with helpful and friendly staff who always make you feel welcome, if its your first time paintballing or if you play alot you can always expect an action packed day in a safe environment.
None
None
None
None
سلام الله عليك يا ابن رسول الله
None
None
Love the Friday All U Can Eat Buffet! The Pizza is the best.
Isha Mahan always does an awesome job. She cuts both my fiance's hair and mine and does equally great work with men's and women's styles. In the past I have been through quite a few stylists, but I think my salon-hopping days are over. Highly recommend!
Emir and Eric were very easy to work with and Emir worked for three days to get me the deal I needed and wanted. Pretty awesome to deal with.
Thank you Nancy, Anita and especially Dr. Kritzman for changing my life to the positive and removing my bad dental flash backs. You are the first dentist in my life that I look forward to my appointment with you. Thank you Brian Richard Cooper
We love Primrose School of Firewheel! Our two children, 7 and 4 years old, are so happy there. Dr. Rigley and her staff have created a wonderful, stimulating environment where learning and play merge, and we are very pleased with the loving, nurturing care that our children receive every day. It gives us such peace of mind knowing that they are safe and well cared for, and, above all, happy and having fun. We are so pleased with Primrose- it really is the best!
None
The best buffet EVER! Healthy, delicious, incredible. I went there thanks to a Coupon and I could not be happier. Everything is fresh and abundant. Incredibly cheap considering the quality you get. Highly recommended.
"Great Service!"
Had a very good experience with this painting company. Was on time, reliable, and affordable.
個人覺的中餐廳的東西超好吃，推一下。
Me and a friend went to this nail salon for her bday nails..the staff was very friendly. And my nail tech did and excellent job. As well as I found their prices reasonable. I would more then recommend this nail salon to anyone looking for a new shop or in need of good quality nails. #greatjob
I love this store. Javier is very helpful, open, and amazing. He don't invade your space and always helpful when you ask about things. If he don't know the answers, he try to find it for you instead of just brushing it off as people in other stories I've been to. His prices are very good and he is fast, quality of his products are the best. I will recomend Javier's store you wont regreat it.
I always try to visit George's when passing through La Jolla. Been here half-dozen times, and always outstanding! Be sure to sit on the Terrace if possible... And get the soup!
extremely accommodating, reliable & very friendly! Working 13 hour shifts while having rescued a 6 week old puppy was only made possible because of Brett, Nick & Kristina. They were great about helping out or changing plans last minute, sent email and/or text updates and pictures of her and did an amazing job of wearing her puppy self out (which is not an easy task...) The logs they kept from each visit were hilarious and a highlight to come home to. They made me and my dog so comfortable and without worry or hesitation about her care or the care of my belongings. You won't be disappointed. I wish I could have them here in Charlotte--she misses her buddies :)
Top quality work! very efficient and very professional. The Interior painting they did in 2 of my rooms were well done will definitely use them for future painting jobs!
These guys know trees. I had a giant locust tree looming over my house, and it needed to come down. I met with Matthias, the owner, he was professional and knowledgeable. He answered all my questions straight forward and in detail. While his quote was higher than the others, I went with him because of his professionalism. We scheduled the job three weeks later and the crew showed up in uniform, along with an enormous crane. They worked efficiently, impressive to say the least. Now I don't have to worry about an enormous limb falling on my roof. They took out the stump too. I highly recommend Advantage Tree service, I will only use them in the future.
My wife is Korean and I lived there for years, and can say that the food here is authentic and tasty. My wife likes the food here and I love the bi bim bop! My Indonesian friends like it too.
A cada visita, uma novidade que alimenta o corpo, os olhos e a alma: do antepasto ao prato principal cuidadosamente elaborado, e servido à sombra de uma caramboleira, oferecendo um tom idílico de ares interioranos em plena coração de São Paulo. Sempre com sabor de quero mais!!!
Alex knows his job!!! Highly reccomended!!!
Super place, we found this wonderful place by chance while finding restroom. And then spent there for half a day. It my first experience to ski. But after trying at the practice line, my son and myself start to play in the main line. So fun! The staff are also super nice too! Should spend more time here! Will revisit if possible.
Love coming to Coffee Evi. Joel and his wife Yaz will make you feel like you're at home. Great ice coffee and sandwiches. Prices are super reasonable, service is great and wifi is really fast. Fantastic place to meet people and get ideas. Highly recommend!
This is our home when we are at the Dragon. The scones at breakfast are to die for. The lake view and Friday night cookout make this a fantastic stay.
Guy was waiting to take us to the courtesy bus , 5 mins and we were at the office all very helpful , the car we had was better than we thought , and all went very well The paying for a full tank of fuel was not good and expensive , we returned the car half full so lost out badly , the damage checks were not correct,[], so always check before you depart and tell the office , Having full damage waiver was great , but again expensive , but when in Spain you never know what will happen, all in all great and would definitely book again.
None
I've gotten nothing but honest and reliable work from these guys. They always fix my car completely, quickly and for reasonable money. Run by a bunch of great people.
Great Mexican food! Awesome salsa and queso.
Always polite service.
It is such a decent place, where any one can go & stay respectfully.
Great food, great atmosphere, friendly she quick service... Great food!!!!!! Had the best omelette ever!!!
I'm not sure why the other reviews here are awful. Maybe because only folks that have had problems feel the need to post their experiences. Here is mine... I took my wife's car and my car in to this Dobbs to get them inspected. In the case of my wife's car, no problems at all, I was in and back out (I waited in their waiting room) in just over an hour. With my car, the inspection went fine, but they told me that my front tires were a little bald. Mostly due to an alignment issue. They fixed the alignment issue and priced out two tires. Gave me a 25% discount when I told them I was unemployed and was wanting to discuss with my significant other. Told me that the quote was good for 30 days. I was out of the shop in about an hour and a half. I have nothing but great things to say about these guys. I have done business with them for almost 10 years and can't think of one bad thing to say about them.
Italian restaurants have always been hit and miss with me, even the major branded/chain ones I find it hard to like the dishes - too rich, too much sauce. Lazeza is a great italian restaurant with a difference - the food has a more defined, smooth flavour with huge portions of pasta, pizza, meat and fish dishes. I've tried several of each and all are cooked to near perfection, every time. We've been to Lazeza at least twenty times and I can firmly say it's quite simply the best Italian restaurant I've ever eaten at! Prices are very good and there's the occasional "any pasta for £6.95" offer on. Deserts and starters are equally as scrumptious! Staff are always welcoming and you can usually grab a seat without reservation. Definitely one of the better haunts in harrow. Go see and eat!
My favorite place. They just do simple stuff REALLY WELL and always seem to find you a table. Real family run vibe.
Wilcox Family Funeral Home knows how to perform and performs with distinction. Their location is conveniently situated, no hardship in getting there.The directorship conducts business with the needed touch and grace designed to provide ease in closure. The prices are right and the options are clearly laid out. This is the place to visit if you have an emergent or timely preparation to make. Financial ease or tight budget in taking care of the final remains of your loved ones, there is no better setting to get that settlement.
Nitin came by today, on very short notice (I called him yesterday), and despite the fact that a snowstorm hit overnight, arrived earlier than expected. He and his colleague did a great job. I couldn't help noticing the high-end sweeping device, which Nitin informed me is much more reliable and effective than the old-style interconnecting poles that I remember from my youth. They left the place even cleaner then they found it, and Nitin also took the time time to find a piece of masonry to prop open our draft with, and he tightened up the fireplace facade. As if all of that wasn't enough, his colleague informed us that our rug was hand-stitched and not machine-made. I kid you 'knot'! Couldn't recommend Chimney Chief enough.
None
My car was totalled in an accident. I was hard pressed to find a vehicle that met my needs and within a deadline after dealing with Insurance. I was referred to Kevin Swindall by a former co-worker who had a wonderful experience. I had a flawless experience and Kevin Swindall is the best you could wish for in a salesman. He was nothing but help from the beginning, and was very accommodating! Everyone I encountered at the Dealer, from Kevin to the financial department to the secretary, were a blessing in a rough time of my life! I would reccommend Sandy Springs Ford and Kevin Swindall to any friend or family member anytime!
Pros: cheap fare, no wait (yet), cozy and welcoming ambiance Cons: Menu is mostly sandwiches, even though the space is like a restaurant. I wish they'd do a traditional breakfast (biscuits, omelettes, etc.). It would bring me in there a lot more! They really put out a home-cooked meal vibe. I haven't tried enough of their pastries/desserts, but I hear they are delicious.
Thank you for power washing the deck on my Wixom MI home. After renting a power washing machine, bringing it home and finding that it did not work, I Googled "Wixom MI power washing company". I found you, called, and left a message. I appreciate that you returned my call promptly, gave me a free power washing quote that same day, and power washed my deck on the first dry day that Mother Nature gave us. My deck now looks good as new! Thanks again for your deck power washing expertise.
Very good indian restaurant. Have some great vegetarian and vegan options.
They will exceed your expectations! (First, I must say I rarely write reviews, but after my experience with this company I had to share.) My family and I just moved to Chicago from Texas and our car's' bumper got damaged on the trip. I found B&L from searching 'Top auto body repair shops in Chicago.' The customer service, from the initial phone call all the way until leaving with my repaired car was "above and beyond." Every employee I came into contact with was so friendly and helpful. They gave us a goodie bag of stuff when we got our initial estimate and even gave us some good looking t-shirts when picking the car up. At one point, while dropping the car off, I found out the insurance adjuster had altered the price from our previous negotiation and the check the company had cut was less than the original quoted price. Without hesitating, B&L adjusted the difference and I was on my way. They even gave me a ride from the shop and then back again when picking up. The owners seem very involved with the company and went out of their way to find out about us and remembered small details weeks later when seeing them again. If you need any type of work offered by B&L, you won't find a better place to get it done. EXCELLENT SERVICE.
I'm so glad a new Aldi grocery store came to this shopping center! It's a nice store with fresh produce/meat and bigger than other Aldis. The shopping center did a lot of cosmetic upgrades when that store opened, along w/ Aaron's next door. There is always plenty of parking (huge lot) and it is very well-lit. This used to be my 'go-to' center in it's heyday when Greetings & Readings was here, but now it is again with this grocer that's rarely found in B'More County. I do many of my errands right there - at the nail salon, bite to eat (about 4 small restaurants), dry cleaning, groceries and the all-important dollar store :)
None
Want the best po-boy in town? They got it.
I first tried to go to Future shop and the more the person talked the more money it would cost me. then they ended up stating buying a new one would be cheaper. I left the place and entered Ottawa Laptop and they were very helpful and fixed my laptop for me for a very decent price that I could afford. They were kind and explained everything in words I could understand.
SANTAAA!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Great place for food in this small town. Yummy and affordable!
The staff was great, I have medical issues and prefer email communication. They worked with me and actually found me a better bed frame that I originally was going to order. They have great service too, even checking to see how the frame was doing since I got it set up! Definitely Recommned!
Temple of healing.
I have taken several tours with Anacortes Kayak Tours over that past 5 years and we have really enjoyed every paddling experience. Their multi-day tours are fantastic! Beautiful spots! Plus the amazing meals are a serious bonus. I take my young children on most tours too and the guides are very kind and fun with the them. Highly recommend Anacortes Kayak Tours!
Loved swing the passing tourist while having my first escargot dish... Yum
I love ordering food from Anaam's in Commerce Township, they are great on the phone and always get our order right. They remember our favorite items and make us feel great when we walk in the door.
None
They came highly recommended and exceeded expectations. The quality of their work, and the fair price saved me a lot of worry. My car broke down as I was driving to Jackson on business. They got me right in, found the problem ordered the parts and the repair was done the very next day. My only regret was that I missed meeting Cloe. I understand she has a big personality.
I enthusiastically endorse the Law Offices of John Phillips. Mr. Phillips possesses the rare combination of a high level of skill in the courtroom and technical areas of the law while being a people person who has aligned his practice to put clients first.
One of The Best !!!
None
These guys ROCK!!! Best around hands down!!!!
Stopped in and did not have an appointment. The lady did not tell me to leave she said I could browse. No one was in the store yet and her appointment was late she said i could try one or two on. After weeks of trying on dresses and becoming discouraged I found one with the first try. Bought it and brought it home! would recommend to anyone and everyone!
The best Fish and Chip shop anywhere,especially Chicken breasts
Sehr cool.
We sold our house with Marge McKenzie. I cannot express in words how happy we were. She was knowledgeable, competent, professional and great to work with. We were so extremely pleased with how quickly our home sold and the price we got for it considering the market and compared to what we had been told by other realtors who had no idea what they were talking about. But Marge priced our house right and did a wonderful job in negotiating with the realtor on the buyer's side. It was a breeze and all went so well. We can recommend Marge McKenzie very highly!!
Good super store in pano aqil city
Sol Yoga is a neighborhood studio that specializes in Power Vinyasa Yoga and a Yoga/Cross-training hybrid class. Our teachers each have a minimum RYT certification of 200 hours to ensure a safe and effective class for all levels of practitioners.
Never had anything here I did not like. Real Italian Apizza and dishes
None
Tried Cherry Village for the first time, I must say it was awesome. Great Food, Excellent Service and more than reasonable price. We did the "DINNER for TWO". Very clean and great atmosphere. Highly recommend for anybody looking for Great Chinese Food that doesn't have the word "Panda" in it's name.
Estoy en mini comisariato trebol
This is directed to Ms. Lisa Dunn. My name is Serena Gordon and I have been the practice manager for Millie Roberge for 11 years. I have reviewed our records, and see that you have never been a client of ours OR an opposing side. How you came about the conclusions that you have about our practice seem unfounded at this time. We take the grievances from our clients very seriously, and have a prompt 24 hour response policy. We offer a unique approach for our clients here in Clark County with our flat fee system that makes legal representation more affordable and approachable than most. We do that because we have a firm belief is resolving conflict without creating more financial scars, and at the heart of the matter always remember that our clients are good people who have just found themselves in a not so good moment in their lives. We truly are here to help, so if you are speaking on behalf of someone who needed further assistance, I strongly encourage you to have them contact us to see what might have caused an lingering issue, and as to whether there is a legal resolution that could be sought. However, if you are a friend of an opposing side I can perhaps understand why you are lashing out in this manner. We are a very successful law firm in the area, and it is customary to have opposing sides discontent.
After the renovation food is gone brilliant. Always hot and fresh. U can spoil urself with choices. Perfect buffet for perfect price.
None
The personal are great and have alwfys treated me and my family well.
None
Singletons Retreat is truly a home away from home - without the neighbours :-) The house has all of the amenities you could possibly need, and bbq'ing all of our meals from the deck was superb. We are heading back with our dogs for another visit in October. They loved it too !
Outstanding service. I had my boat for sale for over 9 months with no luck. The boat had engine issues that several other boat repair operations could not find the problem. They fixed the problem in an extremely timely manner and sold my boat in three weeks. They are knowledgeable and professional and I can't say enough about the positive experience. Definitely the best in the entire Charleston area!
I am one of those rare individuals who actually enjoy going to the dentist. This was not always the case, and this odd behavioral abnormality started in the summer of 2003 when I first attended Champagne Family Dentistry at the insistence of my father. Their staff wrote the book on customer service, their workplace is spotless, and they seem to always be upgrading their equipment to be on the front lines of having the cutting edge technology. Even when I lived overseas (in Italy and Guam) I would wait until visiting home to make sure my teeth where properly taken care of. Well that is not entirely true, to my everlasting regret. In order to make sure my dental hygiene was up to date, and I was not able to make it to Champagne Family Dentistry, I opted to use a different dentist. My experience was nowhere near what I had with Champagne Family Dentistry and reminded me of why I used to hate going to the dentist. In closing, I live 1.5 hours away from Champagne Family Dentistry, but still make the drive (3 hours both ways) three times a year because they are just that good.
Quirk Volkswagen in Braintree is truly awesome. From sales to service they work with you to find the best deals and give great service. I have been going there for about 2 years and always came out with a smile on my face. The people are very friendly and easy to talk to which make any customers day when you find comfort when spanding your money. I always know one I drive of the lot myself and my car is safe. Service guys: Bruce, Patrick and Carlos are AWESOME.
I have really enjoyed drinks on last friday at Bar 333 with my friends .. we got good and friendly service from the staff.. i recommend this place.
Vision Photography was AMAZING!! The Vision team is very professional and my daughters senior pictures are ABSOLUTELY PERFECT!!
I was in public storage last week purchasing merchandise and the property manager was amazing. She was very energetic and kind. 10 stars for lashanda
The Hil burger is fantastic.
None
They are the most wonderful people with the best BBQ in Houston. I don't even like BBQ but I eat theirs. And for the last year I was homeless and living under a bridge right down from their restaurant. I would come in with twelve cents and hopes of a cup of ice and leave with a full stomach and some Dr. Pepper. The people working there are angels, truly good people if I ever met any.
None
I liked how easy scheduling was, even when I had to reschedule due to unforeseen weather. I was also very impressed with how prompt and nice the moving guys were and also the fact that you worked with me and gave me a very competitive price.
Adam did a great job at our client event for Immersa Marketing during the 2013 CES in Las Vegas. Adam is our go-to DJ for events due to his professionalism and consistency. Adam is always up to date on current music trends while being able to pull out the sounds of Big Band and Frank Sinatra when requested. Anyone hiring Adam is getting one of the best in Las Vegas!
Hands down, my favorite place to eat!
Fantastic! Would have paid $20 a head but its free! Please leave a donation so they can build their expansion on this absolute gem!
None
Great place for after work apps and cocktails. Get there at six and grab a seat at the long table. The best of DMV Heights.
None
Walked in, before finishing my paperwork was seen, treated and everyone was extremely pleasant. I appreciated that. Thanks! Anna Barrett
Absolutely brilliant service from all staff. Won't use any other bike shop
I moved across the US only to find out several computers were improperly packed. Martin resurrected them with ease, professionalism and was fantastic to answer question. Highly recommended.
Great burgers, great service. Loved the 50s style decor and the unlimited fries were awesome!
Excellent food as always, bit on the pricey side as when all said and done it is still pub grub.
I had a great dinner. The gumbo was the best I have had in a restaurant. The shrimp & grits and the courtboullon were awesome. The bread pudding was the best I ever had.
Excelente hospital, de los mejores. Desde el punto de vista médico solamente.
In Sept I put money down on very specific Audi in Seattle. The dealer stalled me, pushed out the delivery date past the date that my very good financing would have lapsed. When I pointed out that other dealers had the exact car I was looking for, they did little to help connect me with the Audi of my dreams. Then came Travis and Jacob of Wilsonville Audi. Found the white Audi TTS that I was looking for - about three hours south of Seattle in Oregon. They helped me work out the deal with my bank in a matter of hours over email. They responded to emails quickly. They found great discounts that I didn't know I was eligible for - like the Audi Loyalty discount. The next day I took the train from Seattle to Portland and Travis picked me up at Union Station - he's a sweety! Within an hour, I was out the door with my brand new Audi TTS and off to visit a friend in the area. Travis and Jacob did a great job to get me the car I wanted with the features I wanted. They were supportive and helpful.
Delivery from My Organic Food Club has become absolutely essential to keep up my healthy lifestyle. I work A LOT and don't really have time to spend in a grocery store. My Organic Food Club delivers fresh food to my door. I just pick out what I want and it's there, ready for me to eat now or later. Their food is priced right, delicious and I really don't know what I would eat without it. Thank you!
The room was nice and clean,the bed was amazing ,very comfortable I actually overslept 2 days and was late for work haha .I don't know if thats a good thing or not lol. tThe pool was empty but it's winter so really didnt matter, there was some kinda smell in the restroom ,I was on the 2nd floor I just let it go at bad vent in sewr some where in the wall ,went away in a few minutes after turning on light with exaust fan .Staff was very nice,I stayed here a week and went home on a Friday I left my Fossil watch on night stand and called on Sunday to make sure it was at the desk ....hmmm they said they have not seen it. I know for a fact I left it on the night stand!!! only complaint I have.My company has rented a room for next week as well i see no problem staying here ,as long as my watch shows up. haha ya right!
Great blues & whiskey!
Sympa et souriante, elle nous a bien conseillé et elle a su nous rassurer. Ses photos sont aussi belles en vrai que sur son site ! N'hésitez pas à faire appel à elle, souvenirs de qualité garantis.
None
My experience with CRI has been extremely positive. My 6 month old puppy goes to camp 4 to 5 days a week and cannot wait to get into the building. Prior to taking my dog to the facility, I arranged a tour of the building (which the staff was happy to do) and I had all my questions answered. CRI's web site explains that certain breeds of dogs are not accepted for insurance purposes, however CRI does not have a blanket policy of excluding "mixes." My dog is a shelter rescue and a mix of many things. The staff has always been very friendly with me and my dog runs to them with excitement when they come out of the door to get him. I am grateful that I have found somewhere I can trust to leave our family dog while we are at work.
I absolutely love this group! They're so fantastic and amazing and understanding and are able to work with people as well. I know that Their help all OVER the place, billing, the front desk, even the nurses and doctors are a fantastic group of people that I would never think about swapping from.
El mejor de los locales de Gatsby
Jim came over to our house to fix our A/C, not only did he arrive on time, he was very fast and efficient, and the price was great! Thanks 4 Seasons for cooling us off in the middle of the summer!
These guys are great! I couldn't do what I do without them!
Best burger chain I have discovered in the Bay Area, hands down. This College Avenue location is somewhat better managed than the Piedmont Avenue location.
None
None
Putting our puppy, a frisky miniature schnauzer, in the hands of Ali and his team is one of the best decisions we have ever made. Pup left thinking he was the boss and came home walking nicely on the leash, sitting, staying, etc. The K-9 facilities were immaculate, and they took him to a wonderful, wide, grassy field for some of his training. They also took beautiful, professional-quality photos of him and sent them to us! Nice enough for framing. They checked in with us during the week, and they responded to questions immediately. Even after we brought Pup home, they checked in with us and have continued to answer questions when they come up. We definitely will board him with Ali and friends in the future. Can't say enough good things about this group. Very professional, very friendly.
Friendly staff. I left my luggage their and I'm from the UK. Was so impressed with how much they have helped not only to get it back but also to reduce the cost!! Wonderful service over and above what I expected!
Delicious, flavorful Thai food. Extensive menu with lots of vegetarian options. Service was courteous and FAST.
Great food and service.
I haven't been there yet, but i really want to
I would like to say that Flagship is a Five Star company with Five Star service. I would like to say that on August 11, 2013 Flagship did more than accommodate me because of my disabilities they made my experience a unforgettable one that I will never forget. They are the dream come true. Flagship was the keystone of my trip to San Diego if I wouldn't have taken that prime rib cruse on the last night of my trip I would of missed out on something so special. If there was any tears shed it would be of tears of JOY and I never wanted the night to end. If you were wondering how they accommodated me is since I couldn't eat certain foods they on the fly substituted them with something else like the salad they gave me a fruit plate and made it on the spot and they made shore I had access to a wheelchair restroom. You couldn't ask for better service than what they offered me. After the cruise was over the caption made shore that my ride service came by to pick me up and I was safe. Whether you are or not disabled you won't go wrong booking on Flagship. Again a Big Thank You from the bottom of my heart Flagship and I hope to be on your cruise ship the California Spirit.
I Walked in expecting crazy eBay prices like a lot of the other local stores. But was amazed by the amount of stuff and the low prices. I actually stood there talking with the guys for about 30 minutes as my wife and younger brother shopped. They even hooked me up with a controller for my Dreamcast for about $15 less than what everyone else wants. I will be returning very soon.
Turn the Page has so many levels of help it blows my mind. They can educate you so you can do SEO, blogging, and social media on your own, or they can do everything for you including press releases. You pick the amount of interaction you want to have and they will do the rest. It is truly amazing. They are better than having a full time employee whose only job is to get you noticed on the internet. Unlike an employee who get complacent and does not like to learn new things, Turn the Page is constantly evolving. Their staff is top notch. They enjoy their job and their enthusiasm is infectious. No matter how good you think you are doing, they will take you business to a whole new level.
When we arrived, we had the opportunity to browse the cars before getting assaulted by sales reps which was nice. When we were ready, a sales rep was ready for us and we met Terry. He was extremely informative and answered all our questions quickly and accurately. Anything we requested, he jumped at the chance to please. He even ran around the car lot, in the dark, to find us the perfect exterior and interior colors for us. The only two things we were a little disappointed in was the lack of options without upgrading to a different model car, and the lack of finance people available so we had to wait a couple hours to get our paperwork processed. Even while we waited though, Terry kept us company, showed us around, brought us water and coffee, and showed us all the cool things our new car could do. This was the best car buying experience I have ever had, by far!
None
Have been doing business with Steve at Liberty, I must say... to get it done right, go see Steve!!! One place for all your tire needs... will do business again and again!!! Thank you!!!
As always, I was happy with my last visit to Dr. Balle. I never wait past my appoinment time. The staff is friendly and helpful. The office is very clean and relaxing. I have been going there for about 20 years. I highly recommend them!
Eating here since 1971
Best dentist in the world!!
We had a very nice dinner here. Nothing spectacular, just good food and good service. Will return.
I can't say enough nice things about Sabrina. She is one of the nicest people I've met, while still being the consummate professional. John and Ryan are always willing to help in any way they can. I've rented storage from them for 16 years and I don't plan on going anywhere else.
None
A great day to learn
None
None
Visited Sukohthai for Sunday buffet food and service excellent cant wait for our next visit🍴
Love the authenticity, GREAT karaoke nights! This is a PUB
I made my first visit to Town Tire (8th Avenue location) yesterday, I needed 4 new tires for my Camry. I had a great experience from beginning to end. Fair prices, great customer service and a friendly environment. I've been going to the local Toyota dealership for the past 5 years, but I'll be using Town Tire from now on.
i work at PrintTime in Modesto and my boss got two small peach pies which were the BEST ive ever had. I HATE PIE... but wow did they change my expearience with pies. You can still taste all the freshness in the fruit with each bite. Had to google where they are... theyre a distance away :( at least for me. they should have a delivery system. i'd have they're baked goods each morning if i could.
None
Fusion is one of the best casual dining restaurants in the Fort Walton Beach area! Unassuming from the outside, once inside you'll feel like you are in a hip bistro in San Francisco or Chicago. Fusion offers Latin, Asian and American "bento" boxes as well as salads and soups, including excellent wonton soup made with delicious homemade wonton (if you like spicy, don't forget to ask for a side of Sriracha hot sauce to stir in!). With the bentos, you get an entree and side salad with a ginger vinaigrette, then choose noodles or rice (or some come with chips and salsa), plus one more side (the grilled zucchini is my favorite). All for around $7.50-$9! I have been there dozens of times and go back every chance I get. Try it, you'll LOVE it!
Great
Absolutely fantastic! Not only do you get a fun, casual atmosphere, but the food is *amazing*, the drinks are a little too dangerous if you're not prepared, and even though we arrived on a crazy, busy Sunday night, we got a table right away and the owner even came by and checked on us to see how everything was. I normally only give 4 stars for a very good meal, but I was so impressed that this easily sits at one of my top 3 meals ever eaten. I'd recommend trying the shashimi sampler. I'm normally not a big sashimi eater, but everything was so fresh and amazing I am officially a convert. Thank you, Eatery! We will definitely be back!
None
The food and service were top notch. Not to mention that they took the time to entertain our daughter by showing here how to throw the dough and even gave her some to play with. Well definitely remember visit when in town again.
I visited Dublin Toyota last week to trade-in my leased Prius for a newer model. I would like to place on record my happiness with the purchase experience. Joe T, who showed us the choices available, understood what we were looking for, and took pains to help us identify the right car with a color that we really liked. Then on to the Finance Manager Luis Abreckov – this again turned out to be a very pleasant experience, unlike what we had experienced at Concord Toyota. Luis came across as a genuine person, who cared about the customer, and invested time and effort in understanding his perspective. We came off feeling good about our purchase. I am happy to recommend Luis Abreckov , Joe T and Dublin Toyota for their professionalism and customer-friendly approach.
The very cherry milk shake best in the world
I have a Moto X and I was messing around with the accessibility settings and really screwed up my phone to the point that it was unusable. So I called Sprint national tech support and talked to 2 tech reps and they tried but couldn't help over the phone. They recommended I take it to my local Sprint store that does repair and recommended I go to the Tyrone store because it is a Sprint corporate site. But, instead I went to the Sprint Maycon store at US 19 in Pinelllas Park where I bought the phone, and much closer to home, and they were very helpful and courteous. Took 10 minutes max, phone fixed, I'm happy, highly recommend.
Frankie listens to what I want, makes suggestions when I ask for it, and ultimately gives a great haircut every time. I've been going to her for several years and couldn't conceive of going to anyone else. She's personable, has a knowledge of both contemporary and traditional hairstyles, and very good at what she does. She has limited availability so you must make your appointment well in advance, but it's worth the wait!
None
None
None
We are thrilled with the floors from Hardwood Bargains for our daycare! The install was easy and they are very durable which was important with a daycare setting. We have received many compliments on the quality and overall appearance. The customer service provided by Kurt Kucera was amazing and he was able to offer competitive pricing. We highly recommend Hardwood Bargains!
These guys are awesome. Great selection of scooters, great customer service, and they know what they're doing. They'll even help you with something you some place else, they are just that cool!
Working with Incredible Marketing Since the start of my business has been the best business decision I have ever made. It is an investment that pays for itself daily. Sam and his team are creative and full of ideas. I trust them with all my marketing, and SEO management. I have been more than thrilled with the results. I highly recommend this company!!
I work with The Flooring Place on a regular basis for custom home projects for my real estate clients. All of their staff is always courteous and helpful, and keeps the project tracking in a timely fashion. They have an excellent selection of materials, and are able to source unique items quickly as well. I would highly recommend the Flooring Place for all of your interior finishing needs!
The team at Stensland Dental are extremely professional. Their focus on patient care and comfort makes them stand out in my opinion in comparison to other practices in this area. I had a good deal of work completed. They were flexible with scheduling. They did a great job of caring for all patients in the office while still making me feel like I was their priority. I am confident that the other patients seen while I was in the office would feel the same way. Thank you!
Awesome
None
None
Wow - what a great find! Emmanuelle (the owner / proprietor of the hotel) and her staff were amazingly helpful with accommodating our specific needs for a larger room since we were traveling with our daughter and our dog. We loved the breakfast spread and the beautiful terrace. It's located just off the main tourist area and so it's conveniently quiet even with windows open. Europe + summer = need air conditioning!! The rooms are equipped with a noiseless A/C unit, which made it very comfortable. The hotel parking lot is a real deal for Euro10/day, and well worth it if you're traveling with family. The only thing we could have done with was a mini-bar / fridge in the room to house our daughter's milk. We were also (perhaps unreasonably) hoping for some local toiletries from Provence, seeing that they are so famous globally, which we could also perhaps have had the option to buy (and possibly be another revenue stream for the hotel). We look forward to going back there soon!
None
None
Highly Recommended! My son (5 1/2) just joined this school and he can not get enough of it. Professionally structured, well organized lessons and Super qualified instructors make you feel as a part of the team right away. We love this school!
We had a wonderful new car buying experience at New Motors. We'll recommend them and our salesperson Damien Wescott.
None
None
I love this homebrew shop. It is small, comfortable, the prices are always very appropriate. The staff is very friendly and knowledgeable. The ingredients are always fresh and the staff goes to great lengths to assure this. I have shopped at Above the Rest about 2-3x per month for the past 2 years and have won several first and second place medals from brews made from ingredients sourced from their shop. The 50 lb "virtual bag of grain" for under $35 is a great deal and it cut my brewing costs in half. I shop at Above the Rest almost exclusively because they have treated me as a knowledgeable and dedicated brewer from day one...which is not always the case at local brew stores.
None
I have been a student at Durham Technical Community College for the last two years and have been nothing but satisfied! Faculty and staff go above and beyond for the most part to assist students in their endeavors. I would and do reccomend this college, especially the transfer program. They have a Transfer Center and the Deans of each College Transfer department are the best! They work really hard trying to keep students informed of happenings and opportunities. If you want to know things you can type in the search bar on our website's home page and there it is! This is college not a high school holding students' hands, so it is the responsibility of student to become an informed participant in his/her experience here.
Always the family's favorite sit down restaurant. good service and good food...price can be a challenge; however, worth the price every once in awile
None
The service was exceptional! The service representative was on time, prompt, knowledgeable and efficient.
I ordered cremation jewelry and was so thrilled with the appearance and quality I immediately ordered a small onyx urn and had it engraved. I expected to receive it in 5 or 6 days. Three, yes 3 days later, the box was waiting at my doorstep!!! It is Beautiful!!! I would Highly recommend Perfect Memorials to anyone looking to memorialize their loved one. For quality, reasonable prices and great customer service, Perfect Memorials can't be beat.
We use these guys for all our printing needs and appreciate the great service and pricing.
I just had my first visit (for eyebrow waxing), and although it wasn't the fanciest place, the service was outstanding. I've been searching for a place that can do a good job shaping eyebrows in the Upper Valley for 3 years and this was by far the best, fastest, and cheapest ($10). I absolutely plan to go back and try out the rest of their services.
The atmosphere is just like back in Germany. The food is exactly like back home. The personnel treat you great and like your family! The prices are in line with the items. Try to get German beer for the price of a Bud! German beer is worth it!
Took my car in for replacing the fuel pump. Hector explained to me exactly what the problem was with my car and what steps would needed to fix it, which I appreciated. The service was performed in a timely fashion for a reasonable price. I would definitely recommend Sunset Automotive to anyone in the area who needs their car repaired.
None
Had a sewer backup and Dominic Mendez was here in an hour. In a couple of hours he had 3 lines cleaned out and called in a camera tech come over and check out the sewer line at no extra charge. Dominic was very efficient, knowledgeable and the most courteous and polite tradesman I ever dealt with. I will definitely call Plumbline again and will ask for Dominic.
Yes they were open at 5 in the morning on 4th of July! Even had a pharmacist on duty. Rite Aid across the street was not.
really awesome school... d best 1 in saharanpur district
None
At 56 years old, I have bought/leased a few cars........Everything from Corvettes to GMC Denali & a lot in between. Finally caved & bought a Hybrid. Tired of spending $300 + a week on gas. After driving EVERYTHING under the Sun, I finally decided on the Cmax. It was superior in every category , in my opinion. Best comfort, best acceleration, best features, best ride, best gas mileage, best value. The only thing the Prius V has over the Cmax is a bit more cargo space. When I searched the Tulsa dealers, Bob Hurley had pretty much the vehicle in stock that I was looking for. Called and talked to Donna Lolato to schedule a test drive. When I arrived, the car was waiting for me by the front doors. After a brief summary , we took it for a spin. After 2 minutes, I was sold. Though, I had to return later that day for "wife approval". That being said, we returned to the dealership at 5 ( Donna was supposed to leave at 5, but was gracious enough to stay. More than I can say for a certain Lexus Dealer). She let us drive the Cmax while she had my CUV appraised. When we returned, she had the appraisal ready for us. Surprisingly, it was exactly where I thought the trade-in should be. None of this $500 here & there, "let me go talk to the manager" crap. With a minimal amount of negotiating the car price, we had a deal. At no time did I feel pressured to buy anything. Just a completely easy going atmosphere. I am fortunate to have a high credit score, so they got me an interest rate even better than my bank could offer. Finalizing with Jason Barnett in the Finance Dept. was also a breeze. Didn't try to sell me a tire warranty, undercoating or any of that other happy crap that finance guys do. Discounted the gap ins. for me with no problem. Total time in the finance office 15 minutes. Total time from arrival to driving off the lot in a new car approx. 2 hours, but this included Donna giving me the Ford Voice Control primer & doing some bluetooth programming. The next afternoon Donna did a followup call to make sure I loved the car, which I do. 47 mpg RULES ! Also got a call from Vincent Hennigan the "Tech Specialist", set up an appointment to really go over the active controls ( a lot of which I had figured out myself). But after spending an hour with him, learned some other really cool features. I know this review was lengthy, but THE BOTTOM LINE IS: THIS IS THE MOST PAINLESS, ENJOYABLE CAR BUYING EXPERIENCE I HAVE HAD..........EVER.......PERIOD. Five Stars. Buy a car here !!!!!!!
Had some vinyl graphics put on vehicle a couple of years ago and went back recently to have some vehicle magnets made. Professional service, strong attention to detail and quality work. Would recommend to anyone
Not the biggest Gym in the world, though it has all your equipment there, even if you like to lift heavy weights... Nice friendly staff! Always willing to help! Hardly packed! Best in thanet! :)
None
Excellent experience with Action Pest Control. They were considerate, knowledgeable, and their techniques work. They used a barrier method at my home, and my house was pest free without any chemical smell, and my pets' health was not in danger. Loved working with them. When I moved to a new city, I called Action to see if they had a branch there.
You Best for Bride guys are working great job! I am quite happy with your services. I got 2 dress with a very reasonable price. Everyone of my family are very happy with this dress. Thank you, thank you very much!!!
None
This is the best bang for your buck and my personal favorite place to eat period. I love how they accommodate you if you want to alter a menu item. They truely make your food the way you want it. The wait staff is always friendly and fast. The portions are big enough to share.
Excellent customer service. Had a death in the family and was forced to cancel the trip at the last minute. CONNIE in reservations was able to refund us. Thank you so much. One less burden to deal with in such a hard time. Once the smoke clears, I will definitely be back with my wife. Thank you so much Connie for your understanding and Professionalism.
This location does exist and every time I've gone inside for help the staff has been super friendly and helpful.
My cat had serious health issues (bladder stones) and Dr. Ryan helped him in just one day! Then my poor cat had fleas and I was very scared (we never had flea before), but Dr. Ryan with her staff helped us in just 15 minutes. It's a very good and reliable place with reasonable price. I recommend Coastal Cat Clinic to anyone who has cats in Golden Isles Area. ^_^ Thank you, Dr. Ryan!
I showed up at the deadline date for a city sticker with an out of state registration and license. The staff gave me no issues whatsoever and got me what I needed in a hurry. Highly recommend this business!
wonderful place, great food and service nice location.
None
One of my favorite places.....The service and the setting not to mention the food!---it's all top notch.
I stopped in here for the first time for a quick lunch on a scorching 100 degree day. It was nice and cool inside and I got my meal in 10 minutes. The chicken gyro and sweet potato tots were great. This is my new favorite spot for lunch or dinner.
I like PU!
Delicious food! The most amazing restaurant ever! <3 Always go there for lunch and dinner.
None
I recently visited New Orleans and wanted to get out and see some of the local flora and fauna in person. New Orleans Kayak Swamp Tour provided that and much more. Jeff was very knowledgeable and took me on an amazing tour. Not only did I get to see a lot of wildlife, but the scenery was beautiful. I would highly recommend them.
I use to go there once a year. Never changed as tasty as it always will be.
Charlie Vaccaro is definitely one of RBM's great salesperson. Charlie has helped me buy my first car from RBM. It's a wonderful experience for me to visit with Charlie and receive his unique advice for buying a car. I think, Charlie, has always been genuine and helpful, which are very important to customers. If you wanna buy a good car, I'll recommend RBM and Charlie Vaccaro without hesitation
I found out about this place a long time ago and have been goin their to this day. I love eating their.
The staff make you feel welcome and comfortable. The service is nothing short of exceptional.
I would summarize it as an experienced not to be missed.,.,
See Chris Phillips and the team at AutoNation Ford Burleson!.. Period. Absolutely the best dealership I have dealt with in many years. I've purchased many new vehicles in my life and can be a sales person's worse nightmare as I work in sales as well. I left with everything I wanted and everyone involved was a winner. JP in finance is one of the best financial people you will find out there and everything is exactly as you see it with him. I would drive down to see them regardless of where I lived in the DFW area. Thanks to the entire team!
Come Home
My experience at Burnside has been nothing but positive. I have been going to the clinic on and off for various injuries for about 8 years (competitive sports will do that to you!), and they are always positive and resolve my issues in a matter of a few visits. The reception staff are also very helpful when it comes to both booking appointments and clarifying any questions I have regarding claims. My most recent injury Joy helped me using IMS techniques and by the time I left the clinic I was already feeling better!! The staff are knowledgeable and kind, and I would highly recommend this physio!
Why would you ever hire another male after the experience we had with Felicia? Her attention to the detail and her explanation of the process far exceeded our expectations for any HVAC technician we have ever dealt with. Thanks for a great job!!!! Greg & Tracy Rouse
Snelle en vriendelijke service
New Amsterdam Market goes beyond other NYC farmers markets by continuing to fight for the redevelopment of the East River Market District. Come by to pick up locally grown produce, ready to eat fare, a few specialty items, but leave knowing that you're also supporting the future of where and how NYC eats.
I love coming here! Check out Open Mic on Monday nights for a little entertainment or just stop in on your way to the beach! My favorite drink is the Mexican Mocha with an extra kick:)
None
I happen to stop in with a friend,wow what a great place. I enjoyed the atmosphere,I didn't have to travel to Houston and fight the crowds for a Friday evening. By the way I stopped in 2nd time and happen to meet owner,what a great people they are. Not to mention I can't help but to order a to go because my husband loves their food....
The book selection is very good. They also have a wide selection of CDs and DVDs. There are many programs for children and teens. There is one parking ramp on the same block and two others within three blocks. If you ride the bus, there is a Read & Ride program.
None
My 5 and 7 year olds participate in the after school program and I could not be more pleased. Everyone takes such good care of the kids. Whether they are doing their homework, taking a class, or playing, they are in a warm constructive environment. They are learning lifes skills: courage, perseverance, self-discipline, and determination. I consider the staff at HK Lee as part of a team that includes all the important adults my childrens' lives.
None
Awesome - Skilled team of scrap dismantling, salvage and processing professionals provided high quality, safe and cost-effective services. They attend and delivered overall good.Customer Support and the Way of Dealing is also nice.
Dr. James Moore is the BEST Chiropractor is the state of TN! His staff are wonderful too. Definitely first class service at a great price. Keep up the great work Dr. Moore! God Bless!
From the moment we arrived we loved the place! From the amazing view of the bay from our Captain's Cabin with great privacy and use of a kitchen, to our endearing host, his family and doggies, we loved our stay! We were completely comfortable, enjoying the rocking chairs in our room as we gazed out onto the bay, and slept really well. The breakfast items were much appreciated, as well as access to bowls and utensils for ice cream we brought in to enjoy! Oggie and his family helped us with places to eat and wonderful places to visit. On his recommendation we drove up Mt. Erie to spectacular views of the islands. So fantastic! I cried when we left. I know we'll return to enjoy this completely unique and lovely experience. Thanks Oggie and your family!
Very good food. Am mostly vegetarian and it was a perfect fit for me!
Una muy hermosa terminal como se merece Quitó .....
None
I have been involved with the Laguna Beach Animal Hospital for over 20 years and through 3 Irish Setters. Wouldn't consider going elsewhere. In addition to the clear extensive capability and knowledge, Dr. Levin and the staff exhibit professionalism and compassion, fully understanding how important our pets are to us. Glad to be able to take the opportunity to share my respect for them.
Excellent service provide by Dale and his company yesterday. Efficient, professional, well-presented, courteous, friendly and nothing was too much trouble. What sets one company apart from another is often in the small things, the details. Dale telephoned me to say he was leaving the collection address and again to say he was 5 minutes away from the delivery address. This kind of attention to detail leaves you with a good feeling about the experience, it makes it memorable and so you are inclined to use the company again and recommend it to friends. It seems so obvious and yet too many companies ignore the logic of this inescapable truth... to their cost. Dale made what could have been a difficult or tedious day for me, go without a hitch and I am grateful to him and his colleague. Thanks guys!
The best quality photo products in fuvahmulah
None
I have suffered from lower back pain for 11 years. In May of 2012 I strained my back and went back to my chiropractor for a regular adjustment. Usually, 3 or 4 adjustments and I'd be OK. Not this time. After suffering all summer long I finally decided it was time to do something different. I heard about Dr. Reeb and spinal decompression, but I was skeptical. So I decided to check it out and made an appointment. Dr. Reeb was great - and walked me through everything! After getting an X-ray of my back, he recommended his non surgical spinal decompression. I did a little of my own research and everything he told me was confirmed by what I read and those I spoke with. Of course the best part - my back pain went away after only the first few treatments! With the occasional adjustment - I'm still feeling pretty good. Dr. Reeb and his staff provide an excellent family atmosphere and I cannot recommend them enough!
My wife and I have been back many times. The food and service have been consistently good. We've had spring rolls, crisp-fried tofu, rotis, vegetarian fried rice: all very well done. Good choice of wine. Low prices and good service. Modest surroundings that go with the prices. This place is excellent value.
This place is so helpful and full of warm and knowledgable people. They always do a good job. Very worth the visit. Ask for Kathie, she's great.
magnifico lugar el centro cultural se ubica en paseo de los heroes en zona rio y vale la pena conocerlo
Onze oudste zoon was jarig en wilde graag naar La Promenade en dat was een erg goede keuze! Bij binnenkomst een (kinder)cocktail en als afsluiting dessert met vuurwerk. De bediening heeft zich uitgesloofd en het werd helemaal een feest toen mijn beide zoons de chefkok een hand mochten geven. Wat een eer voor die kleine mannetjes. Ik vrees dat er een traditie geboren is. Verjaardagen vieren bij La Promenade.
This is a very professional practice with an excellent reputation - well worth looking into and trying
I was looking to buy a used 2009 to 2010 Impreza to replace my 2004 G35 and when I first arrived at the dealership last week being April 16th, Ben greeted me with a smile and asked how he could assist me. I told him, what I was looking for in a car, the mileage and my price budget. Based on that, Ben showed me 3 different Impreza models, allowed me to sit in it and then suggested I go for one in particular mainly because of the mileage and the price. At first I thought the price of the car was too high but with great research I found that the price was actually reasonable compared to other Subaru dealerships in the GTA, including used car dealerships. Ben and I sat down afterwards and I told him that I would like to bring in my dad to look at the recommended car of choice. I went back the same day with my dad and we both test drove the car and it felt really nice in the sense of suspension, pickup and comfort. Sure it doesn't have all the bells and whistles as my Infiniti did, but I believe that in the long run it will be a better choice for many reasons, particularly gas and repair costs down the road. I believe that Subaru is a utility car in the sense its for the daily driver. When it got down to working the numbers out, Ben allowed me to discuss the numbers with my dad, and the fact that I would be trading in my Infiniti as well. Ben gave us time to think it over and we went back to see him on April 23rd to work out the proposed numbers and negotiations. Long story short after offering three to four counter offers, both of us came to a final decision that would work best for us which left us with a smile. We were happy and they (dealership was happy) but they ensured that the entire process was pleasant. Then we met Sam who is the Business Manager I believe and he thanked us for our business and showed us the paperwork to be signed and even offered us the details of extended warranty to which we politely accepted it based on the services offered and the price. Overall the entire transaction went smooth, and most importantly both Ben and Sam showed excellent business ethics and ensured that we all left with a smile in the end. Definitely worth checking out Richmond Hill Subaru.
Great
I am an internet customer, and my orders always arrive promptly, normally next day. And there is always a extra in the parcel - chocolate mints, a diary and other things depending on the time of year. Customer service is excellent, even phoned me when I made a mistake in my order. Pleasure to do business with.
None
Hola amig@s: La Central es una libreria de ensueno, la tipica libreria que gusta a todos los bohemios y a los amantes de los libros. Esta creada por jovenes emprendedores catalanes, que han sabido aterrizar en Madrid, con gusto y estilo. Esta que resene del Postigo de San Martin, esta construida en un antiguo edificio de tres plantas y esta muy bien y ambientando en diferenciados espacios para segun a que segmento de poblacion quieran seducir: el acogedor cafe de la entrada para todos los publicos y las distintas secciones: el rincon de la musica, los libros de politica e historia, literatura nacional e internacional, libros de ciencia y el encantador de libros para ninos. Ya les digo un pequeno oasis cultural en el corazon de Madrid.
good service, good food, excellent value for the money with fairly healthy food. I've eaten their at least once a week for about two years and have never had bad food... so I have to disagree with the earlier post....
According to my own experience I have used the services of this company, It's a best travel company.
Excellent quality on bumper stickers of my business, Will O' The Wrist Photography, customer's favorite, 395 Panorama, speedy delivery and great price!
Uno de los mejores centros comerciales q hay en Bogotá ;-)
Freehold changed my life. The classes are taught with a kind of gentle ferocity that helped me push through my perceived limitations. Not only did I gain new and important skills, both professionally and personally, but also a new community and sense of purpose. I cannot recommend Freehold highly enough.
I'm addicted!!
Platypus Wine Tours provides a very entertaining wine tour experience. Our tour guide was knowledgeable, funny and very flexible. He quizzed us on what our tastes and background in wine and made some recommendations as to the wineries we could visit, and in no time we had our short list, We had a join in tour, so of course we didn't know the other people we were with but by end of the tour I feel like we'd made a bunch of new friend. First rate, I'd go back.
I was visiting my brother's family in Huntsville on my way to Florida -sorely in need of a pedicure before I donned sandals. Found Classy Nails on-line and went as a walkin. Got right in and had the best pedi ever. The place was spacious, clean and very professional. My guy gave a great leg and foot massage. I wish I could take this place back to Madison, WI with me.
Prezzi onestissimi, buona qualità, tortellini ottimi, anche menu a richiesta
None
เป็นสถานที่ที่ศักดิ์สิทธ์มาก...เป็นที่ที่ทุกคนในภูเก็ตเคารพนับถือมาก
The Marines are the best!!!!!
Wonderful people, great, experienced service, professional beyond compare. As always.........the people at Luther Nissan Kia were amazing and considerate. They always go above and beyond in service and are some of the most friendly people I've met.
i,ve been getting inked up by Novi and almost every artist thats worked there.SINCE 1999!! EVER SINCE MOBY DICK WAS A MINNOW!!!!IF YOU WANT THE BEST TATTOO WORK COME TO BABYLON! I TOTALLY RECOMMEND IT! JOEY IMAGE X-THE MISFITS DRUMMER 78-80 L.A.M.F.
Positive experience, fast turnaround and good service. Very helpful and nice people.
Order online, delivery is fast and food was delicious! We tried this place on a whim and were glad we did. Specifically, the Lo Mein was made perfectly to order. I actually just placed another order with them as I was starving and we needed something quick and cheap. Their prices are a *little* high on some dishes and about average on others. Expect a great deal of food though. You won't be hungry afterwards. I will warn that I think they use MSG. It's that ever hungry for more Chinese food thing when you eat their stuff. But it's TASTY so I kind of don't care. Give them a shot! Their website is actually very secure. I place my order right through there and they just call me when they get here!
As a Champaign County uncontested divorce lawyer, I appreciate the efficient and professional manner in which the circuit clerk staff operates. It makes the experience of an affordable, flat fee divorce even better for my clients.
สถานที่เที่ยวในPhnom Penh
None
Magnificient historic hotel. Loved the gardens. Enjoyed my time spent at their delightful bar in the lobby.. drinks were reasonably priced... The hotel seems to well serviced by local taxis..that will take about Rs 150 to Thamel.. or it was just a 10 min walk. Highly recommended. Would stay here if I ever visit Nepal again.
Absolutely, without a doubt, the best place in town for breakfast and lunch.
Get the C'est la vi and the artichoke goat cheese bruschetta as an appetizer!
The owner subsequently contacted me after the review to apologize for the poor service and their failure to follow up on my complaint. He stated that that is not the way they do business and offered to refund my fees. I appreciated that the owner contacted me. They sent me a letter stating they had refunded the charges to me even though I had not requested a refund. This is how an honest businessman is supposed to operate and I appreciate that
The service here is above and beyond anything I've ever experienced at a gun store. Cullen, the owner, is very knowledgeable and helpful. If they don't have what you are looking for on the rack the guys at Republic will hunt it down at a fair price. I will be taking the CCW class soon!
We were in Charlotte over the weekend and found this jewel of a Q joint right in downtown! Food was excellent and so was the service. If you are working on portion control to lose weight this is NOT your place! There is a very good chance there is a to-go box in your future!
Friends from out of town surprised us with an arrangement of flowers to wish us luck in our new business. The flowers stayed fresh for two weeks! and that was in July! Thanks Millinocket Floral Shop!
Great little pizza & more place ! Food, service , price ! One of my family's favorite hole in the wall restaurants ! Highly recommend this place ! I Prefer the tripp rd. Location
My two poodle mixes (Tweek and Trinket) have been getting groomed by Elizabeth for almost a year now. She does a great job and my dogs really like her. The best part about it is the dogs are groomed at home and don't have to wait around in a cage making it an extremely comfortable situation for the mutts! I think the other review about a man was meant for someone else because she is the only person that we've dealt with.
Came here on vacation and just loved the pizza. We don't really have deep dish pizza back home and this was good. The wait is not too bad because they cook to order and you get everything right out of the oven
Fantastic food. Have been numerous times and have never been disappointed. Fresh and authentic Thai.
None
Best price when comparing. Over delivered (came earlier than expected and performed faster than expected). Friendly service. High quality work. Lupe did a great job!
Nice big store. Ideal for some last minute shopping.
None
None
vgjjjj
I've gotten pizza from this place a bajillion times and every time it. Is. Awesome!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! If you're visiting this area please try the pizza here! The people are super-nice and pizza is even nicer!They also sell other things like pasta and salads! They even have a dining room! You can even call in and get your pizza later! So what are you waiting for? MIP is the bestest!Try it now!
None
Great beer great service.
Simply put ..... "wicked awesome!"
For almost two years now Dr. Joe DuChene has been caring for several health issues I've head. One of them is a frozen shoulder, it happened to me in both arms. The treatments that Dr. DuChene has been using have helped tremendously to ease my pain and speed up my recovery. He deeply cares for his patients, has a broad knowledge as a chiropractor and wellness practitioner. When you meet him you will know that you are in good hands :-)
Pure marketing genius.
Absolute best company to work with!! Thanks for fixing the problems your competition left me. I should have used you to begin with and I would have saved a lot of money and stress.
I love this office! Dr. Losee and Dr. Valgardson are both excellent doctors who truly care about their patients. The staff is so friendly and I feel like I am family more than a patient. I recently started Invisalign and love it!
The calzones here are amazing.
My favorite burgers in Atlanta. Design and location is all class. Bravo.
None
標高１８００ｍ 天空の露天風呂 泉堅さんのフロアショウ すべてが最高
The absolute best place to go to get an extreme high quality haircut and if you want to spice up your style with some color. They are true artists in their field. They care about hair.
We wanted to do a small vanity remodel to spruce up a secondary Bath. Modern Mosaics came to the property looked at everything and then proposed a very classy looking project that allowed us to reuse the existing cabinet. The mosaic tile back splash and expensive looking (but not really expensive) faucet made the project pop. Everything cam in on budget and looked great. Kudos to modern Mosaics for that level of customer service. Great selection of unique items in this shop. Well worth a visit.
I love it here
I regularly use this Rite Aid since its just a couple of blocks from my apartment. The staff is always friendly and they always help me when I need it. The only downfall is that there's always homeless people outside, so I only go in the middle of the day.
Love this airport
Great gym, my first day I got a great workout. They have the great options for any budget. I got the $10 a month and can workout all day
Brilliant place to have traditional Bangalore city food. Butter Rice Pancakes are brilliant .
This is a vet that is truly in it for the right reasons. Shes has taken care of our animals for several years and I never had a displeasing visit. Her staff always has a smile and always there to help. With every visit I had, the prices were always lower than expected. Being in the medical field myself, when someone charges for services well below the "going" rate it is a sign that they care more about their patients than they do about the money. This vet is absolutely amazing and there is no amount words that can explain how awesome this vet is. She also sponsors neuter and spay clinics for those interested. We used "Neuter for a Nickle", and yes is was only a nickle, for our male cat.
This place is great!! I called for a same day appointment as a new client and was told the Dr would call me back. Within 5 min he called back and had me into see him within 35 min. The staff was great, as was he. I can't say enough about this office!!
Repairman arrived on time, was polite, clean and professional. My clothes washer had an intermittent problem which did not occur while he was here. Rather than just leave, he questioned me about the problem, in depth; and then he proceeded to find the cause and fixed it on the spot. Very few repairmen would do this. I highly recommend Jim’s Appliance Repair.
Ta nejlepší vinotéka v Brně ;o)
I have NEVER had a bad experience with Cecil. He is incredibly friendly, has unbelievable prices and has always been able to fix ANYTHING I bring to him in a timely fashion. I wouldn't go anywhere else.
What a place and what a great service and i mean it .having my friends and family wanting to go and check out the place after i told them
Best by the slice pizza in town
None
None
None
Great Record shop that just opened a new store near Tomball. Awesome selection, friendly staff, and they even have a small skate shop inside. The dude I talked to was honest & very helpful. They also have a head shop if that's your thing, and a few tee shirts. Check them out!
None
I had a wonderful experience with Emily at Dress Gallery! She helped me find just what I wanted and was extremely patient with me, even when I was being indecisive! She made me feel so welcomed and comfortable throughout my entire appointment!
Try the Med Wrap. You won't be disappoint.
วิวสวยมากมากครับพี่น้อง
A passion for the past and simplier times is a wonderful place to be. Many of us wish we were there. Thanks for the reconstruction.
Marvin has been a key player in our success as a property manager in the Grand Rapids area. We trust Marvin and his team with any job, big or small across all property types including single family homes, multi unit residential and commerical properties.
What a great car buying experience! Nice, extremely helpful sales staff. I was given a very fair price on a very nice vehicle and then experienced how Riser takes care of their customers after a sale. The best car buying experience a girl could have! Thank you all for taking such good care of me. I'm definitely a huge fan!
None
As an avid connoisseur who's eaten at almost all restaurants worth eating at in Erode, I'd most certainly put Kops on top
My 2 young daughters always have a great time on the bouncy structures at Laser Bounce. Best part is that it's open daily until midnight.
This place has a good breakfast and lunch menu. Unique and tastey food. Their brunch on Sat and Sun is excellent, and its a regular spot for breakfast before work. Another good place around town for wifi and getting some work done over food.
I was extremely happy with my experience here, the staff is very pleasant, and Dr. Goldberg knows exactly what he is talking about. I'm very pleased that I choose him for my orthodontic needs.
awesome, fast and great service!
Great food and service! James was a great server and was happy to get a fire going for us on this brisk evening.
My 3 year old son has had his teeth cleaned and checked twice at Alleman Family Dental. The fist time with Rebecca and Dr. Brecklynn and today with Michele and Dr. Dan. Both visits went very well. Everyone was patient with my son's questions and took the time to explain what was going to happen. Rebecca was great with his first visit telling him each thing she was going to do before doing it and letting him feel the tools on his hand before using them in his mouth.
My wife and I had our first experience buying a new car together here. Sometimes the car buying experience can rip couples apart. I felt like it actually brought us closer together. From our product specialist, Daryl, all the way through financing, the team at Germain Nissan was great to work with and made the car buying experience low stress and enjoyable.
best place to get braces
Very Pleasant as always. They ALWAYS have American Girl stuff!!
Really good pizza place i would recommend it to anyone who like pizza, if your a vegetarian you wont be left out they have pizza for everyone even if you don't like bits on the pizza you can change it.
Great Pho and beer selection. What more could you want in life?
Während des Häuselbauens wurde uns die Firma Weichselbaumer von unserer Hausbaufirma herangetragen und wir haben seit her alle sanitären Dinge dort erledigt. Sowohl freundliche, persönliche und flexible Beratung als auch kompetente und zügige Umsetzung - alles in allem absolut weiter zu empfehlen!
Nos estamos Trasformando
Servizio perfetto, un ambiente accogliente, pasticcini più buoni in assoluto, vasto assortimento di vini e grappe pregiati...
I seldom write reviews for places but for this, I had to share. I'm a simple man who likes Chik-fil-a food, so I went there for lunch one day. The place was clean and the food was very good, but those were givens. The one thing that caught me off guard was the service and the employees. These people were smiling and friendly – honestly, some of the nicest people I've ever met. The guys made jokes and were on par with my complicated orders (I have needs, okay?). But anyways, as I was eating, a wasp came out of no where and the cashier rushed over and killed it before I even realized it was about to sting me and possibly ruin my appetite. He apologized over and over and when I walked out the door, he gave me a drink, free of charge. I walked out satisfied and appreciated. This has honestly been the greatest Chik-fil-a experience of my life.
As a Specialty and 24-hr Emergency Hospital in Florida, we have used Diamondback Drugs as our go-to compounding pharmacy for the past few years for in house medications as well as compounded medications. The staff of Diamondback has always been very knowledgeable and extremely helpful. Anytime we call with questions on a medication or availability, there is always a pharmacist that is happy to answer any questions. They offer a wide-variety of compounded medications at a very reasonable price and ship these meds to our hospital and clients in a quick timeframe. We would definitely recommend use of this pharmacy for compounding needs.
My absolute favorite Sushi place in Calgary! I love the creativity of the chef when we order big plates and the service is great. I have been going since they open and I hope they stay open forever!!!
Dream System Solutions has recently taken over 3 of my websites. He has already saved me over $7,000. His transparency in SEO is a relief. This is a professional SEO firm that is looking at what is best for their clients. So far I am impressed.
I have been an extremely happy and devoted client of Jodi's for 10 years. Her work ethic is impeccable, professionalism is remarkable and her integrity is undeniably one of the best!! I have gone from blonde to dark brown and back to blonde and my hair has not suffered any damage at all. Jodi is amazing with color and uses only the best products. I receive compliments almost daily on how fabulous my hair and the color of my hair is. She is consistently current with trends and products. Most important to me is the fact that as a single mother with very little time to spare in the day, Jodi is on time with her schedule and efficient. I can't recommend Jodi enough...
The veterinary eye doctor did a wonderful job. I couldn't have been more impressed. It helped too that a good deal came off the price of the surgery. We did an initial test, called an ERG, which the veterinary eye specialist does to be sure our dog is able to get vision back -- the eye doctor doesn't want to waste our money. After the surgery was done, we were delighted to find the entire testing amount was removed from the cost of the cataract surgery, which was performed in both eyes. We also got a month of free rechecks. We were back the day after surgery -- procedure here to double check -- the dog ophthalmologist is very thorough. Mille is seeing beautifully! What a gift this veterinary ophthalmologist is. I would not ever know Mille had any eye issues before.
Don't let the size of the store fool you - there is a lot to be had here! Just walking by the place, you are immediately put at ease by the wonderful aroma of whatever combination of incense has been burned that day wafting out the door. Stepping inside, it feels cozy. Friendly. Homey. The staff is courteous, knowledgeable, and will go out of their way to make sure you find what you are looking for - even if they don't have it, they can find it for you in the area, online, or order it in. Books, candles, incense, gemstones, athames, tarot decks, oils, you name it. Whether you're a student of Wicca, a practitioner of Vodou, are an herbalist that dabbles in rootwork, walk the Native American shamanic path, or you're just learning how to read tea leaves, this little shop has what you're looking for (and staff that knows what they're talking about!) - stop in for a "spell". :-)
Third time I've had my hair cut somewhere different in 20 years... guys did a great job. Shorter than I remember my hair being, but it's been a few months since it was cut. Pleasant service, will return again
Awesome service from the barback service... Outstanding service
Was passing through McGregor and just looking for anything to eat when I stumbled upon this place. The restaurant is very clean with a nice bbq-joint-meets-sports bar atmosphere (minus the bar). I had the chopped brisket sandwich and my g/f had the smoked turkey sandwich. The sandwiches were served dry, so you're feel to put as much or little BBQ sauce as you like. The two sauces at the tables were tasty in their own ways. Also had a side of mac'n'cheese that was also delicious. It wasn't smothered/swimming in fake cheese like many bbq joint tend to do. Instead, it was a lighter macaroni with real melted cheese on top. I like to eat on the healthier/lighter side so I appreciated that (as well as the sandwiches served dry). Last, all the staff was upbeat and friendly. Such a great place!
Tu já mám nejradši, tu já mám rád!
Great dance floor. Lots of nice people, good piped-in music, and the bands are usually good or better. The help is nice and hard-working, and the drinks are reasonably priced. Dance lessons there, too. Never had the food, but it looks good w/generous portions. Worth going there!
None
None
Super friendly, knowledgeable and great service. Skip big box and talk to these guys directly.
None
I've been there 3 to 4 times now and I've always been in and out very quickly with a satisfactory visit. The facility is very clean. The staff was so friendly and made me feel very welcome. My last visit was my favorite. The doctor stitched up a large gash going all the way through my lip. I was worried that I might have a large scar or that the skin would pucker where the stitches were applied, but I'm all healed up and you can't even tell it ever happened. I refer my friends here because of all the great visits I've had.
Now this is my new thikana
Stopped in as I drove through the town. Very interesting store. Didn't know what to expect, but I'm glad I went in! Phenomenal staff with a real knowledge of their products. Not to mention, they were a pleasure to chat with! Really enjoyed my experience here, but they need to open up shop closer to my hometown!
Susunya bikin pengen nenen terus!
Very clean.
One of the best hidden gems on the peninsula. Great flat bread pizzas.
I've just been to Sno!Zone for a 3 hour lesson in preparation for a ski trip. The facility is excellent, and I definitely feel that I got my money's worth. There were 5 in our beginner group, though the groups taking the shorter 1 hour lessons did seem larger. The instructor was knowledgeable and friendly, and coped well with the varying levels of ability in our group.
I love Dr. Edward Perkl and his staff. If your looking for a dentist in Lynnwood WA that has top of the line service and equipment, this is the place to go. They are the friendliest people you could ever meet. His office is close to Edmonds Community College, and offers cash discounts. I have been going here for years. They are great with kids and have a bunch of cool kid toys to get your kids happy about going to the dentist.
I needed my battery/electrical looked at, due to two recent dead battery days. These guys were recommended by a small local shop in town that was too busy. When I arrived, they told me it would take them at least an hour to be able to tell him if the car had any problems. I didn't ask about rates, but fully expected to pay an inspection/diagnostic fee. After 15 minutes, they called me to say they'd squeezed it in; and everything was in working order. At my request, they also looked at my spark plugs after this. When I went to get the car back, they said "you're all set".... no charge, at all? I've never seen that happen before. Plus, their hourly rate is only $68. Maybe that's normal in this town? but it's 30-40% less than I'm used to paying.
Great Food, great ambiance, good looking and fun staff and the best margeritas in town! Its the only place i go when i go out! Treat yourself to a romantic date night or bring your friends and family, either way your in for a satisfying night away! I am being completely honest when I say it is the only place i go because i always have a great time!
Finally made it to this delightful restaurant. Food is excellent (my *very* picky daughter wanted to go back the very next day) and the staff is friendly and attentive. Definitely check it out!
Top 3 dining experiences on the Central Coast! Delicious! Everything was prepared and executed top notch. We had the Elk and Flatiron Steak, both were incredible! Wine list is awesome and affordable! We will be back...
Great experience
Wonderful App. Directed me from home to 35km in a place ive never been.
I had an awesome experience at the dealership Tommy (manager) and Juan T. were the best! Juan T. was very knowledgeable about the vehicle, told me everything I needed to know about the vehicle. Juan T. did a great job and deserves to be rewarded for the way he treated me and my family. I'm sending my entire family over to purchase Hyundai from now on!
Lucky 7 Shoe Shine & Repair services mentor & primary supplier.
The first time steping on to the peir I was just struck by the energy and vibe of the croud hanging around the peir, I had a very good experince exploring the area. I would definatly take my friends here, it is also a very lively place at night. It would be a great place to bring kids! Hit it up! :)
Mark and Connie Heavener have been styling my hair for the last 20 years. They have worked at many different venues. Salon Heavener is by far the best location that showcases their talents when it comes to hair and beauty. I leave each encounter at Salon Heavener feeling wonderful, knowing that I look my best and having been treated with care and compassion. They have many different talented individuals working for them, each hand-picked by Mark and Connie. So whatever your needs or tastes, this is the only salon in Orange County for me.
None
None
Definitely the best title company in Helena. Always on time and up front with the information that you need to get your closing done fast. The staff is very knowledgeable and their experience shows the minute you begin talking with them.
Driving back to Astoria last night around 8. It was the start of a storm so it was getting windy and wet. I hardly ever go to Starbucks because all I ever want is a regular coffee. But instead of going to Burger King my wife suggested Starbucks before we crossed the bridge back into Oregon. Went to the drive thru, asked for a double shot in the dark, drove around to the window. I asked the lady how to add cream and sugar (there was nothing at the window and wasn't sure how it was done there)? She said she would do it for me. Over the next hour on the drive home I savored some of the best coffee ever. Not sure the size of cup she put the double shots in, but it was rich and strong. Thank you whoever was working at that time last night.
I was shopping around with my parents for a car. We stopped by Nissan of Manhattan, the sales person James Tan was very knowledgeable with the product and tentative to our needs. He was not pushy nor in a hurry to make a quick sale. He patiently answered a long list of repetitive questions in Mandarin, Cantonese and in English to cater to each of us. His excellent customer service and attention to detail made it an excellent experience. I would not hesitate to recommend my friends and family to him.
Fast service, good pricing. Bought a tub of Cyclone, which was cheaper than buying direct from Maxi. Would recommend.
Bartow Ford its an amaizing Family bussiness place to shop for your car. Best priceses in central Florida. But when it comes to the services and taking care of customers they have raises the standars to the top. Theres no words for the cortesy, carisma and respect this people take with the customers that walk in their lot and I mean always. Excellent services, I happend to have Mr. Rodney Rodrigues as my car salesman and I only have to say onces what my needs were and it was done as I request, No games. Always thruthfull and Im very thankful for his help and direction. He do know the dealer industry his in, I very much love that He is a Christian and he do reflect this place with respect. Thanks again Rodney and may God bless you always as well may the Lord bless this dealer in many ways for having in their staff people like you. Thanks to Mr. Benny that always is there too, and to many others that work together to ensure the best of them always, Ms.Pamela, Mr. Carlos, Brian at sevices and on. Well I do give them ( 5*) Strars. Humble and honest poeple alwyas last for ever, Good luck to you all always, specially to you Rodney, Thanks.
Hakkari'de teröristlerle çıkan Hain çatışmada 6 asker ile 2 köy korucusu şehit oldu, 12 terörist de etkisiz hale getirildi. Hakkari-Çukurca karolunun 40'ıncı kilometresinde bulunan Geçimli jandarma karakoluna saat 02.30 - 03.00 sıralarında bir grup PKK'lı 3 ayrı koldan roketler ve uzun namlulu silahlarla saldırı düzenledi. Bu sırada kamyonetle jandarma karakoyuna doğru gitmeye çalışırken fark edilen bir grup PKK'lı ile bölgede bulunan asker ve köy korucuları arasında çatışma çıktı. Çatışmada 6 asker ve 2 köy korucusu şehit oldu, 15 asker ile çatışma sırasında karakola yakın evlerde oturan 6 sivil yaralandı. Bir kadın terörist de Nizamiye kapısı önünde intihar eyleminde bulundu. Üzerindeki bombayı patlatan eylemci parçalanarak öldü. Şehitlerimizin 3 'ü Ordu Gölköy Özyurt İlçesinden Olduğunun Haberini Aldık Allah Şehit Anne Babalarımıza Allahtan Sabır İhsan Diliyoruz. Şehit Olan Kardeşlerimizinde Ruhları Şad Olsun. ŞEHİTLER ÖLMEZ VATAN BÖLÜNMEZ.
Very good! It was busy with locals (always a good sign) and the food was hot & fresh. Cute decor, they're connected to antique stores so the have those displayed throughout the restaurant. Would happily eat there again.
Really honest, great customer service and always ready to help! I much prefer people like Matt rather than those big tech-shop!
We have been working with Residential Rental Group for 5+ years now as owners. We find them to be efficient, resourceful and professional at managing our property. They also manage properties for two of our friends who are also quite happy with their services. Our last tenants liked RRG so much, they rented from them again when they were ready to move to a smaller home. Jeanna Cole, the owner, is great at diffusing situations. The entire staff is friendly and professional. The longer I work with them, the more I appreciate what they can do and how they do it.
Absolutely a wonderful place to eat for the family or for friends!
Coldest beer in town & great frindly folks !!
Paradise Jet Boating lives up to its name of Australia's Most Exciting Jet Boat Ride! I highly recommend it. You go fast, you get wet and you have great fun.
St. Alban's is an awesome church...a fun, loving, community of people on a journey together with Christ. South Austin is blessed with this church on the hill!
None
Good food, clean, well lit parking and lots of it.
When you walk into this place you are immediately hit with the heavenly smells of fresh baked breads and other goodies. The staff is super friendly and everything was totally yummy. The small grocery was well stocked. I will go back more often than I should.
I have been buying my strap material from Synthetic Textiles for a decade and they are just a wonderful company. You have to call them to place your order but they are so courteous and helpful it's actually a pleasant experience. Their prices are excellent, their customer service impeccable. I simply won't buy from anyone else. Terri Hearne
We have been going here for 7 years for my daughter's birthday. Dick and his staff has been very good to us every year we have gone. We enjoy it very much. It is very family centered and family oriented.
Hop giao ban moi thang
None
Nice pub with surprisingly good food
None
Everyone at Generate Design exhibits a rare combination of right brain / left brain thinking. They're creative in the extreme but also bring a thoughtful, strategic approach to every client project. Plus -- and this is the rarest attribute of all, especially these days -- they are genuinely nice, caring, ethical people.
Not Bad
I can tell you first hand that dealing with the good people at Kendall Auto Group was an absolute pleasure. I would recommend them to to anyone.
Can't say enough good things about Scott Smith and his team at Academy Mortgage. Scott was the last loan officer I sat down with prior to accelerating the purchasing process and I was very fortunate that we crossed paths. Scott is ridiculously knowledgeable on the various types of loans and what properties to employ them on (be it a standard fha, fha 203k, conventional, types of loans for flips, etc), which gave me an upper hand once I was ready to pull the trigger on a property. The best part about working with Scott is that he takes the time to explain all of the working parts of each loan; clarity that was refreshing as this was my first home purchase. He truly works to build a relationship so that you'll be a repeat client. Scott has definitely earned my future business, and I already recommend him to all of my friends/family.
The staff at Trailside Dental always go above and beyond. The wait time is always minimal, staff is more then kind, and level of care is off the charts. I have never found a dentist that will do more to make you feel comfortable and informed.
the food is good but i hear from servers at diff eatires that they have a time keeping good servers. we get the 2 for $25 alot its a awesome deal for a couple
Excellent, both food and service
Fantastic! Great food great atmosphere!
None
My boyfriend and I have had many of our cars serviced here and had always been happy with the outcome. The staff makes you feel like you're part of the family.
The Whole overall experience was wonderful, I was referred by a co-worker and I was very impressed. Professional staff, beautiful facility and just all around wonderful people there. I have definitly found my daughter a new Dentist that even she will be glad visit as needed! Great Job ladies and keep up the great Work!!!! 5STARS!!
We started coming to Gulf Shores about four years ago, and we always stay on the Fort Morgan road. The first year we were there, we discovered Scoops, and now it's part of our daily routine. We play all day, eat a big dinner out, and then go to Scoops for dessert. Every day we're there! Love it. The ice cream is excellent, but perhaps more importantly, the staff are unfailingly courteous, friendly, and cheerful, even during their busiest times! Only wish it was a little bigger so more people could enjoy it! Huge thumbs up!
I found A & A lock service via a google search last week for a locksmith in the Clarksville area and called them. I scheduled an appointment, met Roger and his wife at the house the next day. They were on time, professional and very effiicient. He changed all the locks in my house to fit ONE key in less than ONE hour. I was very happy to have this done for a price less than what it would have cost to buy the locks at Lowe's and replace them myself (and they would not all have the same key either!). I highly recommend this team!
I've been seeing Rosalee for a couple of years now. She used to be at the Staples Mill location but has since moved to Carytown. The location is super convenient for me and the service is always wonderful. They are quick to answer the phone, book appointments and always greet customers. Rosalee gives a great cut and is fun to talk to. I usually get a nice moisturizing treatment for my extra-dry / tangly hair and I love that her haircuts grow out nicely too. They also have lots of great products available including the super awesome It's a 10 line.
I am an avid bicyclist and originally went to see Dr. Tamar Gamliel in 2012 because I was experiencing numbness and tingling in my left leg. She introduced me to A.R.T. and I noticed a difference right away. Over a short time I have seen a huge improvement. I have continued to see her for adjustments/ As an athlete herself, she understands the issues and challenges I face and I have found her exercises and advice on posture and stretching to be invaluable. Her core classes are excellent to. One treatment and you'll recommend her as highly as I do!
Excellent service and very accommodating in making my car available for pick up off hours.
I recently got my first tattoo here and could not have been more pleased with the experience. I am such a baby when it comes to pain but the staff were amazing and made me feel really taken care of. I have also been pierced here and had a great experience then too! I would highly recommend going here if you like artists and piercers who are passionate about/take pride in their work!
Amazing wings. Other food is great too but be sure to try their wings when you go there. I get them every time I am in the area.
I purchased a package on Bloomspot and had an awesome time. The atmosphere was relaxing, and the complimentary champagne went a long way in helping to soothe my nerves. Carrie was my photographer and she was great at finding good poses and coaching me through the session. I'm very pleased with the final product, and already thinking up ideas for my next session! Highly recommended.
Very friendly staff, knowledgeable staff who are runners too! Plenty of great athletic clothing. Really cool location in Old Town.
I've had nearly had every sushi roll there is on the menu and it's hard to go wrong. Yes it gets a bad rap from some hardcore sushi eaters because it's Korean owned but I can assure you that you won't be disappointed unless you come in expecting to be so. It's a family friendly joint and the owner is extremely nice. Owners personality might rub some people wrong, if so, go take a chill pill, relax and just enjoy your time and your meal. Oh, and Mon-Thur it's $3.99 all you can drink SAKE. And that's $4 for the whole table [4 people] from some time to 9pm. And to top that off, if you buy 10 rolls you get one free. All in all, this place is great
Our service advisor Justin Mitchell has been taking care of the two VW's that we have purchased from Chapman VW with the first in 2006. Service has always been prompt and Justin does a good job communicating details about the service or any warranty issues. Scheduling appointments is easy to do on the website and that ensures you get your car looked at on schedule.
Jan has just left after coming to service fix my blocked drain. He arrived on time, was friendly, informative and efficient. He fixed the problem and restored my drain normal working order. This is the third time I have used Plumbers Belgravia and have been completely satisfied all three times. A very good service.
Very very impressed with Portrait Dental. Right from the prompt and friendly service by reception, to the very kind and gentle hygienist. Everyone took the extra time to listen to your past experience, concerns, issues, what you hope to see, and just to get to know you. I was very worried about finding a great dentist office in Toronto compared to my childhood dentist, but I think Portrait Dental is definitely filling that hole. Atmosphere is wonderful and clean; without being snooty. A++
Spicy Italian pizza rules
Awesome place to go with family for a delicious THALI dinner ..
I started taking my Apollo out to DogTown after having a TERRIBLE experience with another boarding/daycare facility out on Winchester Rd. The staff at DogTown are all great with the dogs and I have to fight Apollo to keep him from dragging me up the stairs to get into the building every time I drop him off! I always recommend to all of my friends that they take their dogs to DogTown when they have to go out of town.
I have lived in 4 cities and have had a number of dentists over the years. Dr. Savitsky is, by far, the best dentist I have ever had. She is a phenomenal practitioner - highly skilled and truly brilliant. But, for me, what is more important is that she will help you make the best decision about your options. She will not (as many dentists do) recommend (insist) on the most expensive treatment option. She will help you consider the timing, cost and results of any procedure. I have been seeing her for almost 7 years - my daughter sees her as well. If I could take a photo of my teeth and include here - I would! Plus (this is a bonus) - Dr. S and her staff are wonderfully helpful and friendly. A visit to the office is an enjoyable experience in every way. Look no further - once you are her patient, you will never leave.
None
Great store for all your food shopping needs! Best in Merced in my opinion. Don't let others discourage you from shopping here, it's literally the best place you could go to as far as value and quality are concerned. I read a review where an individual stated you should go to FoodMaxx, let me explain why Food 4 Less is the superior choice. Unlike FoodMaxx, Food 4 Less has great employees, not to mention the deals are better. So when you're deciding where to shop, don't let yourself be fooled into making the wrong choice, shop Food 4 Less every time.
Amazingly helpful, knows his stuffs. He was able to solve my issues just by giving me directions through the phone. Recommend him to anybody is a given. Thanks again David for you amazing help may god bless you for that!
Excellent service and fast response!!! Unfortunately we needed a tow to the car dealership. We called and the wrecker was at my house within 10 minutes. Ryan was extremely nice and helpful. He understood our situation and made the towing experience seamless. Very reasonable rates !!! Highly recommended!!!
Trader Joe's for my family has been not only convenient with the pricing but the quality of the food is excellent.. The folks at Trader Joe's are nice and friendly and seem like they acuatlly enjoy their jobs. I also have a service Dog Max a German Shepherd and he is always welcomed and treated with the upmost respect. Oh and one more thing; I suggest everyone (well the peanut butter lovers) try this for dessert: buy the coffee blast ice cream, Peanut Butter the creamy one and cinnamon. all together and it is delish!! Thank you Trader Joe's for your service!
None
None
So far in Dothan, this is my favorite Mexican restaurant.
I was in the market for a new vehicle and had test-drive many brands including Honda. I had a suv and wanted a car. All of the cars seats dipped even with power seats wouldn't tilt forward enough for my short legs to sit comfortable. Mohamed a salesmen answered an email request. I came in, test drove Accord and Civic they were nice and I like them but again the seats were uncomfortable for my short legs he suggested the CR-V. The seats were straighter and more upright which felt better to my legs. Once I decided to get it Dean worked with me on getting an excellent rate. April was great on explaining the warranties and Erica with the signing of all my paper work and explaining my total cost, trade in, discounts and taxes. They even informed me about the New Honda Owners gathering they have for new owners. I would recommend Sheehy Honda.
I just had a PM Shine done at Paul Mitchell and love it! It brightened my color and hid a bit of the grey!! It took a little bit longer than it would at a typical salon, but the energy and attitude and money I saved were awesome!
I just love Annette and the team at "The Do" in Saint kilda. This is a great looking salon with a real atmosphere where I can be myself and be totally looked after.
Excellent facility! wonderful staff...I work in East Asia, but my home is in Utica, NY but get home summers...I keep my routine up, weight down, & spirits up; the staff is so kind & gentle. ;-} rap.
None
I picked up a lot of photographic pearls the last two weekends at Mike's Camera Seminars, 4 events in two weekends. 1) Wildlife Images with Impact! With John Vansteenberg 2) Photo Safari at the Zoo to Test Drive camera lenses, bodies and tripods. I sampled a 600 mm fixed Nikon lens and a Tamron 18-270 zoom, got some great lion and monkey shots. 3) Next day, back to the store for a gentle review and critique of the zoo photos with John Vansteenberg. 4)Following weekend: a two hour seminar with Me Ra Koh on Unlocking the Magic of Children. All the events were interesting, non-intimidating, professionally run, started on time and we had an opportunity to ask questions. These events are basically free: they cost $20, but you get a $20 gift card to be used at the store. I met some fellow photographers to network with and improved my skills.
If you're looking to work with people of integrity, who do what they say they're going to do, have their priorities straight, care about people and get results at the highest levels - then The Haro Group is the real estate team for you. It all starts with leadership. And Haro sets the tone with his intense passion to serve God & others. It's why he has the utmost respect not only of past clients, but from accomplished peers in the real estate industry.
Great service, great coaches. Just finished my program (i think total boot camp or immersion or something like that, it was 12 weeks). Learned a lot from these guys (and girls , thanks Antonia for filling me in on women's side of the story). It felt as it it was gym for my dating life. Individual attention, in field practice, plus doable and actionable assignment = a lot of fun and a lot of progress. Didn't expect much, and more so was my satisfaction when NYDC delivered and then some (Hunt you are awesome! day time meeting is actually enjoyable now). I have to do presentations all the time for my job, and i found myself doing much better on them, and getting more sales. Highly recommend to anyone who wants dating and communication skills improved. wish i done it years ago. I am dating a girl who actually is next door, we met in elevator of my building. Service is not cheap, but they say you get what you pay for. Certainly the case with NYDC.
I have taken my cat there several times. The doctor, Dr. Beard, was friendly and treated my cat with the utmost care. I was in the examination room with my cat the whole time. Very pleased with my experience and would definitely recommend.
Great clothes and nice guys.
Very nice! Cross a board walk over a swamp and continue to St. John's river with bald cypress covered in Spanish moss. 6 ml round trip.
I have been to St. Anne's twice with a Diva for a Day package and both times it was simply perfect. The staff are amazing, they even planned a special afternoon snack for me because I am allergic to nuts and could not eat their usual snacks. The spa facilities are wonderful, the yoga classes very relaxing, and the grounds are beautiful for walking around. I wish we could stay overnight - something to dream about! Can't wait to go back!
None
As anyone can tell, that's a handlebar mustache: not a unibrow. This is my favorite place in Cleveland. The owner is awesome. The employees are awesome. The crowd is awesome. The music is awesome. This is one of the few places people still show up to hear music, and they don't leave when their friend's band is done playing. This is the kind of place where you feel like you have a stake in what goes on. So the people pretty much police themselves without having to be told to not be jerks.
From beginning to end, Charlie made me aware of what needed to be fixed, and how much it would cost. He told me my options, and gave me the timeframes for deliveries and repairs.He was was in constant communication with me during the whole process. I was extremely satisfied when they replaced the engine on my 2005 GMC Envoy, and plan to return for services when they are needed. They are honest and reasonable, and really care about the long term relationship with their customers. I highly recommend their services for any automotive repair job, big or small.
None
I was having issues with top wisdom tooth and my dentist referred me to an oral surgeon whom I met and didn’t like. I was really tensed and started looking online. Thanks to reviews I found ORA Oral Surgery and Implant Studio. I was initially there for the checkup and happened to meet Dr. Koos. The confidence he gave me in my first visit encouraged me to setup an appointment for surgery. He explained everything in detail about the whole procedure. I was nervous on the day of surgery but thanks to Dr. Koos, Nancy, Ali and Julie for painless experience. Best part is Dr.Koos himself called me the evening to find out how I’m doing and asked me to save his contact. I had questions about the food I eat on day five and left him a message and I got a call back in no time. I never saw someone who cares so much about their patients. I strongly recommend Dr. Koos. He is amazing and best in this field :-)
Great food and alot of fun things to do before or after dinner. Also a great place to host kids birthday parties in Niagara Falls.
I see Nutritionist, Sarah King Feldman at Aria. She is so knowledgeable and has been pivotal in my process of healing myself with food. Additionally, Aria is a great location. It is beautiful inside. Staff or friendly and helpful. It has the feel of a high-end spa.
There nothing better, when you have finished dinning at the restaurants on Dee Why beach, than heading to the ChillBar, to get a refreshing Gelato cheers Rowan
Pizza, sandwiches and salads are perfect, fresh and delicious every time we order. Not sure about the Yelp comments saying the food was bland; we love the variety of flavors and options, particularly being able to add your own ingredients when ordering online. We've mostly ordered delivery and it has been consistently delivered in half the time expected. I've also noticed that the delivery folks are always very friendly. A bad experience here must be rare, because we've never had one!
Collection VW Hudson is great place to shop for your next car. The professional and pleasant staff was very helpful during whole process. My experience was easy from start to finish and working with Antoinette and Alex was a pleasure. I highly recommend Antoinette as a sales person.
None
I have been there a quite a few times since they opened. I have never had any complaints regarding this restaruant. The place is spotless, everywhere! The employees are normal people who are very plesent and not robots with lines they practice. The food, well I have to admit, I have had only the stuffed meat pizza as it is awesome and could very well be its own food group. Will easily feed 4 for just over $20 bucks and everybody will be full. They sell slices so one can snack or have a less expensive lunch then just ordering an entire pizza. Sodas in cans and bottles is nice as I prefer no fountain drinks. They do have fountain drinks if that works for you. Its really a nice place to dine in, take out. I honestly do not remember if they deliver as I live kind of far away to be in their delivery area but I believe they do.
Love the food especially the cookie dough!!!!
I have had the pleasure of following, interacting with and recommending Kim here on Google+ and other social platforms for a while now. I can easily recommend her based on these interactions and getting to know Kim. She is a true professional that "knows her stuff" and can back it up!! Get to know Kim and check out her business. You will be glad you did!
I just purchased a new Pathfinder Platinum and have nothing but raves for this dealership and their staff. I did so via the Internet and the process was flawless. I had my transaction completed in a 30 minute period with Josh Henderson, Internet Director, who was an absolute delight. He was concise, efficient, clear-cut, courteous, extremely considerate, polite and most importantly, trustworthy. We were greeted by the manager, Paul Francis, personally and treated with courtesy, respect, consideration and encouragement. He genuinely appreciated our business and expressed it throughout our experience. My vehicle was readied to meet all of my expectations and our salesman, Doug McIntosh, spent a great deal of time making us familiar with the car's features. The price for my vehicle was most competitive and I recommend this dealership without reservation. The car is a joy to drive and the attention to detail, along with some great options, make it a must have!
Best Sprint Store in Winston Salem
I have tried a few pet kennels but Pet Paradise far surpasses them all. My small dogs stay in the "Petite Retreat" and have constant access to the outside via a dog door. The play yard is very large and during the summer they have access to a shallow pool. Hazel, the owner, and her employees are geniuely interested in making your pets feel at home and always give us a status report when picking them up. The facility is clean and well maintained. They offer grooming services as well and bath dogs one at a time, creating a less stressful experience. I would definitely recommend Pet Paradise!
Beautiful and stylish furniture! Excellent and responsive service! Lots of new items all the time. Love this company!
None
None
Great gym, very helpful and friendly staff; I would highly recommend personal training expert Luke Hayes. I have been involved in fitness for over 20 years and never had a personal trainer. I decided to try a session one day and it was the best decision I made. Luke’s knowledge and motivation has helped me reach the fitness goals I previously set and now I continue to set new goals I am confident I will achieve through his help. I would highly recommend Luke for anyone out there wanting to improve themselves and achieve results. Whether you are new to exercise or have years of experience Luke will make you a success in the gym.
A great web design company in jaipur indeed, I suggest all the interested guys to visit once here. They provide extra ordinary professional web design in jaipur, A great company excellent!
Nice pic
It's within easy reach of the downtown hotels and a definite stop if it is your first Trip to Montgomery or if you have been there a number of times. The woman on responsibility was very beneficial in guiding out things you can do.
I was studying in this college and I remember my college day till the time and miss it.
The food and service at Moody's is top notch. The menu has changed a little over the past few months/year but its really dialed in! If you haven't been lately or are looking for THE spot in Truckee while passing through make sure to check them out. Top picks on the menu; best burger in town, awesome steak frites, truffle oil french fries and the ahi appetizer is killer.
I went to Julie's Alteration to get my wedding dress altered. Julie and her staff were very helpful and did a great job! Also, they were very reasonably priced!
The Doxey Real Estate Group is the best in the business! Joe, Nate, and their team made the process of finding and moving my elderly parents an excellent experience. Nate was very professional and did everything in his power to find the perfect place for my parent. He was willing to take phone calls any day at any time. He was also very prompt at setting up showings at the many properties that my parents were interested in at the times that worked for us. They made us feel like we were the only clients they had. Very prompt, professional and detail oriented. Being that my parents are elderly it is very difficult for them to leave there home. The Doxey group was willing to bring all paperwork to them from start to finish which greatly eased this stressful situation for my parents. Classy Group! I am looking forward to listing/selling my parents old home with Doxey group in the immediate future.
The Service form our Salesman Mark Goff was fabulous. Took the time to listen to our wants and needs and made sure we drove away satisfied. I would highly recommend Mark and your dealership to everyone. :)
None
Loved it
This is a convenient location with fast and friendly service. Company owned and full service, it's a great place for a morning cup or an afternoon break in the day.
Awesome place, bar opens up onto the gardens and is an easy place to sit and drink for ages. Have to try the chicken wings... immense.
We booked the Chalet Rainbow's End for a Couple Retreat (4 couples). The house was amazing, and the staff at Chalet Village was superb. The 2 recommendations I would make to the owners would be to upgrade the TV's to larger screens especially in the bedrooms. For someone who likes to fall asleep watching TV, the TV in the bedroom was hard to see. Also, the grill outside was very small and hard to fit 8 steaks! I would recommend this Chalet and Chalet Village properties to anyone visitng Gatlinburg, TN.
Great bunch of guys, we go there alot, excellent food, excellent atmosphere... Thanks Humberto and Daniel for your great service...
I drove from Springfield, MO to St. Louis to buy a car because Todd Eversgerd, at Bommarito Nissan offered me such a great deal on a new Xterra. The prices were much better than those in Springfield, and I felt like I was being dealt with fairly and honestly - and that's important when buying a car. I now have a new dealership. It's a long drive, but I can catch a Cardinals game and buy a car next time!!! It was a very stress-free process and I never felt like I was being "taken" or lied to by Todd. He was just straight forward and I really enjoyed doing business with him.
One of the best. This Starbuck location has fast and friendly service. I love it here
Excellent customer service. The staff is polite and friendly and very professional. The entire rental process took less than 20 minutes, including seeing the unit I would be renting. I received a follow-up phone call just to check in and make sure I was satisfied with the unit.
Great guy honest and punctual.
None
My fiance and I had a great experience w/ Jason F. He always had a great attitude and was always willing to answer our questions and help (even if it meant staying after hours)!! I will definitely tell friends/family to head over to Broadway for their next vehicle. They made our first vehicle purchase a fun and worry-free journey! Thank you Broadway!
What a secret gem! Tired mom and daughter driving back to University of Oregon and we hit the wall at Roseburg. Trip Advisor led us here and we were so thankful. Fresh food and atmosphere like we enjoy in San Diego. Lucked out and enjoyed "Twice as nice Tuesday" specials and some Cupcake Chardonnay. Great service by Cheryl too. :)
My husband are very pleased with the serivce and experince we got from automax. Mr. Staffa got us a great deal. I would recommend Automax to others and be sure to ask for Alan Staffa.
Berliner pub with good flair. Service is nice, but they don't pamper you. Berlin Charme.
Great!!!!
None
About 3 weeks ago we went to our cousins birthday party and really enjoyed the atmosphere and the private dining. Food was sooo good and the music was awesome. I really enjoyed the DJ how he mixes the music with the videos. We liked it so much that we are going back for date night (my wife and I). Keep up the good work Grand Agave. We love it there.... JJ
Philly Pet Care took care of my kitties for a few days while I was out of town. I was very happy with the level of care, and when one of my cats was suddently not feeling well, Dave and Kristie took it very seriously and kept me posted throughout. I will be happy to call them again when I need cat sitting!
I had to get 2 new tires before getting my sticker for inspection and after looking around for the best deals on tires, these guys weren't...but were more than happy to meet the lowest price I did find! They definitely were more than helpful with getting my new tires and were very kind. I really am impressed with the customer service I received and will definitely be using these guys for anything else I need for my vehicle. I would highly recommend these guys!
None
You really can't go wrong with this dealer. Nathan Swope is a salesman who does everything right, the first time every time.
Powder River Dental is a wonderful group of dentists in Gillette. They do a great job with kids and are truly "gentle" just like their slogan ses. I would recommend Powder River Dental to anyone with a slight discomfort with going to a dentist. They make it... dare say... enjoyable??
You will not find a better local eatery. From the food to the service. Excellent
My stay could not have been better! *Lovely, helpful, informative, but not intrusive hosts *EXCELLENT two-course breakfast *Beautiful home *Beautiful room *Convenient walk to downtown and restaurants GREAT STAY!
This Trinidad & Tobago landmark is currently under construction. However, the wonderful structure is part of the Magnificent 7, a row of majestic and well constructed buildings.
None
Une cuisine exquise et soignée, à des tarifs très accessibles (menus à 20 ou 30€). Encore merci pour ce bon moment, j'en salive encore ! (avec une pensée particulière pour l'entrée de St Jacques poêlées et safranées...)
IME is one of the best institution for Management Education in NCR. This institute mentors you to have disciplined ways leading life.
None
Definitely the best restaurant in Paddington and maybe one of the best in whole Sydney. The place is classy so don't expect a casual diner or pub. The booking is a must if you want to be sure that you'll get a table. After that, you'll have the pleasure to have the perfect night - delicious food, excellent service and lots to talk about afterwards.
I didn't eat there but i see the ''movie'' and i can say that is it looking better than a lot of other place from where they make'it here in Romania ..so i definitely need to try in the nearly future to see and taste it..
My tattoo looked amazing and the staff are extremely friendly and welcoming. The place is awesome!
None
None
I have never had any trust in any animal care center until we came in with American Animal Care Center in an emergency. They gave us the greatest care ever and were also friendly with us. They seemed to really care for my dog Mercy and it makes me happy that after the office visit she felt better! Thank you.
I work at this location and I want everyone to know that the staff there does care about what you get and how much you pay. I've been there for half a year now and have had no problems. We are always striving to update and improve your experience and help you with anything you need! We have one of the largest Magic followings in the area and are able to get what you need even if we don't have it. The most important thing to me and the store is not just profits, but establishing a community where gamers and card players can enjoy themselves. Which is there! Drinks, Snacks, and Tables for anyone to use and Video Games and Cards for those looking to take it home! Saying bad things about a store you haven't really gotten to experience is only displaying your lack of consideration and ignorance... Also side note! We do give the largest return on product to help you afford the games you haven't tried, or are soon to be released~
Great Mexican food and even greater prices.
My main reason for loving them so much is their gluten free pizza! So GOOD. They are always top notch when serving large parties that they deliver to. My work orders from them for almost all of our events and we always see great service from them, which is why we always call for them to deliver when we need to serve a big group of people! We love Bellagios!
Amazing job done by this team, helps to customer reach there things safe, on time at affordable cost. Good Service with best support.
None
Hot and sour soup was really good, and (at the time of this writing) it's cheap. service was fast. They're also open late so that's awesome.
Awesome food, better people!
My wife and I have been all of Los Angeles shopping for carpets, and Pashgian owner David Mehraban is simply the best. He quickly zeroed in on what we liked and proceeded to dig out and display one great piece after the next. We are extremely picky and were surprised to find 4 pieces that we actually wanted to see in our home in La Canada. As it turned out, one of the pieces that David identified that we weren't sure about in his store ended up being the best! He is knowledgeable without being pushy, has great taste, and is easy to do business with. Highly recommended.
I've been to Apatura a couple of times with friends. The service is good, while not being annoying like some places. The staff are friendly and the food is really good. The prices for the drinks and the courses are affordable as well. If you are looking for a quiet, pleasant evening out try this place.
The owner, John Borgetti, is a true Italian! GREAT food and a wonderful atmosphere!
Fiz um bazar para vender minhas roupas na Prime pois achei que seria mais profissional que fazer em casa. O espaço é muito bem decorado, com ar-condicionado e TVs modernas, ficou parecendo uma loja mesmo! Recomendo!
Meatballs sub was fantastic. Service ws s quick and efficient especially as it was during lunch.
Mr. Boggs is a compassionate, caring professional who works with couples and individuals with pornography issues. As a colleague, I can highly recommend his services.
The Best Fresh Fish in town! Love their salmon and the fresh bread with the herb olive oil is awesome! Great place to relax and enjoy the art!
I'm impressed by the home improvements this company made for me. They made a wonderful kitchen remodeling for me - they replaced the old laminate Countertops with granite ones, they've changed the tiles and everything is more comfortable and beauty. Just great work.
Rita is a consummate professional who goes above and beyond for her families. She has a thorough sourcing, screening and placement process that puts the needs of the children and their families first and foremost. I would highly recommend Nanny Boutique for anyone searching for that perfect nanny!
Now in new hands, the former Landlady of the Hopbine! The Tally Ho offers great value for money and an excellent Sunday roast! Will be returning very soon :0)
Our first visit to this dog park was wonderful. Our Barkley loved meeting all of the other dogs. We enjoyed ourselves. The facilities were nice, lots of water for the dogs and they supply the clean-up bags. There was plenty of room for running and they even had exercise equipment for the dogs. I love the fact that the park is free during the week as well.
The whole team is second to none, from the sale down to financing they out did anything I could have expected. No hidden agendas.I felt like the team here was honest and not deceitful like a few places we stopped in before we went to Maher. Chris Vaas was the sales associate I dealt with. I have an extremely busy schedule being a paramedic student, working full time, and being a single mother, Chris worked around my schedule to get me into a car that I wanted for the right price, right financing, not to mention the great warranty on the car. Everyone there was extremely polite and helpful. I am very happy with my new car. Thanks for a great experience , I never knew getting a new car could be so hassle free and enjoyable. We will be back when it's time for our next car.
I just bought a 2012 Mazda CX-9. From Sales to Finance and Service, this dealership both took the time to listen and also made the process as speedy and simple as possible for the sale. They listened to what I wanted specifically, took notes and found the vehicle I wanted within the price range I wanted and made the deal work for me! I would and will recommend them to friends and family. Thank you Garrett and Steven for awesome collaboration. Rick (Frederick) Curbelo
Pete was great! Love how easy going he is and the great work he does. Thanks!
Great hotel needs better parking.
Kelsey did a phenomenal job with a pretty complex job. Very personable, very prompt, and went above and beyond what was expected to make sure the job was done right. Would gladly hire again. ~Nick
I recently enrolled my son into kindergarten last fall. I have had good communication from the teachers and staff thus far about the progress of my son and he is doing great. I have seen the school staff go above and beyond what could be expected to make sure that my child and others are safe and not hungry, both in and outside of school. As a result I have witnessed many who love to come to school and they thrive as a result.
This the best casting company. I have been able to get background work on a few projects over the past nine years. The staff as far as over the phone, never had to come into the office, are pleasant. Very professional and classy company. When you show up as scheduled and do as instructed more than likely will get more work on the same project. I love it Heery Casting far above...
My first walk after moving to Portland's NW side had led me to a fantastic meditation tree on the NE corner of the Couch. It's a Redwood, it was '99, and it was nighttime. In the shadow of the Redwood and invisible to everyone, including Po Po, i began to awaken. Since then i return to this tree when i pass through or visit Portland.
Simply a fantastic experience and I can't possibly recommend this store highly enough. Jared provided us incredible service and we wouldn't hesitate to go back anytime we need a mattress.
HIGHLY RECOMMENDED! Singularly, the best coffee shop in the area. If you know anything about proper brewing methods and artesian espresso based drinks, you will see that they have the best product in town - and in fact the entire area.
mcdonalds cabuyao as of nov 18, 2013 is still under renovation. i hope that the management have done this earlier so that it may serve their customers prior to holidays on december.... still mcdonalds is more likely to have a number of customers rather than those of mang inasal, jollibee and chowking. (sister companies). anyways, as far as i can see, now, they're renovating to serve more customers and to have an enhanced customer experience, i like the new concept of the building.. i hope that there is also a second floor. ^_^ it's like a view deck like the one's with jollibee in front. ^J^
Wonderful, wonderful! The Fufu is devine.
This is a very clean Red Lobster. I have seen far worse and it may eventually age. I would hope they keep up with appearance. They do not have much else to offer being a food chain. The staff assisting us were top-notch. It was a very pleasant atmosphere. Living in a Gulf Coast community, Red Lobster is the last place I would recommend for sea food. However, they have an excellent steak. I would never name their food as "great". With the pleasant service and good food, it makes for a fine night out. Be prepared to pay high for mediocre sea food and great steaks.
Best Damn Mac n Cheese!
I would like to whole-heartedly thank Kevin Sale and the entire financing crew at Encinitas Ford for all of their help in getting me into my 2013 Ford Fiesta SE this week! They worked fervently and relentlessly to get me the absolute best deal even when faced with some pretty tough financing challenges. Instead of giving up and telling me they could not help me, they went above and beyond and made sure that I left the lot with the best car for my needs and with the best possible deal I could get. I am thrilled with my new car, and eternally grateful for everything these people did to help me. I strongly encourage anyone and everyone who is in the market for a new or pre-owned car to talk to Kevin Sale at Encinitas Ford before you go anywhere else.
None
I visit this restaurant when I have events to celebrate. The food is excellent and we have the leisure to linger over the meal.
Simply amazing, I've never been to a Greek food. But now I love it!!
Amazing coffee, fresh food and friendly staff. Freshly roasted on site.
Fantastic Food! Best pizza I have ever had, so many toppings! and they don't skimp either! Was staying at a hotel and the delivered it to me in like under 30 minutes! The guy on the phone whom took my order was super friendly and easy to deal with, I believe his name was "Deron" or "Dan". I wish lived in Kamloops so i could eat there on a regular basis!
Nettes Thailändisches Restaurant mit netten Service. Es gibt gutes Essen nach original thailändischer Art.
Don't miss this place when in Rhodes!
I can't explain it, because we may know, but the sunset ling cod dish is soooo exquisite!
What a blissful place.
I am always greeted with smile and a friendly hello. The staff is very knowledgeable and helpful. Chris was very helpful and I have referred many of my friends and family to him. Always a great experience!
The room was fine. Not the Ritz but I was paying for Courtyard and it was a great value. We stayed during a snow storm and I can't thank the management and staff enough for all of their help in digging out cars and keeping the facility open. I highly recommend this very convenient and well kept property.
$10 lunch menu is an awesome meal for a great price. Cashew chicken is delicious here.
Velmi příjemná obsluha, stylové prostředí,příjemné ceny... Vřele všem doporučuji.
None
Great group of fellas. A little pricey, but if I cared enough to spend less, I'd go wait in line at a different station. I'm glad they offer the connivence.
I am thrilled with the experience I have had with Marquis Plastic Surgery. Having my 3 year old son undergo emergency reconstructive surgery on his mouth after an accident was scary and gut wrenching. Dr. Desroisers was able to explain the procedure and assure me that he was in safe hands. As my son was taken into the operating room I had all these fears that his face would never look the same. Fortunatly, the surgery came out very successful! I always like to show the before and after picture so you can see what great stitching and precision Dr. Desrosiers has. He was always just a phone call away if I had any questions. He and his staff are very professional and a pleasure to work with.
None
Very addictive:) yummy flavors from strawberry cheese cake to stickers over 250 flavors!!!! Staff is amazing very very great!!!! Great place to take kids any day!!!!!
Best Pizza in Lebanon!
I got wheeled and dealed into buying more than I intended, but it was a nice experience. Great tea and atmosphere, very helpful staff.
I've been working with Imprezzio for over a year now! I love the service team and the results. I will be renewing my contract for years to come because of the results my agencies are getting from their SEO and Marketing packages.
Great loving group of people, looking to serve God! Great place to Praise & Worship God.
Loy and her staff has been great as a currier for us. Our company is in Matthews, NC and we have to pick up a list of General Contractor license applicants from Raleigh twice a month. Loy picks up the paperwork and send it to us the same day we call her. She has been a great help and is easy to work with!
Auch ich möchte, aus Sicht eines nicht Online Marketer, ein kurzes Feedback zu meiner Teilnahme am 2tägigen SEO Seminar in Hamburg geben. Vorweg muss ich sagen, dass ich von den 2 Tagen wirklich sehr positiv überrascht gewesen bin. Ich selbst komme eher aus dem Bereich Entwicklung und wollte in erster Linie wichtige Hinweise zur Onpage Optimierung mitnehmen. Was ich die 2 Tage dann aber bekam, war weitaus mehr und absolut interessant um sich sein Hintergrundwissen rund um Google etwas zu erweitern. Die Inhalte wurden wirklich überaus spannend vorgetragen, Langeweile kam die 2 Tage niemals auf. Sehr schön fande ich auch die Möglichkeit der aktiven Teilnahmen in kleinen Gruppen. Somit wurde einem ein sehr hoher Abwechslungsgrad geboten. Generell muss man sagen, dass die Teilnehmeranzahl von 12 Personen wirklich sehr gut gewählt worden ist. Die gewählten Seminarräume in dem FLANE Institut fande ich auch sehr passend. Die Mitarbeiter dort waren auch stets sehr freundlich. Ich kann ein Seminar bei Alexander auf jeden Fall sehr empfehlen. Die Qualität war aus meiner Sicht einfach überragend. Vielen Dank dafür. Liebe Grüße Kevin
Great place central to Valbonne and surrounding area whilst exploring. Very friendly staff and quiet and peaceful grounds, with a sceanic backdrop of mountains. Marks out of 10...10 highly recommend it!
I take my two Jack Russells there often to day care and sometimes for boarding. I have no bad comments about the place at all. The staff is really nice and heplful the place is super clean and pretty, I also take then to the park and they love it. Napo & Kami thank you very much for all the care and loving that you all give.
Nice guys at MG Laws, they will go out of their way to fit you in as my MOT had run out without me realising and they got me in same day.
THE SEAFOOD WAS FRESH AND AMAZING !!!!
I booked a wedding for an employee with Allure Wedding Chapel and was pleasantly surprised. Wilma and her staff went well beyond my expectations for a $300 Las Vegas wedding. Mike Bray Las Vegas, NV
I feel as if I have my own bookshop. The sales people are knowledgeable and extremely well-read without being snotty about it. They just like books and a good reading experience. The shop is well laid out and also has stationery and children's toys. What a delight!
Without exception, the service people have been polite, well-trained, and very efficient. Recently, a visit to address a potential problem was as arranged on short-notice and I received a phone call a few minutes before his arrival. Charges for services have been entirely reasonable.
None
None
ein schritt in den laden und schon hat einen die athmosphäre gefangen :) es läuft gute musik und vom ersten regal lachen bereits die indie neuerscheinungen. spitzenmässiges indie angebot sowie auch electro. aber sonst auch alles quer durch die bank zu finden (auch second hand platten). beratung ist top und überhaupt... spitzen plattenladen :)
Clean bathrooms... Until I got done with them.
None
Excellent facilities, horses receive the utmost care. Rachel is an amazing trainer, instructor and owner. She truly cares about what she is doing and making sure her lesson kids are doing their best. Whether you are looking for a lease, boarding, summer camps, or lessons Triple Edge is the place to be.
Comfy, cozy, wonderful smells and tastes! Just like being in Grandma's kitchen with fresh baked goods, yummy soups, pizzas, and fresh coffee (oh, but Grandma never had latte's), and warm wood with cozy couch sitting areas. I love my new discovery and only wish I could spend more time there with a good book! Oh, and it's a great place for having a committee meeting too!
This dude Ray is the real deal. I was confused on what to do to my Honda Accord and his knowledge and patience makes him the go to man I ended up doing all my door speakers rear speakers and a new stereo. I recommend this shop over any other shop in town. Thanks Ray!!!!!! FABIO G.
Great place to study, read a book or people watch. Water Ave Coffee is SUPER good!!
Nice toured place in Goa
None
These guys made me feel like family from the minute I walked into the place, and they seem to make everyone else feel that way too!
Always hook me up
This was by far the most pleasant car buying experience I have had. Brad made everything extremely easy for us. I would definitely recommend him to everybody I know. Top notch service and smooth from start to finish!!! Thank you Brad and Hiley VW!!
This is not your average pizza delivery. Sure, you can get a basic pizza and a side of wings, but you can also select from their wide variety of delicious and fresh topping offerings. Their crust is chewy, the sauce is flavorful, and the owner is very friendly. Why there is a fish tank, I'll never know. But it sure is fun to look at!
None
Brandon and his team provide excellent and timely service. The customer service is top-notch. They are always available to answer questions or concerns. We recently moved and the quality of service is unchanged. Lawn Solutions is a local business which provides it's customers with a fantastic value! I recommend them to my friends and to my customers.
None
Dennis is extremely professional, helpful and top notch at customer service. The storage unit we rented is clean, dry and secure. And the price we paid for our large unit is cheaper than most of the smaller units we priced at other locations. Our experience has been very positive.
None
None
Nice folks, stayed here twice now.
Excellent hotel with friendly staff and very comfortable beds. Free wifi was nice and the room was comfy. I would definitely stay again.
None
Its a lil hillbilly country, but hell of good people!
I was referred to Revolution Chiropractic by my parents. They have been going there since it has opened and they have seen huge improvements. My mother had been suffering from severe osteoporosis, and chronic back pain for years, and the adjustments allowed my mother to partake in activities such as bowling that she wasn't able to do before without throwing out her back. Her bone density is back to normal, and she hasn't thrown out her back in 2 years. I have been in Marching Band for the past 8 years, and since going to the chiropractors office I have more mobility in my lower back, and I can sleep easily without it becoming sore. I have also suffered from knee problems since middle school and was told that I would have to get surgery on my knee if they didn't see improvements. The chiropractors office indicated that my pelvis was rotated and after about a year of adjustments, the doctor told me that the cartilage around my joints looked better and I can now run without my knee brace. I also no longer suffer from multiple headaches a day. The staff at the office is wonderful! They know everyone by name and you are always welcomed with a smile. They make you feel right at home, and the best part is that the adjustments don't even take that long. You are in and out of the office in 15mins. I would highly recommend this office to anyone. Thank you for all you do Dr. Baron and Dr. Miceli (:
Great veggies, great services.
Auto accidents are always unexpected. Even if there are no injuries, they are painful in 3 ways. First, there is emotional toll at the time of the accident. “Why me?” (or “How could you!” if a family member or employee was driving). Then there is the inevitable repair cost. Finally, there is the flimflam character behind the desk at the auto body shop. For most of us, few things are worse than the saccharin concern of a grease monkey with an estimate pad and business methods that are difficult to verify. In the business of auto accidents, repairs, and dealing with insurance companies and body shops, be thankful that you live in Worcester or Middlesex County. You can’t do better than working with Steve Paglieroni or one of his mechanics at Kar Kraft in Northboro, Kar Kraft is sister company to JAMN Auto Sales. Steve has survived in a cut throat and often shady business for more than 30 years because he is transparent, sympathetic and honest. He undercuts rivals while crafting a repair that not only looks new, it is durable and safe. I know cars. I know character. My family has trusted Steve going back to when he was a kid working with his Dad. His work is unrivaled. He is dedicated to his clients. He is fair, up front and honest. Philip Raymond Vanquish Labs Marlborough MA
I've visited a few tea stores in the Denver/Boulder area, but I think the tea here has the best quality of all of them, and their prices are very reasonable. Not quite as good a selection as Ku Cha in Boulder, but better quality and *much* more affordable. They tend to have special teas that aren't on the regular menu, especially oolong, and the ones I've tried are wonderful. The proprietor really loves tea and it shows. Ps, edibles (especially sweets) are really good too!
We took our daughter there for her 6th birthday and we had a really lovely day. Would recommend this to anyone. Top day!
If Jungle Jim's doesn't have it . . . You DON'T need it! EVERYTHING is Here! A $1000.00 Bottle of wine . . . .or a WALL of Hot Sauces! WoW, WoW, and More WoW!! I'm headed there tomorrow to buy an Edward's Country Ham . . . I'd have to drive (12 hrs!) to Surry, VA . . . if it wasn't for Jungle Jim's! Jungle Jim is Aces in my Book!
After breaking my ankle and snapping my ligaments I wanted to get back on my feet asap. Rachel who I saw was absolutely brilliant. Went above and beyond to help in any way she could. Even calling me during the week to make sure I was performing my exercises. Each week I got stronger and have her to thank for it.
Das Burrard hat uns super gut gefallen. An der Rezi ist eine Tirolerin. Die Zimmer sind zwar etwas klein aber fein.Die Zimmer im Hof sind auch sehr ruhig. Das Burrad ist wirklich was besonders.
None
I enrolled at Brazillian Top Team in Signal Hill, Ca in August 2013, to basically further my strength training for surfing and increase my cardio. A friend of mine that had been training Jiu Jitsu for around ten years suggested I try it. Amazing is all I can say. Lost 16 lbs in the first three months training 2 to 3 times a week. Not that I needed to lose weight but as my core strengthened and muscles tone, everywhere, it just came off. The most supportive and health conscious group of guys I've come across. These guys have turned out to be the most inclusive and respectful group that I could of imagined. Thank you Professor Perdomo for welcoming me into your academy. ooooss!
Cheap and fast. Perfect combination for Chinese food. Just as good as the local competition and cheaper, as far as I've found.
great tentative staff. The buffet has a wide variety of food. Gym and swimming pool are always staffed and is great. Room is very nice and clean and so is the rest of the hotel
My favorite Thai place. Great lunch specials and the food is consistently amazing.
As a professional organizer, I'm not a fan of off site storage. It's difficult to transport items there, I find people forget about what's stored, and you pay for space you don't use. With CityStash Storage (which I actually use), I love the online portal, showing you what you stored, and that you pay for only the space you use! And living in a city, where having a car is a minority, the helpful crew of CityStash does all the work. They came to my home, provided storage bins, came back to pick up my stash (on time, too!) and took it to their storage location. It's there when I need it and the delivery cost is very affordable. I recommend them all the time!
I have known Dr. Sign for more than a year now and from his time in Banfield. He is one of the best vets in the region and his knowledge and his treatment methods are commendable. As an animal hospital it is clean and is pretty much a one stop shop. The nurses are very friendly and treat people and their pets with love. I would certainly recommend this place to new pet owners and old ones.
Excellent patient care
We have used Jamar Power Systems for about five years. I have found their team to be extremely responsive and capable. They have always done a wonderful job for us. They have dedicated customer service to take care of any customer issues. Phil Edwards, at Jamar is very helpful and friendly. He has a great team going there. I am very pleased with their services over the years.
The food was very good, though it was my first experience with dumplings so I do not have any frame of reference. The service was on point and the place was very clean.
Absolutely brilliant! We visited several times during our stay in Plymouth and the food was always delicious and quick. The staff was friendly and our view was lovely. We couldn't ask for a better experience and we will be sure to get our fill next time we return to the UK!
I can't comment on its authenticity (I'm not overly experienced with Indian food), but I can comment on its deliciousness! The buffet was perfect--everything was fresh and I wanted seconds of everything I tried. Even my boyfriend who is rather picky enjoyed it lots. The staff were also all very nice and helpful, and the décor was pleasant. We will definitely be returning, especially since the weekend lunch buffet is only $10!
I have been coming to this nail salon for probably 8 years or more. I have always had great pink and white nails done as well as pedicures. My pink and white nails will last me about 3-4 weeks as opposed to just 2 before having to do fills. Ask for what you want and you'll get it. As one of the nail techs told me here, you're paying for it so you should get what you want. I've never had any complaints about the service. And pricing is more than fair.
None
Fantastic dinner and really friendly staff. A word of advice; if in a reasonable group, ask for the mains as a tapas sharing meal - it's really fun and you get to taste everything on offer. Good value for money too with the prosecco no more expensive than their wines.
I love tasty food pizza :)
The staff are always nice and will remember your favorite drink.
I was very hesitant to have any kind of surgery, but Dr. Cappuccino and staff went out their way to accommodate my schedule, and fix my heavily hooded eyelids that had made me feel and look tired all the time. Dr. Cappuccino took the time to describe the entire process and answer all my questions. He was empathetic and professional, and made me feel confident in my decision. The office is very welcoming and soothing, and the staff is top-notch. Thank you for a great experience! I’m so glad I didn't wait another year to have it done!
Recently needing the front two speakers in my Honda Civic installed, I relied on University Audio. The owner, Tom Patel, was extremely patient and willing to explain everything in detail. For do-it-yourself types that just need a little extra help, University Audio is a great resource and installer.
None
None
I helped a friend find an absolutely great nanny through this company. Was so very impressed with their background work and honest efforts in matching the family with a dependable, intelligent, caring companion. Jessica was a pleasure to work with!
None
Their spa is AWESOME. Dakota, Darlene, Scott - they are all terrific people who are passionate about what they do. I am a current client and will continue going for massages with Darlene as often as I can.
I met with Luke for an initial swing consult. Luke is young, but understands the fundamentals of golf and I believe is able to articulate them to a player of any skill level. We spent a good amount of time reinforcing swing mechanics and discussing things such as grip, hands, pivoting and following through. Naturally, all of that was reinforced with the robot. After one lesson I could feel my thought changing as I was on the course, so the benefits of the lesson in my opinion were immediate. I was already putting to work tips I learned with my time with Luke. I would recommend Luke and the Tour Bound Golf Academy to anyone looking for a competitively priced lesson backed by expert analysis and modern technology. Given the weather fluctuations in Chicago, I also believe it easier to stay on track with my lesson plan given all instruction is done inside, no more 90 degree summers and 30 degree winters at Diversey Driving range.
We were quite satisfied with the Omtech Food Engineering. The Company prides it selves for manufacturing and exporting Food Conveying Belts and gears to esteemed customers.
None
None
LOVE IT !!!!!
Janet has been my mortgage broker for close to ten years now, since the purchase of my first home. She has always been dedicated to me as a client, ensuring that I understand the mortgaging process and find the very best rate available. She has always been extremely easy to get a hold of, and returns her messages very promptly. Though I now live in a different province due to a military posting, Janet still sends a calendar or gift certificate every year, along with Christmas cards and newsletters. This kind of customer service is extremely hard to find, and when our mortgage is up for renewal she will be the first person I call.
mi facultad
None
This location is the best! When you need something done right, Just express what you need and they deliver! I've been going too this location since 1994.
The thing that makes Judd Greenberg stand out is that he took time to understand my needs and he recommended policies that made sense. He can really explain insurance in a way that is simple and easy, and he makes purchasing insurance a breeze. Before talking to Mr. Greenberg, I found insurance confusing and a little intimidating. Now I "get it" and Mr. Greenberg has helped me create a long term financial plan. I can't say enough good things about his agency, you really should talk to him before buying any policy.
This restaurant has good food, hands down. Very pleasant staff, sometimes a little snooty, but when they focus they deliver quality. Again, the food is absolutely perfect. The kitchen is well run, every thing I order is spot on. Great portions too. The "lounge" which is just the expanded tables around the bar, is very nicely run. The staff is polite and treat everyone well. What I really like is they treat business people well and that matters because we are on the road so much. I highly recommend Outback in Goleta.
Love the staff here and the ambiance! Thank you for creating such a wonderful customer experience.
Replaced an '03 Cavalier exhaust system (catalytic convertor, pipe, clamps, O2 sensor, resonator, muffler, etc) the day after Thanksgiving on short notice and threw in a free tow. Less than $750 total. Nice guy, quick & quality work, nice price, good customer service, came across as genuine. Will go back.
Everett Chevrolet keeps a wide selection of vehicles on the lot to choose from. After the sale, The vehicle that I purchased was explained in great detail with the invitation to return if I had any questions. Very helpful staff both in sales and in service.
None
None
Awesome Park
Great little place that filled an absent niche in the Pass Area. Nice atmosphere and welcoming decor.
Paul Solko was great, getting us into a new car and helping secure financing!
Chris runs a one man, one stall shop. He was quick, efficient, and friendly and I was in and out in 15 min on a Saturday morning. Great spot.
None
Everyone has been extremely helpful, knowledgeable and courteous. I appreciate the amazing customer service as it is very hard these days to be able to actually talk to a human..(usually a recorded voice answers telling you to push buttons for 10 minutes or more just to get to a human being). Thank you! S.F.
I went in to get a nail removed from a tire and have it fixed before getting more damaged. Not only did they do the work for free as the previous owner of the vehicle had purchased tires from a kal tire, but they also did a free and honest inspection of the vehicle for me, checking up and topping off my fluids and letting me know where things that require regular maintenance were at. I'll definitely be returning when needed.
Just bought my H&K P30L from these guys. Anthony did a great job to make sure I was happy with my purchase. Great store... great selection... great prices... great service! Check these guys out!
quick prompt and courteous!!
The best restaurant! Love that it is food with integrity!! Always huge portions!! Makes for 2 meals!
Finally a Dr. that cares and works to fix the problem. Not a pill pusher, just an honest, forthright physician, who knows what to do.
Brilliant local store, the staff are very friendly and very honest and helpful with vasts amounts of knowledge about Bikes and accessories. I have had a few services done to my bike through themselves and bought various accessories and been very happy with the service and price. A family member also recently got a Trek 29er off them and was given advice, had the bike setup to suit her, shown how to change the tyres, recommend configurations etc. Will be going back on regular occasions for services, parts & accessories. Well worth a visit whether your looking to get into biking or to upgrade your kit.
Great service from a trustworthy locksmith.
We have known about this place for a long time ~ we used to boat on the chain of lakes and would stop in frequently! Loved the place, the people, the food! Now we live in North Florida (125 miles away) and are trying to get some friends that ride to head that way on the harleys. We have missed this place!! Looking forward to seeing it again real soon!
This place was amazing! Very good food and exceptional service! I was hesitant to go at first because of the large menu, but everything we had was awesome, homemade good cooked food. We will definitely come back next time we are in the area.
I LOVE Patton Ave Pet Store! The staff is urber friendly and very knowledgeable.
I walked into this store AFTER walking out of another store because of their poor attitudes. Truly, I was immediately relieved when I first met Rick. (owner) He was helpful, kind and caring. It didn't matter the size of the service you needed- HE WAS THERE TO HELP any way he could. He solved my immediate issues and helped me by servicing my computer to avoid additional problems that would have delayed my project. He also saved me $80 on my Mac battery. When I went back to pick up my computer I met his wife and she too was excellent and helpful in every way she could- (she might even be his "better half")- YOU CAN TRUST YOUR PERSONAL EQUIPMENT WITH IDOCTOR- and know when you return its ready to go.
Responsive, honest, knowledgeable and open -- Neil and his team are awesome. I always felt like their most important client. They helped us get a great deal and made the process very easy. This is a professional outfit with excellent knowledge of financing options and products. My wife and I have financed a number of properties in the past, and our experience with Ross Home Loans was the best by far. Thank you Eric, Neil and Susan for making our recent transaction easy. You have become our financing referral to all friends and family.
Not sure why the last two reviews were so negative... Been going to this shop for years and never once felt this way. Remember that when reading reviews that are negative and vague as well that you should take them for a grain of salt. If your willing to trash on a company you should be willing to actually explain yourself... just waisting peoples time otherwise I will be honest the old mechanic who's is not there anymore definitely had a bad attitude at times and I can understand why some people would not be happy with him. He knew his stuff and got it done buuut at times was pissy pants. Brad, the new mechanic is a great guy! He is one of the most knowledgable mechanics I have ever met and he is always out learning new things to better help peoples needs. As for the sales staff, I am not actually sure they can be rude, Kelsey the young girl who works there is always the most polite and helpful person. Either way, Hey! If your in the neighborhood stop buy and meet the staff and check out what they have to offer.
None
None
My husband and his buddies play there every week and love the course.
Nice place the wife loved it. It is hard to find good Chinese food in the South...
I'm been banking with Moody Bank for a number of years now, and they've always treated me right. I like the fact that they aren't a big national chain but a local bank. The people are always friendly and eager to help. In a pinch they will do their best to help you out as they did for me on a couple of occasions, and for that I'm a repeat customer for as long as I live in the air and they continue to exist.
When my former optometrist started becoming prohibitively expensive, I found Blackstone by Yelp reviews. I have now been going for 3 years, and my experience with them has been excellent. They conduct extremely thorough exams, they explain everything and answer questions patiently. Dr. Fukunaga is terrific. They have a good selection of eyeglass frames at various prices, there is no pressure to buy expensive ones. The office staff is polite and helpful. I highly recommend them.
Dr. Corby is wonderful and makes your feel very comfortable. She is very friendly and takes time to explain everything. The staff is very friendly as well.
Awesome awesome awesome!
Amazing people - I just got my brand new Mercedes scratched by a Valet on the left side of the Bumper. I took it there and right away 3 guys were there to help me out. Very happy I took my car there !!!
We had an absolute blast playing HMR. Definitely worth the drive if you're looking for a fun course with a great layout!
I am an Anthem resident and happy to finally have an excellent restaurant in our neighborhood. The food and drinks are outstanding! Much better than Buckman's Grille at the Revere Golf Club. The restaurant is beautiful, with modern furniture and an ambiance to match! The menu is simple, but has delicious selections. The meatloaf eggrolls are exceptional. Thank you Vic for finding Anthem. I will continue to enjoy Vic's as long as you are here.
I've been coming here for years, and even though the change in management altered some of the recipes, it is still my favorite restaurant. I make a point to go at least once every time I visit from College Station. The portion sizes are huge. The sauteed tofu is to die for. The guys that work there are always friendly and speedy. And it's CHEAP, considering how much you get for the price. I love this place.
My wife and I travel fairly often and are more than happy with the treatment both of our dogs receive at Holiday Kennels. By the time we are dropping them off the dogs are no longer paying attention to us and are excited to be somewhere they can socialize. They do an excellent job in grooming, they love animals, and the pricing is up front and fair. I have nothing but great things to say about this kennel and recommend to all of my friends when they ask for a place to board their animals.
Amazing pizza. Other food is good too. Fast delivery.
Nice place to visit for a movie, eat, or shopping. Just don't like the fact that parking is so expensive.
The food is great. Someone said on here that the breakfast is the only good thing on the menu but I disagree. I always get their tangler burger and the kickin chicken sandwich and I love them. They have main street pies that are to die for. I became a regular there and was rewarded with a vip card to receive 10% of my orders. Truly amazed by the service and food because I wasn't a fan of the Perkins in Eau Clare.
None
Probably the best chicken chow mein I have ever tried in my entire life. I would definitely recommend this restaurant - 5 stars!
I have worked with Educo on multiple occasions and they have never delivered anything less than pure excellence and exquisite work.The entire team consistently delivers high quality results and have been able to produce under tight deadlines and adverse conditions. It has been a great pleasure working with "Team Educo" during the past few years and I look forward to the continuing relationship between Searchology and their team.
None
verry good
Always Great Friendly service. Highly recommend the Chicken Dim Sims
Try their breakfast sometime! Amazing potatoes and omlettes!
My family has just adopted an moluccan cockatoo. We are very excited about our future with Magellan. We had our first visit with Meadow Book Animal Hospital, and they were very helpful. We now know that Magellan is healthy, and we know the type of food to feed him as well as a few things to look for and avoid. We were also able to get a list of prices for future care needs so we can fit them in our budget.
The best coffee place anywhere near Fairfax. They exclusively serve coffee from PT's Coffee and have high enough turnover that they order fresh beans every single week. They are masters of the pourover and their espresso-based drinks are excellent as well. On top of it all, the owner, Amir, is the kind of person you want to give business to, no matter what the product. Passionate, knowledgable and friendly. But even if he was unpleasant I would be coming back again and again for the coffee. I don't judge coffee shops on pastries (which are incredible here!), open mic nights, ambiance, wifi (which is also great), or anything else. I only judge it by its coffee and this place is top notch.
UVCE Is my Home <3 The Most awesome college there can be..
When my husband and I first looked around for a photographer, we knew that we couldn't just settle for any photographer because we wanted to have amazing, detailed, gorgeous, and classic photographs to show our friends, family, and - some day - our kids. We wanted to be proud of the images captured, but most importantly, we wanted to know that - in the future - when we look back at our images, we would be reminded of our best day ever and also be happy we went with the photographer we chose. Carretto Studio exceeded all of our expectations the very first day we met with them, and I knew for a fact that I did not want to work with any other photographer. Andy and Elizabeth are friendly, personable, professional, and so much fun to work with that, at times, you forget that they're there to capture your wedding day. They make everyone - from the family to the wedding party - feel comfortable and at ease. If you're still looking for a photographer(s) who will - no doubt - give you some of the most beautiful and creative work of art, then I highly recommend choosing Andy and Elizabeth. You'll definitely be working with two of the best photographers in St. Louis!
Beautiful drive from the Twin Cites and surprisingly beautiful setting amidst a rural setting. Gracious hosts!
Best kept secret in Atlanta! Beautiful park in the S.W.A.T.S . If you like Piedmont Park you and your friends will really enjoy this park. :-)
David was incredibly helpful and knew what he was talking about. They are very kid friendly as well. My oldest boy said "Dad I thought that was going to be boring but I had fun!" The price we were given was by far the best I was able to find. A+ retailer A+++ Customer service!
My previous driving instructor decided to abandon me a week before my test where the standard of my driving (according to Neil) just wasn't up to scratch. I started calling around and Neil understood my situation, put some time aside and committed to helping me rectify as much of my weaknesses as possible in ~4 hours. He was fantastic, really hands on and not afraid to really push you into shape. You can immediately tells that he cares about your performance. An honest, realistic and highly experienced instructor. In the end, I passed first time with one fault; it definitely pays to keep calm.
Great service and a good prices. The guy can fix anything. Give them a shot!
This place changed my life! I still remember January 3rd, 2009. That was the first time I walked through the door at Next Gen as an out-of-shape and seriously overweight person. Fast forward 4 years and I'm in significantly better shape and health, and cannot imagine my life without the wonderful people at Next Gen. I've lost fat, built muscle, and found a competitive fire that I hadn't felt since high school sports. This is all the result of hard training under the expert coaching of Eric Barber coupled with a quality diet program that I learned about from Eric & his wife Luila. Whether you're a serious athlete looking for a competitive edge, or an overweight slob like I was looking for a way back to health, this is the place for you.
None
Great service and equipment, I rented a lawn mowing tractor for a large project, they dropped off and picket up and gave me a quick refresher course on operations. This project would have taken me days with a normal lawn mower. All Seasons Rental saved the day. Staff is friendly and helpful.
“I was looking for new tires for my bike and was unaware of which best met my needs, the person that helped me was very helpful and by asking a few questions knew exactly what to recommend and the tires he recommended have been the tires that I have got the most out of and have lasted the longest in between purchases”
excellent college.
Amazing & beautiful place recommended
friendly and inviting atmosphere with authentic food that was delicious!
I found this place walking by and decided to give it a try. I needed a part replaced which had to be picked up from a dealership, brakes changed, inspection, oil change, and my front plate mounted. Not only did Chris tell me how much everything cost before he did anything and how much labor it would take, but he kept to those numbers which were quite reasonable. I thought my car would be in for a week, but he had it ready for me the very next day. Outstanding.
We made a call around 1 p.m. to have 1-800-GOT-JUNK come out and de-junk our garage. They were there within two hours. They did a fantastic and efficient job of getting everything out. Our garage probably hasn't been that clean since we moved in! I would use this service again and again.
None
Have been twice with different people and tour groups and had a ball both times. Ha Long Bay is a quiet reprieve from the rest of bustling Viet Nam. I was so rested after 2 days that they had to drag me from the boat, much like the Looney Tunes cartoons where Sylvester is dragged off the roof and his claws leave scratch marks
Extraordinary to Perfection
None
There is a Wells Fargo, it's located inside the Pavilions grocery store. Go in the front entrance to the left past the Starbucks. Friendly staff.
Its a place for learning
Nice atmosphere and overall experience. The showroom to the shop where clean and all the employees were friendly, courteous, and engaging. The sales executive (Tony Fulco) went above and beyond in his efforts to make the trade-in, acquisition, and delivery process seamless and enjoyable If you go to this dealership, do yourself a favor and ask for Tony.
Couturière très sérieuse, rien à dire. Une adresse à conseiller
We had a great experience with Sigma! We needed a banner and a couple of signs very quickly and they helped us get it done. They even installed one of the signs for us. They are a very professional company, very friendly and easy to work with. We will definitely be using them again and again in the future! Jennifer Sanders D&L Farm and Home - Denton
I love the Chesapeake Framing Company. Their staff is fantastic (and patient) and they always help me figure just the right frame for my artwork. Couldn't be happier!
DataRetrieval offers the most amazing service. I thought that I was never going to be able to afford to recover my devastated documents. I am a teacher and had all of my documents on my external hard drive. I found DataRetrieval and was amazed by the price they quoted me. These guys recovered all of my data and at an incredibly reasonable price. They are honest, hard-working people and deserve every bit of what I paid them!
Gorgeous renovations. Spending weekends here with family is awesome. Thumbs up.
Bất động sản Đà Nẵng đang chết, có trông chờ chi được không đây, khi nào bất động sản mới trở lại?
None
This place is not to be missed if you're in Kanazawa. Beautiful historic gardens, great for any season.
I live in New Jersey, so why am I reviewing a bicycle shop in Staten Island? Because it was one of the most pleasant shopping experiences of my life. I was told about Bay Street Bicycles by my brother in law. While there are some bike shops in New Jersey as well as the big box stores, I was told that this would be worth my trip. John the owner greeted me with a warm handshake, and that was before he knew I was sent there as a referral. He volunteered his assistance with selecting the proper bike for my wife, while allowing her to take a test drive, as well as ask him a dozen questions. He was helpful throughout, and allowed me to make my decision based not only on price (which was fantastic, no sticker shock) but also after learning about the options available as well as being treated the way a customer should be. I can't say enough about this place, and I'll be back when my kids are ready to upgrade their bikes.
A truly remarkable hotel. I'm a huge fan of the Wentworth Mansion. My wife and I had an extraordinary stay here and love how welcome the staff makes us feel every time we're in town. We also love Circa 1886, the restaurant on the same premises. A wonderful place with outstanding cuisine. My favorite hotel in town.
Love this place. No one can beat the quality at Lumber Baron. Redwood is supposed to be Red, not yellow. The owner, Max, had some beautiful reclaimed redwood I used for stain grade casement windows. The grain was straight and tight. My favorite aspect of the Lumber Baron, no cumbersome orange carts. You can park your truck right at the wood you need and load-up! No barcode hunting games or clowns on forklifts parading around. Im in and out in 10 mins every time.
None
Die Qualität - The Quality - Kalite
None
My kids can't wait for summer to attend Banner every year!
It’s said that the best leadership is done by example; For Dr. Bhakta to have such a wonderful, friendly staff, they could have only inherited those traits by her professionalism, knowledge, care and affability. I have been bouncing around eye care professionals since I started wearing glasses in the third grade and Dr. Bhakta’s office, by far, is the best I have been to. The attentiveness achieved in her office is unsurpassed. I would recommend her services to anyone, with confidence they will not leave unsatisfied.
One of the best hotel in Africa. Best in Nigeria
Tonight we got the same excellent service as always but also had a chance to experience the amazing(!!) gyros and homemade hummus from the newly opened food cart here. It's just the right amount of food before smoking. I would give the chicken gyro 5 out of 6 noms. The hummus gets 5.5 out of 6 noms.
Ben Hur did a great job on our move. They came on time, were professional throughout the entire experience- both in terms of efficiency and care over each item being moved, and in terms of their demeanor and honesty about any small issue that may have come up. They made moving a stress-free experience- and their pricing was fair.
I have been going to Gentle Dental in Braintree for the last 7-8 years. I recently broke a tooth and called the next morning as soon as they opened. I got an appointment first thing that morning and had work underway to fix the problem that afternoon. Dr Shapiro was great going over my options and got everything in place to take on some challenging work.
None
I love Pollo!!! Fell in love when I went to Miami and had it for the first time. Best kept fast food secret!
Friendly, excellent customer service. HIGHLY RECOMMEND!
Friendly atmosphere, clean, customer focused staff, and many activities to choose from. Great value for the price!
To the review below: Have you never purchased a car before? They are trying to get the best deal from you just as much as you are from them. It's a big game, no matter where you go. I've used Ferman Chevy for their car services as well as bought a car here and been nothing but absolutely satisfied. When I was buying my car, we were trading in another car, we haggled back and forth, which, like I said is par for the course, and got the price we wanted for our trade. We also got them to come down on the new car. You just have to be persistent; welcome to the world of car buying! The salesman are all professional, and typically very upfront about what reality is, not to mention knowledgeable and good looking! I've never had a bad experience here, nor do I see that changing. As soon as you pull in the parking lot someone is eager to help you, not to haggle you, but to do their job and help you find what you're looking for! If you live in Brandon or Tampa, or any of the surrounding areas for that matter, this is your place!
None
Brought in my Oldsmobile for an oil change. Gabbrielle and the techs did a very good and proficient job. Thank You!
Dr. Press and his staff are phenomenal at patient care and service. Dr. Press is the definition of a medical professional and I highly recommend his services. He has passion about his field and shows extraordinary care for the patient. He is attentive to detail and has been instrumental in the chiropractic needs of my family.
CBMK is a great place to skate, no matter what your skill level is. Everything is great about this park. The vibe, the people, the park, and how all the people there are there to have fun. I highly recommend that you go to the best skatepark in the GTA!
Dr. Way and his staff did a wonderful job with adult braces. It took two years to get my teeth pushed and pulled into the right places. As an adult I coped with the annoyances, especially having problems cleaning my teeth with braces and the tension on the them. But the personal and professional concern and help along the way, made a big difference for me. I'm still going back for check-ins too.
Our experience at Kay Dental Care has been excellent. Dr. Kaler gives you the time that is required to understand and digest information related to your exam. I took my mother in law for her evaluation and not only did he do his due diligence, he actually took the time to explain things thoroughly. Also, gave his expert opinion and gave us time to think on next steps. I am very satisfied with the service and overall experience has been great. I highly recommend Kay Dental Care.
FILE INCOME TAX RETURN WITH TRP
Being new to Texas I was fearful that we'd never find a school we loved as much as ours back home in Florida. I was so very wrong. I love The Children's Courtyard! They are very kind and patient and the teachers really seem to care about what they do - it's not "just a job" to them. My boys are learning so very much and I'm thankful every day that I decided to stop in to have a look when we moved here.
None
This school is great because it's a non competitive school and the tuition is not too expensive. My daughter is in 2 separate classes; ballet and jazz. She is 6 and this is her first time to dance. She loves it! Ashley has been a great instructor. :)
None
I love this sandwich shop! Best sandwiches around. Got to try the meat ball and the chicken bacon ranch, both are my favorites. Fast services so this is a great place to grab a sandwich if you are on the run. I usually get mine to-go.
I recently bought a car from Laurel BMW of Westmont. This was my second BMW so I wasn't a stranger to the type of service provided by the brand. That being said, the team did a fantastic job. The service was excellent and the entire staff was courteous, attentive and knowledgeable. Highly recommended.
Like any depot they have their quirks. I brought in a large amount that they totalled to near 60 dollars. And it was sorted as fast as I could empty it out.
Been here for breakfast and lunch before. Every time the food is amazing highly recommend trying this place out.
Amazing and addictive. Excellent service and food.
Wonderfull people, These guys really know their stuff. I have had nothing but great dealings with Paasche and its Staff. Great American made equipment with a staff that stand behind their product. Well made, Cost effective, fast transactions, and reliable service.Thank you for a great American made product.
My Lease was about to expire in 2 months I leased a Ford Edge 2010 before. I went back to Ford dealer to shop around for a new car, spent 4 hours there order the car then the following week I was told that my car was sold to someone else, it was very upsetting. Then I went to Mercedes dealer and talk to Lauren Singer she explained in details all different models to me; I told her I was going to think about it and come back another day. Then I had a death in the family and I did go to many dealers to check for cars. I was going to buy my Edge and due to high monthly payments for an old car; I decided to buy a new car. I did go back to Mercedes dealer and talked to Ms. Singer again and I did go to a test drive GLK and another sedan. I really liked the GLK, the dashboard and the full power AC (aviator style), quiet, smooth to turn around, etc. It was a difficult decision between the 2 models but I am glad I did get the GLK a family car. My kids loved it! My son and his friend like the dealer so much and Ms. Singer he told me when he grows up he wants to work there lol. Ms. Singer explained in details the difference between the models and I bought the car. If you are a women trying to decide on a new car go talk to her; she is great!
None
None
Dr. Meng and her staff do a great job. Dr. Meng is very lively and enjoys what she does. She and her staff do a great job explaining all the dental work they will be doing or would like to do while you are in the office. I highly recommend making Dr. Meng your family dentist.
None
I have been to many hairdressers over the last few years and I can honestly say The Chapel delivered in every way. Right through from reception to my finished colour and cut. Thank you Mark and Billie for making my time at The Chapel one of the best experience's I've ever had. I walked out feeling a million dollars and happy knowing at long last I'd found the one ! I'm definitely going back to church !! X
Wanted to treat my family to a whole freshly fried fish, but not sure if they do that. No-one to ask, in English that is. They had a lot of different kinds of miso paste, yum!
Had a great experience with Amy Gers at Sellers Buick GMC buying a 2012 Buick Enclave. Love the internet sales team, as I knew what I wanted and Amy was very responsive to my questions, making the entire negotiation and delivery process a breeze! thanks Amy, nice job!
None
Excellent payroll services at a reasonable price. Very friendly and helpful. I highly recommend using them for any payroll services
None
Seo Web Mount is a good SEO Leading Company In India.its provide good Services very cheap and best price.
Best pizza joint
None
Easy helpful staff, would definitely recommend them to family and friends. The guys are great with the stuff and gentle, storage items are well packed and protected in the module. I would use them again.
I love going to the Silver Star They have great rooms,Fantastic food,and all of the staff is really nice. I hope I get to go back next month.
None
I have been to Sassy Nails So many times over the past few years. My husband, various family members and coworkers also enjoy their services. The owners are Peter and Tina -- both of whom are excellent at what they do. I am also very happy with the services there of Van, Linda and James. We are regulars there and are never disappointed. Thank you all for taking such good care of us!
None
Wasn't a huge fan of Steam Whistle prior to taking the tour. I certainly appreciate the beer a lot more now. It was incredible, all the things I never knew about Steam Whistle and beer making! I love the atmosphere and the friendliness of everyone who works there! The tour packages are GREAT deals, and I love their free art shows every month.
I have been with Public Storage for a few years now and I am extremely happy with the service I receive from Blanche, when I go to my storage unit. She is always kind and willing to help. When possible she stops by to say hi and ask if all is okay. I wish she could adjust the prices from going up but that is out of her hands. I thank you for employing people like Blanche who know how to care for customers. Martin Arnaud
None
Justin Pals never seizes to amaze me. I bought a car from him about 3 weeks ago. I was at the dealership alone. A woman, alone. He treated me with the up most respect and answered every question with a smile! I have continued to call, email or see him in person and I usually have a question for him. I am truly amazed he always has an answer. I wholeheartedly expected him to say a few times, I am not sure, let me check, but there is nothing he doesn't have stored in that head of his! Thank you so so much Justin! I love my car! Especially this time of year I am loving the remote start and the heated seats! I will refer everyone to you, Justin! (Love the car washes, XM radio & ON Star too!)
I was greeted promptly, was finished when promised, and all of my questions were answered in a very professional manner. I have a 2012 Boss 302 and I'm VERY picky about how the car is treated. The only thing missing was a wash and wax job!
Great place to buy a Honda! My family and I drove a couple hours to get to Springs and we were glad we made the trip. Salesman Joel Mosier made buying our Odyssey a breeze, all the way from the test drive to the final purchase. I highly recommend setting up a test drive with Joel if you are in the market. I was also very impressed with the entire sales staff and the service center operations. Worth your time!
I stayed a weekend at the Quality Inn in Franklin PA and was very satisfied with the service, the restaurant, the staff and the room. Well worth the rate.
Located in the center of the Historic District this property has everything you need for your stay in Savannah. In addition to the location, the staff of the hotel goes out of their way to provide you the kind of positive experience you'll talk about everytime you mention Savannah. In short - they are the best!
I have used the services of Covina Animal Hospital for 30 plus years and our cherished pets (over the years, a couple of cats and several dogs) have received the best of medical and kennel care. The veterinary doctors fully explain any treatment our pets may need, or have received, leaving little necessity for follow-up questions. Additionally, the staff is equally professional and courteous, leaving us confident that our pets get the best of care. I highly recommend the animal hospital to pet owners who are seeking expert and caring medical attention for their pets.
Great steak, burger and fish and chips in town!!! Very affordable too.
My family and I went to Ed Voyles Honda to see what was available in the 2013 Fit. Greg greeted us out side and took us right over to the Fits and explained some of the features. He asked me about any specifics I was looking for and I told him I was looking for a particular color, the Blue Raspberry. There weren't any on the lot so Greg went to check the inventory and found that they were expecting the exact car I wanted on their next truck. So we test drove one that was on the lot and Greg got me set up with the paper work for the car that was on its way. It was expected to arrive in a few days. The buying experience was easy and pleasent. No hoops to jump through. I would definitely recommend this dealership to my friends.
I've been fortunate to work closely with Findlay auto group on several community events and am very impressed by their commitment. They sponsor several key community events which are a huge part of makes flagstaff flagstaff. They are not just here to sell cars but also to ensure that Flagstaff continues to thrive. Their sales and service staff are also some of the most professional and best people to work with in the industry.
Excellent experience. We arrived expecting the average family restaurant atmosphere and service, but it was much better. The place was clean, the floors were spotless, during a fairly busy day. The tables had room between them rather than being pressed together to maximize occupancy. Our server was attentive and pleasant. The appetizer was brought out by a different employee, who was equally attentive and friendly, rather than dropping the food off and scampering off. The drink was brought out by a third employee, who also was attentive, ensuring we had everything we needed. It gave me the sense that everyone was working together like a well-oiled machine. The food was correctly cooked to order and flavorful. This is the only place I feel like I can actually get a medium rare steak and have it not overcooked. The margarita was the best I'd had in a long time. Overall it was a perfect experience. Maybe I got lucky, but I will definitely be going back.
I have been going to AIM Tax & Financial for years now, and absolutely love how quickly they handle my taxes. Not only that, I have become educated on ways we can save money on our taxes each year! Anna is always keeping up with the latest tax information and I HIGHLY recommend AIM Tax and Financial for any accounting needs. They're the best!
You can see many animals there. If you have free time, spend it in the Zoo, not in front of the TV. Don't be a couch potato, explore the world around you. This Zoo is so big, that you'll need hours to pay attention to every single animal. In my opinion, you can make a list of the animals that you're interested in. It is a good opportunity to hear the stories of the keepers, too. Go to the Zoo and have fun!
We read reviews and they were right. Everything was excellent. We are in town for six flags and headed home tomorrow for Washington. We would definitely be regulars if it was where we live.
Great food, don't miss Sunday breakfast
Angie did a fantastic job with listening to what I wanted and then delivering. I had red steaks put into my long black hair and it looks incredible. Very happy. Will definitely return.
RICHARD WEBB HAS BEEN MY SERVICE ADVISER FOR THE PAST 13 YEARS AND THRU 4 MERCEDES THAT I HAVE PURCHASED THRU CROWN EUROCARS. His professionalism and customer relationships has made Crown Euro-cars Service COMMENDABLE. I have even already referred friends to Richard as a Service Adviser and they too are extremely happy with the Service that Richard provides.
Went here with a few friends and had a great time. We tried a few pizzas ("Smoker" and "Farmer") and they were delicious. We were presented a Flight of their beer and were able to sample them all. "Big Spring Stout" was a personal favorite. Wait staff was very friendly and did their job well. Will visit here again!
Great visit. You'll get an introduction into the unique beer culture of the region, which has over 1000 years of brewing history. And you can taste and buy some of the Gueuze and Lambic beers in all their variety.
Enough parking for rigs
All Star recently did some work to repair an emergency plumbing leak for me in the crawl space. They understood my urgent need, quickly had a guy out who took care of it quick in a professional manner. Since I had used them last year with a similar quick response and fair price for quality work, I figured they would take care of this problem quick for me in the same manner and they did a great job. I really appreciated the follow-up flexibility to make sure the repairs were working as planned.
A very good hotel, great service, great location, great staff, will definitely stay here again. Highly recommended !
The people at Professional Insurance have been nothing but helpful. They take care of my home, auto, and business. Very knowledgeable and helpful agents
If you know me, then you know that I'm pretty well obsessed with this place. I love Foodly! If you're looking for friendly service and great breakfast, look no further than Country Foodly. Whenever I have guests from out of town, I take them here for breakfast and they've all raved about the food. Their omelettes are terrific and hash browns put Waffle House to shame. Also, ask them about their intricate system for cooking bacon. The bacon slices always come out crisp w/o a lot of grease. See you there!
The Bison Burger is the best burger I have ever had...and I've had many burgers in the last 31 years!
It is a exellent technology (MNP) company.
None
None
None
nagyon kedves a fogadtatás az árak kicsit borsosak de még meg fizethető akiszolgálásjó
I may buy another house just to have them manage it! They have been a pleasure to work with. I can trust in their competence.
Some of the best coffee you'll have in Dallas-Fort Worth.
None
Pete has provided me with substantial advice, support, insight, guidance and knowledge both professionally in the area of real estate and investing and personally in the many years I have known him. I trust his judgment extensively.
None
This was our first time trying the pizza from here and I have to say, by far the best pizza I've had in a long, long time. Great food, friendly staff at Take out. We will most definitely be back!!
My experience at Leith Honda in Raleigh was wonderful! I was able to peruse the vehicles and communicate with a sales associate when I was ready. Waleed Abdelsattar assisted me with my purchase. He was attentive and made the extra effort to ask me not only what type of car I wanted but what kind of purchasing experience I would like. For instance, he wanted to know how much information and communication I wanted/needed from him. He listened when I explained why I was looking for the type of vehicle I had my heart set and helped me make my own decision. Additionally, I was impressed that Waleed did not pressure me to hurry and make a purchase so he could make a sale. In past car purchasing experiences, I felt the need to have my father or brothers accompany me so I would not be hassled or misled as many car dealerships tend to mislead women. Waleed provided me with excellent information and even encouraged me to compare his information elsewhere. As a result, I was neither hassled or misled and feel great about my decision and purchase. I greatly appreciate Waleed's attention and customer care.
I came across this store by accident...one of the best accidents I have made. I love how fast and quick you receive your orders. They even have an AMAZING selection of kinds of brands. If you don't find it here I would say they would be able to get it. I love the rewards program they have. If I purchase online I look to Paradise Fibers FIRST!!!
Pratiquement toujours au meilleurs tarifs de la ville, toujours une pompe disponible, service rapide et impeccable, bien situé pour préparer de long trajet par direction Nantes ou Le Mans.
It is great to take your dog for health care to a place where the people love him as much as you do. I've never experienced a more caring veterinary environment than the one at Wakarusa Veterinary Hospital. WAH is Boomer tested, Dad approved!
Lional WAS AMAZING. We went in on a Internet Ad, which I might state was below the sticker price as it was. Now this was our 3 stop so we knew what we were looking for. This car fit the bill. We went in and with in an hour and a half, the deal was done, signed loan and all. I could not have asked for a better experiance, and our sales man was amazing. He handeled us quickly and with no BS. Also had a great sense of Humor. The Dealership was amazing clean and over all freindly. Other Salesmen also helped us take pictures. This has Started a long time of Business with us and Bill Luke. Thank you.
I've lived in Texas for 22 years and here for 3 and this is by far the best Mexican food restaurant I've found. I got the austinite. The meat was fresh and so were the ingredients. It was prepared well. I got a burrito and thought it was okay, but burritos aren't really my thing. Next time, I'm sticking to the tacos. This place would be perfect if they had homemade flour tortillas instead of those thin flat store bought ones. Also the place is a little small and dirty. Definitely a to-go order type of place.
Тhis is the best place in city for a pleasant and tasty pastime
Incredibly good pizzas with perfect dough and crust. Great wines at reasonable prices to go with it. The antipasti and salad were both exceptional too. Enjoy!
Our experience with Universal Builders was great from beginning to end. Their team is extremely professional and made the entire process very easy to navigate. The finished project turned out better than we could have imagined and I have recommended them to several of my friends and colleagues already. I will definitely consider them for future big projects on our house.
None
I completed my homework in the hopes I could cut my overly high monthly car payments. I did my research online and checked many dealerships. I noted a vehicle which matched my needs and desire. That vehicle, a 2013 Rock Lobster red Jeep Wrangler was also being sold at an internet price over $2200.00 less that the regular sale price. I brought in my vehicle for trade in and was quite surprised with the price I was offered. The whole process was started and completed in about two hours and I made signifigant savings on my monthly payments. I have desired a Jeep for some time adn am extremely pleased with the one I purchased and with the service and how I was handled.
Always have a good time. The people are great that work there. It's clean everytime I go in. I have only great things to say about this gym
Good times!
None
I have many massages and been to many aromatherapists. I was a guilty groupon first time user with Metropolitan Relaxation Studio. I was so impressed with the quality and detail of the treatment that I purchased 8 more. I am a very happy client and I recommend their services to everyone! Thanks Shar.
I have used The Gold Leaf Insurance Agency for several years now insuring my home and rental properties. The staff is very responsive to questions and have provided me with great rates and service.
None
Had the duck duck meatloaf. Both were excellent!
None
None
The shop is owned and operated by Ji Song. Sing made my wife's engagement ring, and both of our wedding bands.He is a friendly and talented , as are the staff that work there. They are very professional,Friendly attitude , cost is not so much...Totally Excellent service. Thanks guys . Specially Song.
The staff was awesome, and Noah (piercer) was fantastic. I received excellent service, and was made to feel as comfortable as possible while at Evolution. I would recommend Evolution Piercing to anyone.
Great Job!
A friend actually recommended that I visit this clinic because they were very kind and friendly and offered very affordable rates. So, I took my Pomeranian here for her annual check-up. I am so glad I decided to give them a try! Not only did I get her shots for a very affordable price but they also found out she had a worm problem...gross. Never in a million years would I have thought my little sunshine would get worms. The whole process was pretty quick and the wait time was minimal. Thanks!
We just picked our dog up yesterday and everything went perfect! Great place for dogs and amazing customer service. Thank you
Excellent driveway service and has no problem passing on promotion gifts. Especially at Xmas. Friendly business and nice people.
My daughter and I just got back home from this place of anything you ever dreamed of being on ice cream but its Yogurt.. Fantastic and Fun experience, took pictures of our creations and then ordered moms for the way home, and I think she agrees just as much as we did that this place just ROCKS. Thx for the coupon, my daughter got $5 off from a friend and figured ok, let's go play and get a sugar high from all the toppings.
good bargains.
You truly never know what you will find at the Habitat Wake ReStore. It's a great place to shop as a DIY Home Updater for furniture, appliances, building materials, and more. Plus all the proceeds come to Habitat for Humanity of Wake county to support our mission of building homes, communities, and hope. Also, shopping and donating to the ReStore diverts of 3,000 tons of materials from the landfill every year. A great store with a great mission and a great impact on our community. What better way to shop local?!
Great service and food. Lunch buffet was yummy and free for kids 3 & younger! Casual hippie atmosphere.
My work started with Jesse James when a chiropractor said there wasn't much more he could do for me after seeing me for over a year. I had been through 2 chiropractors before that, and a variety of other specialists, none of whom could put a dent in my chronic back problems. Within 5 sessions, Jesse James had taught me how to heal myself. He taught me the principles and techniques for getting my muscles to finally release after years of dysfunction. Not only am I eternally grateful for what he taught me, I just so appreciate Jesse's level of integrity, ethics, and personal care. He is an excellent communicator, a consummate professional committed to continual learning, and a knowledgeable and insightful practitioner. I cannot recommend his practice more highly, and have referred many friends to him already!
None
Very convenient, reasonably good prices. No complaints.
Jamie & the owners are just great. Always friendly and super helpful - this shop serves to me as a benchmark for all other businesses and my own. You don't get service like this everywhere, if we did, shopping would be a whole new experience! nice work guys! Anthony.
Best dining experience in the Watkins Glen area. Both the food and atmosphere were incredible. I ordered the stuffed pork chop and my friend had a fish dish and both were delicious. A bit pricey but it is worth it. I will go back again on my next trip to WG.
Excellent coffee, excellent service, very friendly not bitter baristas. Great food and wine, they have two taps for seasonal brews and such. Atmosphere is great, cozy but open in the summer time.
We first came to Mergen Orthodontics when Maria was in third grade. She had one tooth that was out of line, requiring brackets on six teeth. It straightened quickly. She then sported a retainer, made in a bright color, in case she threw it away at school. Everything went well with that tooth. Our experiences with the staff at Mergen were exceptional. Maria got full braces in August 2012 at age 12. Again, staff members were very efficient. After one appointment, Maria said something different had been done. After eating lunch in town, I called the office. Maria kept commenting about a wire feeling different. We were able to get back in for a quick check, which proved the wire needed to be adjusted. I was thankful for their flexibility to get Maria in, saving us the hour drive to come at a different time. I appreciated how they worked with me and our insurance the first time and helped me do a cost comparison for the full set of braces. Having payments taken out of my checking account also made the experience hassle-free for me. I would recommend Mergen Orthodontics because staff members are friendly, caring, efficient, and knowledgeable.
I've been with light ship for probably almost a decade now, and I couldn't be more pleased with the services I have received! The entire staff is willing to help and understanding of your needs. Great prompt service and they make my life a little less hectic. My mom has used them for years and years and told me she has never considered switching. Thank you for all your help, Lightship!
None
This is the first time I've ever posted a comment. I've always had great service at this Verizon store. I'm prone to losing my phone often (I'm on phone 5 in two years) and they've always been great at switching my services to my "backup" phone and then to my next phone. I have nothing bad to say about the staff. They were even the one that recommended an inexpensive smart phone for the transition period. Even recommended the place where I purchased it (CPR Cell New Tampa). Two doors down I purchased a Droid X with charger for $50. I work from home which gives me the luxury to visit the store during business hours so there isn't a lot of customers and I get right in and out. I came in late one evening and the place was swamped. It took longer than expected but they were still giving everyone efficient service. Selfishly, I would have preferred they move everyone through like cattle through a chute and then take their time with me but that's not the staff's fault. Management might want to staff up a little heavier in the evenings.
I've been the proud owner of a 2012 Kia Optima hybrid for 2 weeks and couldn't be happier! The car is *fiiiiiiine*, I get an average of 35 mpg, and I have been so pleased with the follow-up provided by Paige Northern and Thomas Moore at the dealership!
Innmari god mat, og en herlig atmosfære! Klarte kun å spise meg halvveis gjennom middagen før magen sa stopp. Servitøren var meget hyggelig, og perfekt plassering i henhold til den ligger godt tilrette ved hovedveien.
Dr Walsh and Dr Maxwell have saved our dog not once but twice!! This is an amazing group of specialized veterinarians and nurses. So grateful to have a specialist and er clinic in one building. For those who have complained about money and expense, you get what you pay for and thats quality care. Also,they are excellent for giving estimates and staying within the estimate range, giving updates daily. Thank you PetMed and MVS for the love, care, and compassion you have given our four legged children. We thank you for all you care and support
Прекрасная парикмахерская с весьма демократичными ценами, мужская стрижка в районе 350 рублей.
I took my car in for a routine service and MOT, the staff were very friendly and knowledgeable, and the cost was very reasonable. I would recommend this garage and will definitely be returning.
Lemmongrass is one of our favourites restaurants to dine at. The food is always wonderful and the atmosphere always welcoming. We especially enjoy the wine selection and also the live piano music.
I love this place! They've got interesting and fun things going on there all the time. The service is great, and the vibe is too. Way more cozy than a chain coffee place. A lot of local foods, drinks, art, jewelry...
Loved the food. Will be back.
None
Die Zusammenarbeit mit Patrick Pachner war und ist sehr sehr unkompliziert, schnell & professionell! Wir haben mit der Erstellung unserer neuen Website begonnen, die bald fertig ist. Und jetzt sehr schöne neue Vorlagen für unser neues Corporate Design bekommen. Großes Kompliment! Und wir freuen uns auf eine weitere kreative und unkomplizierte Zusammenarbeit!
I feel like there's a stronger orientation (and success rate) at Sports Reaction Center to getting an athlete back in the game than at other physical therapists. For example, I called one afternoon after having seen two doctors earlier in the week for a burning pain above my ankle that was getting worse every time I ran. I had my first triathlon of the season coming up in 4 weeks and it looked like best case I'd have to shuffle through the run, and more likely, wouldn't be able to compete at all. The SRC team found a time for me the next day, and within four weeks of working with Dr Laura Mickelson the pain was gone -- and I ran a faster run split than the year before on the same course! I've continued to work with SRC, they've continued to keep me racing. I highly recommend Sports Reaction Center.
We've been very happy with 24 Hour Recreational Storage. For anyone wondering, they have normal business hours and request a day's notice to pull your RV/boat/car out of the warehouse and leave it in the gated outdoor storage area. You then have 24-hour access to the gated area for picking up and dropping off vehicles. Once dropped off, they put it back in storage, or you can have it left outside if you aren't ready for it to be put away yet. They've graciously accommodated our last-minute requests and follow up with a phone call if there are questions. I just wish they had a mobile app I could use to request my vehicle be taken out of storage, instead of calling on the phone.
One of our favorite restaurants in the city for the last 10 years. The food is and has always been outstanding. Best place to view the bay on a full moon. We send scores of clients there all the time.
I have been working out at Shape Up for going on a little over 2 months. My biggest takeaway is the staff itself - always encouraging, always pushing you to do a bit more than you thought you were able to do. In the 6 weeks I've been training there, I have lost a total of 28 lbs. and feel better than I have in many years. And it's not like I'm working out 7 days a week, for 2hrs at a time; I go roughly 3x a week, for an hour at a time. The results are incredible, but the workouts are fun and engaging. The environment is fantastic; it's not a "musclehead" facility - rather, it's a light atmosphere with lots of joking and even more encouragement. The training staff is knowledgeable & friendly. The workouts are challenging yet a lot of fun. I leave every day exhausted, soaked in sweat, but feeling better than I did when I walked through the door. Working with Shape Up is a great experience and one I recommend highly!
Mark & Jon helped us buy our Spokane Valley home several years ago, and I couldn't give them a higher recommendation. You can't go wrong with them as your agent, they are awesome negotiators and problem solvers, and will help you get your deal closed!
We moved from our old insurance to Neckerman to keep it local in Madison. Our rep, Ryan Waite, worked with us to find the best possible solution for our family, weighing not only cost but the best coverage for our needs. We love Neckerman Insurance!
This place is the top. If you are looking for lots of flavor you found it. They are more of a take out restaurant than a sit down. But they do have some tables if you are not going home. People are friendly.
Henry's is an outstanding restaurant. Wholesome, healthy and gourmet. Prepared to your directions the menu is varied and terrific. Enjoy your time there.
Best red velvet cupcakes I have ever had!
Bought my springfield xd9 from them, first time owner they helped with everything I needed and took care of my registering through metro they are awesome
None
None
The best service company we've ever had at our home. Of the three local (Denton) sprinkler repair companies we called with our emergency, they were the quickest to respond, even calling us back on a Sunday to schedule for the next day. The owner came out to our house, repaired the obvious problem, found two more problems and didn't leave until they were all fixed. Clearly explained how to use the new system, and the charge was more than reasonable. So happy with American Sprinkler Repair!!!
Excellent staff. We are always greeted as soon as we arrive and never wait for more than a few minutes. Dr. Kifer is always able to see us on short notice and really understands our needs. We are very pleased with the services we have received and would recommend his office to anyone.
None
Sent my Galaxy S4 into RockIT Repairs right before Christmas. They gave me two options on the repair and I chose the LOCA for $134.99 as it seemed to be the best quality repair after talking to the technician. They were very informative and my baby made it back to me in less than 4 days, now that's what I look for in service! I will definately be using them again even though I live in California and they are in Virginia. -Archer
Great place for a hole in the wall. My Marines and I love this for a quick bite
Destin is GREAT! I stayed at TOPSL Resort and loved it. The Gulf Beaches are wonderful. It is a place to go to unwind and relax. I will be going back and I am already looking forward to returning.
I love this place. I walk in, they ask me what kind of beer I want. I never have to wait…my appointment always starts on time. Rachel is amazing at cutting hair and a great conversationalist too. I'd highly recommend it to anyone who doesn't trust thrifty cuts with their hair. Grandpa always told me, "You get what you pay for"…and it seems to be true at The Parlour.
I have used this location many many times for Mac repairs for my clients. Techs are friendly and knowledgable. It is way more convenient than the apple store and I never have to wait to check anything in. You can make an appt with the apple store and still wait for an hour or more to be seen. I highly recommend this store. It sure saves me a lot of time to not have to deal with Apple directly.
Went there for the first time today, because my usual barber (Fellas, over the road) was closed, with no signs explaining why. Great way to lose customers. Anyway, I was really impressed with the haircut I got at Al-Baddar, and the friendly guys working there. I'll definitely be going back.
Great attorney. Innovative, professional, personally handles all cases.
None
Wow! I did not know it was supposed to be like this. I was involved in a collision in Rockville with my Lexus GS350. My insurance company Allstate, referred to me their preferred shop. Well I've been around the block one too many times to fall for that trick. My last accident I took it to Allstate' preferred shop and I left with self esteem issues and a car with two shades of white that kept falling apart. I called them to complain but soon realized it was the insurance company they wanted to keep happy, and not me. Well this time I googled body shop in Rockville and found a number of listings. Then I read reviews, called a few, and went in to Total Recon because I read their stellar reviews on Yelp and could not believe the consistency in amazing customers. I spoke with Bobby and found him professional, knowledgeable yet very down to earth. He explained to me how they are an independent shop and work for the customer and not the insurance company. I just got a good sense and left my car there and enterprise came and picked me up. Bobby called me the next day and said Allstate's estimate was too low and called for cheap aftermarket parts. He said he would make Allstate pay for original Lexus parts and pay for proper repair procedures. True to his word I got my car back a week later (3 days earlier than promised) looking like new...better then new. They even detailed the car from top to the bottom which I was not expecting. If your involved in an accident, take your car to Total Recon in Rockville but definitely not where your insurance company tells you. Best body shop in Rockville.
Excellent service. Every time I've taken my car here, the staff has been prompt, helpful, informative and friendly. I've never felt pressured to get any additional/surprise service to my vehicle, and I've never had any problems 'down the road' with the quality of service I've gotten at Express Oil Change.
Very professional
its was superb., nd its view is awesome
Place of faith.
Ordered take-out. Food was excellent, with a very reasonable price. Restaurant is nicely decorated, and looks to be exceptionally clean. Will definitely come back again!
I Spend 4 Nights Here....I Can Say This Is The Best Place For Newly Married Couples..Very Peaceful Place.....Awsome Experience With Tarika's Sea Breeze.
Tom Ill has been treating my lawns for over 10 years. He is always on time and follows up on every treatment. My lawn looks great and I enjoy having Tom come by once a month. He is super friendly
Olá queria saber quanto é uma semana numa suite de Casal? Vou de Lua de Mel no final do ano e estou fazendo o orçamento. O Hotel Serhs foi muito recomendado por amigos :D
My car was in an awful state of repair and the guys at AMC Electrics delivered an excellent service and then some! AMC Electrics come highly recommended with prices that are honest and fair.
I have enjoyed being able to work with RJ and think big. There is one focus on our discussions and it excellence. Ideas are great but RJ is a master at implementation. Energy and commitment has lead to success. RJ's commitment to high character leadership is another key to his success.
We moved from Corona to Carlsbad with a very short, yet critical timeframe to find a home. Kids school, work timing, high standards for a new home and the fact that we had a contract with renters moving into the current home we were living in made for a complex house hunt. So I called Brent at Humpherys Homes because I knew that Brent would deliver like he had when we purchased another property in Downtown San Diego a few years earlier. Within 24 hours of looking with Brent, we had found an incredible home only to find out that our offer was the 3rd offer. Brent skillfully and strategically guided us through this process that had the seller accept our offer over the other two. It was pure genius. I love Brent's energy, dedication and most of all his integrity. Both my wife and I knew through the entire process we were dealing with a pro. I usually don't do endorsements like this but this is a no-brainer for me. If you're looking for an agent, I highly recommend Humphery's Homes. And if I ever think about moving again (though not planning on it any time soon) Brent is my first and only call. Mike and Jennifer Foster
Really nice hospital and very caring staff. Was in the A&E department for a few hours, but the staff were lovely and kept checking on me. Then moved up and stayed in D7 West, and I had the best treatment from both the doctor and the nurses. Clean rooms and good food.
Extremely friendly staff and good food
We are never disappointed!
Divine Intervention... awesone temple with a sea view just blows you away... a must visit place for all... Strongly Recommended...
I LOVE this salon. I have been going to get my haircut from Cherie for my entire life. She gave me my very first haircut as a baby; I'm 25 years old now! I love that the salon stays up-to-date on the newest styles. Cherie has also done a fantastic job at up-do's (when I went to prom, my sister's wedding, and my own wedding) and make-up. The ladies at the salon are all very friendly and personable and would reccomment this place to anyone, guys included!
Location, location, location; great place to spend a weekend and catch a Broadway Show, Shop, and just hang out and people watch.
Love the interior design of this place. Location is a bit hard to get to by bus but it's a nice walk! Also, their lavender muffins are to die for.
What a tasty drive in. Great food, great service, decent price.
I stayed at the Holiday L.I. Manhattan View and loved it! It was so convenient to and from Manhattan! I'm going back for Memorial Day Weekend and staying at this hotel again :)
THE place for boots
None
Friendly atmosphere. Great deals on all types of vehicles.
After trying out a free intro class, I was hooked. The classes are fun, effective, and able to scale to anyone's ability.The coaches are awesome and give great instructions on the exercises and make sure you are working hard. It's the largest Crossfit Box in the city and offers a ton of different time options for classes and by ability level. Definitely would recommend to anyone looking to improve their fitness.
Happy Time has once again been a great all around experience. I will say for a class that is needed to dismiss a ticket, this one is above the rest. I know there will come another day that I need a Defensive Driving class and I will definitely use Happy Time.. Thanks again for the laughs...
Hôtel sympa et très propre. Accueil chaleureux... Les chambres sont certes petites (surtout à 25 euros) mais assez propres et bien tenues..: Cela vaut la peine de s'y rendre.
Drs Fisher and Ma have a great practice here. Very competent hygienists, excellent office staff, and a very convenient location. Just a mile from uptown, and only a mile or so from the Sugar Creek Greenway. Perfect for us bike commuters!
Excellent pizza. Most certainly the best pizza in Upland. Thick, chewy crust that's crispy on the bottom, excellent quality toppings that are plentiful and very good pizza sauce that's not overly spiced or tangy. 1,000 times better than the corporate pizza places! It's mostly a take-out joint, but there are places to sit. The service is very good and the decor is fine for a small pizza joint. Disabled parking spot right in front which is great for me since I'm disabled. Trust me, don't pass this place up! Give it a shot! :)
DarkSyde Acres can only be summed up as HORRIFYINGLY AWESOME! It's got the thrills, the chills, the gross outs and the sexiness you'd want from a class-rate haunted house. The actors are phenominal and get so deep into character that it's a more than a little scary. Along with being entertained while just waiting to get into the haunt, the three haunted houses are terrifying...and sexy.....which begs the question....how in the heck do they manage to make you hot under the collar and ready to crap yourself at any given moment? Guess you'll have to go and see for yourself. 2012 was just top notch, CAN'T WAIT to see what 2013 brings to the horror lovers crowd.
Having worked in the industry for years I am extremely picky when it comes to furniture but I have to say that Alex was excellent. The quality and selection is incredible, his service level was superior and the overall price for the amount of furniture I needed and a queen size, very high quality, mattress was beyond fair. You will be hard pressed to find a better place for your furniture needs in Central Florida.
Having become fed up with getting 'ripped-off' by Apple, using Turn on your Device was a welcome change. The service was incredibly quick and efficient and all for a reasonable price. Thank you very much.
All three of my kids have been under the care of Dana Orthodontics! We love her and all the staff! Dana Orthodontics is the best in Northern Colorado. I highly recommend her and her team. She cares and is very tentative. I also love that she gives back to the community as well!
We love the warm, inviting farmhouse charm of Emily's House. The kitchen was a great surprise too. We were there for wedding and Emily's House provided an amazing - delicious brunch for the whole party! Wow. French toast and so much more. Awesome.
This place is NOT permanently closed.
The best place to see a movie - affordable and fun!
Das Hochzeitsshooting war ein Hit. Hätte es mir nicht besser vorstellen können. Selbst wir als fotoscheue und etwas unruhige Motivgeber haben es genießen können :-D Sind super Fotos geworden. Vielen Dank noch mal für alles und weiterhin viele schöne Shootings. Katja & Matthias
Hi, we had a lovely trip in Manali with ARV Holidays. All the services provided as per the package they committed. We are very happy with the travel arrangements and selection of the hotels.
Local calmo, com ambiente bacana, preço honesto e os melhores baguetes da região. Recomendado para ir com os amigos(as) na hora do almoço pra atualizar a conversa.
Super camping, pas loin de tous, super équipe, bonnes animation. Le lieu que je recommande pour passer des vacances.
Una de mis raíces descansan ahí
Love, Love, Love Sandi and Balloon Utopia!! The best the balloon industry has to offer, hands down!
Due to unforeseen circumstances, we had to obtain another vehicle. We were directed to come to Elephant Auto Group to see what could be done for us to purchase another vehicle. As most people know the car buying process can be uneasy, even stressful. Even though we have been here two days we finally agreed on a vehicle. Not the first choice but an exceptional and nicer vehicle. Due to our salesman ( Chris Duke ) we got a better car and rate cause he went the extra mile and kept looking even though there was a vehicle on the lot that we were actually looking into. Thanks
If you visit Amelia Island, You have to eat in this place, excellent!!!
None
Local Partnership Joint Market Solutions is a state of the art SEO company that focuses on enhancing a local businesses presence on the web. This is no easy task given the fact that Google is constantly changing the rules of the game. I own a similar company, Local Spotlight, and focus in the Atlanta area. We share ideas and news breaking changes on a daily basis, so I can attest to the fact that they are on top of their game. Great people. Any company is only as good as their people.
None
Todd is the man! no matter what you need if he can get it done he'll do it. if there is something he can't do for you, he is well connected and likely knows someone/ someplace that can provide the service you need. T.S.E.'s is an excellent business under excellent management. a wide variety of products to choose from whether you drive a car truck or bike Todd has you covered!
I have known Kendall and his family for many years now . He has got to be one one the most Honest businessmen i have come across in all my 32 years in the Financial Business world. I refer him to many of my clients and business associates and have never had a bad review or comment made about him. I do and will continue to refer him to everyone i know . Keep the good work up Kendall Dave Hagerman EPC. President CanWealth Financial
I have had nothing but pleasant experiences in the several times I have been to Big Al's. Mike and Dave are great, easy to talk to, and they explain everything wonderfully. I frequent the store a lot, with 6 work vehicles and 2 personal, and each and every time they get us taken care of quick and professionally. If you need tires, they'll get you tires. If you need alignment, they'll get you alignment (even before they offered it at this location they managed to get it done!). Its a one stop shop, good people and good work!
None
Loved the food! Cooked perfectly. I am completely in love with this place and I am a perfectionist!
None
Stephen is a great tradesman. This is the second time I've hired him. The first time he installed an electrical plug for my kiln. This time I had him replace a faucet in my bathroom. Both times his work was excellent. I would definitely call him again. Thanks Stephen and all the best to you and your family.
This place is amazing, especially the service. I only go for lunch. First of all the food is cheap - the five dollar lunch is back! Second you can order online and it's ready when you get there. Third the service is great. Once our order got lost and they fixed it in five minutes and our lunch was free for me and my friends even though they only screwed up one order. One note: there is not really seating inside, just 3 tables, so get take out.
Great desserts
Excellent Shisha place. Have a lot of variety. Better than in Canada and cheaper. Issue is parking. Otherwise service is great and they have nice Arabic sofas just like home.
I was in a real jam when the screen on my laptop stopped working all of the sudden, and like any good Mac user I went straight to the local “genius” bar to see if I could get it fixed fast. They quoted me a 10 business day turnaround and $400 dollars to fix my computer! That seemed like a lot of money, but my real problem was TIME!!! I am a small business owner who depends on his computer every minute of every day just to keep the doors open! I was lucky to have a friend who recommended me to ITM computing. I thought surely they just work on PC’s but was delighted to find that they could totally fix my Mac. I made a quick trip down to their office to drop off my computer to see how they could help, they didn’t have the part in stock, but they ordered it for me and called me when it arrived a few days later. On my return trip down to their offices, they disassembled my laptop and fixed it in ONE BUSINESS HOUR!!! Plus they applied the previous diagnostic fee to the repair. Unlike the drones at the Apple Store, these guys understand the needs of small business. They had me up and running again in no time! The team at In The Moment Computing really impressed me, and I’m sure they’ll be the first people I call if my beloved mac ever runs into problems again.
I have always felt that the staff at Peter C. Snyder Dentistry is a cut above the rest. Dr. Snyder is truly remarkable, very gentle and obviously an expert at what he does. It's a small husband and wife owned and run practice, with an expert team from the assistants, to the hygienists and the dentist himself.
I've stayed in Jensen's On the Gulf several times in '12 and '13, and have enjoyed each experience. The 3-story bldg on the gulf provides superb views from the top floors, and is literally 50 steps from the water. There is simply nothing like experiencing the sunset from your own porch. At the same time a short walk brings you to the Jensen's Twin Palm marina on the Pine Isle Sound side of Captiva where you can rent a boat for fishing or sightseeing. For dining, the northern tip of Sanibel hosts two of the best places: the Mad Hatter for upscale cuisine and the Lazy Flamingo for the best, freshest fish in a bar-tavern atmosphere. Captiva is a great island, and I cannot recommend Jensen's too highly!
Bobby Blue Burger- Sub Chicken. Both the french and sweet potato fries are amazing, and so are the sauces. Service is excellent.
I live in Palm City and it seems the ants have taken over!!! I called Ambassador Pest Management and they were out the next day. I'm happy to say the ants are gone and I can enjoy my yard once again :))))
HealthSource genuinely cares about the well-being of their patients. The office has a fun friendly atmosphere and also knows the importance of manipulating bone and muscle simultaneously. I have been treated for cervical disc degeneration and now live a migraine/pain-free life.
Grassmasters lawn and landscaping has been servicing New Mexico for over 15 years, call for free estimate.
Отличная студия, заказывал персональную фото сессию у фотографа Громова Игоря, остался доволен, цены не кусаются, оборудования предостаточно, фотограф мастер своего дела, спасибо. Рекомендую!
None
Tech Dentistry was great! staff was friendly, service was quick, place looked really nice and you get your own flat screen while they clean your teeth. Staff members seemed to take great concern and did a good job.
Dr Jeremy is great! Myself, my girlfriend and my mom all see him. He's great with addressing back problems, neck problems etc. I would highly recommend!
Great night out, something for everyone
Always been delicious and have had fast service with a smile. Love the prices (use coupons from the portage lakes Gold Clipper), and have been ordering exclusively from this location for 12+ years. Very good pizza, and it blows nasty Dominos, lame Papa John's and greasy boring Pizza Hut out of the water! You've got to try the PB&J pizza, and all the deep dishes are wonderful. Very great crust!! Only place I'll even eat the crust besides Italo's on Waterloo.
My wife and I recently purchased a new Subaru Outback and were exceptionally pleased with the entire buying process at Reliable Subaru. Our sales rep Dennon was super to work with, and really knows his product. The negotiating process was very quick and fair, and we are very happy with the fact that we got a terrific deal without any stress or drama! The financing process with Mike was also a great experience. We were approved through the bank at a crazy low 1.7%, but Reliable Subaru beat that by almost half, 0.9%! I know that most people will tell everyone when they have a problem, but forget to tell anyone when they have a great experience, so I wanted to be sure to post here what an extremely satisfying experience we had, and highly recommend them to anyone looking to get into a new ride. Thank you, Brian
None
Our favorite in Newberg!!
My experience at St. Louis Tattoo Company was excellent. I took my son and we both got tats at the same time. We both loved them. I got the Punisher breakout pictured above and my son got a Pantera Dimebag Darrel tribute tat. In fact I am going back tomorrow to get a Harley Davidson Skull tattoo with black flames. I can't wait. I highly recommend this place and it's artists. They are excellent. See you tomorrow Mr. House. Kenny J. St. Louis, MO.
It is good and economy
So far I am very pleased. I am having lower back pain and now numbness in my right leg and have just started my 2nd week of treatment. My first 3 visits last week resulted in soreness as Dr Shepherd said they would but I am looking forward to reaching a point where I can walk without the discomfort I have had this past year. I want my quality of life back and I believe with Dr Shepherd's expertise I will get it. Stay tuned for more updates.
Ask for Mitch he is great!
None
None
Honest. Reasonably priced. Friendly staff. Great experience.
This is one of our all time favorite restaurants. We have never had a bad meal here. The one time that we had a problem, they made it right and did not charge us for the item. The food is excellent and the service is the same. I would recommend this for any occasion.
None
Best sandwich bar in notts
Fantastic restaurant! A wonderful Italian fine dining experience. Great service, great food, beautiful ambiance! Don't miss this if you're in the area! It may not look like much from the outside, but go on in and enjoy!! We started with the caprese, which was very fresh. My husband had the salmon, which was served over spinach with goat cheese. The combination of flavors was excellent and it was done to perfection. I had the ravioli with sage & butter sauce. It was very rich and flavorful. The texture of the homemade pasta was delightful. The only bad part was that I was too full for dessert.
Warren Barry is an excellent young architect. I have had the pleasure of working with W.E.B. Designs since he opened his practice and highly recommend him for residential and commercial projects. He is a man of integrity who has delivered professional services promptly. His services are a great value.
We've enjoyed the Rolling Hills pub for years
Dr. Anne Lundquist is an extremely gifted Chiropractor. I'm a Chiropractor and I usually treat my own wife but when my wife was pregnant......I referred my own wife (without hesitation) to see Dr. Anne because I know she is one of the best in Prenatal Chiropractic Care. My wife delivered a few weeks ago and it only took 30 mins of active "pushing" and just like that....our baby girl "popped" out. I am positive that Dr. Anne's treatments helped big time. And we're bringing our new baby girl to see Dr. Anne for a check up to make sure her nervous system is working 100%. Thanks Dr. Anne!
Very knowledgeable. I have never worked with anyone so willing to help, not only with design but also suggesting different options for difficult projects. I was impressed with the organization of inventories and the quality of products they carry. Thank You Control Solutions!
Tôi đã uống cafe ở đây. .thật tuyệt vòi được uống cafe nơi quê hương nhìn cuộc sống thôn quê yên bình
My stylist, Emily, consistently gives me excellent service. She is attentive and has helped me find the hair cut that works best for me. As for the salon itself, whenever I enter, I'm immediately greeted by staff and offered refreshments while I wait. I could not ask for better. Keep up the good work.
We had a terrific experience renting from King Kong Party Rentals. We selected the Junior Funhouse Dual Slide Moonwalk with POOL and absolutely loved it. My 3 year old and her friends loved jumping around in the moonwalk, climbing the ladder, and then sliding down into the water pool. The dad's also loved it, as we would jump up to the top of the slide and enjoy and head-first slide into the pool. King Kong Party Rentals is organized and accurately delivers the product you want on-time. I also found them to be very much price competitive. Great experience and we have now selected them for multiple birthday parties.
Muy buen hotel
Dr. Mills combines the book-knowledge of a doctor -- with the common sense of a smart man -- with the puzzle-solving skills of a scientist. He also has good people skills, and uses it to casually chat with me just enough to take in the 'whole picture' of my life (general health/stress/relationships, etc.) before making a diagnosis or recommendation. I usually spend an average amount of time that you would expect to wait in a doctors office--- he's definitely busy but I never wait too long. He seems to understand time management and spends just the right amount of time with me to obtain the answers to his questions before diagnosis, and still leaves time to answer my questions without rush. The reception area is not the slick, high-dollar reception areas that you see in all these new urgent care-type facilities -- but it is clean and comfortable; it is the feel of an old-school family doctor's office (which I like). Also, based on his health appearance, he seems to practice what he preaches. (I would much rather bet on a doctor who looks in good health him/herself, instead of a doctor who is overweight or has sallow skin.) Dr. Mills' health appearance is A-1. In fact, I might mistake him for a surfer, if I ever see him near the beach!
Awsome!!!
None
None
Bacon Brunch at the Sage General Store is one of mans greatest achievements. Some say landing on the moon, others might say the pyramids, or the Great Wall of China. But none of those can compare to a 3 course meal all based around bacon. This is what humans were meant to do, put bacon in as many food stuffs as possible. Also the food at Sage is just really good, local, and tasty. The service is good but the food is a little pricey for some. I think its worth it but people who don't want their food to be fair trade or local might think otherwise. Plus BACON BRUNCH!
You will get only the best service and advice at Farrish Johnson Law Offices.
None
None
This place is consistently making the best coffee and tea drinks around. They have been in this cute little storefront since 2006. And the service is superb.
Really good food and huge portions. Friendly staff. The decor is very simple, but they've made it nice...there's a nice, hand-painted mural in the wall.
My daughter loved lollipop park there were a lot of kids her age and she was able to go on every ride and staff was very friendly. We can't wait to go back
HT install came out for a simple tv mounting and left me amazed. Great overall experience from these guys. They were on time, they worked efficiently and they cleaned up as if there were never here. I will definitely recommend to anyone I know !!!
I have had rheumatoid arthritis for more than 35 years. For more than half that time I have had a weekly deep tissue massages from Don Bowman. The benefits have greatly enhanced my life and well being.
Good prices and solid, consistent, sharp men's haircuts. Good chair-side chat if you're so inclined. Simple down-home atmosphere. They even give my 2-yr old boy a handsome boy's cut. Cash/Check only.
Great place, great people, great times!!
مساكين ياللي ماعندهم البيك ههه
Good wholesome family food....Great service.
No vegetarian options but other than that they have great food and service.
None
Welcoming to the entire LGBT community. Especially appreciate it's TRANS:THRIVE daily programming Tuesday through Saturday.
I am not the only one, but... Maize Pizza! Trust me, Prosciutto De Parma, Delicately Grilled Corn, Creme Fraiche, and Buffalo Mozzarella on Locale's signature Nan-like pizza crust is a mind numbing experience! P.S. I add red pepper flakes to add a mildly needed dimension.
I had my wedding reception at Rincon Beach Club in July 2011. The venue is ideal. It's right near the beach, has an elegant room inside if the weather outside is prohibitive AND has a beautiful patio. Melissa and Jamie were extremely helpful to me. Melissa, in particular, has years of experience with Rincon and helping brides and grooms make decisions about what will make their wedding just how they want it to be. She also had great suggestions for other vendors. My reception was everything I wanted it to be. All of my centerpieces, place cards, and favors were laid out on the tables as I had requested. My cake was displayed on the wooden patio. Guests raved about the food and the service. There are many beautiful spots to take photos and plenty of room for guests to enjoy food and dance indoors or outside. I highly recommend the Rincon!
I get my haircut by Mike. I heard he was a period haircut specialist, so I went in and got a sweet 30's military cut (he talked me out of fifties because of my hair type). Super era accurate; I trusted him and it was an awesome cut. But then I had to be in a wedding, so I went back in two weeks later and he and I worked out how to tone it down a bit. I couldn't be happier - still classic, but not so extreme. And he does it all in about 10 - 15 minutes, including clean up. That combined with online booking makes this an easy way to look the way you want.
Excellet coffee shop! This is the only independent coffee shop in Monroe where you can sit down and relax while you drink your coffee and read a book. Everywhere else seems to be drive-through shops these days. At Paesano's, you can sit around the fireplace during the winter time and sip an eggnog latte and in the summertime you can sit outside and look out to Lake Tye while drinking an iced Americano. There isn't much of a food menu, but I like being able to snack on their fresh fruit, bagels, and scones and be able to leave without that "sick, bloated, ate too many ham and cheese paninis at Starbucks" feeling.The good news is that if you're really starving, there is a burger place and a teriyaki place right next door. All in all, this is a great coffee house and once the baristas get a little better at their latte art, it will be one of the few best places to get coffee in Snohomish county.
They arrived at my house and were clean, courteous and extremely helpful. They took the time to explain my pest issues, where my weak points were and what they were going to do to fix it.
Holy smokes... I should have typed this A LONG TIME AGO! My husband and my 17 year old son are pizza-aholics and they needs help...Since we have discovered 19th Street, My boys will only eat 19th Street pizza as picky as they are about their pizza, 19th Street is always fresh and hot. And my little ones (9, 7 & 4) fight over the crust that is well seasoned ...garlic & Butter Delicious! I'm not a big pizza eater myself but I eat their pizza & their salads are FRESH AND AMAZING....the QUALITY AND QUANTITY IS AWESOME. We literally eat pizza from here once a week ! The owner and his family are friendly and always kind...(Even if I pick up my order a little late sometimes!) We are proud to support this local/family owed and ran restaurant.... And think they're pretty amazing!
Nice selction. The staff is vey helpful and they know thei fireworks
歲月的沖刷與洗禮演驛著千姿百態的人生。細細想來..依舊不過如此..可說可悲..也可說無心之人...如何歸..其實也就是裸來裸去。還有什麼更好的解釋比這種解釋更精到呢？
Broast only at crispy in hyderabad if you know that what is broast
Best general tso I ever had.. Only Chinese food I'll eat from around here...
Cutting down on administration so we can spend more time with customers has always been our Goal. The UK Fuel card is just one of those situations which runs itself, and needs very little input from us.l would recommend it to any business. All dealings with them has always been quick and efficient..
Kompetentes Team, vielen Dank für die Hilfe.
The store manager skillfully resolved my problem with a product return. Along with good prices on organic vegetables, bulk foods and nuts, just another reason I do most of my food shopping at Vitamin Cottage.
best school ever
None
We had a problem with our kitchen outlets not working even after resetting. We called Thomas and described the problem. He knew exactly what the problem was AND he was able to come to our home that day! After researching, he found an additional problem and corrected it as well. Our home was built in 1996 so the wiring did not have the same regulations as today. We have not had any problems since. We will definitely call Classic Electric with any electrical issues from now on.
None
This is a wonderful place. If it's not your cup of tea, then don't come here, because it definitely isn't a perfect fit for everyone! I adore it, but then again I don't drink alcohol or coffee, I don't smoke, I don't sleep around, and I don't even like having boys in my apartment past midnight. I also like wearing clothes that actually cover my body, because mystery is always more attractive than blatant sexuality. It may seem like I'm a prude, but if this sounds like you too and you like freely applying spiritual (especially Christian) learning to academic learning and you love to study and work hard (and don't want to go into debt for it), then this is the place for you. If not, you would probably rate this place one star and say something nasty about it. ;) And by the way, yes, I did get plenty of dates, and with guys that were actually interested in ME, and not my cleavage!! I'm getting married to the love of my life in just a couple months and couldn't be happier. We'll probably both pursue our graduate degrees out of state, but we'll miss BYU!
A wonderful Starbucks, clean and great costumer service, be sure to tip for appreciation!!
This is the only place in Mississauga or the GTA to go to when looking for medical aesthetics with results. Katie and Veronique make sure you get results whether it's with IPL, skin tightening and brightening, laser hair removal or nutritional counseling. I send a lot of friends and family here because I know they will be happy. Skin Deep create excellent valued packages that target what bugs you about your face or body and I found them to be far less expensive that other places I have quoted out in Mississauga and surrounding areas. Simply put ... at Skin Deep you get the best results for the best price, to me that's a no brainer!
None
None
Everyone is awesome there. Professionals.
I have photographed many weddings at this beautiful location. It is an amazing wedding or party venue with spectacular views, exceptional service and wonderful food. Plus it also has accommodations.
A tree service that cares about your property and making it look good for years to come!
None
Tortillini soup was great. Pizza crust was just my style - hard and very dark brown. The sauce was just as good - tasty and no one taste was overpowering. We ate at the College Park site twice in three days. Sadly we had to leave or else we would have eaten there more. When we visit our son and his wife again - Russo's will be our go-to place. You have a loyal customer.
After working with many other dealers, I found Country Nissan to be the best! It started out with Rose, who emailed me with all the information I needed to make a good decision on which vehicle and how much I would pay for it. The entire staff at Country Nissan has been excellent, from the start through and including the Service staff. I live over 60 miles away and will continue to go back for service and will recommend this dealership to everyone.
None
My experience with this service is amazing. The owner hires to most competent, dedicated staff to ensure the lessons are of high quality. I would highly recommend Jeff and his staff.
If you want really good quality and really good service you come here.
We tried My T Print for the first time this past year and it was great. They did a great job with the artwork we asked them to create. The shirts were aolid quality and the end price was exactly what they have advertised as. Sometimes when you see a special deal there are so many restrictions it ends up costing much different than you ancticipated. Not hte case with My T Print. They did a great job and it cost exactly as much as I had figured. We will definitely be ordering from them again!
I needed a last minute cleaning and I called about 10 different places before I found HQ cleaning Wow, I didn't know such top notch customer service existed in the Glasgow area. I went online to book HQ cleaners and yes, it truly is as easy as everyone says. Two ladies arrived 30 minutes early to my flat. They scrubbed and grunted and dusted like mad. I needed to get the place ready for picture taking because I was going to put it on the rental market. I needed a visible dirt cleaned up for the tenant prospectives. The ladies came with their own supplies and everything!! Made the whole process a breeze. No way -- I'm not even sure what I was thinking trying to clean the place myself. I'm so glad I found them while researching online and would definitely use them again..
This is the type of place I want to go to when I eat out. After you order at the counter, much like in a fast-food restaurant, you go sit down till they call your name to get your food. No wait-people, no escort to a table, just you and who you bring along. The food is great! I love the Combo nachos with queso, always comes out with more than enough to feed two people, of which it does with my wife there with me. They have so many menu choices, you maybe hard pressed to find one to decide on. You can easily have a nice tex-mex dinner for 2 under $10 here and never feel pressed to buy more.
I am very happy with their service and promptness. I had my muffler replaced for a better prize than their competition. Very friendly and honest, they know their stuff and I will use their service again.
So far, I've been to the office twice, and both times I've been treated like a treasured friend. Everyone is so friendly, but not in a creepy Stepford dentist way. It's like I'm the only patient, and everyone is genuinely interested (excited even) to help me.
I've always experienced friendly service. My car is always ready when they tell me it will be and no problems so far!
I love this place. It's almost always busy and bustling with activity. In that environment they still make every customer feel like a VIP. They take excellent care with all of my personal and business vehicles. It literally makes me smile when I see my car after they have washed or detailed it. It looks like brand new, they give so much attention to detail! Now they have aquired the oil change mechanic shop next door formerly Silver Car Care (who I would never use) and changed it to Super Car Care where they give the same excellent, high quality service that they do in the carwash/detail shop. Love them...Go there.
Jeremy is great with kids. He teaches martial arts and personal development. I highly recommend him.
Fast & Friendly service. Very professional and knowledgeable. Highly recommend.
I love this coffee! My boyfriend who hates "pretentious coffee" loves this place. I can not express enough how much I love this coffee. For reals.
Excellent laser cutting service provider with in a cheap and very low prices..
Good one to spend our time...best in nellai...value for money..
What a gem. Not much to look at on the outside, but the inside is very clean and cozy. Service was excellent and the food was fresh and came with big portions. Very reasonably priced. Will definitely be back.
The restaurant has grown and features an outdoor patios area. The tri-tip salad is mouth watering and the garlic mashed potatos are wonderful. My favorite BarBQ restaurant.
Stayed here on a business trip. Best rate for a 3 star hotel in town. Friendly staff and clean rooms too. The place is so new it doesn't show up on google maps. The breakfast buffet is pretty good. All the normal stuff but also eggs and potatoes. Super comfy beds and pillows too. Highly recommended.
Called them for a warranty replacement on an Interstate Battery that I had purchased a few years back. David was very helpful and even contacted Interstate for me to make sure I would get warranty replacement. They even found a vacuum leak on my intake that apparently the local Jeep dealer had missed on all three of my last oil changes.
A best place were anyone would like to work
Residential project - Re-roof & ventilation of 2-story, 4-gabled Farm House roof. This was a major project which included tear off and clean up of 2 layers of asphalt & 1 layer cedar shake shingles, installation of drip edge/ridge vent system utilizing metal furring strips between roof boards & OSB sheeting and installation of a complete GAF Timberline architectural shingle system. This was a competitive (4 contractor) bid process in which Frey came out head & shoulders above the competition due to: 1) Professional & customer focused response to initial quote inquiry, Sr. Sales Associate onsite visit to review/spec out project bid and negotiate final contract. 2) Scheduling (3 weeks of signed contract) & completion of project (7 business days/included rain delay) in timely fashion. 3) Customer service during project - site visit of owner, sales associate & daily conversations with onsite project manager. 4) High quality workmanship. 5) Project clean-up
No waiting, friendly employees always going above and beyond to fix my sisters issues with her phone.
Lorca is undoubtedly the best coffee shop in Stamford. They are continually bringing in new flavorful roasts that perfectly compliment their variety of soups, sandwiches, and baked goods. The baristas are also extremely knowledgeable and take the time to make perfect espresso drinks. The shop is small enough to feel cozy if you're trying to relax but large enough to accommodate a group of people if you're having a casual business meeting or catching up with friends. They also offer special order full cakes, pies, and other desserts with several gluten free options.
I have known Sean for 5 years, and I recommend him to all my friends. Sean is a great plumber, so I suggest to at least get get a bid from Sean
Best brazilian dentist.. My girl love being treated by her... Thanks for the exceptional work..
None
stayed in duck key last year & saw this place but was being remodeled. Wow! the price is great for the area, staff was so friendly & rooms were fresh, clean, & roomy. bathrooms had nice sized showers. outside the resort has an actual beach (many don't) with the pool not 20 yds from the waves. key colony is very nice. leigh annes & sparkys are within walking distance & very good. not to mention there is a tiki bar at the adjacent hotel that is accessed by a gate from glunz pool. if you know anything aabout room rates & want a beach, this is the place. marina jus across the highway has jet skis, charter rentals as does sparkys. our new home away from home. 5 stars!
Most of the times you need a plumber you are probably having a bad day. I needed a plumber at 10pm and they sent out M. Martinez. He was prompt courteous and professional all the way. If I need a plumber in the future Roto Rooter is my company. Roto Rooter Austin. 6/6/12
Beautiful New Day Spa in Soho . Just had chemical peel done and facial with Cristina . And my eyebrows mapped out and waxed with Kelly . Great customer service and quality product used ! Very happy with my experience and recommend to everybody . They do waxing , Brazilian massage , mani pedi.. One stop beauty place ! They have parking !
The coffee is sooooooo good. It's in the top 4 cafes I have tried, so it shares company with Seven Seeds, The Naked Espresso and Brother Bubba Budan. It has become a weekly ritual for me to visit Axil for a coffee and a bag of beans to use thoughout the week. Their beans are expensive, ranging from $12 to $20 per 250 gram bag, but it really does reflect in the quality. I've tried buying freshly roasted beans elsewhere for much cheaper prices, but I don't enjoy coffee anywhere near as much. Staff are wonderful, they're helpful and happy to chat about the coffee blends and brewing methods.
Great Value for your money. Excellent food. Not too snooty for a middle class person. I absolutely LOVE the dolphins and tigers exhibit, it's so up close! I recommend anyone go see it.
As always my dental experience yesterday was great. I have been seeing Dr Jones since he opened his practice and I would never go anywhere else. His staff is always professional and friendly and Dr Jones is kind and caring. Sorry, Dr Jones but I don't love going to the dentist, but if I must, this is the best place to be. Thanks once again for giving me a no-fear, no-pain, pleasant experience.
Absolutely fantastic place. You walk in, and its like you aren't in Camarillo anymore. The food is amazing, too. I would suggest you try the fish and chips along with the clam chowder.
the hotel and friendly staff and the brilliant atmosphere of the downstairs bar was the best i have ever had
GDW has been a favorite since I moved to Carson City 3 years ago. Really great hotel front desk staff.. If you're going to pull an all nighter this is the place to do it! GET A ROOM and now you don't have to drive home or to your hotel, since most Carson City casinos don't have an integrated hotel like GDW..
Sandro at Select Technology Services was great. My computer was slow, heating up so much that it burned to touch, and would shut off without warning. I dropped it off and got it back after one day. It works like new, all previous problems were fixed, and he cleaned my screen and keyboard for free. Great service & great price, would highly recommend.
Dee Anwari is both extremely knowledgeable as well as responsive and easy to talk to. I find the fixed price policies of the firm to be easy to understand and very reasonable. Highest recommendations.
My dog Dakota (and I) LOVES Uberdog! We live in Durham and we've been to other doggy daycares closer to us but Uberdog is our favorite. Dakota used to be very shy and skittish around human strangers (loves dogs though) and her experiences at Uberdog have definitely made her a lot more outgoing and confident. She loves the Uberdog staff and all her friends. Also bonus - there's a great coffee/baked goods shop literally down the street within a couple minute drive - Hartford Baking Company. You should check it out with you are at Uberdog! P.S. If your dog goes to Uberdog and you are on Facebook, you should "Like" them. They post pictures of the dogs on their facebook page and it's super fun to see all the dogs. Dakota is on their facebook page and I showed everyone :)
I had a great experience choosing my dress, our assistant was very nice and helpful, had a great time, working now with the alterations ladies that seem to be great, very nice and accommodating. I haven't read the reviews before going here but I honestly can't relate to any of them.
Exceptional communication and turn-around. Art department quickly created proofs. Modification requests were completed quickly and new proofs back in a couple of hours. Delivery of custom drives and cases was unbelievably fast. I highly recommend USB Memory Direct.
Alles bestens - jederzeit eine Empfehlung. Sehr gutes Kompetenz Duo.
Muy buenas a arepas bien sea con pollo, carne, pernil o chorizo, recomendadas 100%
Awesome restaurant! Great service, appropriately priced and higher quality food than one might expect from the price.
None
I had a great experience with Derrick setting up my Business Facebook site. Since my technical knowledge is limited, he handled all of the upload of pictures and content as I had in mind. The site has received the correct type of traffic as envisioned and it has been easy for me to manage it and work with it. Derrick is still involved, helping me to post news and evaluating the data we gather.
The consultation with Dr. Grilliot was relaxed and informative. The staff were friendly and the atmosphere pleasant.
Smoking is a terrible curse but for anyone who has made the decision to quit they also need to tools to quit. This is why contacting Brian should be on your list since his track record in this area is terrific.
I have been stranded in this small town for over a week now with my car in the shop. I was looking for a place on a Sunday to grab a brew and some hot food when I came across Mackey's. The food is very good with prices that match it's quality and they have a very friendly staff not to mention the Owners are on site a large portion of the time willing and able to make your visit more enjoyable. The beer...they have several on tap and more in bottles yet they may not care a large selection of imports, but they do have many from local brewery's. I advise anyone who comes through Ontario stop in and grab a bite and a cold one.
I have had a great experience living here since june of 2013. The apartments are nice. A lot of you professionals live here as well. Anytime there has been any issue in the apartment I have contacted the front office and they typically send out someone immediately and in both cases, i believe their names were Leino and Jodi, they were courteous, efficient and got the job done with a pleasant disposition. I would highly recommend Dover to any one.
I lived in Chicago for 7 years and this is the best Chicago-style pizza I have found on the west coast.
The food at Sal e Pepe is delicious and the service is always friendly and attentive. We love the relaxed atmosphere for a family meal or a casual business meeting. It's one of our favorite spots in Newtown!
None
Best school I have ever been to, and that's that I,ve been to dozens of schools.
None
None
Sehr nettes Personal und auch sonst sehr zufrieden!
Free Flow Massage Therapy is excellent. Brad does an excellent job and he really cares about you and your well-being. I've been visiting here since 2006 on and off and been very happy.
I will never forget my stay in Roma, and Hotel Isa. The service is really good; rooms are beautiful, clean, and modern. The old world charm of the dark wood, and the elevator lift were stunning. The star attraction is the beautiful rooftop, and views. To come back to the hotel and go up there at night for relaxation and coffee/wine was the highlight of this hotel. The breakfast is excellent and the hotel is very well located. Close to the Vatican and also close to the main attractions. All hotel staff from the front desk, rooftop, and maid service was excellent! For my next (and hopefully soon) visit to Roma, I will certainly stay at this hotel and will recommend it to others. I love beautiful and chaotic Roma. Thank you for a wonderful experience.
For being the Sunday before Christmas, the service at Lil' Chef was great! Although they were busy, we were seated quickly, our drink glasses never quite made it to empty, and our breakfast was absolutely delicious - not to mention cheap! My boyfriend and I each had a hearty breakfast and our total was only a little over $15. This may have been our fist meal at Lil' Chef, but it definitely won't be our last. I can't wait to try the rest of their menu!
Overall, very good!
Bought the VALE M-2 and put it on myself and it fits like a glove. Called the shop today for a question and the guy was great that answered the phone. On my way for a Juice Box tomorrow! The bike sounds so sick - love it!
Chris Marini of Network Savants is one of the most knowledgeable people I know, in the field of business computer networking, and onsite maintenance and repairs. His depth of understanding of multiple operating systems and various networking platforms is amazing. He is engineer certified in all of systems he works with and gets the job done no matter how complicated and their fees are very reasonable. I strongly recommend Chris Marini and Network Savants --- Micah Bleecher, Bleecher Insurance, Inc., Las Vegas, NV
Great experience with this dealership. Marc Soloway has been a great help to me and so has the service center. Awesome waiting room with coffee and wi-fi is key:)
Great new place to check out. Interesting menu and great draft beers. The beet sliders were interesting and the pear grilled cheese was great. Had Lake Erie Monster on top--first time I'd seen it outside of Cleveland. Nice outdoor patio.
We went on the Ultimate Adventure cruise during our honeymoon trip in Key West. My husband and I had a BLAST! The crew was amazing and very fun to talk with and hang out all day. The trip included snorkeling, jet skiing, and parasailing. During the snorkeling, I had some issues with getting the breathing right and panicked a little bit. Monty, one of the crew, took some time with me to help me get the breathing right. He was extremely understanding and helpful on the trip. This trip is worth every penny and we highly recommend it!
I've been taking my CRV to Jeff Wyler Honda in Florence ever since I bought the vehicle there 10 years ago. Always friendly, informative, and helpful. Trustworthy. Most recently I've been dealing with Dylan Noble. Dylan - you're great! Keep up the good work!
For the third time in the last 5 years, DataRetrieval has helped me out of the ditch of lost data. After some hours and lots of work, they found and restored information from my old Mac lost during a power outage - my invaluable contact database and photos from trips abroad - and transferred it to a new iMac. Their skill and ability to try different methods to get results was amazing to watch on screen. Highly recommended! An excellent experience all around!
My experience today was great! The staff really helped me out. This is not the first time that Louisiana Dental Center has helped my family out in a time of need. They really know how to make their paitents feel at home. They care about their painents in more ways than one. Will deffinantly be coming back time and time again. Great Job!!!!
Art (and Art's Brewing Supply) has made me ten times the home brewer than I was before. I had been brewing beer for about 18 months and made what I thought were good beers by purchasing kits at The Beer Nut. My first trip to Art's was not what I was expecting. The business itself is located in an old house that is stacked floor to ceiling with grains, malts, etc. Art's desk is next to the door and I ended up talking to him for around 45 minutes before I grabbed a single ingredient from the shelves. Art is very opinionated and is not afraid to express those opinions. After shopping there regularly I have come to understand that Art has a passion for home brewing as a hobby and ultimately he wants to teach others an appreciation for home brewing as a hobby as well. If I could do it over again there is no question in my mind that I would start my adventures in home brewing at Art's. I have now made three beers with his guidance and they have all been amazing. It has actually gotten me much more excited about home brewing and I am excited to try the next recipe. The advice and information I get at Art's is the most valuable thing to me, but that is not the only benefit of shopping there. The ingredients are high quality and fresh. The prices are also excellent. I have actually been able to make stronger brews for the same price as I used to pay at the Beer Nut for kits because I can spend more money on malt. If you want to take your brewing to the next level I highly recommend heading to Art's.
Dr. Russell is probably one of the best Chiropractors I know. He takes the health of your body to the extreme. He really cares about his patients and makes sure they come first. I would reccomend him to anyone. Steve G.
Perry insurance is great they will take care of you if you ever get in an accident. I appreciate the extra mile they went for me.
Joe was timely, courteous, inexpensive and very detailed oriented. I had him do a few cars and even the dents others said they would need to be repaired, Joe was able to remove. Call him and you will see.
Awesome service. I love this place!
Thank You Larry Simmons, you made a first time buyers experience comfortable and unintimidating. You made my year long car search all worth it. If I had to describe my experience I would have to use a simile, buying my car from you vs. buying my car from another dealership is like staying at a Four Seasons vs. staying at a Holiday in. They really knew how to make me comfortable with the whole experience, from allowing me to test drive the car without the annoying car salesman talking my ear off in the back sea,t to negotiating the price of the car without an intimidating pushy salesman. Larry laid out straight forward what he could do and what he couldn't. The only negative was that since it was a high demand car they could not move on their advertised price (which was fair in the first place) however, he did move up a great deal in what they would give me for my trade in. Also thank you to the finance guy ( I'm sorry I don't remember your name) you were very informative when presenting me with my warranty and insurance options and you took "no" for an answer the first time without using the "scare tactics" that many finance guys would have responded with. If I planned on buying another car in the near future I would definitely work with this team again and I would recommend them to anyone who is looking to purchase a new/used vehicle. Kevin Baker 2006 Nissan X-terra
I have buying from this store since around 1967 at three different locations. The new store is as nice as any of the large chain stores. The difference is the staff is very informed on the latest music equipment. I buy from them , because it is local, they have great staff, prices almost always will be competitive, and maybe the most important: is that when there is a problem, they will help you take care of it. That does not happen on line all the time. I would tell you to shop here for your music needs.
Likely the best steak house in Burlington! The staff is amazing, the food is incredible and it's a place I go back to time and time again! It's a great experience and everyone should try it!
I went in for an oil change and to check a valve on my front left tire. They did the oil change and checked and repaired the valve. The following day the light came on showing the air pressure was AGAIN low. I had to go back on a Saturday morning. Fortunately the mechanic checked the valve that was repaired and found nothing wrong. He then checked all the tires and found a nail in the back tire!!! They plugged it and I was on my way! Thank you Advantage Toyota!
I was just their agin today for my yearly trip to the store, I live in Holland,MI so I make it a road trip to go here a lest 2 or more times a year, I wish their one closer to Holland, but that would take way the fun in taking a road trip, but what I have to say about the store is this a grate place, every time I go here, I feel like I'm in korea and not in MI any more, the people that work their very nice and helpful, they all ways have whatever I have in mind, I haven't been able to not find anything I wanted, its all ways their, I would say if your in to the whole Korean life style, this is a store you must shop at.
reliable service, fast friendly,
Für Dim Sum und original Char Siew unbedingt hier essen gehen. Am Wochenende abends immer reservieren.
Brixton Jamm lately has really raised it's game, had some totally wicked nights there in the last few months + looking forward to loads more good times there this year! Greg
Nicole was excellent, She was very informative and helpful on getting my driver to come at the time promissed that I could make my flight in plenty of time! Also she estimated the weight and price correctly. Allied van lines are the only one I would trust! Very very professional! Thx again
Perfect service. Folks are knowledgeable and diligent, they were always available to me and my employer to explain the details of a process that seems convoluted and very user un-friendly. No call went unanswered -- I am generally a worrier and especially in immigration, but I honestly felt so well taken care of. My employer also is very appreciative of their competence and has recommended the firm to other colleagues. I am grateful for Glen's and his staff's support and could not have picked a better, more reliable and effective law firm. I'll be happy to provide further recommendations and, if I ever need legal help, I will always go back to them.
Our sandwich preparer was quite an interesting fellow. We enjoyed his spirit, but got a little tired of it after awhile. Restaurant was clean and tidy, and we enjoyed our food. Definitely would recommend subway any day. Note: Subway isn't the cheapest.
None
5 years ago, while I lived with an old Mercedes as a daily driver, my specialized mechanic retired on me and I had to find a new mechanic for this, and my "regular" car. A friend recommended a mechanic at Havertown Tire, so I gave them a try. They are open on Saturdays and that was a big help. Since this first meeting, I have taken my subsequent 5 cars to them, all foreign makes, and they have provided prompt, courteous and professional service to me. Russ and Tim have made me feel welcomed and a valuable customer and have gone out of their way to make sure my cars are maintained in good condition. Even my current car, that is under warranty goes to them for all my regular maintenance. They have done a variety of work that I have been very happy with. From regular oil changes, annual inspections, to brake discs and pads, fluid changes, shocks and struts, to more involved engine work and diagnostics. I am very happy going there, they tell me the truth about my car and keep me safe and running. Will use them first and have no issue recommending them.
None
Great spot to go paddle boarding. Their prices are the best in town and they have a 'price match' in case you happen to find a better deal. Great customer service and a great location!
EVERYTHING Food In Bloom provided for our event--the food, the presentation and the staff were exemplary. Their professionalism and execution exceeded our expectations. We will certainly recommend Food In Bloom highly to anyone in need of their services. And, we will jump at the chance to hire them again for our next event. A special thank you to Krystal Kelch, Tom Sted and their excellent servers. The staff magically set everything up and then boxed the leftover (delicious) food, swept the floors and exited the building cleaner than it was when they got there! Simply wonderful! If a five star rating is the best, we give Food In Bloom 6 stars!
Paw Country owner/operator is very knowledgeable about pet nutrition and was very helpful when I needed to choose a new food for my kitties. The food and treats in stock are based on sound nutrition and sold at fair prices. If you've resisted switching to holistic food because of price; give it a try, the difference you will see in your pets will make you a believer.
None
best food in town and reasonable prices
Прекрасно място направено с много вкус,използвайки българските традиции,бит и фолклор.Добра българска кухня и отлично обслужвате.
Bert's has been my local go-to beer shop for the last year or so. I can't find anywhere else in this area that compares to the great selection of brews (not to mention the friendliness, knowledge and passion for great beer the staff have). I would recommend Bert's to anyone looking for a large variety as well as the charming personality of a smaller business. Support your local brew shop!
I have been taking my pets to see Dr. Franklin forever! My dogs love him, he's great with the cat and I couldn't ask for a better vet. I will say that Sheila is a fantastic person to have as a receptionist, although the last time I was there the girl on reception wasn't very welcoming. I will continue to go though Dr Franklin is amazing!
Great Farmers Market - lots of variety. very reasonably priced flowers. Coffee is delicious! Growing Home is our favorite farm - they are located in Chicago! ALso love Bennison's Bakery and their Sweet City Bread.
In my opinion, this is by far the best sushi place in Spokane. The food is consistently outstanding. To start, my wife and I love the chicken lettuce wraps. I love their Pearl and Red Dragon rolls and I always order some sashimi as well. Always excellent! My kids (6 and 8) also love coming here. Service has always been very good for us. We have also ordered the food as take out on multiple occasions. The food is well packaged for the ride home -- no complaints. Unlike others on this post, I have never had a bad experience there and my family has probably visited this spot around 15 times now.
Backbone Chiropractic is awesome! Dr. Batdorf has been instrumental in helping me to manage my health and to heal from years of back pain. I would not hesitate to recommend her!
I went in to pay a phone bill. I got was a big smiled and a welcome greeting. At the time I wasn't planning on changing my phone but the employee was so good to me. He pointed out that my phone would stop working soon and If I did change my phone I would have better service everywhere I go. He wasn't lying! I love it! I would always go back to that place! He loved him and the place!!!! I always tell my friends about it :D
None
I've been going to the guys at Your Choice Inala for a few years now, both for tyres and car servicing and have no hesitation in recommending them to other car owners - in fact a number of my friends do go there and also recommend to others - which shows how consistent YCTM are in their commitment to service. Recently had a rather horrid noise emitting from my car so of course I called them. Brad Mullins took great care of me, identified the issues and did a temp fix so I could drive the car till parts turned up. Then gave me an excellent price on what would have been a disaster if ignored. This is a great team who go out of their way to ensure you and yours will be safe on the roads. I'm hitting the road for FNQ today and can only hope I find another company half as good as this team. Special thanks to Brad and all the team there :)
From a fairly new student perspective, I would suggest and recommend Mr. Machado's RCJ Machado Jiu Jitsu. What you can expect? Great people and an open environment for learning. I drive from Rockwall and its worth it. For anyone considering learning a martial art for self defense, MMA, training, fitness or just spiritual progress - RCJ Machado is simply the best. Review from a real student who has made significant progress towards my personal goals. Thanks to the entire team.
Just picked up my Mark Schneider ring for my 50th Birthday. We ordered it when Mark Schneider was at Spectrum Art and Jewelry in Wilmington NC. It was awesome to meet Mark and know that my ring was going to be custom made to our specifications. Star Sosa was awesome in helping us select a diamond to complete the setting. We couldn't be happier with our experience. We hoped the ring would be here in time for my birthday and it arrived a few days early. They went above and beyond to have our custom order completed. We'll be taking my old settings in to Spectrum Art and Jewelry to be redesigned and reset into some kind of new piece/s. Star has an awesome program that allows you to see new designs and make your own one of a kind piece. We are looking forward to designing something new.
McAdams Dental surpasses any dental experience I have ever had. Don McAdams and his beautiful wife Jaimie have shown compassion and empathy while maintaining a high level of professionalism. The entire staff are warm, kind and understanding. I enjoy sharing a bit of humor with Dr. McAdams as I love to hear him laugh while working on my smile. I highly and without any doubt recommend McAdams Dental along with the entire experience they provide to each of their patients. They are all a 10+ in my book as well as my heart. Lori V Orlando
Technician was very professional and personable. He has good interpersonal skills.
Very accommodating, friendly staff. Cleanest and most well-maintained hostel I've seen. Would definitely return if I wind up in Phoenix again.
I have had serious credit problems and have managed to get my finances repaired. I had found a small house within my income level and went to several mortgage brokers to see how I could get financed. They were discouraging and things looked bad for my hopes of buying a home. I had heard about Mandi Feely Swain and decided to give it one last try. I’m glad I did because she listened and helped me find a mortgage plan that worked with my new credit situation. I will get a home, a mortgage and terms I can live with thanks to her. I’m glad I persisted in searching for the right mortgage broker.
Great food with the decor to go with it. Had the Lime Grilled Shrimp Tacos for lunch and will defiantly be going back.
Well my experience was the best. Mervyn Riley looked out for me 100% and I'm 100% satisfied. I'd reccomend him to anyone looknig for a vehicle.
sono soddisfatto e ci tornero' spesso, un posto incantevole
I am glad They found someone who has the time to do the bike shop.
None
I really enjoy going to Signal Garage, I trust their judgement and know that I will receive honest and prompt service. The promotions are great too that they offer through their newsletter!
The Metropolitan Museum is probably one of the best art museums in the world and definitely the best in the United States. From the opulence of its art collections to state of the art facilities, it s definitely worth a go.
Fantastic food, not ur ordinary curryhouses with unique keralan combination of flavours. Get in there and try it for yourself
Excellent service from the front desk, kid had red hair, I forgot his name but he was the most polite and helpful person I have encountered in my many travels, and I do travel alot. The room was clean, newspapers available, cost was about $70 for two beds, breakfast was gravy, fruit, yogart, cereal, bread, waffles, muffins and more. I liked my stay there and I will be coming back!! And, it was just sold by LaQuinta to Brooks Inn.. I dont' know what kind of effect that will have on quality for the future.
Awesome pizza,always so damn good i stuff myself silly.
Gwynne is an extremely talented therapist, especially for anyone with a history of trauma. She is kind, patient, and very skilled. You won't go wrong with her on your side.
Very friendly, helpful staff that do not mind spending time with you as you struggle to make a purchasing decision. It's a small store, but keeps decent stock. They will order you anything you need- I just recently got a Mossberg 500 barrel for less than anything I could find online. Other area gun stores are driving prices up, but this shop has not. Gun, accessory, and ammo prices are reasonable (with a few really great deals) for the stock on hand. They don't tack on all kinds of hidden charges either. This local gun store has done well enough to get all my business that I had previously done on the internet.
Excellent shop. I have had our cars worked on many times here and they are always fast and honest. Great work from minor oil changes to oil pans & starters.
This is one of the best climbing gyms I have ever been to! Not only are the routes interesting and different, but also the staff and community that supports this gym are incomparable. I am a mediocre climber who usually feels intimidated by the unfriendly hulk climbers that would usually hang around a a climbing gym. Not once have I even remotely experienced that at Vital. I typically climb there twice a week and have never had anything but rave reviews of this place. Most the time I can show up by myself and find people I don't know to climb with. If you are even debating visiting the place, just go! It's a great for hanging out and I even use it as my makeshift office when necessary. I have met climbers of all levels there, but all of them are willing to lend a hand or share beta. This is one gym that really knows how to foster a community.
I recently had a problem with my laptop. Since I own a business I am not able to be without my computer for any length of time. I found All Star Tech Support online and gave them a call. Jeff, the owner was very personable and knowledgeable and was able to help me the same day. I was up and running on my laptop within a few hours. I would highly recommend All Star Tech Support to anyone that has a computer problem.
Had the BBQ Chicken pizza and loved it. Just tried the pizza pretzels, they are awesome!
Delicious pasta and smooth, creamy sauce with the Fettucini Alfredo dish. Nice environment. Friendly service. Great place for date night.
Outstanding. Would highly recommend!
A+. Terrific people to deal with. Very helpful and truly cared about helping me and my family. So glad I called them,
Всё отлично
Great Atmosphere... Great Food... It's my only place for sushi in Tampa
Comida Deliciosa y muy Buena Atención.
Complete peace of mind every time I start my vehicles. This is due to 5 years of high quality maintenance at Alan's Automotive & Diesel. From my Company Truck, to my personal truck and my wife's car. Especially my wife's car, Its very important to any husband to make sure our wives never break down on the side of the road. My company truck is an 03 Chev with 244,000 + miles on the clock. It runs better than the day I bought it. It is imperative that my work truck starts every time. My business would really suffer without a reliable mechanic to keep a 10 year old truck maintained. The Tech's are familiar with my vehicle and when it needs service or maintenance, Alan provides great detailed quotes that the Dealers cant touch.
Great service! Very friendly, Ben came in and was fast, efficient and very friendly. Thank you for the great work! The best part is three months later the stains are still gone! I will recommend them to all my friends.
None
I was not actually scheduled for a service I was requesting, but they accepted my vehicle without any issues. They explained everything in detail in words I could understand, what was needed for my car and since I am not a vehicle technician that made it pretty cool. The customer lounge is always clean and plenty of water. Lastly, everyone was so helpful and respectful which made my visit very pleasant and I will be taking my vehicle for its 40K check-up at Mercedes Benz of Alexandria, I just enjoy the easy of getting in, receiving a text, and getting out. THXS MofA Ms. Stewart (Red)
Great hotel for the money. Very clean rooms and a nice pool. The staff is super friendly and the Manager, Kathy, took very good care of us. If you need a place to stay near the Waterford or Burlington area this is the place you want to be...
None
None
WOW!! I was satisfied with the food and service on the other hand ,they did shorted my Girl on her Bacon they gave her one slice and a 1/2 and she did complain I thought that was over doing it ..lol I was very shock that she complain about something like that.. lol wow
Today I took in my Harley rear wheel to have a new tire put on, this place rocks I didnt have to wait and the job was great and everything was so professional and clean.I used to take my work to m&c in long beach but not anymore. I have found my new bike shop...
A MELHOR UNIVERSIDADE DO BRASIL E UMA DAS MELHORES DA AMÉRICA LATINA.
Best Coffee in Media City. Great experience / good vibe. Superb.
None
Simply outstanding and delicious food,you really need to get familiar with the culture in order to understand the traditional dishes.Very great service and all around tasty....Got to try the Lechones dish next time around,which will be very soon....
Great local place I would suggest to anyone for car needs!
None
None
I absolutely love Bella Spa, everyone here is very kind and knowledgeable, I have been coming here for two years and enjoy it even more since the remodel. I always leave feeling relaxed and refreshed.
Great waffle and breakfast steak!!
what a great spot at the base of whistler mountain. great food and staff with quite reaaonable prices
My wife and I finally had the opportunity to eat at Swan Oyster Depot and it was worth the 1-hour-plus wait in line. The sashimi of ahi, albacore and scallops in olive oil with chopped red onions and capers was delicous, as was the smoked trout and smoked salmon; the kumamoto and blue point oysters; the combination seafood cocktail of bay shrimp and dungeness crab meat topped with a plump oyster and a boiled shrimp; the little neck clams with green pepper mignonette; and the crab butter (the guts of a dungeness crab served in the shell with a little water, turning the fatty, crabby innards into a delicious broth that was delectable on pieces of sourdough bread). Guy, Steve, Kevin and the guys were great hosts. We had a great time and a great meal.
None
Last Tuesday I took advantage of the Chevrolet "Sign and Drive" promotion to buy a 2013 Chevy Camaro from Findlay Chevrolet in Las Vegas. Although my primary residence is in Arizona, over the past couple of years I have found myself working in Las Vegas so much that my car rental expenses have come in at well over $600 a month on average, So I decided to contact somebody I know that works at Findlay Chevrolet and see what kind of deal I could get. After several text messages, I drove out to the dealership and met with my friend, Jamaal McCoy who is the dealership GM. I met Jamaal at an industry event in Miami a couple years ago and we have stayed in contact since. Jamaal asked me to work with a salesman at the dealership by the name of "Larry". Larry was fairly new, but was exceptionally helpful and pulled up 3 2013 Chevy Camaros in different colors that met my equipment requirements... Right away i knew that I wanted the black one... very good looking car! When Jamaal presented the deal to me, including trading in a 2006 Mercury Mariner that I needed to dispose of for a relative that lives in Las Vegas, I was VERY pleasantly surprised. The monthly payments with no money down, and negative equity of about $1,200 in my trade-in came out to less than $375 a month. I smiled, accepted the deal and thanked Jamaal for his courteous treatment and better than expected numbers. After going through the documentation process, getting our complimentary accessories from their accessory department, a Findlay Chevy employee who specializes in doing vehicle deliveries took me through all the new Camaro's systems, Bluetooth set up with my phone and made sure I knew how to operate the vehicle... Away we went, in one of the smoothest and most aggravation free new car buying experiences I have ever had.
None
Excellent service. Always a great job and priced well. I have an auto repair shop that is nowhere near Renu but we travel and recommend customers across the city due to poor experiences at competitors closer to home.
The friendly staff at Great Lakes Dentistry always make me feel comfortable and take good care of me. Dawn, the hygienist, always cleans my teeth so that they feel spotless and shiny. She's so gentle that I could take a nap in the chair, but fortunately her sense of humor keeps me awake and smiling. Dr Shawn thoroughly checks any x-rays and re-examines my teeth, guns and even tongue before giving me a clean bill of health. I leave feeling refreshed and satisfied knowing I've given my teeth the best care. Thanks to all of you at Great Lakes for continuing to make my visits pleasant, painless, and healthy.
Great place to get whatever you are looking for. A place you can make get friends with, and people you can trust will always take care of you. I'll never get sick of going into that store.
This place rocks! Surprise Carmel, this is the restaurant / bar you have been waiting for!!!!
Having just recently been burned by Kal Tire i returned to Green and Ross with my other car. First time this location. Expecting the worst, desk manager came out to parking lot, inspected my tires and reassured me that replacing only one tire was necessary. He had an easy in to hose me resisted and the rest of the visit was as i could only have hoped it would be. Nice to get real service, genuine desire to deliver and no nasty feeling youve just been had. Thanks
I can't recommend this facility enough! My daughter has learned so much since enrolling her. The playground is not huge but it is appropriate for the ages of the children. *They were great with helping potty train. *They work with parents financially through their Open Doors program. *Healthy meals and snacks *Family activities hosted by the center for the families and children. I LOVE THIS PLACE!
Quick and accurate. Everything I needed was completed in a timely manner.
Been going to Steve for several Years. Very Honest and very reasonable. Saved me a bunch of $$$ by telling me the truth about what I needed to fix. Tires+ tried to sell me $1k worth of repair I didn't need. Steve has earn my trust and my business and will earn yours.
None
super visite avec un guide génial
I do not know how anyone could be giving this place a bad review. The food here is superb. The staff is always friendly, although service is not always quick. Just relax and enjoy the slower pace. The food here takes time because it is made to order. The Dum Aloo is the best I have ever had, the Kaju Curry is out of this world delicious, and the Mulligatawny Soup is amazing. Also try the Paneer Tikka and the Masala Dossa, both are fantastic. Really, everything I have ever had here is wonderful!
Staff are friendly and food is excellent. Portions are large too
None
Borgo incantevole dove poter riscoprire la bellezza della semplicità e della natura trentina
None
My kids love taking nature classes here, the teachers and volunteers are amazing, the classes are a great way to bond with your kids. I definitely recommend the Houston Arboretum.
Un piccolo paradiso, Veramente consigliato.
I really like their Pho. I never been to Vietnam, but the soup looks very authentic and very good compare to other similar eateries. It's a real thing!
Great pizza and pasta !
I loved the food and the service. it was so good. I was also glad that one of the chefs was by the door upon leaving, so I could rave about how much I enjoyed my meal. I hope many of my friends go and enjoy it as much as me.
Love it! Have the best Friday n Saturday nights...I love tequila Tuesdays $2 tequila all night...I recommend you try it out they have awesome bartenders.
Malibu motors is the best alternative to a Mercedes-Benz dealership for cars older and new alike. Henry, a very assertive and knowledgeable owner. His team is right on point to what a car needs. I took ny 1999 C230 suspension and work, and I am very satisfied Sith the end result. They are what a service repair facility should be. And the customer service follow up and notifications just makes this a better review. I highly recommended to anyone who owns a Mercedes-Benz of any year make and model. You will not be disappointed.
Went there for a $35 3 course meal which was absolutely amazing! I had the masala seared scallops, tiger prawn and scallop main dish (with garlic aoli and black bean rice pilaf) and finished with a dessert of pot de creme - a small portion but sensibly due to its extreme richness. Everything was top notch including the service from our server, Will who was one of those rare gems that takes pride in delivering an exceptional experience. I also had a caesar and it was, perfect. Would highly recommend.
None
Excellent food and service .
Our grandfather is suffering from parkingson's dissease and this conpany has given us the security and trust that we were looking for him. He is 76 years old and we are not always available as we do work 9-5. Advancare offered us the possibility of sending us a professionally trained caregiver that is with him throughout the day. The caregiver takes him out for a walk (when it's not that hot) she does the grocery shipping for the house with him so that he gets distracted. She is extremely polite and responsible. Parkingson's dissease is hard as they person with it can not do activities for too long. That's why someone should be there in care our grandfather needs to go back home. Im glad that we found Advancare, it's been over a year with their service and we can say we are 100% satisfied!
Best dining experience I have had in Fort Wayne for a long time! We were there recently for dinner and had the best time and food! They have really stepped up their quality and service at this restaurant! I had the Porterhouse Pork Chop with the Garlic Parm Risotto, and the Pepper Jack Mac. They were all great and the food quality was top notch! I highly suggest you give this place a try!
Very comfortable, clean, perfect for walking into Pitlochry town centre. Really enjoyed our stay here.
Dear Bobby & Danielle, A huge THANK YOU for all of the time & energy that went into making the 3 rings for Alisha & I, (especially her absolutely stunning engagement ring!!). It was our friends who initially recommended you to us, now we get to highly recommend you to others. We're both just so pleased how everything turned out, we very much look forward to having you as our lifetime jeweller. From the bottom of our hearts, thank you again. Ben & Alisha xx
I needed a very special baby gift for a close friend. I called Green & Green and told the story of this precious arrival. Mindy immediately came up with a very meaningful lasting gift. Our family was so pleased to give such a quality and beautiful present to our friends. Mindy really is a Chief Gift Officer! Thank you for such wonderful and personal service. Kindest regards, Elizabeth
Beth did our wedding photography and I was really, REALLY impressed with her work. First, she is stealthy. Seriously, we never felt like we were having a camera awkwardly pushed in our faces and the only posed photos were ones we wanted. She managed to catch candid, unique, beautiful pictures of everyone at our wedding. We've all been overexposed to traditional wedding photography and Beth's style is absolutely refreshing. She captures angles that highlight the natural surroundings without drowning out the subjects, she gets those rare moments when kids light up and are in awe of the world around them and even manages to avoid the ugly cry. I have never felt more beautiful than when Beth captured my image and I actually usually despise pictures of myself. I also must mention that she is fastidiously dedicated to her art. She regularly attends workshops (creativeLIVE anyone?) to stay at the front of her field and it shows. She obviously spends countless hours picking out the cream of the crop photos and meticulously editing them to perfection. And her TALENT. Again, you can't fake that. She's gifted! If you have any reason to even think about working with her--don't hesitate. You'll be blown away!
Having recently switched the company over to a UK Fuels account, I've opened an account myself which was very easy and efficient. With Oliver as my account manager he explained how the account will work and all has gone to plan. Will recommend to all my colleagues.
got home from a long day at work to a clogged kitchen drain in the basement so I decided to call the plumbers that came to fix my water softener problem last time. got on the phone right away and called roto-rooter from Lombard they came out in 30 minutes and did a great job with that sink and my water softener had a great experience with both plumbers and I will always call roto- rooters with all my plumbing problems
The best nursery school in Beacon. Developmentally appropriate activities, wonderful attention to individual children's needs, and a great staff. Don't go here if you want your kids to do worksheets all day: they will play, paint, sing, listen to stories, learn to get along with others and to follow directions. This is the stuff kids really need to learn before they enter school!
J H Mountain Auto Services took a look at my van when other service centers were too busy or not customer friendly. J H checked out the van and gave me the information I needed in a very open and helpful way. Having talked through our options, we opted to tow the vehicle out of the mountains. Kamil helped us get a rental car at a very decent rate.
H.K. Institute of Management Studies & Research (H.K.I.M.S.R.), located in the heartland of Mumbai has achieved incredible feat within 5 years of its inception. The B-School has been ranked among top 100 B-Schools in India by Business World in 2011, 2012, 2013 and All India Management Association (A.I.M.A.) in 2013. The campus is proud to offer innovative pedagogy, industry-experienced faculty and a high-pedigree technology enabled learning environment.
Peter Soh has been my CPA since 2008. When I met with him, I was starting finishing school and working on my business concept. Peter provided me great advices, critical information related to taxes, up-to-date explanations about business structures, great suggestions for foreign entrepreneurs in the USA and personalized assistance about bookkeeping and Quickbooks. Peter also brought a cross-cultural perspective to his work, which is invaluable in our global society. Hiring Peter Soh to form and register U in the USA LLC was the best decision I ever made.
It is nice to have such a trustworthy service in west LA. I know I can always count on Ron to have my packages ready for me every time I am in the area to pick them up. With the restrictions and prices of airport luggage, this has become an incredible service that I cannot do without.
The music playlist is awesome, incredibly varied, and the atmosphere is very cozy. Possibly the cleanest public bathrooms I've ever seen, and the service is very personal and friendly. They try to make sure you feel as comfortable and satisfied as possible. Very Impressed.
I've owned 5 Saturns and was heartbroken when the company went out of business. I was dreading looking at something else and dealing with "sleazy salesmen." I dealt with Preston Coleman at Spadley Barr. He was friendly, informative, helpful and low pressure. This helped me make up my mind about my replacement vehicle and I am now the proud owner of a beautiful cx-5! Thank you Preston and Spradley Barr!
I had the most professional experience with Tomball Ford when I, a 66 year young woman bought my 1st Ford Mustang convertible. What a joy. They zipped the financing right though, low rate, low payment. The Mustang has been 3 years running in Christmas parades. Carrying the pagent contestant for the Waller Parade, who won the finals. I t was in the Magnolia Christmas Parade carrying the Grand Marshall. What fun it is to have a Mustang. They will be repairing my Explorer today. Thank you Tomball Ford for a good experience.
Best shrimp and catfish, fried or grilled in the south suburbs. Grilled salmon is great too. The salad has an awesome homemade vinaigrette dressing. Ample portions, enough to share.
Excellent restaurant with courteous service. Recommended for business lunches.
One of the most professional roofing contractors in Wilmington Delaware. They offer affordable prices and high quality.
Great little place snuggled back into a corner store front. Food is excellent and service is great. Portions are worth the price. This is the first place I've eaten that has since made me crave for a salad.
I came in looking for a last minute arrangement for the same evening, and I was initially told that all arrangements were done in advance, but the nice florist made me an amazing bouquet on the spot! It was exactly what I needed, the recipient loved it, and the price was well worth the quality. Thank you University Flower Shop, highly recommended!
I would like to take a moment to compliment Lionel in providing excellent service. Not only did he repair my vehicle he also pointed out other areas of concerns and provided a thorough understanding of the issues my car was experiencing. He was very knowledgable and I must say my vehicle is functioning better now. Thanks for the nice discount. I really appreciate it. Thank you and your team for superb customer service and satisfaction!
Helpful staff and great prices. Will do business with again.
This really is the fastest 1/4 mile on DIRT!
Fire Opal is my kind of place. In my opinion, it is just amazing from the moment you look into the front window. Each and every thing from a card to a dress is a lovely piece of Art. If you are lucky, as I have been more than once, you' ll find a treasure for yourself that you will have and love forever. A year ago it was a green hand knit vest, winter time it was a gray jersey knit skirt and I just fell in love with a ring and ordered it! The quality and appeal of everything at Fire Opal is excellent as is the service. Fire Opal is my kind of place, I wonder if it might be yours.
I got the best deal ever from Rand and his son. It is a great family that runs a great business. I would highly recommend them. They did everything they could to get me a good deal, I mean a great deal! They also made sure the car was as high quality as their service.
Immer wieder schön hier, lecker und gut!
Amazing fishing!!
Great food and service! Unlike the typical Korean bbq places, this place shows you the other side of Korean cuisine, plus it's healthy!
A great local garage who have always been very honest with regards to any work needed to my car and also given great advice for keeping it in good condition. I would recommend J&B Autos to anybody in the Beeston area.
WOW.. Met me on a Sunday to bring me the part I needed to repair my dryer!! Thanks Murf!!! :)
Hay un bar, St. Patick's, en el que se esta de lujo, y los domingos por la noche se hacen monologos, una muy biena opcion para pasar un buen rato!
I have known Dave Johnson since 1998 .I am a tile contractor myself and hired dave for about 5 years .I do most work myself ,however Dave was one guy I trusted to do jobs for me .He always did great work for me , and had happy customers.I since moved to Colorado and DJ Tile has went his way and is doing well.It is hard to find a man with great integrity,and a tile business that is an owner operated shop,as DJ Tile is.I wish I had a replacement for him now ,but that is a hard find.If you hire Dave Johnson you will get a great job.At a fair price,and will meet a great person.
Our stay at Inn of the Patriots was absolutely delightful!!! The museum-type atmosphere was so interesting, the tour was worth the money by itself - fascinating!!! The breakfast was delicious too. It is an old house, so do not expect it to be like a new Ritz Carlton Hotel - it is an historic bed and breakfast! BUT, it is very nice, clean, well decorated and still has the modern conveniences of cable TV and wi-fi. Could not have had a better time, been more welcomed, and learned more at any get-away location. My wife and I HIGHLY RECOMMEND this place!
The staff always have a smile here. There's gluten free options (great for me) and they even taste good! Favorites: gluten free spinach wrap and the white chocolate lavender mate latte. Amazing. It's a comfortable atmosphere for hanging out and getting some work done, too.
She saved my life, she is the best therapist I have ever met and is great at giving nutrition values. As an accupuncturist, she is the greatest. I call her my special miracle worker and recommend her to everyone I meet. Thanks Jaz.
nothing beats their roasted garlic appetizer!
My perfectly good iPhone 4 stopped working immediately after deleting the Facebook app. The Home button was no longer operational. Additionally, the Home button on Assistive Touch was not operational. The phone is over a year old, so the Apple Store wouldn't do anything about it (other than offer to swap it for a new one for $150. They referred me to iExpert Studio in the Kenwood Mall. I went there and explained my problem. The support person was puzzled when he learned that the Assistive Touch wasn't working. He asked if he could take the cover off. I said sure. He took it off, and reset the battery, and voila! All is working again. He didn't charge me anything, and within 5 minutes I was walking out of the mall with a working iPhone. A very happy customer! Thanks iExpert Studio :)
Thank you for the work you did! I am very happy with the result!
None
Freundliche Bedingungen und gute Beratung. Kleine nette Cocktail bar mit Havanna feeling.
A great hangout for photographers.
This the second time we have used Welsh Telecom. Very experienced and very reliable. We are very pleased!
sorry guys, but this place closed :(
I've never met a Chiropractor with as much knowledge of anatomy as Dr. J. She is diligent and has only one goal in mind... Get you better so she doesn't need to see you all the time! I've had so many chiropractors in the past just crack me up and send me on my way but not here. She is invested in making your life better and healthier. She will give you "homework" to get better and hold you accountable. I'll never have another chiropractor again as long as she is in business. Thank you for being awesome. Tommy
Don't ever judge a book by its cover...It doesn't look like the best restaurant but the local ethiopeans eat right here and it's because the food is probably the best I've had....very clean on the inside and great service
Martin Bentsen has been my headshot photographer since 2010. He does fantastic work. His prices are affordable and the service is impeccable! Martin does not make you feel rushed either. He takes his time to make sure that you're comfortable so that you can get the most out of your session.
None
انصح بالذهاب إليه
Excellent service and great food.. Our waitress Kerry is the best.
State Farm referred me to B&L. The staff is helpful and their repair work and paint jobs are excellent. My 2000 Honda looks brand new.
None
Great independent coffee place
I've been going to Dr Lane for fourteen years. He is very congenial, and an expert chiropractic practitioner. My professional banjo playing has me holding my body in an unnatural position for long periods of time. He has fixed me up, kept me fixed and given me very helpful exercises to do on my own. I highly recommend Dr. Lane. His expert deep tissue massage is what helped me the most!
Friendly staff, knowledgeable and helpful. While they may not have everything you will want on hand, simply because their storage space is very limited, they can generally have it in the same day (if you get your order placed early enough) or the next day. They do the best they can in a limited space, and often go out of their way to take care of their customers. I highly recommend them.
The best!
I hadn't been to the dentist for nearly 10 years before coming to this Coast Dental location (being a broke art student sort of makes it hard to get insurance) and I've always been super afraid of dentists because of some horrible experiences I had as a child. In addition, I actually ended up assigned to this office accidentally due to a mix-up by an old insurance provider. However, I have to say that I am super happy that the mistake was made as I couldn't be happier to have Dr. Richardson as my provider. The office itself is super clean and really inviting, and the staff is really great at making you feel welcome. Dr. Richardson herself is a really kind woman and I really appreciate that she explains what needs to be done in procedures in a pretty simple manner. She, and her staff, are also really gentle when to procedures and they do their best to make sure that you're not experiencing any discomfort. I, in particular, have a pretty decent pain tolerance, but I know that there are some people out there that don't so I think it's a major plus. As a note, regarding some of the negative reviews I've seen below: The payment plans that they offer there do operate on DEFERRED interest and not 0 interest. But, even if they may have slipped up and said no interest instead of deferred, it's really your responsibility as a patient to read all of the paperwork that they give you before you go signing anything. They're not the ones paying the bill, you are, and all of the paperwork that they present you state all of the details of the plan. The staff is pretty patient so they're not going to rush you into putting your signature down, especially considering that the doctor pretty much runs a one-woman show there and could easily find something else to do in order to give you time to read through things. So, I'd say that if you really want to be sure, let them know that you'll need a moment to go through everything before you fill anything out. That being said: a deferred interest plan is still better than nothing at all, especially if your bill happens to be on the small side and you know you can pay it off in way less than a year but just don't have the money then and there to foot the whole thing. Whoa, this ended up pretty long! Anyways, if you're looking for a new dentist I highly recommend giving this office a chance. :D
None
My gf and i's favourite restaurant
None
Friendly staff
Great new Taco Mac with a 70+ flat screens for sports viewing. Roasted wings are awesome. Only drawback is a limited beer selection in comparison to other Taco Macs, with less than 200
Great place. Helpful staff, cool location, good beer selection, free WiFi.
They did a great job of replacing our water heater last year quickly for a reasonable price!
Great attitude, high quality work, willing to flexible about scope of the painting job and my special requests, fair price. Will call on them again!
Brandon and David were very helpful and patient dealing with me, and I am probably the worst kind of customer. Stubborn, and set on the price I wanted to pay. They worked with me and my wife and we found a price we were all happy with. Went out of their way for me and the customer service is stellar. Thanks guys, love the vehicle!!
Excellent business. Fair prices and great work by the guys here. Pleasant to deal with and they always strive to do right by their customers, and that's not something that can be said for many businesses nowadays.
None
Bought a 2013 optima and a 2013 Rio and customer service was great!! Juan Arturo Yu and Eloy Juarez treated us like family and geave us an amazing deal and 90 days to pay our first payment. We highly recomend Viva Kia and ask for them 2 to get the best deal possible. Alex Huereca & Jenn Huereca REALTORS.
BEST STEAKS EVER...THE VALID PARKING SUCK"S...AND THE ONLY I LIKE WAS THE STEAK...AND THE SERVICE COULD WAY BETTER...
Great Cafe, they are always welcoming and friendly!
Excellent service! I couldn't be happier with the service and work I received. I needed two tires on my car and was looking for used tires because of the cheaper price. I was never hassled or pressured for new tires. The staff understood my need and happily put them on. The price was reasonable and the service time was perfect. I went in with my 5 year old and my 3 year old and they both received toys to pass the time. I will take my car back again for other repairs. .
its all about the drinks and sweet eats the rest is good to
I have a hard time believing that the family that operates this place yells at customers. My family and I have been picking pizza up from here for yeeeeeaaars and have never had a problem or seen one take place! The pizza is great and is more than your moneys worth. As for the service, maybe they just know me too well!
A friend of mine recommended Dr. Le and his staff to me with glowing praise. She was absolutely right. Going to Dr. Le's office is always a wonderful experience. I love that they're always on time and wait is almost always nonexistent. Everyone in the office is very professional, knowledgeable and accommodating. I would recommend anyone to Dr. Le and staff. Keep up the fantastic work, Crystal Creek Dental!
None
We came during the art fair and it was only about a 10 minute wait. The service was very good and our server was knowledgeable and helpful with the food selection. We got a couple pizzas & sandwiches which were very good but the OMG Sandwich was amazing & I definitely recommend it.
I have eaten at Shine Café many times and the experience was great....the Food was delicious and the service was unbelievable....thanks!
Super Essen, auch die kleine Karte zwischen 14 und 18 Uhr. Netter Garten mit Kinderspielmöglichkeit.
None
Toby and Richard did an AMAZING JOB!!!! SERIOUSLY!! THIS PLACE IS LEGIT!! They took care of me like if I was one of them! This is some real service here! They mean business and they give great quality customer service! This is the place to go for any phone issues or accessories!! Thank you guys for fixing my wife's S4 this was a great experience!!
This is one of the best QT's in Tulsa. Kind, courteous, and wonderful staff are there to help and expedite your experience with a smile. I am a regular and always get constant wonderful service. Rallie
None
Fantastic job!
It's basically Chipotle, but stuffed with Indian food. It's basically the perfect lunch place, or a quick dinner. Hard to imagine it being better.
These guys are top notch people. We needed work done basically redoing our entire heating system in the basement and they took it on with gusto and had it done in only a few days. It works great and we've had zero problems with it. They also came by and helped us check out an issue with our attic furnace and it was over and fixed within 10 minutes of being here. Awesome company that I'd definitely recommend.
super place! loved it from the minute i walked into the door. this place is something very special. the waitress was as you wish every waitress to be: friendly, alert, warm, distant but open, fast - and the burger was 1st class. clearly i have to come back for music, more food and stay over night up there! highly recommend!!
Fast and easy. And very nice drivers!
None
Raymond from Legend was great from beginning to end. He answered all my questions promptly and I ended up with the exact car I wanted, at a great price, delivered right to my door. I was skeptical about this all at first, but it turned out to be fantastic.
The BMW was very clean and nearly new. My wife said "whoah" when she saw the car. The staff was very polite. We spend 2 weeks staying in London.
A morada n esta correcta
It is not just the amazing coffee and service but also a great place to mingle with friends and furry friends. With its dog friendly patio there's no comparison to the competition! Come in and enjoy the comedy nights, music and above all superb coffee!
It is the place where you should go if you want to spend some time near a beach. The food provided here is good too. You can enjoy your stay here.
Iam 47 and Watched from the window of my store as people ran by day after day, until one day I had the courage to ask what everyone was doing. I found Crossfit…. WOW..It’s amazing how it has changed my life. I was out of shape, unhappy and a little bored. Not now..I have more energy and Iam getting in great shape, I also was Able to compete in the Warrior Dash thanks to CrossFit North Pacific. I have a bunch of new friends my age, older and younger...The workouts are always a blast, Polly & Dave are simply the best, always there to encourage, support and motivate you. One of the things I love about CrossFit North Pacific is the awesome support you get from everyone who is working out with you. We are a TEAM and no one feels alone….
Been going here for years. Love the food, Love the prices, Love the place.
13 Colonial USA 241st Atlantic Empire New York 1000th Eternal Light Years
A hidden gem
it is 100% O.B. I GIVE IT ALL 5 STARS BECAUSE IT IS O.B. FUN PARTY AND LIVE ON
I was extremely pleased with the service and would totally recommend this establishment to anybody who's worried about bed bugs and is looking for a reputable pest control place to check things out. The exterminator was very nice and he carefully explained everything to us and actually cared about our solving our problem rather than just spraying and leaving. Worth every penny!
So far I have had to visit three times in the past year. I drive a 1999 Silverado, with 210000 miles, so all the work they have done is to replace original factory parts. January 4th, as I was driving to work, my power steering went out, and the engine started to oveheat. I brought it into them, and they show me the original water pump, factory installed in 1998, had died. It is a 60000 mile part. I got 205000. Total charges were about 300 bucks including labor and taxes. Back in early September, my power steering went out again (I didn't have them fix it in January), and they diagnosed the power steering pump, also factory original was done. A leaking line had dried and fried the system. My fault for not having it fixed earlier when they told me about it. Total cost was about 500 bucks. Just this past week, I was driving and my truck completely stalled out and wouldn't even crank. Diagnosis: Fuel pump (factory original, with a 100000 mile warranty) and fuel filter (also a factory original, which I never got around to changing due to being overseas for most of the previous nine years) were shot. They replaced both within a day of me dropping off the truck, total cost 650 bucks. Not bad considering what a car payment each month would be. Also not bad considering maintenance was not properly done/documented while I was overseas. These guys have done nothing but quality work for me. It is a bit pricey, but I'd rather spend 1400 dollars over a year in maintenance than pay 500-800 bucks a month on a car note and insurance. These guys have earned my business for as long as I live in the area.
Everything was top notch with this firm, they went above and beyond to ease our mind with the entire process, and after! Mr. Paolucci was very patient with my wife and I, and answered all of our questions, and really just made everything very clear and understandable from start to finish. I would VERY much recommend this firm to anyone in need of their services.
It is with great pleasure that I recommend McLoughlin Plumbing & Heating Co. to anyone who has to replace their heating/air conditioning system! When we realized our old system was having problems, we called several companies for estimates. McLoughlin's "Chris" was knowledgeable and patient answering any and all questions that we had. The installation team was prompt, professional, and took the extra care necessary to ensure that they were neat/careful throughout the entire process. We are very happy with our choice to use McLoughlin Plumbing & Heating Co. I know we can count on their service for years to come!!!
Great place for a hamburger. Fries are phenomenal. Service is spectacular. There's a little black lady there, sorry don't know her name, that does a fantastic job of making you feel welcome and appreciated. If you're eating there, she'll have you tell her your number so that she can bring you your food. Great place.
I am forever grateful to Eric Edwards and the Olive Garden team. They were my saving grace for my autumn wedding. Our original reception venue was flooded during the severe storms in September 2013 - right before the wedding. We frantically tried to find a new location to host our wedding reception. We were turned away from several other restaurants, or encountered a booking problem with other venues. We had originally planned on using the Olive Garden as our rehearsal dinner space; so we approached the management team to see if they could accommodate our entire wedding reception. We were told “yes” – and what a relief it was! We had half of the restaurant reserved for our 120 guests. They worked with us in piecing together a well-priced menu, that offered variety for our guests pallets. They even accommodated one of our guests who had Gluten Free needs! We were able to serve wine, soup/salad, an entrée, bread sticks, and desert for a very reasonable price. They also were kind enough to house our wedding cake, and provided the plates and flatware, along with our sparkling cider and stemware for the wedding toast (in lieu of champagne). The staff was super attentive to our guests’ needs, and were very kindly and respectful to our wedding party head table. The best part – they were genuinely happy to have us there. Eric really soothed our concerns, and was very kind, considerate and compassionate. He really impressed me. All in all – this was a great experience. All of our guests left happy, and the bride and groom were happy and relieved.
Good photo garafi
It has been over a year since we moved away from Arizona, and among many things that we miss, we talk most about missing Joe's Real BBQ in Gilbert. This place is the "real deal" and deserves all of the rave reviews.
They keep your music things musical.
None
Obviously the most reasonably priced place in the area. If your rich this place isn't for you. If you want a place to lay your head in between walleye,that provides some of the best food in the Northwoods then you hit the JACKPOT! I challenge you to the Sasquatch burger if your appetite is as big as the walleyes up there. This place makes me feel welcome EVERYTIME like I am part of the family. There are many options for lodging in the area but waste your money on that when your not even going to be in the room half the time... I'd rather spend my money on bait or beer.. THANKS MARTY DAWN and DON! You guys are the best ... BEST VALUE FOR THE BUCK!!! - Fisherman Ben..
INCREDIBLE
None
I worked with iBrolly for over five years, handling distribution in Canada and western America. Customers came back time and time again as they were always most impressed with the quality of the umbrellas - far superior to any other promotional umbrellas I've seen - as well as the lovely creative umbrella designs we produced. If you are looking for lovely, high quality promotional umbrellas I recommend iBrolly without hesitation. Do allow at least a month lead time though, or if possible more. As the umbrellas are all custom built in the factory, it takes a little extra time - but it's well worth the wait!
Dua is by far on of my favorite places to eat when I'm on this side of town! Soo delicious!
Great food, every one of the staff were overly nice and helpful! The wife and I will definitely return.
Great food. Excellent service. And Henry and May are the nicest people.
They have always been great. Keep me updated on all the updates that sprint is doing to towers and such. May not always like the answers but they do everything in their power to find answers and alway fix my issues.
Really not sure what the fuss is all about. I've been in and out of Mosquito a bunch of times over the past few years; bought a few things, asked a lot of questions, drooled over the odd super-bike and everyone I've delt with has been well informed, friendly and (crucially) patient with my mid-range level of bike knowledge. Are they more interested in selling italian steel to high end punters?..... almost certainly; but I dont recognise at all the rudeness/arrogance suggested in many of the other reviews. Plan to buy a bike there as soon as funds permit.
I've been buying bikes for 20+ years and this was by far my best experience. Austin did a great job along with Todd in finance. Thanks guys!
None
Once again! You guys are awesome! Late night delivery here on graveyard shift was right on time. Being from Texas, I've ate some damn good wings in my day... And to say that Big Daddy didn't contend is a mere lie. Some of the best damn wings I've had in a LONG time. (Hot Wings), Pizza and all was hot as hades when it got here. You guys rock. Keep up the great work!
Puleo's a;ways gives 100%. Even on the crappiest of cars. Thanks guys!
Irina Firstein is a high-integrity marriage counselor in nyc. Her advice is sincere, professional and always helpful.
great facilities, excellent coaching and each session is good fun
Cheerwine is Fantastic!!
Great cocktails, a very fun and dedicated staff. Bartenders are amazing and you can observe how involved they are when making drinks.I loved the view and the vibe of the place
Landmark Ford Lincoln"s body shop & parts store has friendly folks, they gave me lots of help, and saved me a ton of money. I was so pleasantly surprised by the way I was treated there - I will be telling friends about it for a long time and returning when ever I need parts and/or repairs!
Advanced Connections worked on the Midland Library project and their work was exceptional. Knowledgable, Certified and Professional Staff. BBB A+ rating!!
Amazing independent cafe in the middle of Cambridge. Great coffee and cannoli; a real reminder of holidays. Only bugbear is the queue - even on a weekday.
Anointed Touch Massage and Body Work is an small business growing in a big town.Telephone service can be better but online booking is a breeze. The Massage sessions are the best and the place is beautiful, tranquil and near by. Group-on clients may have some issues, like the last minute person wanting to get in and cannot. What does expiration date really mean? Understanding needs to be considered here. Over all experience is the essence of the matter and I say two thumbs up!
When looking for a photographer, it was important to my husband and I, to capture all of the details of our day in the photography… and capture it in a unique way. In looking at the Reilly’s professional online portfolio we knew that they would be a great fit for our day. On October 13th 2012 Ben and Megan traveled up to Door County, WI to shoot our wedding and as for the weather that day… It rained all day long and didn't let up. Being a bride can be a little stressful leading up to the ceremony, but when you add cold, rainy weather– when we had envisioned beautiful outside photography. I was a little disappointed, or so I felt for a brief moment. :) Megan and Ben contacted me prior to the ceremony giving me ideas on how we can make this work by being creative with umbrellas, location and the classic car we had reserved. They even drove around in advance to scope out a few locations with beautiful fall color. When I arrived at the church, although nerves were running high they made me feel so comfortable & calm… Almost as if they were family members. They were just wonderful throughout the entire day! Jay and I had a beautiful ceremony in bright country church, got some great shots with family, friends and our two dogs and then ventured out in the rain for some outside photos. All of us huddled under umbrellas – they were so positive and had smiles on their faces the entire time. We laughed about it all and made it fun. Just a few days after our wedding the photos were posted to their online gallery, so it was great so see them so quickly. They turned out absolutely gorgeous and exceeded our expectations! Overall, we are just thrilled with everything from start to finish and we look forward to working with the Reilly’s again when our new family grows someday. Thank you Ben and Megan for everything!
Very nice and peaceful apartments. Hidden from the main street. The maintenance is very helpful and friendly and the staff always helps me when I need it. Nice landscaping and the lake view is amazing! Very grateful for this place
Mike Kelly is a great Manager. He exceeded our expectations. The customer service is great. If you were ever unhappy with the Greeley, you need to go back and I am sure you will change your mind.
Great staff and clean units. Gated and secure
Wow! it takes me 2 mins to do my laundry now. I have been dropping off my laundry here for the last couple of weeks and the service has been great! I get it back folded the same way every time, I love the consistently and the service.
This is one of the best restaurants in the world! The food is second to none, the service is outstanding as the staff is friendly and super helpful, and the ambiance and the location of the place is in beach cove that I can only explain as heavenly and one of god's most beautiful creations. We've been to Maui 7 or 8 times as it's one of our favorite places to go on vacation. We never, ever leave that island without going to Mama's Fishhouse at least 2-3 times. Don't miss it!
Simple drug free way to quit smoking, professional and reliable practitioner, thanks! That Ondamed machine is amazing!
Great little local pub, with great outside space on cleaver square. Good beer from shepherd became.
This beautiful spa was the perfect spot for my recent visit to Houston. The moment I walked in I was greeted by my masseuse with a bottle of water and wonderfully relaxing music. The name Zen really describes what I felt once my massage began and she was very thoughtful about asking me about specific pressures and spots of tension. I also chose to use the sauna and they prescribed a wonderful combination of aromatherapy. I can't wait to try the cupping on my next visit. Thank you for a rejuvenating time! I will definitely use this as my "go to paradise" when visiting Houston.
Really great atmosphere and nice ales. Large selection of food and its nice too. Would definitely recommend for a nice lunch by the coast.
FSF is a special place. The clergy are gifted and magnificent. The cantor has a voice which might only be heard this side of an opera house and the rabbi exhibits a compassion, intellect and knowledge of human nature both ancient and modern that makes his sermons - and even just his presence - a life changing and life affirming experience. The synagogue itself is a work of art - beautiful 1920s style beaux arts architecture complete with some of the finest stained glass windows in the New York area. The congregation is diverse and always welcoming. This is a special place and entirely worth a visit. Cant recommend it highly enough!
We eat here all the time. Great modern food and Great Staff. Best place to eat in hawkesbury.
None
None
First off, I'd like to thank Darin Labette for his keen eye of quality and attention to details. Here's my story... In around October of 2012 I purchased (2) 15" rim sized Falken Rocky All Terrain tires from a Discount Tire in Nashville TN. I couldn't afford 4 so I purchased 2. Then they put the new ones on the rear and the best of my old bald tires up front. Great service as usual. Fast forward to Nov 2013.... I called around for the best prices to get my final 2 tires. I used my original receipt from D.T. with the exact model numbers and asked around. Not only did this location have THEE best deal in town, Darin beat my originally costs from the Nashville D.T. I went to! NOW this story gets better.... Upon my arrival, Darin noticed that someone accidently put the Falken Ziex model tires on my truck, not the Falken Rocky's I originally purchased. He said this was a rare odd situation but an honest mistake. The Falken name and their model numbers on both tires are very similar! Since this was a D.T. mistake from another state, he corrected it by replacing them for the correct tires at no cost. I drove almost 40,000 miles on the wrong ones! I purchased the final 2 at the negotiated price and I now have a complete NEW set for these crazy michigan white slip & slide winter months. Thank you again Darin. After being unemployed for almost a year and just starting my third week at my new job up here in the "D" I TRULY needed this. Snows a coming and I've got a 45 minute commute each way to work. Again thank you, your 5 star mechanics and Discount Tire for living up to the name on the front of their stores. Sincerely M.Porter By the way, while calling around, Bell Tires best prices were $68 more and they refused match or go any lower .!
None
great place for go-kart. Can accommodate more than 100 ppl at a time which makes it amazing place for office / family get together with lots of fun around...! Like it !
I spent a full day looking at every SUV and truck on all the websites. Building my perfect car with all the options I wanted. Problem being the price was always just to high. We hit a couple of other dealers before ending up at Jeff D'Ambrosio. I like that I wasn't attacked on the lot when we started to browse Big Plus. As soon as we were ready for help someone from Jeff directed us to Brook Donahue. Great guy, he helped us make a decision between the Jeep Cherokee TrailHawk and the Jeep Wrangler Unlimited. He didn't push us either way, just brought out both cars and gave us all the info we could ask for. Its nice not to be forced into something when making a big 5+ year decision. We ended up going with the Jeep Wrangler Unlimited and are very happy with it. They gave us a great trade in value on our Sante Fe right on par with Kelly Blue Book. And an even better price on the Jeep Wranlger. Didn't think we would be able to get the Sahara. The online build price was at the upper limit of our budget. Overall very impressed, great service and people. Definitely 5 stars in my book!!!!
God bless you guys! Love IHOP @ Pelham <3! Loved it! Great food at low prices! Fantastic service, delicious food, awesome atmosphere!
Ich war mit meinem (leider verstorbenen Hund) und jetzt auch mit unserer Katze oft bei Ihm. Er empfiehlt immer das Richtige. Immer alle Probleme mit den Tierchen gelöst. Zufriedener könnte der Patient (der sich bei der Praxis sogar sehr freut vorbeikommen zu dürfen, da´s immer so leckere Leckerlis gibt) dort nicht sein. Äußerst freundlich, tolles Team, top Leistung. Kann ich nur weiterempfehlen.
Dealing with Hyatt is great. Purchased a Lancer Ralliart years ago with them. Came back to test drive a Lan Evo and walked out owning it. Ty was great to deal with as was Nathan and Stephen, got me in and out in a day. I would definitely deal with dealership again.
None
None
I messaged Half Dental over Facebook about my teeth. Half dental messaged me back within the hour and let me know someone would be calling me. I was not expecting them to call me and be so helpful and caring. They were sincere in there concern and asked me to come in for a free consultation and insisted I get there that day. When I went in they did x-rays and looked at everything. I let them know my concerns and my income and they had options I was prescribed antibiotics and meds. I realized the time and had to leave to work and they were understanding and asked me to call or come back and talk to them about my options. Everyone was nice and the dentist and their assistants knew how to answer my questions. I recommend them to all who need affordable, caring and compassionate dentist. Thank you for all the smiles you help in our community. I have a long ways to go but soon I will have a healthy smile again.
Great service by people who really know what they are doing to repair/test/replace hydraulic parts.
Consistently excellent! I get frustrated when I'm expecting one thing and a product doesn't measure up. This Dairy Queen has consistently good food and icecream and their service is almost like a fancier restaurant. Sometimes I'm tempted to leave a tip. This place pays attention to the little things that make people happy... like flipping every Blizzard over when they hand it over.
Their prices are better than the internet and the local stores for many bikes and some other products. Its my preference to shop here but that's exactly what it is: personal preference. Yes, they are a chain and do try to up sell but if you state that you have a specific budget and don't want to go over it, how can anyone make you? Also, lifetime free adjustments on all cable parts and a $60 2 year maintenance plan is a ridiculous deal for the money you spend on bikes from this store. I'm a customer here originally because I bought a bike off craigslist that was purchased here and they continued to honor the lifetime adjustments without care for whether I was the original owner. No receipt checking or whatever. I owned that bike for 2 years and for 2 years they took care of it. Honestly, that's pretty rare. That's what made me stay as a customer.
Incredible sandwiches/burgers/beers. I've gone back and drag many friends here. The pork banh mi is one of the best sandwiches i've ever had. i'm a personal fan of the double burger, but some of my friends weren't as pleased
Great service, great food, great location.
None
I love the atmosphere in this cozy bike shop! The owner, Steve, was really knowledgable about bikes and local routes. Even though he sells some pretty high-end bikes, he was more than happy to fix my son's bike tire and tighten up the brakes. I will definitely return.
The quality of the food was excellent. The portions were huge! The waitress was very friendly and accommodating. I would recommend this to anyone - there is something on the menu for any taste!
Great atmosphere, selections and service. Love the frog legs.
The best kept secret in long beach!!!!! They have beautiful glow in the dark murals on the ceiling naked to the eye in regular light and a black light that is awesome and illuminates the mural of the ocean and stars on the ceiling. great price, great big t.v's, quiet....nice place!!!
None
A wonderful experience. .. I'll love to come back. .
None
John R Wood Island Real Estate is the most professional, ethical, and friendly real estate company in Southwest Florida. One of their main goals; satisfied customers. It is a honor being part of this great team. I recommend this company for all your real estate needs.
None
None
None
A business owner who understands the value of customer service!. Very friendly, competent and efficient.
Caruso's is one great bakery. Good pastries and cakes along with good service! Every year I also get my mom one of their rum cakes and they are always to die for. The Rum Cake there is basically one of the main reasons I go back.
The food is excellent. Above all, the owner and all their staff were so friendly and went out of their way to make you feel at home. We shall definitely be back
Devon, Mandy and everyone else always take care of us. #regulars
I began seeing Dr. Mike and his team two weeks ago, and after just four visits, I am very pleased with the results so far. Their attention is fantastic as you don't feel like you're on a patient conveyor belt! Concerns are easily addressed and the focus is on you feeling your best. My only regret is that I didn't seek a local chiropractor sooner.
Great experience, let the staff help you with the wine list as it is very extensive
spectro group of companies is the india #1 analytical testing laboratory, which is provide the best service for testing products..
After having HVAC problems and receiving wrong information from several other technicians, we began to look for a knowledgeable, honest and reasonable technician. We called Steve after reading several good reviews online. He came and assessed the situation. He thoroughly explained what we needed and why. He was prompt in his scheduling and came exactly on time. He was very professional and did excellent work in removing and replacing our old compressor and handler. Compared to other quotes received, his pricing was very competitive. We are happy to now have a dependable technician to call! We will definitely be passing his card along...Thanks Steve!
Christian and the staff in the service department were cheerful, attentive and helpful when I brought my car in for service. They provided me with a loaner that was comparable to my own car. The work was done quickly and properly.
This church is fantastic. The church's congregation is 8,000 and growing with several campuses to make it convenient for members who do not live next to the main church. Cam is the one of best preachers I have ever listened to, and I would put his abilities in line with Joel Osteen, Billy Graham, John Hagee, and all the other greats. Child care is excellent, and has the kids wanting to go back week after week!
These guys are amazing. I've had my car "detailed" at a few places around London and no one has ever come close to the quality of work Scotty's does. If after you pick your car up it looks like the best cleaning job you could have done in your driveway - it's not done right. Scotty's crew makes the car look better than if it just rolled off the assembly line. I won't EVER hand my keys over to another "professional" detailer again. They have my business as long as I own a vehicle. Don't make the same mistakes many of us have before choosing Scotty's Shine Shop. Go their first and save yourself the headache.
Hands On Originals did a great job on our young men's ministry T-Shirts. They were friendly, professional and prompt. We'll be back.
I work within walking distance and this is my favorite place to go on my lunch break. The prices are good and the food is delicious. They use real chicken and fresh veggies, quality food for less than I'd spend at McDonald's.
Fabulous location for Ice skating, the building looked lovely lit up in the dark. Well organized skating and enjoyed by all ages. An hour was long enough for a novice.
My personal and school laptop was running very slow so I got into contact with NewAge and brought my computer in. He did his magic and stopped specific programs starting up which helped my computing speed. My laptop is as good as the day I bought it thanks to NewAge.
Beautiful job! Came in right away and did high quality work in less than a week. I would highly recommend them.
Beautiful and delicious! What's not to like about this superb little bakery! Beware: their wares are as tasty as they are elegant. May be habit forming.
Went to 2 CVSes and physical exam office to try to get a flu shot but none had it available. Finally went to Central Health Center and there was no line, very clean & FREE! Staff were very friendly and I'm more than satisfied about this experience. Highly recommended!
None
I can’t say enough good things about the kids Jiu-Jitsu program at Manassas MMA, led by Michelle Welti. My wife and I were looking for a legitimate gym for our 6 year old son to start his walk with mixed martial arts. We have definitely found that at Manassas MMA. Witnessing the growth in our son’s self-confidence, respect for others, and discipline has been amazing! Michelle has a way with kids that many people don’t; this makes her perfect for the job. As a parent, words can’t describe how awesome this is. Some people just have a gift for teaching and working with children, and Michelle is by far one of those people.
Great work, affordable pricing, reliable, use them for all our networking needs.
None
Nice people.neat and clean village towen.lot of upcoming business buldings.one of the best place in kerala.happy land dream park,kadalukaani paara such as lot of attractive places have here.
Life changing experiences. That's the easiest way to sum up what Interlochen specializes in, at least in music. My son, who is a two-time Florida All-State Jazz saxophonist, told me that much of what he learned that accelerated his ability to play he learned at Interlochen, which is all the more impressive as he was able to also attend a summer workshop put on by Juilliard each year. Yes, there are uniforms and yes, they're horribly old school, belt buckles and all, but the camp brings together amazing artists and gives them a beautiful place to spend the summer, create, hang and meet other top artists their age from around the world. The oldest summer arts camp also is a great scouting location for midwestern colleges and great lakes schools like Michigan who look there for talent.
I recently attended one of Rob's workshops. Four hours wellspent. He gave a great insight into the potential benefits of social media for business and plenty of food for thought and nuggets of information crammed into four enjoyable hours. Would certainly recommend for anyone looking to consider social media as a platform for companies and I look forward to attending more in the future.
grear service
What a beautiful place, the natural reverb in the main nave is just outstanding. I would love to track something live here.
Nice place to work in Bolivia
Love em all, always been happy with our local ceasars, now its this one and still satisfied
We love the staff at The Braces Place. Dr. Penella has been amazing not only with his level of orthodontic care, but with his personal attention to my daughter.
When you need an awesome "healer", who happens to be an awesome chiropractor, this is the doctor to see. I don't work for just anyone, and I thoroughly admire this guy. He is a huge value to the community, as he is not your usual chiropractor that only fixes you just enough to keep you coming back. Instead, this Doctor, Dr Buhrman, has "solutions" that actually eliminate your need for much future chiropractic, but for perhaps an occasional adjustment, much like going to the Dentist once every 6 months for a cleaning, and annually for a dental exam and xrays. After all, what's more important, the bones that are your teeth (that you can do without, that you can live without)? Or, the bones of your spine, that you can't live without, and should at least be taken care of regularly, ideally on a preventative basis from the start, much like we have gotten into the habit of doing with our teeth. Just do the same for your neck and back, if not here, somewhere. You just won't necessarily find the care elsewhere that you will find here, with Dr Buhrman. Troy
Great ISP, I have used them since July. Never have had an outage, internet is always FAST(17-20mbps), far superior than Comcast and CenturyLink. Plus you cannot beat the price @ $39.95/month, the bill never changes. I am very happy with them, and would recommend them to anyone in American Fork.
Real, authentic Indian food - that's the most important thing about the place. I brought my family on a dinner here because they wanted to try something new. We had a pretty decent dinner and I think everyone was satisfied from the evening.
Great place to stop
Absolute favourite pub in London! In fact the world. It is London through and through in the best possible way, inside and outside.
Rick and Malinda were so helpful and friendly that buying window coverings from Budget Blinds of Northeast Texas was fun! There are lots of options and styles to choose from...I started off thinking I wanted plantation shutters like my neighbors, but chose wood blinds with tapes. I just love them! The delivery and installation were fast too. I would highly recommend them.
Brooklyn Dentist Dr. Oleg Klempner is a warm, welcoming and superb dentist and oral surgeon. His wife is amazing and runs the office with his brother Boris as a business manager. A family dentistry practice and owned and operated by a true neighborhood family! My associates children live in Livingston, NJ and becuase he teaches dental responsibility as part of his pediatric dentistry standard operating procedure, I am sure I will save money in the future! LOL. A commute into Brooklyn from New Jersey to see Dr. Klempner, DDS, means he is worth it! Thanks for everything Doc!
Was looking for a car for a few months now. Everywhere I went told me my credit wasn't good enough to get financed. I called Pittsburgh Auto Depot and talked to a guy named Scott who assured me he could get me financed! I admit I was skeptical at first as I felt I had exhausted all my avenues. After sitting and talking to Scott I found that he was a legit guy and I felt he wanted me to drive off with a car as bad as I did. Needless to say a day later I was driving off the lot in a super clean 2007 Cadillac DTS with only 70k miles on it. I can't even explain how good a deal I got on the car and how satisfied I was with my salesmen Scott and the whole Pittsburgh Auto Depot staff. I will definitely be returning and I look forward to doing business with them in the future.
Nicole's work is absolutely beautiful.
i would like to let anyone who has not had the opportunity to visit Bert Fish Medical Center, that you have missed what real medical attention is all about. You. The real person, not what you have or don't have. Just you with a medical problem. Of course you will have to be responsible for your needs, but that is not there first concern. Again it is you they are concerned with. I went there this week with a life threatening dilemma. Scared to death that I would be turned away, but too sick to do anything else. I had no choice but to take a chance with this hospital. To my delight they opened their arms and their hearts and gave me first class treatment and service. From administration to aids, everyone was top notch. My surgeon was world class, down to coming in early to secure that my procedure was a success. I am one of so many that is not employed as of now, but I do have work coming this winter and will be able to pay may bill in full, I know that matters like we all do, but what got me is that Bert Fish cared about me first. Thank you, Thank you, Thank you.
Great day out with my 3 year old. Spent hours there messing about and even bought some stuff as well. If your bored this is a good place to go. Fun for all the family.
Scott Adams was one of the best sales representative that I have ever had the opportunity to meet. I felt that I freely walked around the lot and that we were not pushed or rushed to make a decision. In addition, as we were walking around he answered questions about the cars that we were looking at and helped us to make a decision on a used vehicle that fit our needs beautifully. Myself and my fiance are looking at another car in the next few months and we would come back to see Scott for now and for our future. We could not have had a better deal on the car and Scott could not have been more honest, or nice about what we were getting, and we are very happy.
None
None
Ottavio is a friendly guy who will give you a quality cut!
A mi me encantó a pesar de que la dueña no es ni venezolana ni colombiana, ella es de republica dominicana pero la comida es excelente al estilo venezolano colombiano
Super bueno!! tome dos o tres fotos de las "lindas" que me atendieron todos y todas deben ir =P
Excellent restaurant, dans la tradition normande
This church is has been instrumental in my Christian walk. The campus pastors really present biblical truth in a life relevant way. I'm at a point in my life where serving has given me a totally new perspective on what Jesus meant when he commanded us to love one another. Wherever your at in your spiritual journey, I encourage you to give 2|42 a test drive and see if your experience prompts you to take your next step. If you're led to check us out, be sure and enjoy a hot cup of Zingerman's coffee and look me up. I'd love to meet you. Michael Elenio
Excellent food and excellent atmosphere!
Seriously can't describe how good I feel! It's been about 2 weeks since Dr. Reimann figured out exactly what I needed and the results are amazing! Increased energy, joint pain diminishing, sleeping great, clearer thinking.....and it's not like I was eating junk food before visiting the Dr. She simply found out the things I was low on and added them into my diet. Saves a lot of guess work - and eliminated some supplements I didn't need. If anyone wants a really good Dr. (ND or MD....she beats every MD I've ever been to!) & wants to feel good again, Call Dr. Reimann. When I find someone good at what they do, I like to share! Have been referring all my friends to her & am taking my grown children to her as well! Update: it's been about 6 weeks now & still feeling fantastic - continuing to feel better & better as more time goes by.
...its just that I played music here back in 2006 when it was "Kosmic Blue's"...sure has changed,a lot...
Highly recommend this place! Staff always remembers me. Clean office, efficient service, the nicest staff I have ever encountered and high quality treatment.
American Vintage has provided a major upgrade to High efficiency boiler (Triangle Tube), corrected several plumbing issues, and provided follow up services. Each time they have been prompt, provided excellent service and always worked to ensure my ultimate satisfaction. Note: I switched from a few long time providers here on the Northshore to American Vintage and have been very happy with my decision. If you want direct, honest services and products that delivered from a local business that cares about you, then American Vintage is the way to go!
NEVER had a bad experience at this Carrabba's! Love it here!
Great experience-all around! Booked the appointment in the morning, got in, no wait and the exam went quickly. Purchased glasses with ease.
None
None
I will never take my children anywhere else! They even got my 2yr to be comfortable
Stopped by here, wanted to try them out, always see the parking lot full. This place is amazing, from the outside decor to the plates on your table to the color bottle display and fireplace in the bar area. The food was excellent, cooked and prepared just the way we asked for it. Our waiter Sean P. did and outstanding job, far out-ceded our expectations. We will definitely be dining here again.
I was shopping for a sign for my store and then i found this company through the internet. After they finished my sign, i was very impressed with the quality and the price. Its nice to deal directly with this company becase there is no middle man, therfore getting the best deal. May god bless them
The quality of support we receive from The Computer Doctor is impressive. They give us complete piece of mind with top level of expertise and high degree of personal attention. It’s like having our own IT department, at a fraction of the cost!. I highly recommend them.
Goede en deskundige hulp voor een gezondere leefstijl. Kijkt verder dan alleen eten of sporten, maar betrekt het totaalplaatje.
Amazing atmosphere, very welcoming, fish the cat is just a cool character and the land lady (I think her name is linke) was the nicest person ever, she even let us store our bags in her friends studio on our last day. I advise anyone travelling to Amsterdam to pay a visit, cheap beer, great food and full of locals which means it's got their sign of approval. I'll be going there next time I go! Paul
UM LUGAR EXELENTE! CULINARIA DE ALTISSIMO NIVEL E SABOR!
Rich is the man! Wouldn't dream of taking another guide into the Glades or the Flats. He knows the area like the back of his hand and has an innate ability to not only talk to dolphins but also find the fish no matter what. Always a good time, recommend him to anyone - serious fishermen to family fun fishing trips.
in one word, SUPERB
These guys ROCK!
They serviced me the most efficiantly ive ever been serviced!!
None
I got the NY strip 16 oz version, ordered it medium rare. The steak was perfect my sister got the spinach and garlic ravioli they were amazing! The food is worth the price!
Great food. Good prices. The owners/management always go out of their way to make every visit a pleasant one. Very clean, very nice. Enjoy!
This is the second time that I used Korey with AGS. I called him because our home is for sale and our garage doors made a lot of noise and were not closing properly. I had to leave to go to a meeting before he was done - I trust him so much that it did not bother me in the least to let him finish will I was gone and he closed everything when he was done. Now are garage doors (9 years old) are running like new! We will call him for any issues in our next home - super service!
I love Rosita's. Their rellenos are excellent. Prices are reasonable and the service is fabulous! This is one of my family's favorite places to eat. FIVE STARS
None
Real food. I hear lots of people saying its overpriced, but in a city full of fast food microwave joints, its good to see real food coming back. I had the steak and it was amazing. Really want to in the dressing on the salad, have never enjoyed a salad like that one. Can't wait to go back.
Wir hatten einen wunderschönen Tag im Wildpark und würden auch jederzeit gerne wieder kommen!
Awesome service! I've saved easily over $500 and the restaurant and other discounts they have are great!
Great service, friendly staff, would definitely recommend to everyone!
None
Paul/NYC Dog Walkers are amazing! They leave daily notes, letting me know how everything went, and are really caring. My dog was still a puppy when we first signed up for walks, and they were always super patient and understanding with my accident-prone, energetic pup. We had an especially brutal winter and when my dog refused to walk/got too cold, they were kind enough to carry him part of the way or let him have some play-time with his fellow walking-mates. My doormen are always praising how friendly and on-time my walker is. It's also worth noting that Paul is very responsive to emails, so adding another walk in the evening for late-days at the office were typically not a problem. For their price, the quality is really great - highly recommend!
I love this gallery with great lighting nice place to see some exhibition
This was the 2nd location we opened in 2006. We now have 6 locations to serve all of your automotive service and repair needs!
The best mediterranean food in the Hamilton/Burlington area! Incredibly flavourful food, great portion sizes and reasonable prices make this our favourite restaurant.
Another hidden gem in the area.
I have been going to Tilden to have work done on my 1999 Taurus Station Wagon for about 2 years now and I have received nothing but excellent service. Bob and team are fantastic and they give the best customer service that I have ever experienced at any car care shop that I have been. Thanks Bob and the whole team!!
I started taking classes at PoleWorx Jan. 2012. I had purchased a $20 Groupon for 1 month of unlimited classes and tanning. I then signed up for the 6 month membership at $40/month. It is well worth it. I look back at pictures & videos 6 months ago from pole class and compare them to the current ones and I cannot believe all the stuff I can do and how good I've become. It's hard to believe it's me! I love PoleWorx! All of the instructions are AMAZING! They are comforting and welcoming. Natalie, the owner is very friendly and genuine. Taking pole classes, which is a challenge, and Paige's chair dance classes has really built up my self-confidence and having tons of fun while doing it. PoleWorx is also a great way to find new friends. I have become close with instructor Von, and many people that attend her classes. I would highly suggest to every girl out there looking for something new, fun, and exciting to come by. There is a class for everyone! Pole, Chair, Zumba, Yoga/Pilates, & Booty Boot Camp. No matter what age, shape, or size you'll have a blast in all. Remember to keep an open mind and let your inner girl out!
CBSE 10+2 English medium School
None
專業.快速.品質好.
My experience at Berkley Eye Center was wonderful! I am very protective with my eyes, the doctors and administrative staff made me comfortable they are a very professional group of people. Thank you for making my first visit a pleasant one. Great work Berkley!
The staff at Rush, including the owner, are amazing. They are friendly, fast, and good at what they do. The cost of drinks is comparable when you realize how good they are, and the coffee is wonderful. They offer a large variety of non-coffee based items as well. It's my favorite place to go and unwind.
The staff was very friendly, the price was fair. All the other patrons there were very helpful. the only thing the I didn't like was the lack of ammo available, however that's the case everywhere right now. overall i give them a 10/10
I just missed the delivery and managed to phone City Link office, they sent a message through to the driver and he came back! Really polite and helpful and I am extremely grateful to them.
Great chilis dogs and hamburgers
I use 2 work up there an the staff is great an fun 2 work with even the environment is cheerful
None
Please read my update to my review Let me say that Ken Garff Honda's online marketing director contacted me personally through Twitter, and worked with me to finish the work promised in the value built to the sale price. He was very gracious while being genuinely vested in seeing whereh things got sideways with my service. He offered to have the work finished there or at a 3rd party, hooked me up with one of their brand-new Civis to take to Salt Lake City while my car was worked on, and even sweetened the deal with a personal touch by way of a gift card for dinner. Unmatched. While I would have appreciated some contact from our salesman, Wendell knows his stuff. Contact him if you feel uneasy and he'll assure you before or after. Previous review: "Worked with Kevin Burns to purchase a used Honda Odyssey. After playing nice and agreeing to some repairs before hand we come back after 4 days (had to order parts, no problem there), an find that carpet in the rear was ripped by someone stepping on the corner too hard in the back, and the driver's side door dented badly with the black vinyl coming off it like it was freshly dinged. Kevin swore up and down that those blems were there when he took the car in. My pictures at home prove otherwise. What a douche bag. When we got the car after Kevin said "of course we'll do a full detail on your van" the car had gum in the carpet still, stains on the headliner, stains in the carpet, goop in the cup holders, center consol, and glove box, and easily scrubbable blems on the paint. What a joke. Had to bring it in again today to redetail. After expressing my concern for Kevin's lack of honesty I gave him 3 tries to come clean and he refused to apologize or admit to a thing. Always fun to give a slime ball a chance to be honest when you have proof. He can live with it for all I care. Sales manager was much more polite after I complained of the douche baggery we received but still gave me a run around about the door. I'm shaking mad."
What a great place for family,clean and a lot of great courses
Debbie always provides us with clear and helpful responses and her office staff does as well. Even if I have a question about coverage (and if she's not there) her staff has always been willing and helpful to give me answers.
Everything about our replacement window experience was excellent. THere were multiple contacts by project managers, installers etc and the whole job of replacing 12 windows took less than one day. I would certainly recommend Power Home Remodeling Group.
From the beginning Bruce has been very professional and his integrity is obvious by the way he helps people. I am looking forward to working more with Bruce and would highly recommend him to my friends and family.
None
I took my truck here for service and after I left I did not check out the truck, but later that night I noticed the passenger side had been scratched from what looked like a bumper from another vehicle. I was worried that the fact that I did not check out the truck before I left they would give me a hard time about it. The manager took a look at it and did the right thing. I believe this company lives up to there mission statement, they exceeded my expectations and provided excellent service. Will use again and recommend to others. Thanks for a job well done.
We had a wonderful experience. It was my son's first time going to the dentist. They let him explore, had great toys to distract him, did excellent teaching, and answered all of my questions. I couldn't have asked for a better experience.
None
Lugar sensacional de pessoas comprometidas com o aprendizado e o conhecimento. Vale a pena a visita ao campus e ao hotel!
None
The best donut holes ever.
I have been working with Jon for many years and every event has been great. Most recently he dj'd my wedding. I couldn't be happier. Everything was just as we talked about and he was never to busy to talk about our wedding or what we wanted. Everything was picture perfect professionalism through the whole night and he played exactly what we wanted with great flow and amazing quality. I have never seen a dj Anywhere that is as good as John and Music Source.
Amazing work done by Hiram!
I've been looking for some nice rims for my Honda Accord the past two weeks. My friend told me about this place Car Tunes and sure enough they had exactly what I was looking for. I checked prices at some other local places and they ended up having the cheapest price. I went ahead and ordered them and while I was there I got my windows tinted. They use Viper brand tint, not that cheap purple looking crap you get from Wal-mart, and I have to say I love they way it looks. They even covered the dot matrix on the rear window with vinyl to make the tint look seamless for a little extra. It was definitely worth it. Also while they were finishing up the tint job I talked to the other guy there about coming back to get a complete sound system ( head unit and speakers) after I got the rims taken care of. The quoted price ended up being cheaper then the total my roommate had spent at advance custom audio about three months ago. I would highly recommend Car Tunes to anyone in the Morgantown area that wants quality work with superb customer service.
Great Job! Quick Service, but most importantly, the Quality Was Perfect!!!
Great caring and professional service. Has helped me with back and health issues. Would strongly recommend them to others.
Service is awesome. Drinks are great. Staff are solicitous and knowledgeable.
Good food, reasonable prices.
Thad Coggins was a great saleseman, he did his best to answer every question we had about the Hyundai's we drove after driving several different types we settled on the TUCSON, from thereThad and K.C. got us the payment we wanted. this was by far the best car buying experience I have ever had.
Great breakfast tacos and service. They are only open for breakfast and lunch, but they have daily lunch specials that change everyday.
It's been a while since I last stayed at the White Hart, however I have previously stayed there many times whilst on business in the area. I have always found the staff and management to be excellent hosts, and the resources of the inn to be considerably better than most other inns of this type. The rooms are warm and comfortable, and the food offered well and truly suited my individual needs and preferences. This was especially important as I usually worked inhospitable hours, and have needed to entertain influential clients on a number of occasions. It is my hope that I can return at some point, not on business, but with my family, something that I am looking forward to.
Rated service as excellent as there were long Q's but they were able to process our orders quickly. Staff were friendly despite how busy they were! ordered a small latte for £2.50 - too bad they only come in one size as i would have liked to order a large coffee. Am back for seconds - will go there once i finish this review!
One of the best place to be in Chennai.
I had a filling redone with Dr. Henager. His team was very professional, friendly, quick and no pain. I have gone to this denist since I move to Tricities (3years) and have always had a great experience.
I moved from MA to VA and needed to store everything from my house for a few months. The space provided was the right size, clean and easy to access. There were moving carts available to help move in all of my stuff. The staff was friendly and helpful. The security seems thorough. I would recommend extra space storage.
This place is great the service is very friendly
Feels like an episode of " Cheers". Great guys. Very knowledgeable. Must try lamb sausage.
I bought some Thule car racks here several years ago. I had some problems with them throughout the years and brought them in once to attempt to get some parts that had fallen off. I wasnt successful the first time but a year later I tried again and one of the managers, Bri(y)an realized I had the wrong "fit kit" for my model car. They completely replaced them at no cost to me. This inspired me to buy a new pair of hiking boots and drive the extra distance to support a local business now that its time for a different fit kit and a new paddle. Be sure to check out the sweet display tables by local furniture maker Tim Bell of Green River Adventures.
I had a great experience at Auto Nation in Spring, TX with Mark Salinas. He was able to help me trade in my car, lower my interest rate and get me into a Dodge Journey. With a new baby, I'm so happy that I was able to get a great family vehicle with a lot of room. I've had the car for a week and I'm loving it.
This is a great place to eat, have been coming here for years, service is friendly and the food is great! Try on a wednesday for the banquet night!
As a relative newbie to the Fitness Dungeon I have to say "WOW". Accountability is everything! I would NEVER have pushed myself and sweated like I do on my own. Every workout brings new challenges, and although I'm sure I'm going to be sore, I find myself looking forward to each challenge and seeing my strength and endurance get better and better every week. Xavier knows his stuff...and knows all of the excuses so don't show up with any, he will squash them like a bug. Xavier's energy and pure passion for fitness will motivate you and keep you moving through any workout. I'm glad I found the Fitness Dungeon and would recommend it to anyone.
I have had the pleasure of speaking to Ben one of the Directors of this company and he is a lovely guy who is very passionate about what he does. He gave me lots of advice regarding what would be best for my garden and budget which as a novice gardener with a small budget I really appreciated, I would highly recommend these guys to anyone requiring gardening or landscaping services, as they offer a fantastic service and quality workmanship at really competitive prices.
Great service as always. Buying a car is one part of the VW experience but good service is what completes the experience and keeps me coming back to Dave Walters VW. Jeff Stachler
None
This was, by far, the best experience my wife and I have ever had buying a car!! Karen Tittle was awesome, as was Tracy Brown in finance!! Almost everything was handled over the phone, and we basically walked in, signed the papers and drove out!! We have found a dealership worth dealing with!!
None
I love this property! Been here for months now and don't regret a day. Much quieter than the high price Strip hotels and much cheaper. It makes a long stay in Vegas a lot more affordable than I ever dreamed. 5 star service and staff at a 2 star price. What's not to love?
food was good and boy was I hungry...keep up the good service
I was in a hurry due to work reasons and Matt had his boy's performed an oil change and tire swap in 30 minutes, great job!
I never forget this restaurant
For nearly two decades we recommend this unique park to all our guests travelling on the Trans Canada to meet animals they might not see on their trip. Our son Tobias (had stayed at the sanctuary near Smithers too) also learned about First Nations (music). Bravo to owners and staff! Rene, Mulvehill Creek Wilderness Inn and Wedding Chapel, Revelstoke
Took great care of sons boo boo on car ! Professional and reasonable
None
Grym mat! Ok priser och till skillnad från föregående talare så tycker jag att kycklingsalladen är bäst i stan.
Great mom & pop Middle Eastern food. Good value, great service, and yummy food!
None
I cannot believe how absolutely stunning this place is. I am now in love with going to the gym everyday. I have been a member of 24 for over 10 years and will say this is the best 24 in the country hands down. Thank you!
Just got back from 1 week at Kahana Falls and we had a amazing experience. While I am sure all rooms are not equal, ours was great. We had a studio condo unit. Full kitchen, fold down bed, porch with pool view on the second floor. Obviously this is not a 5 start hotel. However for the price we paid, we really couldn't be any happier. Be sure to ask details about the room you are reserving. I say this because there was a room next to ours which I am pretty sure did not have any outer facing windows. It had windows looking into the stairwell area, but I don't think it had any looking outside, or a porch.
My girlfriend and I go here on Sunday after church, and it never fails to do right by me. Delicious food and quick, friendly service. The only caveat is that it's small, which isn't a problem for us, but could be if you've got a group bigger than four people.
Son maravillosos y encantadores, sobre todo Fernando Gómez Checa y sus compañeros.
None
Con kính chúc ĐẠI TƯỚNG an giấc ngàn thu.
None
Excellent service and fair pricing, highly recommended for all international and domestic shipping services. A++
Very courteous & helpful staff. You'll find a wide selection and they have some pretty cool tools to help you find what looks best for your face & style. This is the 2nd time I have gotten eyeware from LensCrafters and will use them again in the future.
Looking for a self defense place? Look no further - wait - actually DO look further. You will see that the class availability doesn't even come close to that of SSKM. I have been a member here for about 7-8 months. TRX? Battle Ropes? Cardio Bag? Etc. These are not only included in the price, but not limited to once a week like some places. And if you are like me - somewhat intimidated by this type of thing - DON'T be. This place has a very family like atmosphere. Tons and tons of encouragement and support from the staff AND the students. You go at your own pace and learn a no-joke method of defending yourself. This isn't hard. No real memory or holds or moves. Natural reactions translated into defense and counter strike moves. YOU WILL LOVE IT!
Thank you Dr Stubbs and staff for being so patient with a child that initially was terrified to go to the dentist - let alone the orthodontist! They made the transition so easy for her that she now looks forward to going to her appointments. We couldn't have dreamed up a better group of people to be handling our families needs! Thanks again!!
I was sold the moment I walked in and saw one of the cooks impaling marinated chicken pieces on a skewer and putting it into the Tandoor. None of the MKE restaurants have a tandoor so that makes this place the best Indian eatery north of Schaumburg. We ordered Mango martini, Chicken tikka (appetizer), Lamb masala and chicken karahi. Keep reading if you want to know more. Mango martini- For an indian restaurant it was pretty good. Chicken tikka- REALLY GOOD. Reminded me of the dhaba's in India Lamb masala- The sauce was great but the lamb meat wasn't the best, considering good lamb or goat is har to find in MKE, I don't blame the owners, who would drive everyday to chicago to get the fresh lamb meat. Chicken karahi- loved the sauce and the presentation. Overall the most authentic indian restaurant in MKE. ************************************ To the owners- Cut the chicken peices smaller in your dishes to better absorb the sauce and don't cut corners by only using thigh or leg meat, some of us enjoy white/mixed meat.
I just had my wisdom teeth taken out here. On my first visit the doctor explained everything about the procedure and helped me fully understand what was going to be done. After the procedure was completed he even called me to see how I was doing. I can't say enough good things about this office. The staff is so friendly and experienced. They really work as a team. I HIGHLY recommend Dr. Wilson!
I have been for over for 4 years with the cotten coverage insurance and the always give you the best rate quotes and what i meant is the really take their time to look for the best and the most important part the treat you with respect and always with good sense of humor I just want to through a name I recommend no 100% 200 % Tatiana camargo she is the best example of everything that i just wrote thank you so much
Such yummy ice cream!
Wait staff wa s excellent, food was fantastic, the time we waited for food was so fast, recommended for everyone to try, thank you Eldarodo
Great food and the staff is always very friendly. I live in North Carolina now, but I always drop in when I am visiting home. Can't wait to have real pizza again!
None
None
If you are a homebrewer, this is the place to go!!!!! All of the staff were very nice and willing to explain any questions about CO2 and beer gas tanks. Excellent service!!! Well worth the drive from Kenosha!!!!!!
I moved here from Los Angeles two years ago and had a very hard time finding good sushi. Then I found Tom Yum's! I LOVE their sushi, and their Thai food is also the best around. I don't need to travel to Tampa anymore for sushi; the best sushi in all of Tampa Bay is right here in Dunedin!
Called 11+ places for a Michelin "13" tire and this was the only place which could get it in less than 24 hours. They took care of my car and received it directly from the tow company (because I was at work). They were friendly and methodological and got me out the door with a smile. They definitely made a fine first impression.
It very nice... We was walking by and dropped in. Very nice environment for a Friday night.
The St. Royals were amazing to work with!! My clients were looking for a band that will bring the life to their wedding, and they sure did!! I can't speak enough about their energy, talent and professionalism. I would highly recommend them again and again in a heartbeat!
Buonissimi e gustosissimi pasticcini fanno di questa organizzazione la vera tradizione italiana, siciliana, arricchita con le varie torte e, non solo, sono inclusi anche finger-food di tutti i tipi. Non é un locale, ma la velocitá della consegna (ovviamente dopo l'ordinazione) rende di questa organizzazione la sua famositá.
Can anyone tell me more? How many tables for poker?
None
I have been going to Baus Family Dental for 20+ years and now bring my entire family. Each and every visit has been pleasant even when I needed extensive work. I can always sit back and relax. My kids ages 4, 6, 8 absolutely LOVE visiting the dentist....even request to go! Mariah, Lara, receptionist and all the assistants are great when working with my kids. Especially when it's my turn and the kids are running crazy throughout the office. It is a great family, friendly office with a well educated group of staff and offers a great variety of services. I highly recommend Baus Family Dental to anyone looking for a pleasant dental experience.
It took me a long time to find a dentist that I like. Have had a horrible experiences. The moment I went to Dr. Tracey's office I was impressed. The staff is so nice and Dr. Tracey put me right at ease! I recommend this dentist to everyone!
None
One of the best...
Okay I am rating specifically for the employee Quinnton!! Stellar customer service :) he deserves a raise
Love the personal touch & care, as well as attention to detail you get here. I know the owner and her staff and they are skilled and personable. You walk in and are completely cared for! I highly recommend this place for all your salon and spa needs.
So GOOD. I always had food at the Reseda location but then moved to Culver City. This is your best bet for a hearty soulful pho soup and/or grilled lemongrass dishes. Also, the egg rolls are different and better then other Vietnamese places I've gone to. Definitely good for lunch or dinner if you're in the area.
Something significant has happened here. For several years, my wife and I enjoyed the occasional pizza from here but nothing dramatic crossed our minds. On a misty Monday night, we noticed a new menu from which we ort=dered for takeout half Tuscan, half Casablanca. A simple review: we think this the best pizza we ever had.
Traded in an SUV for a Lease- We got a good value on our trade in and awesome rate on a lease for a new Honda Accord. We decided that economy was more important than luxury at this time in our lives and this reduced our monthly expenses on payment and gas by over $400/mo! It was a tough decision but we were given all the time and space we needed! Debra was great and addressed all of our concerns!
I went on my first IMPACT clean water project to Honduras in August 2011. It was an amazing journey and a paradigm changing event. I would encourage any man who wants to get back in touch with the things that truly matter to get involved and go on a project.
Frank was by fair the best sales person I have had the pleasure of selling me a Car, Not only was my case a problem Child and we had been going back and forth for some 3 Months with Banks and looking for an angle to get me done when all at once it all came together, Frank and Oscer got me into a Next to New 2011 BMW 328i That I love. And for that I thank them and will take all my Buying needs to them when it comes time for another Car as well as passing on to anyone else looking for a Car. GO TO THEM FIRST trust me it will be your one and only stop. Luis A. Rodriguez
I have been going to Dr. Bryan for quite a few years and his treatments of my ailments have never failed to help my pain. I call him the "Gentle Giant" because of his height and gentle demeanor with his patients. He's vey personable and down-to-earth. I would recommend him to anyone.
Took my son there for a second opinion. Dr. Chuong treated him like he was the only child that existed. Made my husband and myself felt very comfortable knowing that our son was being taken care of so well. The office staff is also excellent. I would highly recommend this office to any of my friends with kids. (I already have).
First trip was for an alignment and oil change. In the shop today for the works: tranny flush, both belts, sway bar bushings and pins, plugs wires and filters. A lot of work for one day and they got it done. Full service shop with knowledgable and friendly staff, great price/value - overall fantastic experience.
None
I've to this gallery a few times, each time I love it. It's a bit small but does the job. You must be a art lover to like this place.
Highly recommended. A few of us rented ski packages over the weekend including skis, boots, and poles. The equipment rented were in top-notch shape! In addition, goggles and helmets were also provided at no extra cost (while supplies last). Surprisingly, these were also in good condition!! My buddies also rented some ski jackets, which were clean and worth the rental costs. They were considering buying new jackets, but in hindsight, renting actually made the most sense. The guys working there were really helpful and flexible with pickup and drop-off times. We will definitely be back again.
Even though there's a Honda dealership 2 miles from my house, I'll drive the extra 10 miles to come to Muller for my vehicle service needs. Fast, friendly and courteous service. No comparison!
None
We honesty haven't tried the food (yet), but the atmosphere was perfect; simple yet with style. The bartender (Don) was enthusiastic about working there, knew all the details and even gave us a tour of the distillery. As for the Moonshine, it is one of the smoothest I have ever had, and the whiskey... words can't describe it's excellent flavor. Now, if I can just talk the wife into letting me join the Barrel Club, life would be grand! Thanks Copper Run!
He comido en la Caleta uno de los mejores arroces negros que he probado en mi vida. El servicio muy bueno, tan sólo comprable a la calidad de sus productos. Cuando vuelva a Ciudad Real, seguro repetiré comilona.
Erik did a great job helping me find a place that would fit all of my needs within a short time frame. Definitely my go-to person when I'm looking to move.
One of the best restaurants in the city. The food is delicious. They have a variety of dishes that will satisfy both vegetarians and food lovers. Quality of the food is unbeatable. The service is also great (by Barcelona standards It's awsome). I recomend you to book in advance because the place is small, but if you didn;t do so and still want to try their food you can have a takeaway.
Stayed here for a get-away weekend. Always worry about how a hotel will be when you have no references. I checked out several hotel reviews and this hotel was the only one that didn't have any bad ones! I now see why!! It is beautiful, well kept, and quiet. The King bed was SUPER comfortable and the price was well worth it! I would stay here again if I am ever in town or passing through.
I have worked with Opie on many occasions since I started my business a little over 3 years ago. Opie is a professional that enjoys excellent reputation in the business with many happy clients. The one thing I love about her is her follow through on all her projects, discuss it once and consider it done right. I love working with vendors that are well qualified, well priced and are experts in their field of business. Opie is FANTASTIC and I RECOMMEND her to everyone without hesitation.
None
After living in Texas for ten years, thiz is the best Mexican restaurant in the ATL, rivalled by Nueva Laredo.
Grerat food very good service
Michele Rose has opened my eyes to the wonderful world of slow cadence training. As a former soccer player, I was very conscious and methodical about my training, and now that I am a busy professional working a corporate job, I don't have time to work out like I used to, let alone think about what I should be doing in my workouts. Michele and 20 Minutes to Fitness take care of all of that for me, so all I have to do is show up and give me best effort. After only a few weeks, I am noticing and feeling a big boost in my energy and ability to constantly be burning calories. I would recommend exploring this type of exercise, particularly for people with busy schedules like me...it literally takes just 20 minutes once a week!
Love my Control4 system that Atlanta Audio Video Solutions put in. We are down to one remote that always works. The thermostat integration lets me make changes from anywhere at any time. No more coming home to an uncomfortable house after being on vacation.
This is the best Chinese Buffet I have been to. We are Sushi holics and the sushi here is far and above ANY Buffet I have been to. The food selection is excellent as well. We have been to many in and out of the state and as of today it is our favorite!
This place is known for its responsibly-sourced ingredients and friendly baristas. They really do care about their customers. The last time I went here, the business was slow, so the baristas were actually practicing their lattes! Talk about dedication to an art! I've heard they plan to roast their own coffee soon, as well as open their own full kitchen. If it's as good as the coffee, I will definitely be dining :)
I love this bar great little joint to hang at after work
I have been a return customer now, for several years, always been treated very well, & fair. I will continue to return here for repairs as needed, Mr. Weedman may have a lofty personality but that comes w/age... thing is he's fair & makes things right...If he does a repair w/a break-in... listen & do what he tells U, his mechanic Knowledge is 2nd to non around these parts.
Mike and crew are the best. He is honest to a fault. Service is fast, done well and at as close as he can get you to the most reasonable price. I wouldn't bring my car anywhere else.
Our 2 pups have boarded there twice (for 3+days) and each time we've had great, attentive and considerate folks taking care of them. The option for suites with windows is great. Any time I call to check up on them I get someone who knows our pups and tells me how they're doing and who they're playing with and seem to have a genuine care for all the dogs. We spent quite a bit of time researching places and we're so glad we found Riverwalk.
The croissant was original !! really french and authentic. I enjoyed the coffee and will go back again. Excellent !!
I completely disagree with a few of the reviews. Their facilities are "dated" but clean. Waiters (and waitresses) are always nice and on their game. Food... Hey, I would put the food up against a large Chicago Italian restaurant that I love very much, any day. Tastes are great, texture and presentation is great and my wife and I have never been disappointed. Give them a try. You will not be disappointed.
I have used Champion Trophy for two very different awards/recognition projects at my work and I have been extremely pleased with the results. Even better than me being happy with them, my boss and the recipients of the recognitions also loved what they received. Paul at Champion Trophy was very helpful and accommodating while I was trying to decide what award design to use for our first project. He even brought samples of the crystal awards to me at work to see in person. The result was a very classy and perfectly executed set of awards. For our second project, Paul helped me find the best mugs at the best prices to engrave for my staff. These turned out great and my employees loved them! Kudos to Champion Trophy for service and quality. Gawain Douglas, Director Production & Design, Learning A-Z
I love to go there for my lunch, great and fresh food team are super professional great spot for kitesurfing place to go...
Came here today with a loose diamond from a pair of diamond earrings. I guess I couldn't do anything with it but sell my diamond. I found this place which was close to where I live and had a great experience. Everyone was nice and helpful. I am so glad I did not go to a pawnshop! If I ever lose a diamond earring again I will go back to this place to sell the left over diamond. lol
Had a crash with my recumbent Tadpole & Jeff told me he had experience with repairing tadpoles. Anyway, he was able to to quickly determine what needed to be done to get me back on the trail at what was a very reasonable price! Thank You Jeff, you have no idea how much getting back my trike in short order meant to me.
None
Nice and clean place to go out for a movie with the family
Great room at fantastic price, friendly staff. Not central location but bus #12 takes you right downtown.
A real person picked up the phone on the first ring. Customer service done right.
All of my videos and photos were saved on my external hard drive when it crashed. I called DataRetrieval and the staff was very knowledgeable and professional. I brought it in and they took a look at it immediately and gave me an estimate. After they recovered my data they let me review it to make sure I was satisfied. Plus they have the best price, which means a lot in this tough economy. Thanks, DataRetrieval.
The Best food around !! Fish & chips, burgers, and Sunday roasts are just incredible for the price ! Great pub, great atmosphere, and unbelievable value !ta! Great service too with smiling and professional staff !! I work in the industry and I'm going every week ! Recommended ! :)
Oh my, this was awesome. Great all the day around. Great service, superb food! I recommend the U 10 scallops! And the crabcake!
None
Murphy''s Law and my Wife are Soul mates. Murphy seems to always tag along and cause malfunctions with computers, cell phones, cameras, ipads, and yes even garage doors. Somehow a broom stick was magically leaned against the inside of our brand new garage door's track (A1 had just installed 45 days prior) while my wife was doings some spring cleaning in the garage. Later that day we had to go over to my parents house, and I pressed my garage door remote in my car as I drove away from the house not thinking anything of it. When we got home the Garage Door was crooked, and as I began to investigate I notice that the broom stick prevented one side of the garage door from going all the way down, which bent the track and made it impossible to repair myself. I was embarrassed to call A1 and tell them why I needed them to come out to take a look at it to see if they could fix it. They came out right away and fixed it for free. They did not have to do that but they did. They have a customer for life.
One of the best meals I've ever had and the service was excellent.
I usually write restaurant reviews, but my resolution this year is to branch out of my comfort zone and do things i've never before; like review my experience with a dealership. It started with a phone call. Baby steps. I needed a water pump, so I called _____ auto parts place (with an Irish surname) and they put me on hold. After 5 minutes I hung up. They must have been busy. I googled a dealer and TSD didn't put me on hold. Don't know if they were busy or not. I shouldn't have to.
I highly recommend, "Massage By Design." Kerry is the consummate professional. From her sweet voice to her healing touch... everything is right. The room was clean and soothing. Kerry has the magic touch and is such a spiritual soul, I felt deeply moved by the whole experience. I look forward to returning to Atlanta for another visit at, "Massage By Design." Thank you. Sincerely, Kelly Spatarella
The food there is excellent and cheap and i was pleased with the service i recieved keep up the good work whataburger
None
Great location, excellent food and beer. The pizza is the best!
None
Ma Garden lol
Thank you for delivering the amazing flowers to my girlfriend. I've always used those 1-800 websites but seeked a local florist this year. Your business out performed all the others in the past! I think the product you delivered looked better than the pictures on the site! I will be using your company for all occasions!
My new favorite restaurant in Pasadena. .. try the magic string beans...they are magical
None
Best BBQ around. First found out about them on Chicago's best, bbq episode. I was on the episode at another BBQ place. Didn't get to try them till they came to Vernon Hills Big Bear Ribfest. I do have to say they were the 2nd best at the fest. The only one that was better, could not reproduce when I went to the restaurant. This is the story with most BBQ places. Every time you go it is different. RUB however is consistently EXCELLENT every time. Try ribs, Beef ribs if they have them, sliders, Brisket, and the pecan pie. oh... fish tacos are good too.
I came to Transitions in July of 2006 and with the help and encouragement I received there, I just celebrated 7 years sober. I had been to a couple places in NJ and to no avail was drunk within weeks. I refused to take the suggestions of meetings, sponsorship and sober living because in my mind "I am not like them". I ended up in a detox/psych ward 2 hours from home after a desperate attempt to take my own life. While there, I made several attempts to call family and friends who refused to take my calls. I was then offered the opportunity to come to South Florida for treatment. I was scared, broken and most of desperate. Transitions helped to save my life. I was taken to outside 12 Step meetings where I heard messages of hope. In order to get more privileges, I was required to get a sponsor so I did. My sponsor was also an alumni of Transitions and she would show up there smiling and happy and all I ever wanted to be was happy in my own skin without substances. She is still my sponsor today. I didn't do it perfectly, but they never gave up on me. I think I cried everyday. Maria behind the front desk was an Angel, her smile and encouragement helped me every day. I would sit in the tech apartment all weekend and cry and Tim would say things like "put the bat down smiley". What I thought was the end of my life was just the beginning. I was 36 years old and had no idea how to live life, I mean I knew how to work and sometimes pay bills but to really live life I had no clue. I went to sober living, got a mindless job, went to meetings. worked steps and my life is beyond what I have ever imagined. I have real friends, a brother who is now sober 3 years, relationships with my family and a job in the treatment field where I help people everyday. Transitions is almost always on my gratitude list. They gave me the head start I needed and are still there for me when I feel the need to stop by for some grounding.
I've lived here for a year and a half and have had nothing but a great experience here. The property is regularly maintained and clean, the office staff is friendly and helpful, and the maintenance usually comes within 24 hours of requesting. My wife and I recently had a baby, and when we asked to be upgraded to a 2 bedroom, the leasing office was very helpful, friendly, and accommodating. It's located across the street from the Town Center, so many stores and restaurants are within walking distance. There's 3 swimming pools and jacuzzis, one pool is heated year round. The gym was recently upgraded with some high end equipment. I've lived at about 6 different apartment complexes around Orange County in the past 5 years, and this place has by far been the nicest, cleanest, with the most helpful staff. I would recommend City Lights to anyone looking to move to Aliso.
Bike Rehab is everything you could want from a bike shop: 1) Friendly Service 2) Low Prices 3) Great Advice 4) High quality work 5) Free tea. My bike has never ridden so well since I got my service. I would recommend it to anyone.
I had a great time with the male strippers here. Amazing male strip show and male strip club, so much fun and its perfect for bachelorettes!!!  I thought male strip clubs were going to be dark and dirty, but this one turned out to be really nice. It had big plush couches and it was very clean. The guys weren't raunchy at all, they all looked like Abercrombie Models. I paid this one male stripper to give my girl a lapdance (it was her birthday). I'm definitely going to bring my other girls here - I'm in charge of planning my cousin's bachelorette party and I'm pretty sure I'm going to have it here.
Dennis and Judd at Atchley Ford did an amazing job and got me a great deal on a certified used Ford Taurus! They're fantastic, hard-working people and they've definitely earned my future business.
Soon..very soon..a view of Dayton 4all
None
Best auto repair shop in Anchorage. Fair prices and honest work.
None
I have never enjoyed cod fish and shrimp. as must as I did here. Be sure that I will pass the good news on. Thank you.
None
Is just the best local butcher anyone could ask for , National award winning sausages, award winning cheese and service that i second to none!! Keep it up lads!
Great grocery store. Fresh organic produce, good prices and lots of specialty products. So excited we found this store!
I just recently bought flowers for my mother's birthday and the bouquet was wonderful it lasted for over a week and the service was incredible! I came in out of the blue and within 10 minutes they had created a beautiful custom order for me! Thanks for the incredible flowers and the speedy service! :)
Adam Narkiewicz was our salesperson... This is the third vehicle we've purchased from Honda Cars of Bradenton and there's a reason we continue to go back and that's SERVICE! We were lucky enough to work with Adam who was not only helpful with our choice in the purchasing of our new Pilot but also knowledgeable about the car, it's new features and how to use all of them. We never feel pushed into a sale and know we're getting the best price, know they're doing the best for us and we never feel that we're going to be put out by the car payment when we leave. Rodney was great at the closing of the sale, helpful in explaining everything we were paying for and other coverages offer. I highly recommend buying a car from Honda, and if you're as lucky as me....Matt Woods will come by and say hello!! Thanks guys!!
I store my boat in there outside lot very happy with the service and management
The cleaners were great, they cleaned up my place very well and were nice with my dog. I will be using them again.
I love the complimentary coffee/latte/cappuccino! Staff is very friendly & knowledgeable! Like that you use an iPad mini for a register! On the product... Design and implementation are great... very solid and appx. the drag of my cigarettes (which I didn't get from other "e-cigarettes"). The flavors of E-Liquid that I have tested in store are good... lots to choose from! Really satisfied customer! Cheers!
Excellent food and very friendly service, not the cheapest place in Wigan but worth every penny.
Very friendly service. Cut my SIM down to a micro-sim at no cost.
Toro is a great South End restaurant, serving up Spanish-style tapas and great drinks! Their duck drumsticks and corn on the cob smothered in Manchego cheese is AWESOME. Communal style seating makes for a convival atmosphere, but it does get somewhat noisy on Fridays and Saturdays, and the no-reservation policy can be a bit of a drag.
I purchased my new 2014 Mini Cooper Countryman JCW from Debbie Ivie. It was a wonderful experience. There was no pressure and she was very communicative during the entire process. Living 2 hours from the dealership I wanted to have as mush done as possible before making the trip. She made it possible for me to show up and see the car sign the documents and drive off. I would recommend this dealership and Debbie Ivie to any one.
Their salsa is just a little too hot! But otherwise this is truly the best place for fajitas in town.
None
Had their buffet it was all good. We went back thinking the regular evening buffet might not be as good as the one they had for New Years Eve. But there was no difference, it was all great. WE will go back!! Went back for their wonderful buffet, love the meat balls and chicken and the pizzas a winner. 9-13. buffet grand as always, you need to try it. this buffet never disappoints!! 11-06-13 good as usual, 12-20-13 Great as always or we would not keep going back. The hubby says the deep dish is better than Giordano's.
Really nice selection, was able to fill in most of the long standing gaps the first time I went in and they have managed to hunt down most of the other issues I was missing. I have not be able to find some of these comics for years. Owner was very knowledgeable, and recommended a couple new series that I am really enjoying. Found that he got to know what I was looking for and recommended things based off my personal preference. Will definitely be sticking with the store.
Checked in 5-20-2013 and checked out 5-26-2013. Worker gave me an amazing weekly rate. Much cheaper than staying off of Fowler. Located in a quite town right on the out skirts in Tampa in Wesley Chapel. Its actually located behind the Cracker Barrel between that in the Groves Mall shopping plaza. No jacuzzi but the pool is large and there are plenty of chairs for me and my colleagues. Breakfast was provided, staff was friendly, prices were amazing. Will save my company money by booking with this hotel for our next conference.
Kirbys daughter is hot :)
None
Wynny is the only person in Boston who I let cut my hair. I was browsing hair dressers for about 6 months. When I came across Wynny I had no need to keep looking. I recommend Wynny's hair salon to anyone.
me encanta mi gimnasio ;)
None
I called 4 inspectors in the Corpus Christi area, and Kuhlman Real Estate Inspection was able to make an appointment the quickest and for the best price. During the inspection, he was very thorough and fast. He took the time to explain several things to be during and after the inspection. You can tell he really knew what he was doing, but answered all of my questions in a way that was easy for me to understand. He's report was sent promptly the next morning and was very detailed. Thanks for the great service!
I got a theraputic massage here as part of my B&B package. After a full day of skiing the day before, it was very much needed. This spa was very soothing, comforting and relaxing. The staff was very inviting, and friendly.
great shop good staff best Kipling range in the town or area with lower prices than El corte ingles
Outstanding customer service. Pure luxury.
I have been a customer for many years. Employees always friendly, whether on the phone or at branch. Low, if any, fees not like corporate banks who nickel and dime you to death. I recommend you use Woodforest National Bank.
Saying this school altered my life is not making a overly bold statement. I had held an undergraduate degree in painting from a state university, but this was not enough for me to secure a "creative" job other than teaching in public schools (BTW, these folks are truly underpaid and under-appreciated). When I heard about a school in Raleigh that offered training in computer arts I jumped at the opportunity to learn more. Before I completed my training, I was already working for a local computer game company. Ever since I have worked in the field as a Concept Artist, Lead Artist, Art Director, and Art Manager.
Maravilloso Sitio.
BSNL GSM, CDMA & WiMAX - All mobile broadband plans are very much economic and good speed :-)
Un lugar exelente!
Master Roberts and Victory TKD staff are amazing. My 7 yr old son has learned more than I can express being involved for a bit over a year! He has gained perspective, patience, empathy, and become more community-minded. If you have had a personal experience, please take it up with the studio, as an adult would. Knocking the techniques, the credibilities, and the man online will not change your already skewed opinion. Please rationalize that this organization has been a very positive influence in the lives of many. I would and have recommended this studio to many.
The service is excellent. They call ahead to let us know when they are coming. The technicians are very knowledgeable and friendly. The price is reasonable. I am very happy with the service.
Lori and Mark are beyond experts and have styled rockstars (I have learned recently). They are very friendly and inviting, fantastic conversation if you want it. They listen everytime to your thoughts about your hair and style down to the letter! My hair is weird/difficult to cut but this salon's capable stylists pull through everytime. They've been in the East Village for years and have great stories about the old art scene. I highly recommend Salon Seven.
None
None
Dr Hart Moreland is so sweet & kind great personalty !! I highly recommended her!!
None
Michele Dessert was outstanding!
I lived at College Hill Apartments for two and a half years - and trust me when I say this is the absolute best deal in downtown Grand Rapids. Let's start with the parking, to which is gated and monitored to ensure that you will ALWAYS have a safe place to park. Each tenant is given a "garage door" opener. The entrance doors are secured by key fob detectors. If that fails, you are given a key to unlock the door as a backup. The apartments are updated (most all of them) with newer carpet, kitchen area, and new trim throughout. It is quiet, and extremely efficient when it comes to utilities. The wall mounted air conditioners definitely keep the place cool, and the heaters are electric and do a fine job at keeping things toasty. The maintenance staff is prompt and courteous when it comes to repairs - whether calling by phone or submitting a request on-line. You are able to make on-line payments which also remind you of when you need to pay rent by e-mail! Recycling is readily available, as well as a compost. An on-site mini gym is on the second floor which has some treadmills a bike, television, and miscellaneous machines. The washer/dryers are brand spankin' new. You can place money on a laundry card on-line, or use dollar bills to credit the card on the lower level. Oh, and there are vending machines stocked with major pops, chips, snacks, etc in the laundry room too! The mail room is basic, but the UPS/Fedex people will bring your package straight to your door and call you to tell you that they are there to assist you. The price is beyond reasonable with all that is included. We had upgraded HD cable at our apartment, and for a while I had an overhead parking spot - all of which were also extremely reasonable price-wise. The location is awesome! If your a downtown-goer, than your right around the corner from all the nightlife. The on-ramp to 196 is right next to the place (don't worry, this does not cause for a lot of noise in your apartment if your worried about it). I could go on and on about how great my experience was with this place. That being said, trust me - give Ruth and the rest of the management staff the opportunity to have you be their tenant. You will not be disappointed. -Steve
Has been my family's home church since 2005. This church has so much going on for the Kingdom of God that it may be too much for the first time visitor to comprehend it all. Once plugged in, one finds more than friendly people, but loving congregants that are dedicated to following the Lord Jesus in every area. King Jesus reigns here. My walk with God has grown and been strengthened by the teaching, preaching, and serving at this church.
Great food for the price. Was a good stop on the way to Melbourne. 
Greg is the absolute best at group plan, disability income, life and other kinds of insurance. He's got a great team of knowledgeable professional associates who can provide insurance and financial solutions to physicians, attorneys, executives and the practices and businesses they own and run. I've worked professionally with Greg for many years and always enjoy his energy and desire to help his clients.
Este sitio es genial, realmente increible, todo está nuevo ya que sólo tiene 4 meses de inaugurado. La vista es un espectáculo. Una vez aquí no lo van a poder creer
Excellent service! Highly Recommended!
None
Still great.
None
Great food at good prices. The Curry is highly recommended. Delivery is usually very quick.
This is a hidden gem in Tallahassee a Asian fusion restraunt with very good Thai food and the best Sushi in town.
None
Over the past couple of weeks, I have been working with Rachel Klarfield. She has been wonderful in helping me to relocate to the San Francisco area. She exhibits strong professionalism and helped me to find the best firm, given my tastes, expertise and life goals. I would highly recommend other High Tech professionals to seek out Rachel and Workbridge to further their career.
It was a GREAT experience overall and positive that LOKL Coffee is here to stay! It's those small things that matter, often overlooked by cafes ... but LOKL Coffee has it!
Great local florist. My family has used them for years, they have allways been a source of comfort for us during times of loss.
None
Best help I've ever hired. Stand By took great care of me and they did above and beyond what was needed.
None
Best happy hour in town. Great cocktail list.
Best sushi i had
Ótimo !!! Maravilhoso !!! Simplesmente AMAZING !!!
Quynh is an extremely talented and creative designer who consistently produces fresh marketing materials with high visual impact for my massage therapy business. Quynh's designs are modern, clean, and attention-grabbing. She is highly professional and delivers products on time at an affordable price. As a more-than-satisfied customer, I highly recommend hiring her for your design needs.
Good family atmosphere. Good seafood. Nice portions.
Great Plant with nice greenery.
Lovely restaurant! Their Nutella crepe is awesome. Fast, friendly service. I'll definitely go back and take my friends!
Awesome place. Is a great place to eat and the atmosphere is so cool. Fantastic place for a beer and food.
Great Store !!! Although Stansberry, dont you have a gf ??? and yet your over here flirting with mark ???? Man someone is getting the dog house lol jk jk, Its a great store im there quite often plus Aviators is next door so i can get some comics and drink and not always in that order =D
Everyone at Acura of Denville was kind and professional. Chip was a great salesman!
Our expereience with Collis Roofing was great! One call, and we had an immediate response for an estimate, and work was started and completed just days later. Fortunately, it was not a whol;e roof repair, it was just for a leak. However, if we ever need our entire roof repaired, we know we would only call Collis! Thanks for the great work and great service!
¡Lo recomiendo!
Stylists in demand! - My girlfriend stopped by as a walk-in on Saturday and was pleased to see all the chairs were filled and several other women were waiting - Chiara and her stylists are in demand!
NO HE IDO TODAVIA, PERO TENGO MUCHAS GANAS DE LLEVAR A MIS HIJOS.
I known James since 1994 before he became an attorney , and all i know is when he passed his bar and was an Attorney , in 2001 i was arrested for something that could of landed me in prison for 50 years. James got all charges thrown out and saved my life and even had 1 charge which was a misdemenor , he had then withheld judication so I was never convicted.. I am a Mortgage Professional , business owner, and active Real Estate Investor IN DUVAL COUNTY, since that day James had changed my Life. James is also great at Tickets and anything that needs to be striken from the record so my future can be intact .. I thank the LORD I met James cause he is the best attorney I have ever encountered in my life .. I use James for all my attorney needs and hopefully for the rest of my life as long as he stays alive.. On top of that, his assistant ANNA is the best in the world , Smart , and drop dead GORGEOUS!!! That helps when your waiting in the lobby lol He is a GODSEND and I recommened anyone to challenge my statement , he will save your BUTT!!! I have the cases and the proof . thanks Big James
PRECISION AUTO BODY HAS DONE AN AMAZING JOB WITH BOTH OF MY VEHICLES. THEY DON'T JUST LOOK AT THE EXTERIOR DAMAGE WHEN REPAIRING A VEHICLE, THEY PEEL BACK THE LAYERS THROUGH AND THROUGH AND FIND ANY AND ALL HIDDEN DAMAGE. I DON'T BELIEVE MANY COMPANIES TO THIS AND THANK GOD THEY DID OR WE WOULD HAVE BEEN STRANDED ON THE SIDE OF THE ROAD SOMEWHERE. THANKS AGAIN PERCISION, YOU ARE THE ONLY PLACE I WILL EVER GO.
Expert computer repairs, mac and PC. I had a few problems with my computer and it was sorted quickly, efficiently and inexpensively. Later I had them set up my home network. Again, fast and efficient service, and very helpful. Great local business.
Great store! Paul has assembled a great team here, and they always have lots of good inventory. Anyone in DFW who shops elsewhere for their harley is missing out!
A great place to get pasta in Downtown Sonora!
A very nice place to chat with a close friend or finish a term paper. They provide A LOT of electric outlets and free wi-fi connectivity to patrons. Also, they sanction live, local music on a weekly basis. Mama Carmen's is one of my favorite venues, and I recommend it to anyone who asks just for the atmosphere alone. As for the food and coffee? The beverages are highly above average, but the food is rather expensive in comparison. I usually just get coffee for that very reason. There is a shoppe located on a platform within the cafe, and while I initially thought that this aspect of Mama C's was out of sorts considering it's a coffee shop and not a retail store, I was surprised and moved by the unique items on display. For Mama Carmen's it just works, I suppose. If you're looking for a good place to kick back for a couple hours, or the right atmosphere for that first coffee date, then look no further.
Fantastic espresso and delicious breakfast tacos. Highly recommend a visit.
This is the best L & L I have ever been to! It's decor is great and so is the service! I would recommend this to anyone who loves L & L :)
I was at Zimmerman Bowl last Sunday, July 15, 2012. I was there with a group of 7 adults, and 5 children. It wasn't that busy. We had a great server who kept coming over and making sure we had everything and to make sure we were satisfied with everything. We had ordered french fries, 3 pizzas, which were delicious and HOT, and a couple pitchers of soda. The server could have brought the check for the food a bit more promptly, but considering he had already done so much it wasn't too big of a deal. The only reason I gave the Atmosphere a 2 was because they played too much John Mayer. lol. But I guess if our group wanted to listen to different music we could have put money into the Jukebox, right? I'm planning on going again in the next couple of days :)
Why have I given them such an excellent rating? They’ve earned it the old-school way. They use honesty, dedication and hard work to make their customers happy. I began calling upon the services of this dealership, immediately after moving to Huntsville from Schaumburg Illinois in April of 2003. They began servicing our two Ford Vehicles that we brought down from Illinois. My wife and I have always had and we still have all of our service work done here on our two current Ford Vehicles. The Service Director, Pat Carroll is fantastic. His dedication to complete customer care and satisfaction is always evident. His integrity and ethics are passed on to the customers through via the efforts and personalities of his excellent team of Service Advisors and Technicians. Our requested advisor is Erica Ortiz. She is very pleasant, professionally polished and communicates extremely well. If you ever need parts (because warranties do expire), Jeff Waddell is a specialist who is excellent in every sense of the word. We have purchased 3 New Ford Vehicles from this Dealership in the past 4 years. The most recent was yesterday 9/06/12. Our salesperson, Sally Rochelle, made yesterday's buying experience the best that we've had in over a decade. Sally is very pleasant, honest, polished, forthright and knowledgeable. She’s an excellent listener and truly has your best interest at heart. I highly recommend this dealership and the wonderful people that work therein.
The office at Broad St. and the one overlooking Central Park are both chic and comfortable. My physician, Dr. Jani, is an NYU grad and an internist who seems good at spotting problems before they can develop. She is also personable, as are the half dozen or so front office people I have dealt with at either office. (She moved; I followed). I lived 20 years in Cali., and this is a Cali. based operation, with a pleasant, nearly laid back vibe. I sometimes come a bit early and linger just to look out at their amazing views, the kind you see in movies. Never did that before in a doctor's office. If only all doctor offices were like these!
After doing much research regarding lost data (family photos, music, etc.) on my external hard drive, I took a chance on West Seattle Computers. They were able to rescue my information successfully--and for much less than other quotes I received. The service was great--personable and friendly. I will return for all my PC needs and highly recommend them to anyone.
excellan hotel from all sides,clean,lovely food and it's located help every body to move smothly
It's been almost one year . I underwent hair transplantation surgery . I am very satisfied with the results and is soon planning to go for a second session with Dr.Sudhir
My husband and I very much enjoyed our experience at Burns Ford. We traveled a long commute after work to see a vehicle on their lot in which we were very interested. We arrived about the same time they were closing. Levi and Freddy stayed after hours to help us make a decision about purchasing the vehicle. We never felt rushed or pressured in any way. They were very helpful and very friendly. We purchased the vehicle and love it! We had some questions that couldn't be answered until the next business day, in which Levi researched our questions and called me the next morning to answer everything I needed to know. We would definitely recommend Burns Ford as a reputable, no hassle dealership where you'll get friendly assistance.
Good food
Mike Gasca was awesome. He was very knowledgeable, helpful, and helped me save a lot of money. I was told that I needed a new alternator from o'reillys according to their test and I called the dealership. Mike insisted over the phone that it sounded like it was just the battery and that I should bring it in. I did and he quickly got the guys on it and low and behold just the battery. He got it taken care of much quicker than expected. Mike Gasca did an excellent job and deserves recognition. I will recommend people to this dealership in the future because of my experience. -The above review was posted as a service and with the authorization of Toyota of Irving, and the comments and opinions expressed in the review are those of a customer from Toyota of Irving.
Julie is a true professional wedding photographer. There are a lot of great photographers out there, but there are few with the level of expertise, experience, and dedication. Julie photographed our wedding on October 27, 2012. Julie came prepared, she was early, had scoped out the best spots for portraits, had special equipment with her to get the best lighting, and was accompanied by an intern. Julie has an authoritative presence which is very important for large family portraits when you have to wrangle a lot of people. At the same time she is pleasant and patient and does not come across as either bullying or intrusive (which I have witnessed from other wedding photographers). Julie is definitely undercharging for the level of service she provides and you should book her before her rates go up.
Got the Groupon and had a great time. Two hours of bowling for $16?? Can't beat that. I second the Big Lebowski-like feel. My boyfriend and I had a great time, and will be back.
Through a two week vacation took breakfast here. Simple food, to a high standard and full praise for personable service. Recommended - Fresh baked warm Cinnamon Scone.
Beautiful location, beautiful building and inspiring art.
Tony has been cleaning and servicing our pool for several years now. He is always here each week, the same day taking care of our pool. Prior to Tony, we 'managed' our pool ourselves - it was frequently green and hard to keep looking nice and inviting. Since Tony we have NEVER had any weeks where our pool didn't look pristine. He is always looking out for our best interest and I would highly recommend him to anyone.
Nice place. Warm service. Uncommon food. To be tried
None
Dr. Jaibaji's office staff is great! Beautiful office. Dr. Jaibaji is very attentive. He listens to your wants & needs. but above all, he does a wonderful job. I am very pleased and happy with my results. Thank you Dr. Jaibaji.
None
Fantastisk service, god klipning, og endnu bedre pris :) Kan varmt anbefales!
None
None
Dr. Gluck is the best orthodontist ever! Usually when you go to an orthodontist, it is very boring. At Dr. Gluck's almost everything is really fast and easy. I'm only 12 years old but I could be dropped off and schedule my own appointment! From the question of the day to getting braces, Dr. Gluck's is the place to be.
Easily the largest and best game shop in the Charlotte area. Shockingly large selection of games and game products. And the new location really makes this the best place to game in Charlotte!
Great deals and very clean.
I had an awesome experience getting the truck of my dreams here at Milnes Dodge in Imlay City! All of the staff is very friendly and Eric Heim provided a great no pressure buying experience! They hooked me up with a great price and gave me more than I thought I would get for my old car! Thank you!!!
My husband and I first began using D4design Studios in 2010 and we would never dream of going anywhere else for our website design needs! D4design goes the extra distance and they are social media and web pioneers. They are ahead of most in their industry! They designed our logos and our websites with ultimate precision, creativity and professionalism. After originally designing our flash websites in 2010 we hired them again recently to make our sites iphone and ipad friendly. D4design was able to re-code our sites and the transition was flawless! We did not have to sacrifice aesthetic or design at all. D4design takes the time to give you one on one tutelage to make sure that you know how to navigate thru your site and make the most of the many new and innovative social media and web options. Both of our business exploded with new clients after D4design created our sites. We are 100% satisfied with the service we have received from them and they are worth their weight in gold.
Leckere, bodenständige und bezahlbare Küche. Bestelle immer Bauerngröst´l - wärmstens zu empfehlen!
None
The ultimate comic book store experience.
Mark at BEE SURE Tyres, thanks for supplying all of my needs for tyres, your customer service, price and quality are second to none. Blindology can recommend Mark and Bee Sure Tyres for all of your motoring needs. Well done Mark and thank you.
Great facility, great price. Highly satisfied.
great staff great area, will stay ther any time i'm in the area
I visited for 3 days and felt the Spirit of the Lord so strongly that I really want to be back right now.
If your looking for a hotel, that has a perfect location, modern rooms and a serviced mined staff. Choose this hotel next time you visit Oslo. RECOMMENDED
I absolutely loved shopping at Whole Foods in Denver. My wife and me used the Cherry Creek store all the time. Wonderful food and wonderful staff. Love whole foods
None
Very polite, clean facilities, a great place to stay.
None
I have been doing things with Sea Kayak Carolina for over 2 years now, and have had nothing but good times and good experiences. I bought my first and only sea kayak from them, and they were both patient and skillful and helping me find the right boat for me. Believe me, it wasn't easy for them. I went through several before I got just the right boat. I live over 4 hours away in Upstate South Carolina, but have traveled over several times to take skill specific courses from them, as well as a couple of coastal guided tours. The instructors and guides were all just right for what they were doing. Thanks to them, I have learned a lot in a short period of time. My wife and I own and operate a lake tour business, with an emphasis on kayaking, and the model SKC provides for us is one of professionalism and dedication. I feel really fortunate to have found them.
I love this store. It's one of the only ones I can shop at without having to analyzes labels for several hours making sure there are no JUNK ingredients. I would highly recommend this store to anyone. Also, if you have as many kids as we do (5)... kids eat FREE in their cafe on Thursday nights.
I love our store and can attest that Brian does amazing thing with jewelry! He order it, fix it... He can make it from scratch with your input. I love it and love having the opportunity to be a part of it and learn about super interesting things. Please visit him! Thanks!
Have been to ashiana a few times and found the food to be excellent, I have tried a range of different options and all have been good so far. The speed of service both in the restaurant and for takeaways is really good. Staff are in general really competent although I have had a bad experience recently with one who seemed totally out of it, although he has been a one off in my experience.
After spending a weekend at the Rock River Riders motorcycle hillclimb across the street, my boys and I hopped over to white pines for a moment of serenity and were not disappointed. The creek crossings on our way to the lodge proved a novel cause for celebration. The well maintained campsites on a beautifully sculpted landscape left us yearning for more. Hopefully we'll be afforded the privilege of camping there in the not too distant future.
These guys were super friendly and the prices seemed reasonable. Despite having ample opportunity to sell me things I didn't need, instead they focused on improving the setup that I had and making sure I got the best value for my money. I'll definitely be heading back.
As a professional photographer myself, I am very particular about what I like in photography, especially when the images are of me and my husband. The reason I'm *behind* the camera 95% of the time is because I strongly dislike being in front of it! That all said... I couldn't be MORE thrilled with the beautiful photos that Drew and Angela captured of my husband and me during our visit to Denver last September. We had fun, we felt like we could be ourselves, and the results totally blew us away. Our decision to hire Drew and Angela take take our portrait turned out to be such a blessing. We are so thankful to them both for giving us this gift and we can't wait for our next trip to Colorado so we can do it all over again!
I had the pleasure of working with Brian Chamberlin while shopping for a new KIA Optima at Kearny Pearson Ford/KIA. Out of the many dealerships I visited, Brian was by far the most professional and knowledgable sales associate we interacted with. Brian's personality made the experience fun, stress free, and enjoyable. He didn't pressure, and was willing to spend a lot of time with me test driving different cars and comparing all the features. After my initial visit, I returned the following week with the decision to go with the KIA Optima. I wanted the car in white, but unfortunately the only white Optima they had was a little out of my price range. Brian and the team at Kearny Pearson Ford/KIA worked with me to get the car to an affordable price, and I drove away in the perfect vehicle, one better than I ever expected to get. I definitely recommend Brian Chamberlin and the team at Kearny Pearson Ford/KIA.
Usually do HD authorized rentals but this Eagle Rider was located 5 miles from airport and 5 miles from our timeshare unit and they had a shuttle, with a very helpful nice driver, to pick us up and drop us off. Probably saved us $75 in cab rides. Very nice staff. Had an Ultra for a week and put 900 miles on it so had lots of fun for $1/mile. Take a rain suit, they don't rent or furnish them.
Our Jeep has been to A2Z three times so far, and the work done has been TOP NOTCH at very reasonable prices. I highly recommend A2Z for any work that Gennady is willing to take on. He is honest, upfront and a pleasure to do business with.
I am giving 5 stars for all areas because of the amazing service I always receive. I just bought my second car at Glockner (Beford) and I can not imagine ever going anywhere else! Drew listened to every detail of what I was looking for and made sure I was comfortable while I waited for JL to find me a great deal. Even though Drew did not offer me beef jerky, he did get me my favorite drink! To top off the whole experience, Monica was so sweet and made sure the paperwork process was as quick and efficient as possible. I really feel like more than just a customer. Everyone is genuinely concerned about making me happy and meeting my needs. I would absolutely recommend this dealership to anyone!
We have recently used Finco Services to steam clean our carpets in one of our offices, and to pressure wash a new warehouse we recently rented. They are always on time, get the job done quick and done right. I would highly recommend them and im sure i will be using them again.
I'm writing to praise the team at OMC Contractors. These guys are fabulous! They are responsive and polite, plus they kept my house clean throughout a particularly horrid plumbing job. I had them back on a paint job (i.e., living room, sun room), as well. Good people and extremely competitive pricing. OMC is a FIVE STAR vendor in my book!
None
Fantastic. Gary gave me a great deal on a queen size mattress. Superb customer service. Mattresses that usually cost >900 bucks elsewhere could be bought for 500 or less here..
I had a fantastic experience with Workbridge! They are the most professional, personable, and efficient recruiting company that I have ever worked with. After getting to know me and my background, they immediately supplied me with many potential opportunities that were contoured to my skills, career path, and even work-culture preference. They placed me in a great new job within nine days of first interfacing with them. All they asked of me was for my best effort and honesty. I highly recommend anyone out there to utilize them.
Great place, I love visiting it.
First time coming here. It was a great experience. Food was great and service top notch also. Highly recommend.
I have known Randy for a few years. Randy IS Affordable Communications. His knowledge of phone systems is exceptional and his work ethic is unmatched. He is the foremost authority on Panasonic phone systems on the west coast. If you need a new phone system, and you want it installed and working right the first time, call Affordable Communications.
I went to the Norwood Contours Face & Body Clinic last month for the first time as I was seeking a clinical solution to achieve healthy and youthful skin. The girls there are so nice and friendly. A cup of peppermint tea definitely made me feel really cozy before the treatment. The girls gave me their honest and professional opinions on what treatments and products would be best for me and I was absolutely amazed by the stunning results after just two treatments. The Microdermabrasion is amazing and the Radio Frequency Treatment afterwards just boosted the results. The treatment packages are well priced and the products are more affordable than I thought. I thoroughly enjoyed the whole process and am eagerly looking forward to going back for more treatments. I would definitely recommend Contours Face and Body Clinic to everyone.
Very good hotel,
My mother and I are staying in St.Paul Minnesota for the weekend and we weren't too sure what to order. I mentioned having Chinese delivered and after comparing a few Google reviews on different Chinese food places we decided to give Chin Chin Chinese a try. There definitely wasn't a single regret about our decision. Mom ordered the Kung Pao chicken meal and it came with the kung pao chicken, 2 egg rolls, 4 crab ragoons, and chicken fried rice. I orded a small order of chicken lo-mein, an order of crab ragoons, and a small order of rice. Also provided two fortune cookies. :) The food was still hot when it got here, they were here on time..early even...and the service was very friendly. The food was a lot for such a great price and very good quality. We would definitely order from them again and would recommend this restaurant to family and friends.
Not much to say! The place is the BEST! The food is always consistent and excellent, and the special items on the menu like the scallops, tea smoked duck and chilean sea bass are the best! Decor is very cool - just gives an extra bit of ambiance. But the staff are outstanding! I've been there dozens of times and never had bad service. Whether at a table or at the bar, the service is friendly, professional, always on their toes - again, not much to say! They are simply the best!!
Seriously? This Travelodge is AWESOME! VERY CLEAN! GREAT STAFF! GREAT LOCATION! Especially perfect when pulling a trailer in or out, and they have a great parking area! Plenty of well maintained grassy areas for your doggies ;-) P. S. Please be considerate! Pick up your doggie deposit and put in trash receptacle provided!!
Great pizza, try the Antonio!
Awesome instructors that teach the kids to read and love music. I have two boys Cody and Josh the oldest has been taking lessons for 9 years and is an awesome guitar player who can play any sheet of music placed in front of him thanks to two incredible music teachers at Performance School of Music Nate and Mark. Josh our youngest plays the piano and has taken lessons for 7 years, his teacher Grace has done an amazing job teaching him songs he loves to play around our house. I can't say enough about how much I appreciate The Performance School of Music and what they have taught our boys over the years. Everyone is friendly, professional, and enthusiastic. If your looking for a great place to take your children for music lessons look no further then here.
Great fresh and fast burritos. Their pulled pork is too sweet for my liking (sampled a friend's) and everything I've ordered has been delicious.
excellent ,marvelous ,lovely and serene hotel.
My very first car was a Nissan and still to this day, Nissan is the only car I've ever owned. I bought my 08' Altima brand new with 0 miles on it and was very VERY upset when my transmission started having problems before 100,000. With the economy being the way that it is, adding a car payment wasn't in our best interested and pricing it out to have my transmission fixed made me sick to my stomach. When I bought my car, 5 years ago, I didn't buy the 100,000 extra warranty because I never had a problem with any of my other 4 Nissans. My husband and I just decided we would drive it until it died and go from there, rather than putting it in the shop and spending money that we didn't have. A few days later, I was driving to Gainesville and out of the blue, I called the service department for a reason I'm still not sure of. I guess just to see if anything might have been recalled by chance. The receptionist immediately transferred me to "Kevin" who was an answer to my prayers. He told me Nissan had a 120,000 mile drivetrain warrenty that I had NO IDEA about. He set me up an appointment for the following morning. I brought my car in, it took MAYBE 20 minutes for them to determine it was in fact my transmission, they gave me a rental car and called me less than 24 hours later to let me know my car was ready to be picked up. I spent MAYBE a full hour, both days at the dealership and didn't pay a single cent for anything. I STILL CAN NOT believe it. The guys (and ladies) in the service department were SO helpful and friendly and did they're very best to get us in and out as quick as possible. They treated us the same way they would have wanted to been treated if the rolls were flipped, not like they were trying to make money off of us or like we weren't important because the warranty covered us. I can't say enough nice things about the service department. I'm BEYOND impressed with them and because of that, I'll never take my cars anywhere else!
Großartiges Essen, Der beste Burrito in München. Unbedingt probieren.
Loved the sushi! Great!! Great prices. And service... what more could you want?
None
Friendly staff make an excellent lunch! Im here pretty often
Darr, John and his crew at Action Auto Body were fantastic. I wouldn't hesitate to use them again. They did an amazing job repairing our vehicle to its original condition. Their communication and promptness were outstanding, and it was obvious they took great pride in their work.
Zen Fitness is THE place to workout! Personal attention, state of the art equipment and an awesome, knowledgeable staff! I would recommend Zen to anyone looking for a great workout experience. :]
None
Everyone at PHIA is so qualified, and their haircuts are fantastic. They have you sign a paper outlining your services before starting any work. At first, I was a little put off by this, as I had never done that at other salons. I discovered how nice it was to know the amount due before getting to the cash register. I have used a few different stylists there, and they are all very nice. They will work within your budget, be sure to ask about options. For example, I get my hair colored by a trainee (less expensive), but my cuts by a master stylist. My color is the same every time, so why pay the higher fee? Everyone I've worked with there really knows their stuff. When my male friends get their hair cut at PHIA, I notice a difference. Parking in the Short North can be a challenge, but it is easier with the Hubbard Garage open. I recommend PHIA and Aveda salons to all my friends looking for a new stylist.
When our 02 Durango had a leaking head gasket we decided to trade. We worked with Mike and Camillo and came up with a deal on a Caravan Crew Plus, it was a great vehicle but after a month we missed our Durango so we went back and worked with Mike and Camillo again trading the Caravan in on a Durango Citadel. Of course this was sort of complicated but Camillo and Mike helped us through it. Special thanks to Brenda for getting us through the paperwork on the two transactions and following everything up. Also thanks to Sam who did the delivery of the Durango to help Mike out. We also have to mention Anthony as he was always a friendly smiling face during the time we spent at Unique. We are happily on the road again enjoying the Durango experience and hoping it lasts as long as our first one. Looking forward to dealing with Unique Chrysler with our future service and maintenance.
I have referred cases back and forth with Shazam Kianpour for almost 8 years. He is personable, intelligent, driven, and just a solid professional.
Dr. Cajar is the best chiro I have ever been too. He treated my shoulder for tendentious and did a great job. He didn't rush me in and out like other doctors but took the time to make sure I was treated well. He did cold laser therapy as well as a lot of adjustments to make it feel better. I would highly recommend him to anyone with sports injuries or who needs a chiropractor. He has a holistic approach and recommended some great supplements to me as well.
A great family place off the beaten path. Very clean and up to date accommodations. Great vistas. Lots of things to do and see in the area. And did I mention the natural hot springs! Highly recommend this place.
This place is great and they do great work. Fred and Tammy treat you like family, highly recommend getting all your bow work done or archery needs at The Bow Shop!
I have eat at the place all my life I'm 42 and it's never bad.
Amazing.
Everything you could want for your pet and great friendly service! Very easy to find at 7th and Scarth in Regina. I gave it a 2 for "appeal" because it's off the major streets and you have to walk for a short bit if you do not have a car. About 5-10 minutes.
Kirk is a top notched insurance agent and truly looking out for his clients best interest. I would recommend Kirk for all of your insurance needs in make sure you are best value protected of you and your assets. I truly recommend and have recommended Kirk for house insurance for my clients
I'm from Oklahoma. My window on my Expedition quit working and was down. Brought it here WITHOUT an appointment. They had it fixed in no time. Meanwhile, I waited in the lounge, accommodated by a free soda fountain and ice cream. THE best service.....PLUS THE best lounge. :)
i have visited kolkata in dec 2013, that was my official tour and i was looking for Kolkata Cheap Hotel and finally i found best cheap and luxury hotel that is heera inn, services offerd by Heera Inn Hotel are awesome.
Hi, best seo company in lucknow 100% satisfies by seo And PPC services. Thanks
None
Awesome place to have fun
Boulevard not only makes great beer, but they give excellent tours. Come here during the week to get a free tour, or sign up ahead of time to get a free tour on a Saturday. You'll get some free tasters, including some beer that's not available in stores yet. After the tour, go to your favorite liquor store and buy yourself some great-tasting local beer.
This Really a fantastic boutique ever .highly recommended.peolple's favourite especially for bridal occasions emergency alterations.Awesome.
After a one month of visiting local dealerships in Miami, I finally found Cannon Buick. One of my friends strongly recommended the dealership. At Cannon Buick I was treated with excellence! They offer what they promise! They carefully explained all details about how to function the car. Nothing as my previous experiences in Miami! I strongly recommend Cannon Buick! I will continue choosing them in the future! I love my Buick Verano!! It was really worth it!! Oh! And you get a free bucket with car care products!! Love it!!
If you're backing a 70' semi into the loading dock...haha...have fun...especially you rookies...plan on spending about an hour...muhahaha.
This is the best place to find used things and garage sale items. I come here to purchase nitro radio control cars and trucks. I always find really great deals from a few vendors. The manager Frank has helped me find the correct vendors that have the item i need. The prices are so cheap you will not believe your eyes. The weather gets cooler in November and this place gets packed. We do a lot of our Christmas shopping here to. I highly recommend this place in Fort Lauderdale.
Love their baked potato and bbq chicken pizza!
I've been here twice so far, once for my LED headlights to be installed and today for my chrysler 300 grill to be installed. both times i have experienced great customer service and good quality in the work. I will continue to come here to get things done to my car. Great job guys!!!!
None
Love service and food. Going here for years. Never disappointed. Kids love it too.
Fantastic service and really awesome staff :D And the best blueberry scones in the world.
i work at the datai langkawi .. so i know everthing about the datai langkawi .. its a haeven place for who in a honey moon people .. :D
Upton Park è uno stadio che può regalare emozioni incredibili, soprattutto per chi è abituato agli impianti italiani. Sorge in un quartiere che di certo non spicca per bellezza o eleganza, anzi, ma se si tralascia questo aspetto, e ci si focalizza sull'esperienza calcistica che si può vivere in questo angolo dell'est di Londra, beh, vale la pena andarci almeno una volta. Per noi tifosi del West Ham United è ovviamente un luogo di culto, e la passione per il club ci fa passare inosservati gli evidenti limiti urbanistici della zona. Uscendo dalla stazione della metropolitana di Upton Park (zona 3) basta percorrere Green Street (verso destra o comunque seguendo la leggera discesa) per vedere dopo pochissimi minuti sulla sinistra l'impianto sportivo del West Ham. Durante la camminata ci si può fermare al pub "The Queens" o da "Ken's cafe". Tappa obbligatoria anche al "Boleyn Pub", che sorge bellissimo dopo lo stadio proseguendo sempre sulla strada principale. Questo è in particolare il luogo di ritrovo dei tifosi degli Hammers più caotico e movimentato, dove poter vivere in tutti sensi una esperienza incredibile: fiumi di birra, cori e canti. Lo stadio si presenta con una facciata caratteristica davvero originale, che ricorda appunto il castello presente nel logo del club. Li si trova la biglietteria e il negozio. Per entrare nei propri posti si passa per i classici tornelli inglesi strettisimi, ma la loro numerosità non fa creare alcuna fila o attesa. Appena si entra all'interno ci si rende subito conto che noi italiani il calcio lo viviamo a metà: l'unica divisione con il campo è rappresentata da un cartellone pubblicitario, e se non si sta attenti nelle fasi di riscaldamento ti arrivano le pallonate addosso se si è in zona porta. La tribuna principale poi è davvero imponente. Lo staff dello stadio, come bene o male in tutti gli stadi inglesi, è organizzatissimo e disponibilissimo. I tifosi del West Ham United rendono poi l'esperienza della partita avvincente e adrenalinica, soprattutto nel settore Bobby Moore e Sir Trevor Brooking lower. No hooligans, no violenza, solo pura passione e voce da vendere. Indipendentemente che tu sia un tifoso degli Hammers, ti consigliamo di andare a vedere almeno una partita in questo bellissimo stadio, che tra l'altro potrebbe diventare presto solo un ricordo, con il possibile passaggio del West Ham United allo stadio olimpico di Londra (quello delle ultime olimpiadi 2012 per intenderci). Maggiori informazioni sullo stadio (come ad esempio quali settori scegliere), sui biglietti e in generale su tutto quello che concerne il West Ham United lo puoi trovare sul sito della Station 936 (Tifosi italiani del West Ham United). COYI
Without its unique seating area on the main floor, State Street Brats would probably be 4 stars at best. As the name suggests, they do brats, burgers, fries, cheese curds, and not a whole lot else. But they make what they make, and have a condiment bar if you choose to go to town. The reason the seating area is so important is two-fold. One, instead of ordinary tables in the center, they have island bars. These are great for sitting and conversing, but if you have a larger crowd, it is not awkward to stand next to. With all the TVs on the wall, it's a great game day place. But even on Friday or Saturday nights, the dance floor and main alcohol bar are on the second floor, so you can go up there and party if you want, but you can stay on the first floor and drink casually if that is your thing (it is mine).
My boys love getting their cuts at 8th Street. Gary cuts their hair just the way they want it every time. The prices are great compared to other shops!
Excellent place for an elegant dinner with great food and wine and service
The best fresh salads and fresh juices ever! And great service!
Great price, service, and a nicely elegant nail salon. First time here and it seemed like they really strive to make a relationship with their customers. They even offered to give me a complimentary water or soda as soon as I walked in.
GBS) (गण्डकी आवासीय उच्च माध्यामिक विद्यालय), formerly known as Nepal Adarsha Vidyashram, is a model school of Nepal. It is located in the city of Pokhara, 200 kilometers west of Kathmandu, and is the first and the only regional school of the country. Gandaki Higher Secondary Boarding School formerly known as Nepal Adarsha Bidhalaya was established on 11th June 1966 as a result of the initiation of three groups: i. The United Mission to Nepal. ii. The Shining Hospital and iii. The Local Community. Initially the facilities were primitive with all the thatched-roofed buildings mud and bamboo. There were only 45 boarding students, who were catered for by 5 teaching staff. It was designated as a co-educational regional school in 1985 with English as the medium of instruction in an agreement between Nepal government and the United Mission to Nepal. The First batch of 10+2 students was enrolled in 1992.Prior to the commencement of 10+2 education; students were prepared for O level study for a number of years. Really it is one of the best school of Nepal. The unparalleled resources, encouraging teachers, clean and green environment, great library with variety of books are just a few of features that G.B.S provides to students. It is ranked best school because of it's effective teaching and learning process. The school is a non-profit institution owned by Nepal Government (Ministry of Education) and used to be run by an agreement and in collaboration with the United Mission to Nepal (UMN). The school was opened with a view to imparting education of an international standard keeping into view the thirsts of the students of Western Development Region for quality education. As it solely believes in the holistic development a child, students here are nurtured providing a homely and caring environment for their mental, physical and social development. The school provides an all-round education that challenges the student's mind, body and spirit. It combines freedom with responsibility and reason with emotion. As it is a non-profit making institution, the objective of the school is to provide a quality education with an affordable cost. Character, Service and Knowledge are our school motto.
Best burgers in Shelby County!
Was in over the weekend and had partial highlights done for the third time with Nikki! She is awesome, the salon is clean and friendly and I always walk out feeling great and valued!! Nikki will have my business for a long time!!
Awesome, awesome place. Nice guys, helpful and friendly service. Went above and beyond just an oil change, I highly recommend this place to anyone. Best experience I've ever had with a mechanic shop.
Great staff and of course the food..!
None
Great Environment
The food, wine and service were simply amazing. Expensive though..!
Great people in a clean and well-run Motel. Close to town but just far away enough to enjoy the beautiful valley at the foot of Mt Equinox. The most reasonable value in town.
Tony and Trevor combined to make an incredible leasing experience for my husband and I recently. Looking for a car is low on my list of "favorite things" but their no gimmicks, just a great price and even better service far surpassed our expectations. This is our 3rd Hyundai and I would not only highly recommend a Hyundai, I would highly recommend visiting Trevor Houston and his Sales Manager Tony Saif for a fabulous experience.
Adoro ir ao Studio 5 ainda mas com o Cinemark e Amazon Bowling
This is my favorite pizza restaurant. The pizzas are truly amazing and they're always fresh and prepared at the moment. The prices are also more than affordable and there's a delivery option. What more can you wish for.
Greater Raleigh Chiropractic & Rehab blends personalized physical therapy with top-notch chiropractic care in the same facility. Dr. Jeff and Heidi Roistacher are passionate, knowledgeable, and caring people. Dr. Jeff uses a mix of pro-adjuster and manual manipulation for his patients. I've been to a couple of different chiropractors, and Dr. Jeff's method has by far been the most effective for me. He is patient, explains everything, and takes a personal interest in my life. Heidi, the physical therapist, is one of the most personable people I've ever met - I've never had so much fun doing rehab before, and the results are clear: I've never had a bigger range of motion in my life than I do now thanks to Heidi's help. Bottom line: these guys are awesome! I've never seen physical therapy and chiropractic in the same place before, and it works very, very well.
duhok
I am a local photographer and use Angel Crosby as my hair and make up artist. She is very professional and makes you feel comfortable and confident. She is very talented when it comes to hair and make up. She is very knowledgeable in what she does. She is very patient with me and my questions and is more than happy to explain things very clearly. I recommend Angel to anyone for any occasion!
Our company uses them and has for years. Great customer service. Prompt service when we need them. Wont go anywhere else.
Awesome joint! Great food and actually where i got my first kiss.
None
Dr. Barsky and his staff are tremendous, it is the best dental experience I have ever had. The office is beautiful and the staff are friendly and caring. I would highly recommend this office to my friends and family.
A member of HiltonHonors and always stay with you. Consistently Excellent.
Great members. They are very helpful. The ranges are all very nice. The only 500 yard range in the area that i know of. They host the IBO shoots. They have skeet and trap shooting
The owner/artist was more than hospitable. I wasn't made to feel like I didn't belong there because of my "lacking in tattoo quantity", which HAS been the case at so many other tattoo shops....................... Like the one with the name of a colored cultural good luck sysmbol :-* Thanx guys, Keep it up A local satisfied repeat customer
I really liked this place. I'm not to big on tex-Mex but this is definitely a place I would recommend. Even though the kitchen was about to close in 7mins as a group of 9 walked in, they were still very nice and served us before the kitchen closed... That takes skill and patients. Two thumbs all the was up!!!
None
This was my first visit to this dealership. I drove from Charleston to purchase a Nissan Cube that I saw on the internet. Not only were these employees super nice and helpful answering all of my silly questions through email and phone, they were exceptionally nice and easy to work with in person. Buying a car from out of state was a little stressful but Mark made it extremely easy and kinda fun. Mark was super nice and laid back...definitely not over the top "Sales-y." I really hate the pressure that you feel when you walk onto a car sales lot, I felt none of that at this place. It was super relaxed.
beach
They do a great job on most everything. I obviously take my dry cleaning here, but they've hemmed pants for me and fixed sweaters. Really nice people. I highly recommend.
beautiful, impressive. and the streets leading to the basilica Sacré-Cœur
Paul Miller Honda. The Best in excellence with customers
Supeerr
Its a good hotel and food is also very good.
Best auto repair shop in Modesto. Fair prices and honest work.
Great customer service and the records are at a very reasonable price point. I love stopping in and always come out with something new to add to the collection.
Tony Tronzo is great! He went above and beyond to help me find the perfect car that met my needs and budget. I would send any of my friends and family members there to him.
I just had to write this review as I was so excited about my experience with FAIRWAY CHEVROLET in general, and NEIL GAINES in particular. Everyone at the dealership is so nice, professional and understanding of the fact that I needed help with all the new technology in my 2012 Chevrolet Traverse LT. Neil is a excellent Sales Representative and did a wonderful job. I ABSOLUTELY LOVE MY NEW VEHICLE!!!! I can't say THANK YOU enough to the WHOLE FAIRWAY CHEVROLET TEAM!!!!!!
Thcs lien ha
I had contacted Dyson's Help Line because my vacuum was acting up. I was told my closest service center was at A & E Vacuum. I dropped it off, they ordered a new motor for me and I picked it back up after a few days. About two weeks later, my vacuum was acting up so I called A & E on a Saturday and they told me to bring it back in. I arrived and the very nice couple looked at it right away. They found a pencil that was stuck in one of the tubes and was causing a block/buildup. I was prepared to have to pay some type of service fee but they assured me that they were happy to help at NO CHARGE!!. It didn't take long to fix but I don't know much of ANY store that will help you out without charging you something. After a very nice chat, they wished me a great weekend and I was on my way. I will DEFINITELY be heading back when it's time to get a new vacuum and will continue to tell others that are in need of a vacuum to head over to A & E Vacuum where they will get it cheaper than the big box stores. Thanks Phil & Joan!
None
i love anamils
None
Love their Big J with bacon! Good price as well!
None
Great location, wonderful breakfast, very clean and an excellent value!!!
Really good pancakes and a nice atmosphere, little bit on the pricey side as pancakes range from 6-14€ but worth a visit!
Modern Furniture Los Angeles is an excellent furniture store. I loved their eclectic style, they seem to have everything. I purchased a modern platform bed, it is comfortable, unique and well made. My bed is easy to decorate and is a haute focal point in my bedroom. Modern Furniture also has beautiful italian furniture. I fell in love with a stylist leather sofa which I plan on purchasing. They have a great array of modern living room furniture. I love this this place it has so much Panache’.
None
very nice society..
I had only a short time to learn to drive, and am a late learner ( 32 years old ). Thanks to Doug I passed first time, with only 31 hours under my belt. Booking lessons, was a simple, uncomplicated affair, and Doug gave me plenty of advice on the process of passing my test, not just on how to drive. Always helpful, always on time, always patient. What more can I say?
Wowww....
Stopped in and needed some cover plates made. Doug told me to come back in a few hours and it was all done. Great service quick turn around. I'll be going back anytime I need some metal work done!
Love the place, Great if you don't want to travel all the way to Glasgow to go Clubbing as its right on your doorstep, Was known as Papa Docs and will always be known as Paps to us ! X
Getting an old ring of my grandfathers appraised was a great experience. Not only did Ron tell me what the ring was worth, but he told me about the little details of past repair work he could tell had been done to the ring, and the time period he thought it was from based on some of the detailing on it. Great experience! They really know their stuff!
The best butter chickens on the Gold Coast. Also, look out for the prawn masala. It is the chefs specialty. Fantastic service.
I've moved around alot and this is by far the best movers and customer service we have ever encountered. They moved around our boxes like Tetris masters and treated everything with care. Joe and Todd, the movers, arrived on time and had everything done in the allocated time. Charlie's customer service is spot on.
None
None
Amazing quality, fresh sushi. Great customer service and extremely quick deliveries. Will definitely order again
Great Job!! I took my 6 month old puppy for her first hair cut to Paw Spaw, she felt comfortable there right away. They have a very clean and friendly environment, I felt confident to leave my puppy there! I will definatley recommend Paw Spaw . Nathan and Joule
None
None
Fab, friendly cafe with delicious food.
Christian Brothers is a great place to go!!! I completely trust what I am being told. I had wonderful, quick service in a beautiful facility. I will definitely recommend Christian Brothers to my family and friends!!
Bobrowe Skały - punkt widokowy
Nice & secure place, friendly people and nice sea food
You can trust Jer. You'll get really excellent, honest affordable work at Jer's Elite. I have heard Jer talking to his staff (who are well-trained guys, by the way) insisting on using high-grade oil, filters and parts without raising his prices. He'll pay a little more for a part to get it for his customer quicker--again, without raising the price. I know I can trust him and his guys to do really good work at an affordable price.
Very friendly staff, always answer the phone, and are just cool people in general!
Best pizza place in town
Professional, friendly, innovative and a pleasure to deal with! Thank you everyone at Canawrap for making our AllCare Mini's stand out.
Had great food. You can tell there is a real chef and the prices are unbeatable if you have children.
Wayne Parker is very knowledgeable and willing to help you with any questions or goals for your new car. Jared Johnson in the Finance Department is also very knowledgeable and knows how to break things down for those of us who aren't super comfortable with "financial speak".
None
Wow oh Wow. We were limited on time and this was the perfect place to hang out at and have a cocktail on the terrace, which is what we did. Perfect glass of white wine - great gondola ride up - spectacular views. HEAVEN on a Hill. We only went for a cocktail. Not sure I'd hang here overnight or for dinning. For sure, cocktail and an appetizer with that view...great. Pictures say it all...
good price and alot of choice for hotels in bali, just book at sapu lidi resort in ubud for this september
It gets old after a while, and the food isn't the best in town, but it's environment makes up for it :)
Great place to rent from. Tova is great at helping to resolve any issues especially LOST gate codes! Always helpful and upbeat.
I recently bought a Prius V 3 from Peterson Toyota. The sales person, Lee was great. He helped me without any pressure and no games. He gave me a top dollar for my trade and gave me a wonderful price for 2013 model which was still wrapped in plastic. I will recommend him to anyone who needs a new car. Thank you, Lee.
None
Es un restaurante ubicado en un lugar muy bonito de Madrid muy popular bueno la plaza turistica, donde se puede ir de paseo por la plaza sol la plaza mayor y la gran via muchos lugares al mismo tiempo y luego pasar a comer algo con sabor latino si entra nostalgia es un lugar muy rico para disfrutar de la comida mexicana...
None
Příjemný personál, vše rychle vyřízeno
Fast, Friendly, and Honest Service. Clean and pleasant office. No sales pressure. I normally do not write these reviews, but I highly recommend this business without hesitation.
Bowman & Chamberlain are so easy to work with, very knowledgeable and explain everything so you're never in the dark. I would definitely use them again.
As good as always , best burritos, and tacos
Talk about EXOTIC limousines! You really can't get any better than Wow Limousine, high class blended with affordability - it can't be beat. That 50 passenger Party Bus is seriously like no other! The clan and I felt like rock stars!
Excellent experience with HepTech. I have used them on a multiple times on issues I've had with my computers. As many businesses, our computers are essential in running an efficient business. HepTech understands the importance of that and has always been able to get us up and running so were back to business as usual.
None
None
Great place to stop... Clean bathrooms and hometown service. Milkshakes and fries
I honestly can't say enough good things about the job that Tara did on my makeup for my wedding. I gave her a picture of what I wanted and she completely nailed it! Not only did the make up look great, but I felt like a superstar when I was finally able to see the finished product. I have to say, I was also really impressed with how long the makeup stayed on. Through the ceremony and vows to the dancing extravaganza during the reception... it didn't fade, it didn't run, and I left with the makeup looking just as beautiful as it did when she applied it 10 hours before! Tara is also such a great person. She fit right in with all of us and we laughed and had a great time getting ready. If you are in the market to get your makeup done for a wedding or any other special event, look no further. Stop right here and call her. You honestly won't regret it!
Growing Generations is a great company all around. They have been helping to create families for so long now; to people regardless of race, gender, sexual orientation, or marital status. Over 1,000 babies have been born through GG and I feel privelaged to say that I have birthed two of those babies. I am a two time Gestational Surrogate who has helped a deserving couple start and grow their family; and I am in the midst of doing a third surrogacy helping another deserving couple grow their family. The thought of helping someone experience the joy of parenthood, like I do, is the reason I wanted to do this and it has been so rewarding. With Growing Generations on your side, they help the process go as smooth as possible. They're always there to answer your questions; through phone or email; before, during, and after the pregnany. They offer lots of support through their website and personal staff, including a phsychologist for you to talk to as much, or as little, as you feel needed. I would definitely recommend Growing Generations, and have already, to anyone interested in becoming a surrogate, or egg donor, to help create or grow a family!
None
It was worth the drive down from St. Paul. The greens were great, the fairways well manicured and overall a fun experience the second I walked in the Pro Shop. A great job to the CreeksBend staff.
I grew up on this cuisine. Easily the BEST Chinese food in the Dayton Area. If you're into meat-- get the Peking Ribs. They might be the most delicious thing I have ever tasted.
Aditi Travels is nice agency to book confirm railway ticket and air ticket
Every time i'm in Atlanta, I make sure to stop by Blossom Tree for lunch. Sometime's i'll double up and go there for dinner as well. Not only is the food incredibly priced, but it's definitely got a unique approach to Korean food that gives everything on the menu a nice kick of flavor. Love their selection of free teas, and even drop buckets for multiple charities.
Masjid yang sangat aktif, harap dapat bantuan dari JAIS untuk pembinaan masjid baru..
Quality installation of tint for your car windows. I had the install performed a little over 2 years ago and it looks new not a scratch. Materials they used are of the best quality. Extremely happy with job performed by High Tech Electronics!
I have purchased from The Kilt Hire Co on many occasions, friendly staff and getting the right fit is what makes it 5 stars for me!
Knightling Studio just accommodated our corporate staffs photos for marketing materials. Our photographer was great to work with, very friendly and helpful. The studio was very nice and comfortable and is easily located off the 210 Freeway. I will be referring all of our clients and coworkers to Knightling Studios from now on!
Chuck worked with us to find a time of day that we could do without our vehicle and made sure he had it back to us in time for us to get to work. He offered us frank advice and was very knowledgeable about the tires we could choose from. Chuck helped us understand what options we had and helps us make an informed decision about our vehicle. We will definitely be back.
Jai Mata Di.......return nature........?
Tres joli parc
I walked into Thai Healing house having never had a Thai massage, only your typical resort swedish massages while on vacation. I left there a customer for life and frankly don't know why anyone would ever choose swedish over Thai, if given the choice. The Thai Healing House was referred to me by a good friend and I only wish I would have gone in sooner because it was truly therapeutic. The place is super clean, the staff is friendly and professional, and the results are amazing. I work out 4-5 days per week and I tried Thai Healing House before a weekend race and never felt better, ie., more limber, stronger, and I just felt loose and relaxed versus tight and knotted. I am so glad to have the Thai Healing house in my area and I strongly encourage everyone to give them a go. Jonathan
Sweet 16! An exciting adventure for Haley's 16th birthday morning! She loved it and was so comfortable with Denise as "her co-pilot"! She actually took control and flew the ultra-light down the coast and back. She had a wonderful time and we are sharing the photos and DVD for everyone to see. Thank you, Sandra
I was having issues with my Civic not starting a few weeks back during the "cold snap" and had to get it jumped. After I had it jumped I took it to the Brooklyn Center Honda dealership where I purchased the new-used car a few months back and they told me the battery tested good. They also changed the oil and supposedly checked fluids. Fast forward to yesterday when we had another cold snap. I went out to start my car and low and behold...it didn't start. I was able to jump the car and get it to Luther Hopkins Honda (I was referred by a friend) and was helped by Jace Harken and Jim Manning (both super awesome, by the way!). They were able to immediately find the source of the issue (yup, the battery was no good) and even found some fluids that needed to be changed. I was super impressed by the problem-solving and friendly, efficient service there and will definitely be bringing my car back to Hopkins Honda from here on out. Thanks, Jim and Jace!
Went there for the first time, last Sunday. My girlfriend and I entered, just to taste some Pastries. We ended up having a whole meal!! Great decor, ambiance, vibe, food, staff, price, taste. Everything par excellence. The Cheese French Fries and the Mexican Crepes were lip-smacking. In Dessert, we ordered a Blueberry Cheese Cake, Double Decker Brownie, a Pineapple something and a Mango something. (Sorry, don't remember their names), they were all Brilliant. I also wanted to buy a cake for my Father's birthday. Terry was very helpful in getting me a last minute order for a Dutch Truffle Cake. They organized everything and called me back within 3 hours for pickup. Good job, everyone. :) Definitely, a place worth visiting many many times. Thank you guys. :)
Real matcha in a bowl, with a bit of mochi and anko. Peaceful and made me happy. I wish I had one of these where I live!
I constantly find excuses to visit. The broth is fantastic. The ice coffee drink will hit your table before you say the last syllable in "coffee".
we went for dim sun sunday. service was good to great and the food was good too! the reviews scared me but I am glad we went!!
A great mechanic that really knows his stuff! He got a worthless pitbike running like it was brand new for me and is now working on my dirtbike. His prices are more than fair and he is a great, nice guy to meet. I would recommend him hands down over any other place nearby!
Kedves, hozzáértő kiszolgálás!
Wow, what incredible service and fantastic food. It was a real pleasurable dining experience. We had the buffalo shrimp for an appetizer, excellent choice. The ribs were delicious with down home Sothern Hospitality. All of the staff was friendly and professional. I am definitely making this a top choice for dining downtown Denver.
Great service and super friendly.
None
If you want peace of mind and a good rest after your next mattress deal, then I suggest that you try Bed City. This is a family-owned business of good quality service. Thumbs up!
Biscuit pierced my nose he was great! professional and hilarious at the same time!
None
I'm a tricky patient to have --- I get extremely anxious with any kind of procedure, and having an hour-long root canal made me more nervous than I'd like to admit. Not only were the Dr. and assistant friendly and understanding but they did a wonderful job on my hard-to-reach tooth. Would definitely recommend.
A brilliant person and a very effective tip for everyone!
Please update your hours. I went in there at 7:45pm to get something printed for a job interview in the morning because this said they were open until 9pm, and low and behold they close at 8pm-- beyond frustrating.
One of my favorite places to go being an import beer enthusiast! Great selection of beers, delicious food and thoughtful service. I haven't ever had a poor experience here!
Amazing food, great service
Loved Le Petit Spa. Priti does an amazing job!
my 02 S80 was suffering a major power steering leak. European Auto Works was able to quickly diagnose the problem, and even though they didn't have the required part on hand to fix the issue, they were able to have it on hand the next day. The problem was fixed quickly and at a very fair price. The staff is very knowledgeable, personable and courteous, something you don't see too much of when it comes to auto shops!
This Place is not the nicest lokking place ..but their food its Awesome A+ Highly Recommended
I recently got engaged and wanted to have my grandmother's engagement ring and wedding ring resized for my fiancee. I had heard of the Jewelry Appraiser from a family member and, not knowing anything about jewelry whatsoever, I decided to give it a shot. I was thoroughly impressed. Deborah did an excellent job of measurements and took great care to ensure that the resized rings fit extremely well. The rings look brand new with some platinum "repronging" as well that really makes the diamonds stand out. Very satisfied and will definitely go back here again for any future jewelry needs.
Literally the best garlic bread in the world.
None
This place is absolutely a great find! Easily in the same company as the very expensive spa's like the Ritz Carlton but at a fraction of the cost. The entire staff is very friendly and accommodating. I am a bit of a massage snob. I am very picky about quality. I have been at several high end spas over the years, but this one is my favorite by far. Karmalee is, without question, the best massage therapist I have had. I hate to mention her name because I may have difficulty in the future booking time with her. If you want a real deep tissue massage from someone that I consider to be the best - she is the one!
I come here ever once and a while. And i must say thye have good prices for there Adult stuff. (: The people that work there are very nice and have a really off beat sense of humor! And i love it!
By Peter Brunner freshly cooked regional food in an very charming environment. Nice wine list and large selection of open wines
BIRRA
Bin Stammgast, bin jedes mal begeistert. Und auch wenn es z.B. "kleine Potpourri-Platte" heißt, die Portionen sind riesig!
Velmi dobre jidlo!
I find the negative comments humorous regarding The Breakers being ostentatious a gaudy. The old, "idle rich" complaint. If you do a little investigation online, you should know what you are in for. If you think the preservation people are snobs, I suggest you buy a huge old mansion with staggering upkeep and maintenance costs, and run it how you think you should! I think they have done wonders with properties that are simply amazing. For me, I was intrigued with what I read online. The tour did not disappoint. An indoor tour during the winter meant no lines to wait in, and unobstructed views of the exterior. Taking pictures outside without people in the shots was a big plus to me. A very good use of a sunny, winter day. It was sure a lot better than staying in my hotel! A business trip brought me to the area in February, and having a weekend on my hands, I decided to explore the "Cliff Walk". It was excellent. It only confirmed my interest in seeing the mansion up-close. I spent an hour taking pictures outside. I was disappointed to not be allowed to take pictures inside - but I knew that going in. I purchased the winter season pass, which will allow me to go back and tour two other properties. I hear "The Elms" is the best tour. I also want to see Marble House. $25 well spent, as I said, on a winter's day (or three, in my case).
Nice place, friendly staff, and they do a quick cut for a very reasonable price. You'll be in and out in no time at all. Nothing extravagant but it's always my first choice for good, competent service. Highly recommended if you need a decent cut on a small budget.
Perfect Smile has a great doctor and very friendly staff. I would recommend Perfect Smile to everyone. My visits have been enjoyable.
I've experienced smooth sailing in both directions on the two trips I took last summer. Very efficient loading process - easy in, easy out.
None
The staff at Family First Dental, was professional, helpful, kind and most importantly, caring. My experience here was first class.
If you are reading these reviews, then you're looking for a photographer. Look at the photos. Can you picture yourself in them? These are not like the photos a friend will take of you. If you are looking for a professional photographer that takes pride in his work, call Jonathan Betz today! There might be a lot of photographers to choose from out there, but you can see the difference in the work of Jonathan Betz. I refer my clients to them.
I love these guys. Fast, reliable, good quality, and excellent service. Got three albums printed there and will definitley get them to do the next.
None
I am phobic of the dentist. Dr. Swift was absolutely amazing. I highly recommend Dr. Swift to anyone who might be a little timid of dental work. The entire staff at Texas Dental Specialists were friendly and professional.
None
I've used Maids & Moore for nearly 2 years now, & I couldn't be happier. Holly & Roxy are incredible, & Ana goes above & beyond each time. I can't tell you how refreshing it is to come home to a sparkling clean home with shiny appliances, spotless bathrooms, & fur "tumbleweed"-free floors (& sometimes even folded laundry)! If you are looking for a fabulous & LOCAL team to make your home or office spiffy & tidy, Maids & Moore is def the way to go!
Trop bonne
Leasing a car has always been a nerve-racking experience for me and I hate it! A friend had suggested that I visit Rallye BMW and I was really astounded by their level of service; the entire process was flawless from start to finish!
None
The best dentist I have ever had; tells you what he is doing and has a very gentle touch. I learned more about my teeth from him than all previous dentists combined. Beautiful work, wonderful staff, and reasonable bill, too.
I just wanted to thank the crew at DBR PLumbing for all the help during ourre construction project. thanks
had some shirts done at Accent for our church group. they came out very well. accent sis a good job on them and everyone loved them. thank you
Best Subway in the area. Very clean and the ingredients are always very fresh. Top notch.
Wonderful service
Fantastic food, atmosphere and employees. Jay, master mixologist, was a perfect host and made us feel like we were family!! My friend Ellen recommended this to us for brunch on Sat or Sun and she was right. We will return many times over!!!
Great pizza
Mr. Spatz is simply the "best!"
I would like to recommend Alan Harvey in general and Sabrina Da Silva in particular. She is very fast, kind and reliable. Sabrina always provided me with an excellent service, giving me all the necessary information and helping me with everything I needed.
Great service, good people.
Chip at Bay inn was really helpful. The room was clean and looked great. Nice place to stay.
I love this salon! that is the only place i go to when i get my nails done. The staff is so friendly, and each time i go in there they call me by my name, they know me in there. They have so much nail polish and shellac! They have recently also remodeled the place so it looks great! i really suggest going there!
Got tickets through Barry and had a blast. Very easy to purchase tickets and no service fees! will use them again!
Small and efficient.
This is the place to buy Photographic Equipment in Norwich. How do I know? I work here, and I love it! Ive bought all my gear here and I know everyone here really cares.
Jim and family could not be any friendlier or more helpful. Excellent quality of work and very fast turnaround times.
Odisha Bhavan
I lived near this restaurant for over two years and I always had an amazing time and delicious food. I would walk here nearly everyday from school and buy a soda and a Sub or chat with Hannah and/or Gus. There is an extremely friendly environment here. I have recommended it to multiple people and as far away as I live now, I am still trying to find my way there for an Italian Sausage sub, Cheesecake, A soda, and a chat. I would tell anyone and everyone I know as long as there was two subs and enough cheesecake for me. Shoutout to Gus, Hannah, Tony, and Frank!!!!! I love you guys!!!!!
Great logistics company
Going to Latte Da? Get ready for great service, fantastic atmosphere, and a lot of variety in areas that you can sit to enjoy a delicious drink, or maybe a plate of biscuits and gravy. I've been going here for about six months, and love it! Great place for a social event or just a quiet cup.
mejor sandwich cubano en todas Tampa!
Perfect!
Our family visited Big Chief on Memorial Day weekend and had a blast. Very kid friendly, and a great staff. I would highly recommend to anyone looking to getaway to the lake for a weekend!
I am so amazed, and grateful to this car shop. Absolutely the best repair experience I have ever had, and did not try to get me into unnecessary parts or services, even when I said I was pretty sure I needed them. I'm thrilled with their service (and my car). Thank you, Wade, Kelly and Rose!
I went with four of my friends on Saturday 14th December 2013 for the whole day. Although the weather was horrific (it was cold, foggy, windy and it rained heavy all day), we really loved it. Everything was well organised and staff members were very friendly. The only downside was the large number of people at the beginning of the day. Apart from that I can only recommend it to everyone, especially if you don't mind getting stuck in.
The Stromboli was absolutely one of the most delicious I have ever feasted upon. If you have never had one, be sure to order the next time you are here. I highly recommend this place if you want delicious pizza at a great price.
None
Jerry's knowledge is amazing.
One of the best restaurant in dubai truly rajasthani
Fantastic food with good sized portions, really helpful and friendly staff and nice surroundings. By far the best Mexican food restaurant we have tried in Auckland.
Edgewood has had a tremendous impact on my life. The family oriented atmosphere and God breathing word has allowed me to be liberated and enjoy life on a deeper level. If you are looking for a place to belong and grow closer to God, Edgewood may be for you!
None
Oh my damn driver if your cb radio is off wack or messed up in any kind of way. Please come here because you will indeed become satisfied with the excellent service you will receive here. From the staff all the way down to the product you are inquiring about purchasing or fixing. This place is wonderful. I enjoyed my time here getting my cb tuned up plus other things I've purchased for my truck!
I have had 2 body contouring sessions out of the 8 I purchased so far and can say I have had a great experience. This is not my first time having body contouring done so I do have something to compare it to and there is no comparison. Tana was very professional and curtiouse to me. She took the time to make sure I was comfortable, which I was. The equimpment was up to date and the room was pleasant. I would highly recommend going to LaserPro MedSpa to anyone looking for body contouring treatments. I am so looking forward to seeing the end results of my sessions!!
None
Holy "monster"!!! Get one now!!
None
These guys deserve a good review! I was a loyal fan of Hunan Express for 15 years, then Mandarin Garden opened up. Sooooo good and really good service too! Their food is great peons and very flavorful!
This place rocks: coffee during the day and craft beers (and a good wine selection) at night! They even have good live music on weekends. Kind of amazed that this kind of a place exists in our small town.
Great !
I can't believe it took so long for a place like this to open. You can get your fries or whole potato any way you want it with the serving style like Chipotle. Get as much greens as you want and pay a little extra from some "protein" a.k.a. poultry toppings like bacon! Food was super delicious.
I was impressed by this place. Clean, nice and cosy. Service was more helpful than I was expecting, which was a great surprise. Food was so delicious! My wife didn't eat that much, but she liked everything she tasted.
I have been playing soccer for over 25 years. Indoor soccer over the last 5 years has not be great. forced travel to woodscross for two sandy/draper teams to play. It is finally nice to have a world class facility in our own back yards. the facility is great, the two on field ref system is great. Fees are competitive! Great youth programs during the summer time. Nothing but props to soccer city, finally someone is doing it right.
None
You don't get much better care from the moment you walk in the door to the moment that big wood door swings shut after you leave. Janice is awesome, and everyone of the staff members are fantastic and professional. I have nothing bad to say about this practice. I only wish they accepted my insurance and I didn't have to pay out of pocket up front. I understand the reason they do it the way they do, but it can be difficult to pay out that money all at once.
Quite possibly my favorite wally world and my family are frequent shoppers.
Seriously ghassan has changed my life.. highly recommend him.. iv been there several times and planning every several months to go back
Dale is a great handyman and will be there to fix your home appliances in a quick manner. I had a broken washer and he was able to service it and have it running in 3 hours
I found his website has tons of useful information, and the articles on his blog are top notch!
None
When we moved our offices our new leasing company allowed us to have the carpet and tile we needed to be installed by anyone we wanted. After looking around we choose Mill Creek Carpet and Tile. It was a positive experience from the beginning. Our sales person Ann from the South Store (93rd and Memorial) was very helpful and stayed with us the entire way. We were on a mission critical time line and our installer went the second mile and came by after hours to install the commercial tile so we could set up our equipment to get back into operation without missing a beat. Our employees love the job they did and everyone who sees our new space comments positively.
Larry provided outstanding service, quick turnaround, and embroidery that is as near perfection as you can get. I couldn't be more impressed with how they exceeded my expectations at a price that was VERY reasonable. I highly recommend them for any of your marketing needs!
None
I take my dogs and cats to Dr. Graef's animal hospital and have always been pleased and willing to drive over 40 miles each way. His staff is kind and competent. Dr. Graef has always been engaging with me and my kids and provided excellent services to my animals. I've never had an apopintment and my animals have always been seen in the order we arrive. Just Excellent. (I do call ahead to be sure they will be open!)
I some respects, it is like the trip to Hana on Maui, not much at the end of the road, but interesting views to get there. Do not try to drive in there. The "road" has deep holes that fill with water that could be deep or hiding large rocks. If you walk out there in the winter months, you should see many whales between the Big Island and Maui as you walk along the sea cliffs.
Hugo and his team did an amazing job on my kitchen and vanities.They were very professional, fact and responsive and I love my new countertoops. I would highly recommend to all my friends.
The most fun you will ever have playing dungeons and dragons or magic the gathering.
We purchased a new house and hired Gary Ricks to service our furnace. The technician was prompt, efficient and helpful. He left everything clean. Most impressive, he gave me great advice that saved us money we might have spent unnecessarily. We will definitely be using them again!
This place is the real deal! I smoke my own chicken, ribs, and briskett, so I am very skeptical of the so called "BBQ" places in NJ. Hot Rods is hands down the best around. The wings are amazing. Thanks Toby and Anthony for such a great place to eat real BBQ.
Great service and great staff. Took great care of my needs with good communication. Thanks!
"You can grow a day in a year, or a year in a day..." This is a phrase that I have heard more often at Brett Manning Studios in the last few weeks. When getting vocal coaching from Brett or any Associate in the studio the latter is true. Most singers have a breakthrough every time they come into the studio. The technique is so easy and allows for so much freedom and enlists vocal coordinations that haven't been thought about since you were a child. I know you've heard of the "primal / functional fitness" trend, well, this is Primal Voice (voce primordiale for my italian friends or students of classical voice). This back to basics approach to singing has created vocal freedom in singers who thought all hope was lost for them because of poorly trained technique. Another huge facet of Brett Manning Studios is the concentration on artistry. All of the coaches will ensure that whatever you sing stays true to the song while never compromising technique. On an administrative note, the staff has always been very caring and helpful for whatever I needed. There is always amazing vocal tea available and a full range of voice related supplements for you to enjoy. The general vibe of the studio is wonderful and exactly what you would expect from Music City. If you're looking for some vocal coaching my recommendation could not be stronger. It doesn't matter if you think that you can't sing or if you've been singing for years. The experience you have here will make you a better singer, no matter what!
The mechanics at Autotech really know what they're doing and you can trust the recommendations they make. Not only will they fix any immediate problems with your vehicle, but also point out any concerns that might cause a more expensive repair down the road.
Great location just a couple of miles from the dramatic coast at Crackington Haven. This is a charming cottage has accommodation for up to three but is best suited for couples. The cottage comes with a log-burning stove, and a free basket of logs - more wood can be purchased. The location is perfect just off the A39 giving good access to North Cornwall but far enough away to feel quiet and secluded. Linda and John made us feel very welcome with fresh milk in the fridge and a box of chocolate biscuits. We plan to return,
Lovely place to be :) Good quality, reasonable price and nice service...
A true hidden treasure in Rogue River. Not only does the food taste great, they use the freshest ingredients available. The veggies are unbelievable during the summer.
I just bought now my second car from Rusnak Mercedes and they've figured out what it takes to keep me coming back. The team there all treated me like they appreciate my business, bent over backwards for MY convenience, and offer genuine follow thru. I choose them because this is good business, something I provide in my practice and a welcome differentiator in todays competitive marketplace. Thank you Rusnak team!
Very beautiful
Fantastic customer service, and outstanding waste service! have been with them for 15 years and will NOT leave. their drivers and recycling personnel are courteous and willing to go the extra mile.
Absolutly looove the cocktails at this bar! The service is great, it's really chilled, you can grab something to eat somewhere in Chorlton afterwards. The cocktails are really good value, so fruity and there are loads to choose from. I recommend the cocktail making tutorial too! yum yum.
Awesome theater.,Excellent sound and superb picture clarity at affordable rates.
Absolutely the best service in Bremerton. I have tried almost all the taxi cab companies in the area and Royal Taxi stands out . Always Always Always on time . I cannot emphasis how important it is to me to be on time and this company just gets me to my meetings on time. beautiful and clean cabs are always in service and the price being low is a plus. Thanks for being professional.
I absolutely have nothing but positive things to say about PickUp USA. The majority of my friends discovered this place January 2013, signed up, and continue to love it! All the other reviews and the website itself will tell you all the amenities, so instead of talking about those awesome features, I really just want to talk about the experience you get. There is not only an amazing community of basketball players that gather there all with the same love for the game, but there is also an incredible staff there that is really involved and gets to know members on a personal level! The staff doesn't even seem like staff (in a good way :]). They just seem like new friends you've met that just so happened to start up a wickedly cool basketball gym for all of your friends to play ball at. PICK-UP IS WELL WORTH THE $$$$. I was hesitant to write a good review because if TOO many people sign up and show up, I'll break too many ankles.... HAHAHAHA! (That was a joke if you didn't catch it....) Sign up, play with us, let's be friends!!! ^______^v P.S. Guys, don't worry, there won't be too much testosterone because there are some really skilled females that play... Do not underestimate them.... they will score on you ALL DAY. :P Ladies, sign up and show 'em who's boss. ;D
None
None
Jason S. was fantastic! He kept trying and trying to figure out our issue which ended up not being a plumbing issue after all. He figured it out and gave us great advice on how to handle the issue. He was professional and friendly all at the same time. I will definitely ask for him personally next time. Thanks Village Plumbing and Jason for helping us out.
Good chicken, nice and juicy. Sides were excellent too. Staff was polite and courteous what more can you ask for.
jadikan saya sebagai mahasiswa FTMD-ITB
I highly recommend Chris Boswell!! I came to Chris about a year ago after being referred by a few friends. I was looking for a smaller vehicle that was better on gas & a cheaper payment. He was extremely helpful! Since I purchased my used Honda Accord from him, anytime I have had a question or issue he has continued to guide me in the right direction. There was no pressure in the least at anytime. He presented everything in a very straight forward, not confusing manner. All in all, my experience was absolutely wonderful. I didn't feel like I had to be on guard at every corner, for fear of being ripped off...Chris is trust-worthy and helpful. I will definitely do business with him in the future if I am in the market for another car. And would highly recommend Chris to anyone!!! You can tell he cares about his customers.
This Shop Has excellence Service and Great Prices! Also the environment of this shop is awesome and love they have seating to kick back and relax! Only place to buy from , No butts about it! =)
I don't typically take the time to write reviews. However, I felt compelled to post this after dropping off two leather cushions today. The two individuals who run the shop, could not have been a nicer. They looked at the rips in the leather and talked me through the various options, the pros and cons of each, and quoted a more than fair price. I suppose the above doesn't do the experience justice... The bottom line is that based on my interactions with the owners and the way I saw them engage with other customers, I would definitely recommend Restoration Centre.
WOW!! Finally found a NY Style deli in Miami that reminds me of the years I used to live in NYC. Great warm, fresh bagels. Amazing food. Great service. Consider me a regular.
I had a deep cut on my hand on Saturday and went to First Choice ER to determine if stitches were needed. The staff was very helpful and no waiting time at all. The total time to in and out was less than 45 minutes and the up most care was given. The location is perfect those living in Wylie and Murphy area that cannot drive to Garland to the hospital.
Being new to the area, I was recommended to Readington Auto & Tire by a work colleague. I have four cars that I maintain and have been here many times for both repairs and routine maintenance and always received great service and good advice. I have never felt any "upsell" pressure during routine maintenance, and when a repair was necessary they were clear and honest about what work needed to be done (vs. what could be put off or wasn't necessary). Will be back, thanks!
Great
I closed my Hair Salon after 40 years because my eyes got worse and worse, Look out clippers! I just may start doing what I loved the most. I had my cataracts removed and had crystalens put in. I am so glad I took the chance, I Love You Dr. Cutarelli....
None
Excellent experience with this location. I store my boat and jet ski here. No extra fees for storing both toys in one parking space, which is what my last storage facility did. Staff is extremely friendly; they found me a bucket to bail out my boat when my cover filled with water, and they called me to tell me my cover on my jet ski had a tear. How nice that someone is looking out for my investments when I'm not there. Great location and easy access too!
No problems with the service or decor. Everything is new and spiffy. The fries are fantastic. They taste like how other fast food fries would taste if they weren't so greasy. However the burgers just aren't anything special. Certainly not worth a pilgrimage, as many would tell you.
On Bank Holiday Sunday my partner and I made a last minute booking here for 9:00pm and walked into a buzzing, bright restaurant! We booked here as having looked online at a few places and read the menu's etc this one appealed the most and we 100% made the right choice. We had a sharer to start, it included calamari, duck spring rolls, chicken skewers and thai fishcakes and it was sooooo tasty! That was the first tick in the box. For mains I had a rump steak, rare (cooked to perfection) and the other half had salt and pepper fajitas which he said were the nicest he had ever had, succulent and colourful. Second tick in the box! (I am hoping you are starting to see a pattern here) For desert the boy had trifle which was served in a glass pot so looked great and I am told was delicious and I had warm chocolate fudge cake and I can honestly say I have never eaten one in a restaurant as amazing as that! It was a perfect bank holiday night out, great food, great wine and the staff were friendly, funny and just added to the whole experience.
visited this place twice, its excellent .....
None
Dr. FJ has helped me so much with my neck pain and headaches. After meeting him at a seminar over the summer he opened my eyes to upper cervical chiropractic care and it is worth the trip for me to be treated with his specific expertise of the spine.
comics to read at the tables, comic covers and art all over the walls, with friendly staff and amazing burgers
None
Basically my entire adolescence
One of the best public parks I've ever seen. There is fun to be had for all ages.
I was laid off at my construction job, and lost my only means of transportation - the company vehicle. I contacted this dealership, told them about my emergency, and they not only had a great deal for me but they FLEW ME TO THEIR DEALERSHIP FOR FREE. If that's not customer service I don't know what is. I was at an extremely rough point in my own life and they took it upon themselves to assist in every way possible. They were incredibly friendly and forthright, and I'd highly recommend them in the future.
VLADIMAR was a perfect gentlemen.
Have been to Sabai twice for lunch, once for dinner. Food is always great and service excellent -- actually better the last two times than the first. Spicy fried rice with chicken is a favorite.
I have always been a bus fanatic and travel around regularly. This bus agency offers me deluxe bus trips and I do not have to pay a lot for the same as well.
When I met with Severine about the wedding I told her that our wedding style was going to be a little be less structured and more "improvised" than the average wedding. I asked her to go with the flow. We did schedule some picture time with my family before the wedding though. The result: AMAZING! the pictures we have seen are truly beautiful and me, my husband our families and friends keep telling us how beautiful the pictures are! Severine adapted to our wedding style perfectly and it shows!! Thank you for your great eye and professionalism!!
I've taken my moms Camry and my wife's Accord here for repairs and smog. The head mechanic is very charismatic and knowledgeable when diagnosing. The smog station is very thorough and considerate of your car's interior. Top that with fair pricing and HONEST evaluations I find myself returning and referring this shop any chance I get. This shop may not be state of the art or up to date...but they GET THE JOB DONE and they GET IT RIGHT. If they don't get it right they're straight up and tell you. Be a man...do the right thing...go to Lemon Grove Smog Test Only.
I'm pretty much a regular there at this point. Over all the place is awesome with a wide variety of food. The staff are very friendly. I was reading some posts here and was thinking.....can any any place be 100% awesome all the time? No but they are normally more then fair if there is a problem. Keep up the awesome work and I will catch ya bar side if I'm there!!
food is great, service is great. i mostly eat in the lounge area. live bands will be playing, for a quieter night the dining room is just as good.
Great spot for great cut and old school shave. Cool people and comfortable space. Focus on customer service you don't get any place else in Lexington. Beauty in the front Barber in the back.
I was so impressed with Dr. Wehling's philosophy of holistic healthcare and how he worked with my daughter that I made an appointment for myself. I was really surprised at how quickly my pain was reduced. After only 2 visits I felt a major difference in my neck, shoulders and hips. Dr. Wehling understands how the entire body is interconnected, and effected by lifestyle factors such as nutrition, exercise, water therapy, rest and stress management. His office provides a pleasant, relaxing environment —with convenient location, flexible scheduling and a great electronic check in system that tracks your medical history and progress. Dr. Wehling combines scientific knowledge with innovative, natural care that is totally personalized...and the results are amazing!
I went there about a month or two ago. I'm still talking about how delicious their food was. If your hungry and need a good breakfast, this is the place to go
I have a good time and felt welcome
None
Best donuts in Springfield . Light and fluffy, unlike the heavy and greasy donuts offered by most other competitors here in town.
Had a terrific evening with fun people last night at the River's Edge. Terrific service (wait staff act like they are all owners!), beautiful views, excellent food from appetizers to dessert!
First time I have ever had flowers delivered from my children. The flowers were beautiful and my daughter stated that the bouquet was better than the one ordered. Over a week later and the bouquet is still beautiful, speaks wonders for the quality and freshness!! Flowers from my spouse from other florists show wear after 2-3 days!! Delivery was first thing in the am even though no extra early delivery fee was ordered. Very, very impressive!! Will call direct and order when we need flowers!! Thank you!!
Excelente arroz. Buen trato. El arroz esta de desmayo
Mary does a wonderful job of taking care of her customers needs.
It is build in just 45 day's.
Nice Office
Bought a new ZX-14 at the Redondo Beach store. Had to get warrantee replacement of windshield (to the correct smoked black one). Kendall made this experience seamless. From her phone call for appointment to me riding home with new part, she guided the entire experience anticipating everything. Bruce in parts was also amazing in that I was unhappy with the mirrors (shape) on my Kawasaki. I bought my first Ninja in 1968 so experience I have. Bruce had retro to new ideas, catalogs and options on hand that had never occurred to me. He showed me mirrors from Italy that were more like jewelry than mirrors! It is a state-of-the-art pleasure to shop at Del Amo. Also while outside some mechanics were coming and going. I asked about chain lube and was given a virtual class on that and the spacing of my free 300 mile check-up. Everyone here is positive and very helpful
Choosing Jen to photograph our wedding was one of the best decisions I made! She and her husband Shawn are so much fun to work with. When me and my husband first met them we instantly felt comfortable. Jen is super organized, creative, fun and professional. Check out her portfolio and see how amazing her photos are for yourself! She did an amazing job at capturing our love story. Everyone has raved over my photos. JEN YUSON is the way to go!
Dr. Michelle and Dr. RJ have cured my back and arm pain! I have been going to chiropractors since I was 18 (for 12 years) and for the first time in 12 years I do not have back and arm pain. Also, I have had chronic migraines since 1st grade and lived on ibuprofen and migraine medicine for years. My migraines have now completely stopped! But they have done more than cure my back and arm pain and migraines. They have showed me a better way to live and how to be healthy and how to raise healthy children. I now have more energy (without drinking caffeine all day) and hardly ever get sick! I can't imagine living any other way. Thank you Dr. Michelle, Dr. RJ, Jenn and Keri for making my family apart of your family!
Best Games Ever Made, that is all.
I would go to International Orange once a week if I could! Excellent quality treatments, both facials and massage. Also love the IO shop! Buy all of my facial products and yoga clothes there. <3!!!
None
Very friendly and helpful service. I have used this storage multiple times and have been completely satisfied every time.
All entrees without exception were excellent. Service excellent. Wine excellent. Ambiance exquisite. The violinist and pianist were so insink as the violinist went from table to table. The piano beautifully complimented the violinist music in a soft pleasent manor. I would recommend the Prime Beef Wellington, Grilled Double Lamb Chops with Sweet Potatoe and Vegetable, Rib Eye & Lobster Tail, Exotic Mushrooms, Truffle Mac & Cheese was tender and fresh, Grand Mariner Souffle for dessert. The Menu No. 1 for $49.95 or the Menu No. 2 for $69.95 are really the best deal. This includes the appetizer, main course and dessert. You get alot of food for the price and it is not too little or too much. You would pay more for each separate item. We could come here any time though probably a special occasion would more than satisfiy or impress your guest.
This is the best family place in GI!
None
None
Stopped in for a quick pizza while on vacation with my wife. Choose it because it had mostly 5 star reviews and it did not disappoint! My wife said, "This was in the top 5 pizzas I've had in my life!" I could not stop eating it, literally stuffed myself! Would recommend this place to any and everyone, and will definitely return here every chance I get in the future.
I am a Affiliate school, located in Michigan, Have been involved in the martial arts for 33 years. I have found the experience with Shihan Steve Del Castillo to be FANTASTIC. He has given me the ability to teach my students great class with great student retention. The classes are always exciting, my adults love the Krav games that KMMA uses as warm ups and everyone has become very proficient at being able to defend themselves. Shihan Steve has provided everything he said he would and much more, he even created a custom lesson plan for me after I asked him a question how to do some gun control and disarms. He allowed one of my students to train at his school while on vacation. In my many years of experience I would say that Shihan Steve provides one of the best programs I have every used. He has made it very easy for us old dogs to learn new tricks. I have been with KMMA for almost a year now and he still impresses me with his program. I am very pleased to say what a great person Shihan Steve is and I know that I am blessed just by knowing him and his instructors. Thank you Shihan
I had never had Thai before going to this restaurant, but went with some individuals who eat it all the time. All of us agreed that the food was excellent. It's too bad I live 3 hours away, otherwise this would be a normal luch spot for me.
Anne Erdman at Bank United has always provided us with the best possible service and is always ready to answer any question we may have.
Good customer service they take the time to explain and offer you what you need. Maruska Silva is a good rep. You have a good employee
Great food, great music and atmosphere, second best beer selection in the area, and friendly staff. One of the best locations in the Southern Tier.
My wife, our newborn baby and I stayed at By the Side of the Road a few months ago as a special getaway before my wife returned to work after maternity leave. Even though I failed to find a place for us to go before the week before, By the Side of the Road had a room available - during peak leaf season - and was one of the few such establishments in the Harrisonburg area that had accommodations for children. The hospitality was wonderful. Even though we only stayed one night, everything was ready when we arrived to check in, and the staff was warm, friendly and helpful. This was our first experience with a B and B, and we will definitely back. From help picking an appropriate restaurant, to suggestions on things to see on our way back to Northern Virginia, to the the wonderful breakfast, we couldn't have asked for more, especially at such a reasonable price. Like I wrote earlier, we will definitely be back for a longer stay!
EXCELLENT WORK! Kent at Doucette-Ewer Construction is THE best contractor I've ever worked with. He paid very careful attention to detail and used high quality materials even when it meant cutting into his margins. He did a great job! And I recommend him highly to anyone wanting to improve their home. Thanks, Kent!
This was the first (and so far, only) restaurant I've visited in Northern Liberties. I was treated to this restaurant by a friends family and let me just say that after visiting El Camino Real, many of the other restaurants in the area have a lot to live up to. We had to stand awkwardly in the entrance way to wait for a table to open up, but we were seated within five minutes of arriving and our orders were taken immediately afterwards. The servers were very courteous and polite and had no problem taking multiple orders in a very short span of time. The quality of the food was far better than I had ever expected. One order of the homemade nachos and guacamole were more than needed for the five of us seated at the table and they were very, very tasty (if not a little bit on the spicy side). By the recommendation of my friend, I ordered a chicken quesadilla and it was by far the most delicious thing I think I've ever eaten at a Tex-Mex restaurant. The chicken inside was prepared very well and the ranchero sauce on top added a nice creaminess and paired well with the cheese inside. The only problem would have to be how crowded and loud it was -- but for a Saturday night at such a seemingly popular restaurant, I didn't expect any different. I would definitely recommend this restaurant to anyone looking for a nice night out with a young, friendly atmosphere and great food.
Wonderfully responsive and patient staff. I originally came for physical therapy on my knee, and my therapist stuck with it even when the original diagnosis didn't completely resolve the problem. I was content with some improvement, but Sophia wasn't until I was back to 100%, and we tried things until we found and resolved the root cause. I've since been able to return to full activity with no pain. I've come back to Joint Ventures for chiropractic work, which is helping me tremendously in my daily work environment. The staff is extremely responsive and listens to everything that's going on. I've been able to raise seemingly-unrelated issues and get them resolved.
He came on a day that the roads where covered in ice and no other plumber was getting out in it. He came within a few hours of my call and came prepared to do the work. He was knowledgeable and very friendly. He did and nice job for a reasonable price. I am a happy customer and I will be using him again.,
Friendly owners, bartenders and staff. Great wraps, salads, and burgers. Get the Irish Nachos.
I've always been afraid of going to a mechanic which has caused an increasing number of problems with my vehicle. Finally, I went to Tony's on recommendation from google/yelp/reddit, everywhere that says Tony's is the best. They were right. Tony is quick, inexpensive, and very personable. I was under the impression that it was time to scrap my car, however, he fixed it and I feel like it will be reliable for a long time.
The wind is very powerful, but the view is worth it!
Fantastic customer service and reasonable prices too
Daniel is creative and insightful. I've been impressed not only with the product delivered but also the price, timeline and professionalism. Keep up the good work!!
My experience with Dr. Smith and his office staff was excellent. I was referred by a family friend and from the moment I made my appointment to the conclusion of my visit, I couldn't have been more pleased. The friendly receptionist worked with my tough schedule to fit me in and since I was coming from North San Diego County, I appreciated her flexibility with my appointment. Dr. Smith's office was easy to find and pleasantly appointed. My procedure was smooth and handled professionally in less than an hour. Dr. Smith was friendly and approachable and his bedside manner was exemplary. My results were wonderful. I will continue to visit Dr. Smith and have no hesitation in referring future patients to him. Thank you for a great experience! Kristina - Carlsbad, CA
Will be going back to Wilde for all my future Subarus. Just bought my 3rd Subaru, and they gave me the lowest, by far, price without haggling. The service was great and everyone at the dealer is friendly. I bought my car through Cheryl in Internet Sales and Corey through regular sales. Great experience, not your usual 'car sales' experience.
Just got my Cat D + CPC(PCV) licence with Wallace. Brillant. The customer service from the office (John) is great and my instructor was amazing (Matthew). Keep it up
American Air HVAC & Refrigeration did an excellent job on my AC Unit! they arrived when they said they would, worked quickly and efficiently, and didn't get in the way with my day to day routines. Cause we all know waiting on a repair man can bring down your whole day! I would happily recommend them to anyone and will definitely be using them for my routine check ups on all my AC & Heating Units in my house and business!
Dale came out and sprayed our house for spiders and wasps. He was very professional and did a great job. I have used this service before and we have had less and less spider webs along our house and windows in the last couple of years. We live on a lake, so we tend to have lots of bugs. Pest Masters has done a real nice job for us. I would highly recommend their services.
Great food. Great camaraderie, Great music. FUN, fun, FUN, til your daddy takes your T'bird away.
None
My husband and I received "In the mail" a complimentary dinner offer for two from Dukes Country Bar & Grill and had to respond and make reservations via email. We had no idea what to expect, for we had never been to this establishment before. Once we arrived for the "First time" we noticed the cleanliness right away, and were seated promptly! The service was extremely courteous beyond mention!! The food was out of this world, and the portions.... the size for a king!! We will absolutely return to Dukes Country Bar & Grill and hope to become long standing customers for quit some time!! The best food and service ever!! Thank you Dukes!!
None
Best freakin' pizzeria ever my family goes there every time we get pizza
I always bring my tires in to have snow switched out with all season. Customer service is excellent, prices very reasonable (much less than T P +). In and out quickly, never a problem. Recommend them to all my friends and colleagues.
None
Very curious to read the poor reviews here. We go fairly often when someone is ill on the weekends and have always had great service, respectful staff, and good care. One time we waited it seemed like forever - a man had had a heart attack at the clinic - and suddenly it wasn't first come first serve and we had to wait. I understand that.
None
I always enjoy their food. Especially their stuffed pizza.
I like Mike's, because it has best prices on oil and Pat, the owner, goes out of his way to find a part for your car, if they don't have it in stock or if its a part for an older car, that is hard to find
By far the best service I have experience from any dealership. Khalil was also very attentive, understood what I was looking for and found what we both considered was a great match for me. Thank you guys for the great experience.
Definitely worth switching during high school if you want free college credits and want to get ahead in school. This was a perfect switch for me and my sister. All students here are welcoming and the teachers are flexible and caring.
Cervejas especiais, mago beer pilsen e weiss, espetinhos e petiscos exclusivos, tudouito bom...
In past places that I have boarded Ruby she would snubbed me for the first day or so just letting me know that she wasn't happy with me leaving her, but at Safari Pet Resort she was lovey right a way so I knew she had a good time. She also had an excellent experience in the spa. Her coat has never been so soft. Thank you Safari Pet Resort for such an awesome experience!
Best pizza in CT
Best school in Ankleshwar.
I had a great stay in July of 2013. The staff was friendly, the site was clean and all the utilities and hook ups were in good shape. I didn't get to use the pool, but it was clean and had people using it throughout the day. Overall, I enjoyed my stay and plan to use them again when I need a park to stay at. My stay in July was only a few days and I got a great site for my stay.
I Love this place me and my husband went there on our honeymoon and went back for are first anniversity,[],[], and going back every year for an anniversirty already have next year booked,[], the staff and the cabins are amazing,[],[], will recommed this place to anyone,.
My family has been with Dr. Patel since the day he opened his practice, he is wonderful as is his staff. Thank you Dr. Patel! Gina, Rick and Ariana Rogers
best place in all of SCV. Great food,drinks, and vibe
food was awesome, chefs were great and oh yea the food was AWESOME!!! The more people you bring, the more fun you will have
For the past four months a group of men from my church have gone to The Lower Deck in Clayton Park for lunch on the second Wednesday of the month. It's been difficult to know in advance how many will show up, but, Gary, Matt and the staff there are very helpful and accomodating. We get all the tables together in the front room there and have a social gathering and conduct a bit of business. The guys keep wanting to go back so, back we go..... Everyone raves about the food, but we would like to see the Lunch Menu Specials changed up occasionally though.
None
None
This is one of my favorite places to go. Great coffee and very cozy. I also recommend the spiced cider when its in season.
None
I needed a storage bay fast and Extra Space Storage made it happen! The frendly knowlegable staff guided me through the process flawlessly! I would HIGHLY recommend Extra Space Storage for all your storage needs.
I have problem with my Mazda3 Navigation control unit, googled and found Edward around my area to see if he could repair it. Drove to his place and he was very professional, friendly and inspected the unit on the spot w microscope to find any potential problems! He told me he'd clean up the unit to see if it fix it for FREE!!!! A couple of hours later he had the unit all cleaned out! Granted, it still didn't resolve my original problem which could be the nav itself but I trust Edward for his professional service, honesty, generousity for any electronic services in the future. Thank you again Edward! Kevin
I did two things I never thought I would do at Rosen. We bought a brand new car and we bought the complete warrenty. I could not be more pleased. Jason was easy to work with and the whole dealership was friendly. This was our first Hyundai. I feel like we made a good decision and have a car we will diving for a least the next decade.
During mid-February I noticed that my "check engine" light was illuminated on my 2009 Chevrolet HHR. My vehicle was required to go through MA state inspection by the end of February. I didn't have time to get it repaired before the deadline so I submitted the vehicle knowing I would be issued a "rejection" sticker and also knowing I would have 60 days with which to resolve the issue. On March 20th, I called Central Chevrolet to request an appointment to make repairs and was told they could take my vehicle in the next day. I dropped it off around 9:00AM and I received a call that the vehicle was ready for pick-up just a few short hours later! They replaced two parts (One part was covered under warranty). The check engine light is obviously no longer illuminated and I can now take my vehicle to be re-inspected well before the April 18th deadline as indicated by the MA State inspection facility. Thank you Central Chevrolet!
Incredible makeover from former rustic liquor store. Cozy tavern, the bartenders understand how to make a drink, and the few small plates that we tried were great (the cheese selections were fantastic).
None
fast good friendly. what else can you ask for?
Pasé buenos tiempos viendo películas con mis amigos, esos días jaja
Breakfast with friends last Sunday - what an amazing place. Beautiful setting, yummy food and wait staff who were there when you needed them. We enjoyed it so much we went back again for lunch on Monday.
Awesome practice! I am extremely dental-phobic, but everyone in this office is accommodating. If I feel the slightest bit of discomfort, physical or mental, they stop and take action to get me through it.
Very nice. I will stay here from now on while visiting family in Pueblo
La verdad son impresionantes estas lineas y uno se explica como la hicieron pero eso secreto solo lo saben los que la hicieron, se las recomiendo que la visiten personalmente no se arrepentiran y muy aparte de eso hay varias cosas por ver. Que lindo la verdad
None
Nancy is awesome! I went through Enforcement Trainers to get my hand gun certification and not only did she give me a one on one class but we also went to the range and practiced. It was such a fun time and I learned a lot. She focuses a lot on safety which is key when owning a gun and she taught me how to do everything from standing correctly, to unloading and loading. Everything I needed to know. She does an awesome job and I would highly recommend her to everyone!
None
None
None
Minha segunda casa (trabalho)
Great Experience! First time buyer and extremely satisfied! Michael Zheng, one of the sales managers at BMW of Rockville went above and beyond to get me into my first BMW. Being a first time buyer, i was nervous about leasing a car, but Michael and his team were great. If you're a first time buyer, stop by BMW of Rockville for a no pressure sales process and a great selection of BMW's.
None
The dealership is always friendly,and inviting to a car shopper. No high-pressure there! I personally dealt with Alan Hill, and he rates Customer Service #1!
None
I helped my mother purchase a used car from Barry’s Auto. They gave me a little less for her trade in than I wanted, but with the deal they worked out for me on the Nissan Altima she got, I think we did pretty well.
I've gone to UPS store for years. Managers are very helpful. In fact, they always take care of everything perfectly.
Probably my favorite local bar. Atmosphere is awesome, local crew is great and some of the best bartenders around. I and eat/drink there regularly.
I recently needed additional insurance and contacted Rhonda Shader. She was able to provide me a great price on the best insurance around. I feel reassured thanks to State Farm and their wonderful local representative Rhonda Shader. I have two policies with her now, one for my personal and one for my business. I highly recommend Rhonda and State Farm.
Great pub. Proper West beer on draught. Nice food. Lots of seats. Good atmosphere.
None
None
None
This place is awesome. Everything you'd ever want from a bar. Great food, great service, heavy pours.
It's typical. The day before Thanksgiving a deep clog somewhere in my home's pipes caused my washing machine to empty it watery contents directly into my downstairs bathroom's shower, and subsequently onto my bathroom floor! The ensuing flood made my bathroom unusable and I was left with the daunting task of finding a plumber who could come out on short notice to tackle the problem at hand. Thank god for Terry. He returned my call quickly, and came by early on Thanksgiving morning to deal with the problem. He was friendly, knowledgeable, and charged me a very reasonable rate. I'll be keeping his number handy for any future issues! Highly recommended!
Excellent provider. Friendly staff, very relaxing and easy to work with. Thank you for all that you do!
My experience was not of others I have read on the internet. The salesman wasn't pushy and the whole car buying process was simple and quick. Evans Halshaw prices appear to be very competitive, but be aware that warranty is extra (£400) and there is an admin fee (which is negotiable) of £100, so take this into account when browsing.
Bob is the only guy I rely on. I know that he will do the best service, the best research for parts and be honest about what it will take to get the job done right. This is the 3rd time I have had to call him out and I only pray he never retires. Thanks again Bob. You're the best!
I've been there with friends and the food was very nice, worth every penny, great place and really nice staff, we will defo be back!
I've been going there for the past couple years since it opened. Maybe it's that they share my enthusiasm for classic gaming or maybe it's that they're a small and close-knit business, but either way the customer service and selection of games is nothing short of phenomenal. Not only do they sell games for nearly every video game system ever made (at least as far back as the 1970s Atari), they can fix them, too--cleaning cartridge contacts, replacing lasers for disc-systems, or even buffering scratched CDs. I recommend Play Again Classic Video Games for those who want to get back into the games they grew up with, and for those whose games have stopped functioning.
We had a pleasant experience with all persons involved in the purchase of our new car. Every conversation was clear and thorough. We were contacted back with an explanation of each question we had very quickly. We are thrilled with our new car, it has everything that we wanted. Thank you!
Excellent service. True professionals with nice personalities. Could not have asked for more.
None
Fast service, great prices, friendly and knowledgeable techs. Will definitely recommend and use in the future.
None
This park is very, very nice. Their are four baseball diamonds and a very nice pool that as two water slides and a new splash park. The employees are very nice and are good with most stuff. You will have a great time with the family here!
I had rental next door at Enterprise and was surprised when they told me they didnt take my Visa Check card. So I walked next door, rented a bigger vehicle at a cheaper price than my Enterprise reservation, thanks Nicole!
Beautiful Masjid! Ample parking.... Alhamdulilah! (Thank Allah)
Rush soccer winter in the dome.
Grade A facility with top trainers in the area.
I love mall of Lahore
AWESOME burgers!!!!!
None
None
I don't care what anyone else has said about this Florist! I was given two dozen beautiful yellow roses for an anniversary and they were AMAZING! I received so many compliments on them, they were like mini sunflowers. The whole presentation, the box with tissue paper and the vase were perfect. I still have people asking where I got them! We will not buy anywhere else. If you think they are expensive, I believe they are worth the extra money. Thank you Hunny, you did well!
None
Have stayed at the Adagio for 4 summers now. Very, Very Nice!!!!!!
There is nothing more painful than having to load up your trash and take it to the dump or wait around for the city to haul it off on Big Trash Day (that is if they even will take it). Well no need to deal with that anymore, THANKS TO JUNK BOSS! I have multiple rental properties throughout the OKC Metro Area and have used these guys more than once. They are always on time, have a very easy to understand pay rate based on your load, well mannered, and have great work ethic! They also reached out and helped friends of mine that were affected by the Moore Tornado, volunteering their time and services for FREE and they did it without asking for recognition or advertisement. I would recommend them to anyone and will definitely be using them again!
None
Tim and his employees have done great work on both of our cars, and always at a ridiculously affordable rate. I've been through the shop about 7-8 times now for various issues, and have been happy every time. I've never been treated like an idiot or been pressured into having unnecessary extra work done, which has been my experience at several other shops. And he certainly hasn't gone ahead and done repairs I didn't ask for and billed me for them. Very honest. The repairs speak for themselves, in my experience. I've had alternators die, wheel bearings go out, overheating troubles and awful noises coming out of the motor, yet Tim has fixed everything quickly and affordably. Actually fixed, too. I haven't had to go back to have a low-quality "repair" fixed.Tim himself is great to deal with. Upfront, polite and quick to let you know what you actually need done and how long it will take. Not your typical repair shop vibe, in a great way.
The new casino and hotel are first class. A nice addition to the Gila River entertainment mecca.
Good Experience. Easy and quick. I needed an oil change and my AC to be looked at. I called the service dept. They got me an appt within a few days. Dropped my car off, got a shuttle ride home. I was given a call when my car was ready and was given the details on my car. Everything was great!
We had a great experience purchasing our camper from Jeff Couch's RV Nation. Scott as well as other staff were very helpful and accomodating. When we picked up our camper, we were given a super informational tour of our new camper by another great staff member. He went over everything and gave us plenty of helpful tips. We would highly recommend doing business here. Plus, we got a great deal and a great trade in! Thanks!!
There is a video of Austin Creek and Armstrong Redwoods State Reserves on YouTube with the title "Armstrong Redwoods and Austin Creek State Reserves".
Always 5 star service from you guys!
We hired this company to pour a large concrete slab. They did a great job. They had one worker I think his name was Bull. This guy was a very professional worker. I will hire these guys again. If your looking to have some concrete work done hire this company.Great job..
I never thought I’d try yoga again, but Dahn Yoga is different, and at this Alexandria center after a couple months, I’m physically and mentally stronger than I’ve been in years. I’m still no athlete or human pretzel – just a writer with a few decades of broken bones, sprains, dislocations, bumps and bruises. My current options are low-impact, though I’m usually more adventurous, and will get back to the crazy stuff, but I won’t give up the Dahn Yoga. Here, I get an hour of a workout as strenuous or relaxing as I choose. Every time I walk inside, I’m welcomed like a beloved family member at Thanksgiving Dinner. When I leave, I’m hugged, given a smile and good wishes. Of course it all makes me want to go back. What better way to motivate people to take care of their body and mind? In every class, our master has us bow to greet each other, of course. Imagine: a centuries-old symbolic practice of human respect that today serves no legal function for safety or security. Just civilized acknowledgment of other people sharing an experience. What better way to promote friendship and peace? Uniforms or suggested loose flowing clothes make it impossible to see bulging muscles, scars, or love handles. What better way to reduce insecurities and inhibitions? In addition, our eyes are closed at times, or the lights dimmed for specific movements so as to reduce sensory input, and let us focus on our own bodies where there’s tightness or blockage, to open it up – even the brain. What better way to create physical AND brain fitness? I’m in! Call it Life Particles. Energy. Karma. Electricity. Whatever. A rose by any other name… But do find it at least once in your life. OK, now. Go here. Close your eyes, and see for yourself.
We needed multiple tasks completed in order to sell our house. We wanted a porfessional job without breaking the bank. Comparison quotes implied that I would get superior materials at a middle of the road price. The job(s) were completed on schedule and the professionalism of the teams were far greater then expected. We had a roof cleaned with minor repairs, chimney fixed, new posts on the front porch.
Very efficient and easy to work with!! Megan is always pleasure to work with and so very helpful!
Antonio was super helpful - about 15 minutes after sending through a query on the website I received a phonecall from him. He agreed to do 4 hours of tutoring over the next 2 days in preparation for an exam. Without his help, I wouldn't have been able to pass and his ability to understand what i needed to know, how it should be communicated and how urgent my need was, was awesome. And he travelled to my home for the lessons! Highly recommended.
Best Giant in the area.....
New to the area and decided to try Raj Mahal. I wasn't let down. The meal my husband and i ordered was delicious. The meat was tender and moist and there was not too much pepper. The chapati was lovely along with the naan and fluffy pilau rice. Such great food and right on my doorstep!!
Edmund Marquez Allstate is the place to be for ALL of your insurance needs. Friendly people, smiling faces , knowledge central and GREAT RATES. Go here for you car , home and other insurance needs.
Dollar cards get attention like nothing else. It's great for your business.
Frank is a great guy, no bs about him! I've purchased and ordered several guns through him and have been extremely happy with how smooth everything has been. Unlike other gun stores I've dealt with he can make good on his promises to get the specific gun your looking for! He was able to get me an FN ps90 and FN fs2000 immediately!!! While other stores told me those guns were simply impossible to find in NJ!!!
None
Great service, friendly people, oil changed in less than an hour @ $36. I must say the $99 internet advertisement for my 20K mile checkup scared me in as much as it was redundantly repeating the same simple tasks every way it could as if too make a big deal out of normal low skill owner tasks of air pressure, tire ware, brakes, fluid levels, wipers, horn, and light bulbs. Do I really need an auto mechanic for mundane tasks on a newish vehicle and especially when the vehicle computer tells me about tire pressure and other problems anyway?
A wondergul place i've ever seen....
Gittelman is an excellent dentist.He doesn't need to bait and switch pricing as what is indicative of his high volume shop. A business does not garnish fantastic success by petty trickery. He exhibits a true passion for fixing people's teeth.
La mejor experiencia en compras por Internet, rápido y eficiente servicio de entrega.
None
The Kameo Coffee Lounge, in St John Street, is lovely. It has a misleadingly small entry, but extends into a larger area and outside space, and we managed to fit the pram through the aisle with no real issue. And they certainly didn't mind. I saw them assist other mums to find a spot, and the cafe is very child friendly, with toys, colouring table and highchairs available. It's not posh, and probably some people won't LIKE the child-friendliness, but I sure do. The service is excellent – efficient and genuinely friendly. Husband and I enjoyed a brunch breakfast meal which was well-priced, well-cooked and generously portioned. And the TEA! We ordered tea for two and we got china teapot with loose leaf tea, super hot, with a second jug of super hot water to top up with, and a generous jug of milk. Lovely! And very yummy. I unreservedly recommend this one, and will go back any time I'm in the CBD. Will have to take a coffee-drinker with me to see if the coffee is as nice as the tea :)
Our daughters have attended various daycares over the course of the last 4 years, and I have to say the staff at Little Pros are top-notch. Apart from being friendly and caring, they go above and beyond to ensure our daughters are spending their time in a loving, creative and engaging environment. Dropping them off every day is so easy; they love their time at Little Pros! 100% recommended!
Big Lynn Lodge does it again. This is the second year our motorcycle group has visited and we were treated like family. The staff and owners go all out. With over 30 people in the group, we can be hard to manage, but they did it without any problem. Great food, great views, and great staff. Looks like we will be going back again next year.
My husband wanted to help pick out his urn. I happened to come by your site. We found the perfect box that he liked. A month later when he did pass I ordered his box and a necklace for me and our son. They all were done well and the prices were great. Everything was delivered sooner than I thought they would. Everyone has been amazed at how beautiful and fitting the urn is. We have now ordered 2 more sharing urns for others in the family. You all have made a rough time in our lives a lot easier. Thank You
Great burgers, especially the flamethrower burger, delicious and good service
My experience with Executive Services was excellent. I, like many people thought that my resume was already pretty good, but after allowing Ms. Dunham to work her magic, my resume was 10 times better. Unlike any other resume service I've known, Ms. Dunham took the time to sit down with me and get to know me as well as my goals in the world of work. She asked pertinent questions about the field I was pursuing, about my character, and about my background and professionally and beautifully descripted me and my goals on a one page resume that I'm sure will grab the attention of many employers. If you are a college grad, a person trying to breathe life into your career journey, or even just someone looking to update your resume, I highly suggest calling Ms. Dunham and setting up an appointment with Executive Services. You will NOT regret it because QUALITY goes a long way.
I just love this place....my dentist next door suggest I go to New Image. I am 30 years old with braces but no one can tell since they are clear. Not only am I greatful for the smile they have given me but for the friends I've also made with the staff and the ladies up front. Everyone is sooo freindly and so sweet! Its been 2 years so far and I am so happy with the results. They are great with payment plans and helping you out with the BEST RESULTS in any way....they will work with you!! Thanks for everything New Image!! You are the best.
The presentation was thorough and we felt it was a great deal and the work was done on time and well. The installers were very friendly.
Awesome! Best biscuits & caesar salda w/fresh paramasean shards. Atmosphere and staff are really great too.
Excellent endroit, un hôtel que je conseil
I'm so lucky to live near Chihuahuas. I know a lot of people come from all around the county for the treat of enjoying good food, great drinks and over the top service. This place is always hopping for dinner but the wait is worthwhile.
Proud Tamaraw! :))
These guys were great. The smog test price was only $20 including the certificate, the cheapest that I could find in the area. They made the process easy without making a bunch of recommendations to me and seemed thankful for my business. I am going back for an oil change and tune up. So refreshing..
The place is very clean, the menu is to die for, and the sense of humor is top notch. I highly recommend it.
Awesome excursion off the Napali coast in Kauai. I would highly recommend this boat tour. Our captain was Anthony and Ryan was his copilot. We cruised up the coast skimming across the waves on a relatively calm day. We saw a pod of dolphins and stopped to take pictures and videos. The dolphins followed us for about 15 minutes. So cool! We drove the boat in and out of caves all along the coast. We stopped and slowed the boat every time we found wildlife. We also stopped on a private ancient Hawaiian beach and had lunch, snorkeled, and walked around and explored the the old Hawaiian village. Ryan provided us with the historical information as we hiked. Super fun and exciting! Well worth every penny. It cost about $150 a person food, beverage, and tshirt included.
Great place don't Know why it has bad review?? Time of seating is slow every place on the weekends :) great food, great service thanks to our waiter, Jesse
None
Nyaman & bersih
None
The David Stout Agency takes care of there customers. Doing business locally sure has its advantages. Thanks to everyone at the Agency for always giving us polite and courteous customer service.
Best hotel Ive ever been to..... Loved it!!
good net for jojo
Favorite place in town to eat. The owner is so friendly that he warms your spirit.
Great place to get a set of tires here in Carbondale! Mark and staff have been repairing & replacing the tires on our fleet of service vehicles and personal ones for several years now - I highly recommend them!!! It's also nice to support a local home town business :)
We ordered our office staff lunch today from Samurai Sam's. It was delicious! And then they called our office a couple hours later to follow up with us to see how our lunch was and to thank us for our order. WOW! That is customer service! Very impressed. We will be ordering from them and referring business to them as well. Pro Travel Fresno says thank you!
We visited on our way to Indian Rocks Beach and had a party of 12. The staff was outstanding and very friendly. Food was outstanding and everyone in our party loved. We had the spicy crab rolls and they were to die for. The place was spotless and very informative on the area. Will definitely visit again.
Might be bias because I've seen so many great shows there (Amy Winehouse, Keane, Muse, Broken Social Scene, Keane...) but I've listened to the same bands at different venues and they just don't sound as good. Mod Club has one of the greatest sound systems in the city. Unpretentious and beautiful. Love this place.
None
None
I enjoy my visits to The Silly Grape and I go there often. They serve fresh food, typically have many friendly servers on-hand, and cater to a professional crowd. Like most other small restaurants they run into some hiccups when they get hit hard during lunch or happy hour, but overall it is a great mom-amd-pop shop. Being surrounded by 6 or 7 large TV screens with ESPN and GolTV is a huge plus.
Hats off to mad hatters. Great service from Ronnie who made it happen and gave my car an upgrade. You guys truly know how to make their customers happy. Hats off to you all!!!!
Service Technician was experienced and knowledgeable and charged us about what we predicted the cost would be. He was fast and clean.
I wish I had found this place a few years ago. I had been going to a place on the other side of town, as it was the only repair shop I knew that had a good reputation. I was looking on craigslist the other day to find a used laptop to use as a backup, and I decided to Google some local shops to see what was available there before I purchased anything. As it turned out, Computer Hut had exactly what I was looking for at a price that was comparable to, and even better than, some of the prices being asked by private sellers for similar laptops. And the laptop from Computer Hut has been nicely refurbished, looks and works great, and comes with a warranty. The best part (for me) is that they are a 5 minute walk from my house, so I have a feeling I will be bringing my other computers there for repairs/upgrades/etc. In addition to the quality of their merchandise, the customer service was outstanding. Given a choice between two similar businesses, I will always choose the one with better customer service. Even though I was not there to spend a lot of money, the young lady who assisted me took the time to consider what I needed, and found the perfect solution to meet those needs. She also took the time to go through a number of issues related to technical matters, thereby providing even greater assurance that the computer I wanted to buy was exactly what I needed. I am glad that I took the few extra minutes to do some research yesterday, and found this place. I will definitely be a return customer.
None
We have been taking our 2 dogs to this great place for over 4 years now for their monthly "spa" experience. They get the full treatment and always come out looking clean and fresh and excited for their treat when they get home. The staff are kind, considerate and respectful and seem to really enjoy their work. I have personally experienced their ability to go above and beyond for their customers. I so appreciate being able to drop our "babies" off there and not having to worry about them. We have never had a negative experience with these special people and will continue to use their services. I have no hesitation in recommending Justine and The Groom Room.
YOU MUST GO! I've traveled to Cincinnati a bit over the past months for business & always try to stop here. In fact, I'm going there next week & can't wait to eat here! I travel extensively for business, including the US, Canada & Europe & am a total fish/seafood freak! Lemme just tell you, for a land-locked state, the quality is very good & they have a wide selection. They also do a good job of offering unique sides & good cocktails.
Greg took his time and explained everything I need to do start a new website. He was extremely thorough and gave me all the marketing information I needed to create a successful online business in Orange County. I highly recommend him to anyone in need of website or marketing support.
Best place ever. They make you feel comfortable and everything is very professional and gentle. I was scared to go the first time and now it's a piece of cake!
Another 5 stars for this guy. Wholesale tire installed & balanced at about 1/2 the price of what some other people told me it was going to be. Havnt got any other work done here yet but i'm looking forward to my next break down. Also the guy i talked to after hours was really courteous and sounded like he wanted to earn my business.
None
None
I've taken my 2 vehicles there for a timing belt, exhaust repair and for a regular oil change/service. Each time was a great experience. The customer service is awesome, I was happy with the quality of work, and the prices are MORE than fair. I would recommend this shop to anyone!
I have appreciated the cleanliness of the facility, the friendliness of the staff and how well they communicate. The place works and is dry and temperature controlled which I greatly appreciate. I like being able to access it for extended periods during the day. it would be nice if corporate would replace the front sliding doors. we customers have banged into them a few times and now their mis alignment slows their operation. that's my only concern.
Great pizza! It had a lot of flavor and seemed to have very fresh ingredients.
An amazing place to enjoy 2 days holidays with your friends. A lots of fun, adventures, sight seeing and so many things compact in a single packet. Me and my friends enjoyed a lot there, we' saw tigers, leopards at the distance of 10 feet. We were in jeep.... :). Must to visit there, u'll definitely enjoy a lot....
Love this place for over 20 years.
We stayed at the Casa Comtesse for a week and found it to be a most wonderful place ran by a staff of friendly, helpful and open hearted people. Yes, 5 stars, Loved it.
My second and last School. Awesome faculty. Miss it.. Sudhanshu Singh Batch 2006
Capri has the fattest sandwiches around... trust me I know
Loved my visit to Shear Vintage Salon!! My stylist was Ashly and she did an outstanding job with what I wanted.
Jack was an all star in showing me exactly what I wanted and made the purchase extremely easy. I'd recommend this dealership to anyone looking at a Jeep / Chrysler vehicle as they were willing to work with me and get me the car I wanted at the right price. Thanks, Jack - great doing business with you!
The food was great and always loved to go there on Saturdays. The pizza and potato/chicken was the best dinners to have hands down. One of the locations in Palmdale had the Asteron Belt LaserDisc arcade game. That alone made the trip worth every time. I miss going there. I now live in Texas and no one's ever heard of the restaurant unless they themselves come from California.
I've owned the same laptop for six years, and have recently had problems with the start-up and overall speed of the computer. Instead of getting a new one, I had a technician at Ace Duce look at it. He reformatted it and removed some viruses. After all that, my computer runs like it did years ago. Ace Duce's prices were reasonable, their service was fast, and their technicians friendly!! I would recommend them to any of my friends needing computer help and/or website development.
Wonderful customer service.
I have been letting from Martin & Co for over a year and have received an excellent level of support from all the staff. The rental process was quick and efficient and all my subsequent enquiries have been dealt with promptly. On one occasion, where I thought there was something wrong with the gas boiler, the maintenance engineer described how to correct the problem over the phone. Which was very informative and saved a lot of time.
None
The food is great. Service is great. Every time!
None
Great ice cream and wonderful company. This place is a treat. If you're nearby you definitely need to stop in.
We've used Steve's for several years now and are very happy. Our dog - a 12 year old 5 lb. yorkie that's used to top service - is no treat to groom but Steve and his staff take special care to make sure he's groomed properly and with the highest quality. We love Steve's!
None
None
Den bedste is jeg har smagt i Danmark.
Brilliant food twenty minutes from Emirates stadium but without the full on football atmosphere... Excellent meal
My oldest son recently completed his orthodontic treatment at RTO. They have been fantastic, every step of the way. From early screening and braces-on, to checkups and fixes, to braces-off and aftercare, I have been delighted with their friendly and compassionate approach to orthodontic care. RTO makes appointments fun and pleasant for patients and parents alike. All this, and they do great work too!
We hired for a 4-way attack (pests, termites, gophers & rats) and received great first visit, and two additional follow-ups! Although all of the guys are great, Roger has been especially responsive whenever we needed additional services during our monthly visit. Also, Jonathon, sales rep, was incredibly personal, helpful and responsive! Continue to use their monthly service call, and would recommend them to anyone!!!!
None
Unity handled our recent move from Raleigh NC to Simpsonville, SC. I could not have been more pleased. Our belongings were handled with great care and the staff was courteous. The team on the Raleigh end worked very efficiently. Although there was very little discussion between team members, with Marcos as team leader, everything just went like clockwork. Two members (Juan and Roger) of the moving team were also with us on the Greenville end. Again, everything was done with great care and efficiency. I have and will continue to recommend this company for anyone that I know is moving. Moving can be a nightmare if you don't have the right people assisting you. Unity/Raleigh Movers was definitely the right company to help us with our move.
Excellent service. Came in for a screen protector for my cracked iPhone screen and walked out with a new screen in 1 hour for $80. Had another unrelated problem with my phone after. They looked at it quickly and efficiently. Solved my other issues. They were a pleasure to deal with, very professional. Great selection of cases, services, and accessories.
This is one of the best local game stores I've ever had the pleasure of frequenting. Mike (the owner) is a great guy, and they have a great selection of board and card games, as well as a lot of table space to play on. If you don't see what you're looking for, just ask - they'll order most anything you want. Snacks, drinks, and coffee for cheap, as well as a lot of food options within walking distance.
Amazing people. Great service
Отличная кухня, приятное интерьерное заведение
Small office, friendly staff, great service. I plan to go back at my next check-up.
None
None
I have been buying vehicles personally and for my business from Shakers for the past 15 years. Each time Jim Reed had guided me through the process and has been on top of every purchase. When you can call a business and everyone treats you with respect and consideration, there is no reason to shop anywhere else. As my company grows, I will continue to buy and service all my vehicles from Shakers. A great company to do business with.
Best local Chinese Food around and value for the price. I have been a customer for over 20yrs. The owner Danny is the BEST! All his work staff is great too. Large portions and very good recipes at very reasonable prices. Highly recommend for mid-level dining and Take-out. Will travel multiple towns to go here.
Great place for Breakfast or Lunch. Ask about the Breakfast Challenge.
I lived a few blocks away for a year and frequented this Thai restaurant more than any other establishment in at least a ten block radius. By far. And I mean every establishment, restaurants included. Bottom line: the Thai served here is quite impressive. I would have to recommend the Green Curry and also the Pad Thai, both of which are steals given the menu prices. The dine-in experience impresses as well. No frills, just clean decor and very attentive service. No matter where I live in the city for the years to come, I will always make an effort to keep returning to Lanna Thai. One of the best values I've known.
Dr. Andren and his staff (Jody,Stephaine, Rebecca, Heidi) All were super helpful and just lovely people. I am not an easy person to win over! The vibe was professional and very laid back. You could tell instantly that all of the staff love their jobs. They truly enjoy and want people to feel comfortable with their dental experience. I almost did not want to leave. They have local coffee and there is a TV on the ceiling. The office decor was streamlined and full of sunlight. The free teeth whitening for life is fantastic. I called around to several offices and the costs are very fair. I just can't say enough good about this office. I will have my better half and best friend switch over right away. Thanks again Peak Dental Health!
Swati Hotels Is a Luxury Budget Hotel at Karol Bagh New Delhi, Situated at Large Shopping area of New Delhi. It is the best choice if you are looking for Children friendly environment. Choose Swati Hotels Online Reservation Service make your stay easy and comfortable. Special Futures of Swati Hotels: 1. Near To New Delhi railway station 2. Near to International Airport 3. Near To India gate 4. Near To Connaught place 5. Easy connectivity with Delhi Metro. 6. Pick up Drop Facilities 7. Pure vegetarian Food and more....
Freundliche und kompetente Beratung. Guter Service.
While deciding what car to buy I visited all the home pages for the various dealers in the Bremerton, WA area. I visited the Advantage Nissan site and compared vehicles, available features and cost. I really liked what I saw at Advantage Nissan. I then visited the NissanUSA site. At that point, I was hooked on the Nissan Altima. Next I asked for information from Advantage and promptly heard from Chuck Capps. Josh Beckner contacted me and offered his assistance. A few days later Chuck sent information on the MLK holiday sale and that is all it took. The incentives being offered were too good to pass up. I sent him an e-mail with the description of the new Altima I'd like to buy. The next-day Josh called me to say he had my car, but it needs to be brought to Bremerton from another dealer. Saturday, 01/14/12, I went to Advantage Nissan to complete the paperwork to firm up the purchase. While there I met Kevin, the business Manager, Josh, and Adam Green; my wife and I were treated very well. Adam went with us on a test drive of an Altima similar to the car I am buying. The test drive went smoothly and I think the Altima performs super. By the time my wife and I were done we received an excellent deal on a 2012 Nissan Altima S with 20th Anniversary Package. Kevin did an excellent job to make sure we got the best deal possible. Adam Green helped us with some of the paper work and offered to help anytime. Advantage Nissan has outstanding core values and it is apparent all of the staff at Advantage Nissan subscribes to them. I recommend Advantage Nissan to anyone looking for a dealer who goes the extra mile and treats their customers with the utmost courtesy and respect. ******* 04/09/12: We've had our Altima for nearly 3 months now. When I picked the car up Adam Green made sure I understood as much as possible about our new Altima. He patiently went over every guage and display. He even set up my Bluetooth connection. During the past three months I have found the Altima to be truly the world's best value. On the highway the 2.5 engine really performs with no sweat. Road noise is minimal. The Altima performs well in all conditions at all speeds. I have continued to compare the Altima against other vehicles I could have purchased, but nothing beats the Altima. Advantage Nissan is the best dealer around. One could not ask for a better dealership who emphasizes value and quality. ****** 10/16/12 Our 2012 Altima was in for it's nine month service. I was greeted promptly, checked in and going in the door to my work in roughly five minutes. I appreciated the ride to work. I went back at 2:00 and the vehicle was completed and ready. One won't find a better place for a fair deal and quality customer service than at Advantage Nissan where there take good care of the customer after the sale. ***** 03/21/13 We have now had our 2012 Altima for just over a year and we been back to the dealer four times. I continue to be very impressed with the quality of our Nissan Altima. It gives us a quiet smooth ride on the highway. My visits to the gas station are now only a time or two a month. The performance is great as the 2.5L engine is no slouch. One will find nothing but excellent customer service at Advantage Nissan. They are respectful and courteous to their customers. The quality of service can't be beat. They do excellent work at a fair price. I'd recommend Advantage Nissan to anyone.
None
Awesome place, the people are great, and I've never had a bad time.
Was here recently for niece's birthday party. Very impressed with the recent renovations; looks (and smells!) much cleaner. Even the pizza is markedly improved. The same animatronic characters were a surprise to see (same from when I had my bday parties there 20 years ago), but fun was had by all. Friendly and helpful staff!
Hubby had the Train Wreck. It was huge. The onion rings are a "must order." Great food and prices.
Attended cocktail tasting last night, hosted by knowledgeable and friendly Kirsty and Del. Totally enjoyable feast while sipping handcrafted drinks! Girl, I am so proud of you. Rock it!
I have used Braintree Rehab on different occasions, and I have been more then happy with the treatment I have received here. They don't just treat the problem they treat the surrounding problems that stem from it as well. I have never had that at any other PT I have ever been to, Example: I suffered a lower back injury. they didn't just treat the lower back, they treated the stomach sides and thighs as well since they all connect to make the back stronger. I love these ladies. They are worth their weight in gold.
Staff is always friendly & products consistent.
Wery good Lamb !
Ingredienti semplici ma gustosi complimenti chef !
Sweet friday
Great food at take-out prices. Where else can you get that delicious brown rice?
Highly recommended for Volkswagon and Audi work. They are very friendly and knowledgable.
My wife Jo and I have just got home and the fireplace looks amazing (just fitted) , we went for the aged reproduction marble fireplace, original hobgrate, and to my surprise it looks as good as the original marble but a lot less £££ ,so we bought a pair Venini chandeliers that are being fitted as I'm typing , I have never seen anything like it ,we thought that we need to give Renaissance a honest review so we both did one for you guys, We love the shop…... Miles
Best food best atmosphere over all best....
This is a machine shop only. No Auto Repair Available.
Quality work in a timely manner. Well mannered workers and a great boss. Clean up was awesome! Floor is outstanding.
I just completed my second roof maintenance with JS Roofing. I was pleased the first time, but blown away by the second cleaning/treatment. I've never seen my roof look this good in the 10 years we've been living in this house. In addition to excellent service, my work with the company has been very professional. Excellent, prompt communication, estimation, and response to any inquiries. Outstanding roofing contractor. Will be my go-to fo future roofing projects. Greg
I visited SCMS 2 weeks ago for laser hair removal. My entire experience was excellent. The office staff is friendly, professional, and thorough. The facility is clean, easy to get to, and I don't think I waited more than a total of 5 minutes the whole time I was there. I was asked to fill out a short questionnaire about my skin type in order to ensure I would respond well to the treatment and to ensure I didn't have any skin conditions that would prevent me from having laser hair removal. Erin, the office manager also showed me a brief presentation on the procedure which was informative and made me feel completely comfortable with the procedure. The PA was very professional and the treatment didn't take longer than 10 minutes, there was a tiny bit of discomfort just from the suction of the laser, but on a scale of 0-10 I'd rate the pain at a 2. After one treatment, I have already noticed my hair growing back thinner and there is less of it. I would 100% recommend SCMS based off of my experience.
Went to Lisa. She is really great! Love the color and cut shes done and I get complements ALL the time! Ive got standing appointments with her every month.
If you looking for a really good hand wash joint, this facility is the best by far. This has gotta be the best hand wash joint I've ever been to after living here in UT, California, and Arizona. You have an option of a hot high pressure rinse, which really does justice if you have tons of bugs on the front of the car of something similar. Also you have an option of paying with a card or cash and the price is right. If you use the high pressure wash option, it will leave the outside of you car smelling really good surprisingly enough. Besides just the hand wash bays there are also two automatic wash drive thrus.
Great for food allergies.
great to be in wtp
The first time my wife and I went here we were blown away by the quality of the service and food. Most of the similar places we had eaten at you could barely taste the food under the salty seasonings and microwave reheating. Everything we've had at the Longhorn has been perfectly cooked and seasoned to enhance flavor instead of cover poor quality ingredients. The prices are a bit higher than at similar places but not enough to matter, I think we figured we spend about 10.00 more on our total bill.
Great pulled pork sandwich
None
I recently took my 10 month old son here for Easter pictures. Cora was absolutely amazing and did everything to get a smile out of my son. He smiled every time she walked into the room and the array of props / backdrops / themes she has to work with are great!! Her portrait packages are flexible and there are tons of options! She's quick, but not pushy, she just knows what she's doing and how to do it! All in all I highly recommend!
None
Called Randy on Saturday morning, and he was at my place within 5 hours for furnace service. He was very helpful in explaining what service he was performing and got my system up and running quickly. He was incredibly courteous and has my recommendation for anyone and their heating/cooling needs!
Spent my best 2 years at this highly academic and transfer rated College. This college will treat it's students with the best resources to accomplish any academic or arts goal and even financial needs. Lancer Jobs are awesome The benefits of being a students at this fine college will get you anywhere. Loving the diversity extremely friendly school.
Nice collection with awesome customer service
Erstklassiges Essen... wir gehen dort immer wieder gern hin. Highlight sind All you can Eat Abende und die Portugiesischen Spieße. Absolute Empfehlung!
This burger place blew my mind. The food was so phenomenal. When I went to DMK I got the Make A Wish Burger and the proceeds for the burger all went to the Make A Wish Foundation. They support a different charity each month and the idea is wonderful for those who want to eat and support charity.
Best new place in town. It's even worth the drive to Maplewood. Don't be frightened by the Brain Poppers and Frog legs, they also have a great burger, steak, mac and cheese and of course, waffle fries! Staff is fun and friendly...Kenny is the greatest bartender ever.
Best gyro in town
None
Had a great time at my first class. Alex, despite being relatively young, ran a great class. He was confident, helpful, and gave easy to follow instructions. Great anaerobic intensity from a workout standpoint. I can tell I'm going to enjoy Krav Maga in general because of its practicality, real-world (as opposed to tournament) application, and sheer physicality. No kid-stuff here. Alex had us learning techniques within the first half-hour, including simple choke defenses and emotional "on/off switch" exercises. The facility is nice, despite smelling like a well-used locker room after the class. The 16-20 of us in the room worked up a pretty good sweat, collectively. As a martial arts noob, I also appreciated the congenial and encouraging atmosphere. The more experienced students are friendly and eager to sub-coach you through the techniques. Price seemed a little steep at first, but that's just compared to your run-of-the-mill gym membership. It's pretty competitive when I put it up against other martial arts gyms, LA boxing, etc. Bottom line... I'm getting an annual membership.
Harbinger Winery is, in my opinion, the best winery on the Olympic Peninsula. They make robust reds, complex whites, and even a few jammy seasonal fruit wines. They're tasting room is very rustic and inviting with plenty of tables and chairs made from barrels, unique cheeses from local creameries, and chocolates bars I've never dreamed of conceiving. The staff are very knowledgeable making wine/food pairing a great experience and they seem to know most people on a first name basis. They occasionally host amazing events in which various dishes/appetizers are paired with their wines. I've been to most, if not all, of the wineries in the area and they make the best wines combined with the best tasting room to make the best overall experience.
I had a blast. The food was excellent, the service was exceptional, the crowd diverse, and the atmosphere relaxed and intimate. If you like Hookah and Mediterranean food, and music I would definitely recommend it.
We were extremely pleased to work alongside with Gayle from 770 Salon. She did an amazing job on the last wedding we worked together on November 16th 2013. The bride looked elegant and flawless which made our jobs as photographers easy. We look forward to working with her in the near future.
Finalmente una lavanderia self-service in zona e con un servizio di ottima qualità !!!
Staff was great and very alert... Enjoyed the visit and I am glad I had the chance to come into the center for a check up. Thanks.
Excellent service,food and a fun,laughable place to just relax and enjoy good company. Just like home. Dine here several times a year. Best Restaurant in South Okanagan!
Quero conhecer. Tenho boas referencias
A blast
Breakfast burrito was great, as was the cappuccino! It is a bit small but you can get it to go.
None
Spread the Truth & bow urself before Almighty Allah
None
We, Crawford Truck, sold Gary Blaisdell a new Ramp truck recently. From our experience with him, we saw that he runs a extremely professional company that seems to strive excellent customer service. Great organization, we wish them the best!
Thursday night's are the best, karaoke and ladies night, Katie is one of the best bartenders!
und Umgebung. Schon über 20 Jahre gibt es nun Michaele und Anette Doimo's Eiscafe in Homburg und seitdem habe ich auch keinen vergleichbaren Cappucino getrunken, ausser vielleicht in Italien ;-)
None
None
I had a great experience at Mystique Hair & Skin located in the Princeton Market Fair Mall on Route 1. I was able to schedule a same-day appointment for a men's haircut. The atmosphere is upscale, calm and comfortable. I was greeted warmly and efficiently by the front desk (interestingly, there were two staff members working the front desk). Tayler, my stylist, provide an excellent cut and was a great conversationalist to boot. You'll pay a little bit more than your standard strip mall commodity service, but you're worth it!
Great place to wash your car or clean you dog at a fair price, and the owner's a nice guy! :) And I live right around the corner.
Legit.
We went there for my wife's 50th birthday. We had never been to a tea room before, and frankly, being a male, wasn't sure how enjoyable it would be. It actually turned out to be a fun time for all, and my wife really appreciated it. They made her and the rest of us feel special, the service was great, and the food was terrific! Highly recommend!!!
None
dooset darim hyper star
A great middle ground between the cracker-thin pizzas that leave you hungry and the puffy monstrosities that you find at places like BeauJo's. The scorched crusts are awesome and the primo ingredients imported from Italy can't be beat. I love the fact that they have a great bar and great patio. You gotta try the dessert pizzas, too.
I relocated to Surprise AZ about a year ago with my brand new Soul. At first I went to Sands Kia for the convenience and now I wouldn't go anywhere else. Eddie, my personal service rep (cool to have by the way), always greets me with a smile. My Soul has had all of the scheduled maintenance done at Sands Kia and I know I've saved money. They are prompt, courteous and professional. Why go anywhere else?
These are the best gyros I have found in Colorado. I have been looking to find some similar as I used to have in Greek town, and these are great.
My parents have been using ESP for ~15 years, if not longer. I now have foreign cars of my own, live in NJ, and still take them to Andy. His prices are fair and I trust his work. It might take some time to get your car back, but it is safe and thoroughly done.
#AmericanRestaurant
Have been a regular customer for about a year. Super helpful, competitive prices, great selection, and superior option to big chains. They're also great for special orders. Well worth the trip.
Hands down my favorite Burger joint!
If you are looking for great pizza, then eat here. We always order the Big G - 16 slices of deliciousness.
My husband, 1 and a half year old son and I stayed here for about 2 weeks while we waited for our house to be ready. To be honest, I could have lived here forever. Haha. The staff was amazing and understanding. There were a couple of problems with our room. (We had 2 bedroom suite), the front door was broken, and one of the bathroom doors lock was broken. Both were fixed promptly. My son was sick for about a week, and we were using the "playpens" they provided for his sleeping arrangement. He vomited in one, they replaced it then shortly after he did it again in the new one! I felt so terrible, but they were more than understanding. I offered to pay for them but they refused the offer. The breakfast was more than enough, much better than you will find at most hotels (we have stayed in MANY, as we travel a lot!). If I had a reason to go back, I would. I have recommended Homewood Suites to friends and family when they are in town.
Great place to buy and service my car!!!
Fresh food, consistent results - best dairy spot in Hollywood hands down
These guys installed an ARB plate bumper for me earlier this year. They did an awesome job, they were affordable, and were cool to hang out with/talk to. If you get a chance, just walk into their shop sometime to look at their stuff. They have some really cool stuff that they fabricate.
None
I have so much to say about this comapany, but my time is short because I am so busy these days with work... ALL thanks for Pathfinders, Inc. Pathfinders has the most professional, friendly, and helpful staff. You take an exam on your first visit to the office. They have a helpful and efficient system for matching you with employers and companies in the Atlanta area. I had a few prospects, and actually interviewed with 2 companies in less than 2 months. I received copious amounts of help with my resume, employer background information, interview suggestions, and general feedback. I WOULD NOT have had such a successful job search without Pathfindres, Inc. I absolutely recommend this comapny to anybody who is looking for a hardworking staff that will assist them in finding an established company for immediate employment.
Best pub in Cardiff by a mile. Friendly staff, great food and a brilliant place to watch the footy. The pub has 'zoned' audio so you can have a chat over a pint without having to shout, beer garden has a big screen for the smokers as well, you will have to look hard to beat this pub.
Very friendly and helpful staff. Excellent group training programs, you really get your money's worth!
Love Dr. G! :-)
Often visit Sergios when in London for work - great place and not far from Euston train station. Food is always great and the staff are extremely polite and helpful!
Love it
I just want to thank you for the excellent service you provide in fixing my car. Also the costumer service was wonderful. Everyone was friendly and very helpful.My car looked perfect. I highly recommend to my family and friends to take their car to your shop. It's hard to find places you can trust and feel secure about the work that needs to be done. Thank you for being a company that can be trusted and treat their costumer with excellent care. Thank you again, Denise Smoke
None
Dr. St. Matthew-Daniel and her staff are fantastic. It had been several years since I had been to the dentist. It's certainly not on my top favorite things to do. From the moment I arrived, I was provided comfort and pampered through the entire process. Everyone made sure my experience was as anxiety and pain free as possible. Not to mention the great job that was done on my teeth. All I can say is, I found my new dentist for life. Experienced Dentist that really cares.
Paul dog sounds good to me and the relish oh so good, well worth the short drive to Rocky Point from the highway.
Very Helpful.... Overall and Totally Satisfying.
If you care about vehicle knowledge expertise, honesty, friendly atmosphere and fair prices for getting your import vehicle repaired, Import Specialty Service is definately the place for you. Getting my BMW repaired by experts that I trust is most imortant to me. The fairness of their pricing is a BONUS! John Hart Nashville
Great Pizza-Fun Atmosphere
Gr8 location.... New Indian oil petrol pump
I have never had a Church family before but after attending Destination Church Chicago, I felt like it was finally possible. Everyone was so welcoming and genuinely interested in getting to know me. I did not feel any pressure but instead a welcoming embrace. If you need a home, I think Destination Church Chicago is it!
This is my go to cleaners for all my cleaning and alterations needs. Nikki is amazing and client first customer service makes me a repeat customer. Thank you for the excellent service!
It has been a month of fantastic gas mileage since I bought my Honda Civic from Pat Peck. Love that Little green energy saving ECONomy button and I am learning to actually drive at or under the speed limit to see just how high I can get the mileage. I finally found a small problem and visited the service department. At first I thought I was going to get the run around but they not only addressed the problem, they came out of pocket with an upgrade that would defiantly prevent a recurrence. In and out in a half hour. Sweet. J. J. Smith Vancleave, Ms
None
None
When in Robe you have to get your meat from Robe Butcher on Union Street. Their prices are slightly above what you pay in the city but the quality of their meat is so much more than what you buy in the city. If you bought the quality of their meat in the city it would be in a specialist gourmet store and really expensive. You have to try their chicken breasts wrapped in prosciutto and stuffed with sundried tomatoes and pesto. Their steaks are so tender and sausages brilliant. We called in before heading back to Adelaide to buy more meat to take home.
I would recommend this company to anyone who is replacing their siding, windows, or roof. They did everything they promised, and they are smoke-free. So no littering the property with cigarette butts, no constant smoke breaks, they worked hard and long, and treated my house as if it were their own. They used quality materials, and followed up with me if there were questions about a certain installation situation, so there were no surprises. Everyone respected the property, and cleaned up well after each day on the job. The foreman, Shawn, was on site each day. Hire this company with confidence!
Ensight has been pleased to have had the opportunity to perform On-Site Low Vision exams at Rigden Farm. The staff always goes the extra mile to make sure our requests are met. Their positive input has certainly enhanced the eye care we are able to provide the residents at Rigden Farm. Barbara Perina, MD. Ensight Skills Center, Inc. Fort Collins
Neatly maintained temple. Nice and peaceful place.
Such a great group of people. Sporting a Ninja 650 Now and I love it. Between myself and my husband we've bought atleast six bikes from Gainesville Motorsports. We also consigned three bikes and they sold them with in a month. :) Would 100% Recommend GM for the serious buyer.
None
Nice rental shop and friendly, efficient staff.
None
My daughter and I went to have some ice cream and were pleasantly surprised at the portion size. My daughters eyes were bigger than her stomach but she managed to finish what she asked for. The lady that helped us was very pleasant and prompt.
Absolutely love Dr. Keffer, she takes great care of my chinchillas!
None
I cannot think of one negative thing to say about Briar Rose. The people are always friendly. Everything I've every tried has been delicious. Pastries and baked goods, delicious. Sandwiches and soups at lunch, delicious. Saturday night pizza, delicious. If you're going there for the first time do not leave without having a cinnamon roll, they are so good it's like Angels are frolicking on your taste buds.
What a fun place! and 24 hrs too? The owner's a blast, a really funny little guy, goes by the name "Banana King". (I didn't see any bananas anywhere).
How can it be worse than the old bus station I have never seen drunks at firstsite urinating in any hidden corner or used needles laying around people of the town need to improve their memory
Friendly staff/owner. Great space and location. Large, comfortable area for kids and parents. Very family-friendly. Good coffee also, at less expense than chains.
“I had lots of interaction with the sales and service staff before and during my training classes to get my license. Everyone really seemed to enjoy their work and the company. No high pressure techniques or over selling involved. Basically they provided loads of info and answered lots of questions and said they were ready to sell when I was ready to buy.”
The original snow & skate camp!
Last week my car began driving strange. After realizing the problem was not going away I took it by a local mechanic shop who took a quick look at it. They advised me it could be a transmission related issue. Having very limited knowledge about cars and never dealing with a transmission problem before I didn't know what to do. I thought the best idea was to go online and do a little research. After finding several places listed, I decided calling and talking to a technician would be the best idea. I called a few places, with very little help getting any kind of answers. Then I called A-1 Transmissions and spoke with John. Really a great guy to talk to, up front, helpful and honest. He offered great advise and had me bring it by his shop. What a great find! When I pulled in, John came out personally and started helping me right away. He checked a few things and got it right on to a lift. Not even 5 minutes after getting it on the lift he was able to diagnosis the problem and the cheapest way to fix it. Turned out I wasn't having a transmission issue at all, I had a defective issue with my front tire. What a relief. I tried paying him, which he refused. I would recommend this place to anyone. Great honest service, which is hard to find these days. Thanks again John!
I have 3 dogs, 2 cats and 3 ferrets and all are AVS patients. They make the duty of taking care of all of my animals an easier and affordable experience. Flexible hours, walk-in's are welcome (and yes you may have to wait if you're a walk-in but I've never found it bad), friendly staff who seem to really care about doing the right thing for the animals. Last week, Dr. Alberty treated my 1 year old pup for H.G.E. and I was pleased with how he handled me and my dog. Oh... and they are VERY reasonable with the prices. 2 nights hospitalization, an IV and all the required shots and test was $127! I paid more than that for annual shots for one dog at a vet on Sherwood Forrest.
Geico was able to save me hundreds over my previous insurance company! I spoke with Christie and she was so helpful and friendly and was able to answer all my questions and helped to make sure I got the best policy for me! Great customer service is what you'll get here I'll recommend anyone looking for insurance to call Geico first!
Great shop with quick repair turnaround times, training options, and beer while you wait!
We've been very pleased with Aiello Home Services and have used them for plumbing, and AC and our furnace maintenance for a few years now. I was most particularly impressed by Peter C of their plumbing staff during a visit to fix a persistent leak. He was extremely professional, dug right into that project, while I added another (which he fixed with simple advice), a very complex filtration project that no other plumber had ever been willing to undertake, and two minor fixes that have bugged me for years. He was quick, efficient, and extremely knowledgeable. Not all technicians are on his level and I'll request him in the future! Many thx!
The guys working here were very professional and friendly. They asked for permission before even checking my tires because they have nitrogen, which is awesome. Fast, great service.
Good prices and service..
After trying a few places in MAC, my wife and I decided to give Yan's a shot (we had yet to find a satisfying Chinese restaurant up to that point). We were seated in a side room at a table (not a booth). This is my only real negative comment about Yan's. I ordered their Szechuan Chicken. It seemed fresh, not overly salty or greasy (relatively speaking of course). Portion sizes were excellent. I have gone back to Yan's exclusively when I crave Chinese food.
Avons découvert cette résidence vacances et très honnêtement c'est le bonheur, il y a beaucoup d'activités pour le bien être des vacanciers. Il y a un tas de choses, supérette, spa, magasins, restaurants, discothèques, hammam, sauna..... Les animateurs font un bon job, les Mobil home sont très propres, je recommande ce lieu. Je reviendrais même. Merci Mayotte pour ce séjour...
Knowledgeable, fastidious and discreet. I would highly recommend Mr. Goldstein to anyone in search of legal counsel.
Very helpful and decent selection/prices. Highly recommended
Great blue cheese bacon burger. Honestly I was surprised by the cool downtown Modesto vibe.
The best storage place we ever rented. The service is always very personal and helpful. Fantastic!!!
Cycle Lane is one of the best Bike Shops in the York area. The owner has a vast knowledge of bikes, kit and also caters in the needs of the user. After using Evans Cycles and being very disappointed in the work carried out on my bike I took it to Cycle Lane. I was amazed in the detail of work that had been carried out and almost to an obsessive compulsive level, even after a bad crash what could have been a very expensive repair bill was surprisingly cheap and also good quality! I would recommend this shop to anyone as i'm sure the next best thing would be having a pro team mechanic.
Tara is AMAZING!!! I've been seeing her for 5 years now and I hope to continue seeing her as long as I'm able! She's not only served as a medical professional during my diagnosis with PCOS and depression after losing my mother, but she's also been a friend. She hugs me tight every time she sees me and always wants to know about the latest happenings in my life. She shares her personal stories as well and is always able to relate. I've never seen her without a smile on her face! She's also been pivotal with my weight loss journey and is always able to answer my medical questions and always eager to help in anyway she can! I trust her with my life and recommend her to all my friends and family! If every medical professional had a heart like Tara's, the world would be a much better place!
Best school
Best shop ever
My two oldest children go here and they like it and I do as well :)
yum
I've been working with Erin and Dennis with NARPM (National Association of Residential Property Managers) and as their locksmith resource. They are awesome. professional, and on top of their game! I would recommend them and Show Appeal Realty to anyone! The Google rating system only goes to 3, but I'd give them a 5 if I could.
I've been a client at Embrace U Salon & Spa for over year. My experience has been great! My stylist is attentive to my requests and goes over and beyond to ensure I'm satisfied with my service. I would definitely recommend a visit!
None
I would recommend this place to anyone. Really good Mexican Food. :)
None
Outstanding. I bought a CK suit from Macy's. Pants needed hemming and I needed it done in 4 days. Went to Macy's and in addition to charging me extra for the rush were going to ring me up for $20 (cya). I called this place and said they could have it done in time for only $8. Went there and they sized me up. The woman was really friendly. The kicker - I asked if they could fix a few more things that would've added $20 more to my bill but she was insistent that the pants were a good fit and that any more would only cause discomfort. Pants were done in time and they fit like a glove. Speedy, affordable, honest, and local. I'm going back.
This is by far the finest Mexican Restaurant in the Valley
Have the pleasure of knowing the team at Landis Communications through our agency's involvement with the Public Relations Global Network. They are a team of very smart and strategic communicators with a commitment to their clients' success.
John the plumber saved my bacon when the pipes froze. They were very quick in responding to my call and helped us in our emergency. I would definitely recommend them to everyone who needs plumbing services!!!
My first time there and I got a beef brisket sandwich with two sides and a soda. At first I thought the price was high but it was worth it. Even though the portions look small, don't be fooled. They will fill you up! I'm a big boy. I eat a lot of food before I get full and I walked out of there feeling stuffed! The chili was good. The potato salad was good. The brisket was very good and the sauce on the brisket was great. (I will ask for extra sauce next time.) College ball on the TVs kicked up the atmosphere. I would prefer a sawdust-on-the-floor look-and-feel for a BBQ joint, but it was still good. The staff were very nice and fun to talk to. I will definitely be going back regularly.
Summit City is our third place! We go in there an everybody knows our name. We get personalized service; the sales, service and bike fit staff are fantastic. Summit City is our main support for our bicycling habit! We love it there!
Promp, Clean, Friendly, very well run company.
We've been in the neighborhood for more than 12-years and been using Riverside Animal Hospital that entire time. When we first started going there is was specifically to see Dr. Steven Kasanofsky, although there was at least one other vet there. Dr. K was well know and well liked - and we agreed with the referral. Over the years the practice has expanded and even though we don't see Dr. K as often, we've been quite pleased with the other vets that have been added to the practice. Everyone there has been terrific, especially in difficult times. I can't see bringing my dogs anywhere else.
I love coming here to relax and escape the city. Walking the trails or sitting at the cafe and watching the wildlife. There are several cozy sitting spots hidden throughout the garden as well. This is my second year as a member and out of town visitors love it when I take them on a tour.
Cookie has tailoring several of my dress pants. They fit perfectly. She has also tailoring many things for my wife including a couple of mother of the bride dresses. When my daughter needed costumes for the school play Oklahoma, she allowed my wife to sew after hours at her shop. She went above the call of duty and is an expert tailor.
None
I have always been very happy with the service i get from Abe's of Maine, in fact the last order i made of an underwater digital camera to take on a cruise with me was through them and Steve G personally called me to ask me if there were any accessories or extras that i would like to add to my order before they shipped it out.
One of the best indian food here, everytime I go.
I run a Auto Repair shop in North Miami Beach and i always send my clients interested in purchasing a vehicle to Kosher Motors - they have a wide selection of used vehicles and will work with you to get the best deal possible.
Super fast response. Gas station delivery!
I had a friend visiting and I decided to take her here as our first stop. We had an amazing day, looking around and watching the life of the animals. It was a sunny day so most of them were out and active. The zoo is a must for everyone in Melbourne, regardless if you're living here or just visiting.
None
The place to go in Limerick if you want to hear traditional Irish music.
None
Food is prepared very well and very timely. Great place!
My dog goes to Lucky Pawz once a week, every week. She is well socialized, taken care of, and we get to see how fun she has every day with the pictures online! It is a wonderful place, friendly staff, and I have never had a single problem. I would highly recommend (and I do) to everyone I know with a dog in the Iowa City area! I couldn't be happier with the service I receive there.
Excellent Indian food..every bite is a new taste bud experience!
Dear All,I have purchased a plot from CREASTATE SOLUTION Pvt.Ltd. through Chiranjiv ji. Both He helped me a lot from the day of booking to the day of registry. I have visited the Company office many times. all the staffs are very helpful. I will tell all other customers to buy plot in Patna from Crestate Solution Pvt.Ltd. ANANT KUMAR 19/11/2013 Plot no. - 06 Project – Vivek Vihar
Clean friendly store, and they treated me like a real person. Very knowledgeable, in regards to every question a first time customer could ever have. Way better than what I had in mind, actually it was a-lot like pawn stars. After visiting their store, I was amazed at the large selection of.... Umm.... Everything. Good prices, great deals, and best customer service in every shape of the word.
My experience with Right Price Auto Sales has been awesome! I wanted a Audi and Aaron and Zahe made it possible. As with most used cars there were some things that needed to be fixed, but they took care of those things and even helped me get some nice new tires. I highly recommend Right Price Auto Sales, because I have been treated with kindness, patience, and fairness.
I have been to barbers in many parts of the world...Gula is by far the best I've ever experienced. She knows her craft very well and executes it beautifully. One of the things I love about her is that her technique is very soothing...at the end I felt as though I'd just had a massage. Not only did I get a great haircut but I felt great too. I will be back and I highly recommend her.
We are a large plumbing company that employs the services of blockeddraingoldcoast for all our blocked sewers and drains . They have a large array of cameras and drain cleaning equipment probably the best ive seen.They are reliable and very trustworthy would recommend this company to anyone requiring the services of blocked drain experts.
Selling my used MacBook Pro was a painless and simple procedure. I described my laptop and its condition and received a conditional price from SYM, which I believe was a fair price. After sending pictures of my computer, the original quote was further confirmed. Using the prepaid shipping label, I sent my MacBook off to SYM. In one week and four days, with an intervening three-day weekend, I had check in hand. I will use these people again!
I recently purchased a new Lexus CT 200h from Johnson Lexus of Raleigh. It was definitely the best car buying experience I have ever had. Zacques Gray and the team at Johnson were fantastic. What I appreciated the most in the experience was the pressure free approach. Zack was extremely helpful in working with me and my limited schedule, including a great deal of email communication and a last minute test drive. I would highly recommend this dealership to others interested in a new or used car.
Thanks for your time in answering all our questions... JC
Martin and the team at We Fit are so good at what they do, quality of service is excellent, nothing to much trouble for them, polite and courteous. Their work is faultless and first class. I would recommend them to anyone considering upgrading their home with a new kitchen, bathroom or indeed any other upgrade.
Absolutely amazing! Speed, price, quality, all A+. I took my Range Rover in after a friend recommended them. I thought my two wheels were beyond redemption, but these guys surpassed all my expectations. Absolutely amazing!
None
I have been trying for quite some time to locate a part for my old Layton travel trailer. When I found out that Rocky Mountain RV & Marine in Albuquerque sold Laytons, I emailed their parts department with my request. A guy named Jarrid answered my email and later that day he informed me that they actually had the part I needed IN STOCK! Four days later it came in the mail. They were very helpful, and if I ever need another part, I’ll contact them first.
Awesome tasting Philly!!
None
Good food good people good fun
The beat ice cream in town
We really enjoyed the vacation home. This was our first time trying a vacation home instead of staying on Disney property. I really enjoyed staying in the home a lot more. We came in on a Sunday went to Walmart (should have gone to Target instead) right away and stocked up for the week then enjoyed the home the rest of the day. We packed a lunch and drove an hour to Cocoa beach the first day and enjoyed the sun and ocean.The next 4 days we hit the Disney parks in the morning after a big home cooked breakfast. At around 1pm we went back to the home for a big home cooked lunch then after a nap headed back to the park until it closed. This was great for avoiding the heavy crowds and long lines and if you've eaten at Disney before you know the food is often expensive and mostly low quality (minus a few restaurants). The vacation home itself was amazing. It perfectly matched the photo's online in cleanliness and even decor. The home we stayed in had a nice projection home theater room that would have been super amazing, but the technology was lacking. The projector was only SD capable and had RCA only inputs so I couldn't hookup a blue ray player nor my PS3 using HDMI. It did have a DVD player and we were able to watch movies and the TV was clear. The stereo system was fantastic and picked up local radio stations well. Don't try to get sound out of the speakers by the pool. After days of searching we finally called the office to found out how to turn them on and it turns out the owners disabled them. I can understand why with the houses being so close together. Speaking of which the neighborhood was nice on our visit, the streets are very narrow and the houses are right on top of each other, but it wasn't a problem. We will be staying with them in the future and would recommend them to friends and family. Great job All Star and thank you for an enjoyable vacation home away from home!
I have been considering prk surgery for the past 6 years and finally made the leap this year. I am 2 weeks post prk and have never seen the world so clearly. Waking up in the morning and being able to see without the trouble of glasses or contacts is the most amazing experience. After three consultations from three different places, I made the decision to go with TLC and Dr. Holzman. From the moment i walked into the Tysons Corner office i felt welcome and comfortable. The staff was so helpful and put me to ease at each of my appointments. The day of my surgery, I was extremely nervous, however, when I met Dr. Holzman, I immediately felt comfortable. The procedure itself was painless and fast and Dr. Holzman talked me through it the whole time. By the end I was like "That's It?" :) From day 1 I was seeing clearly with some bouts of blurriness. But in the past two weeks, my vision has become so clear and as long as i take the drops as told, my vision is good. Needless to say, I am a very satisfied client and will be recommending Dr. Holzman to anyone who needs lasik or prk. I just wish I'd made this decision 6 years ago :)
Well, we're about to set off for our fourth holiday in a row at Landhaus Koessel, driving 16 hours from London, so make what you will of that. Lovely facilities, friendly owners always welcome us back, and about 100 feet off the lakeside in one of the most beautiful places on earth. All mod cons, all facilities, and natural beauty to the max. Cycling, horse riding, paragliding, hiking, you name it. Amazing. CAN'T WAIT!
Paras!
Best ribs in the city.
Great place and fantastic burgers
Extremely friendly and professional! I never have to wait and they make it so convenient to book an appointment through the website. Airbrush tan is always even, never streaky and lasts longer than any other.
Excelente servicio, entrega a la hr prometida y la calidad acordada, recomiendo sus servicios.
Great service!! Best hairdresser I have ever had. I was looking for somebody like Ana for long time.
None
None
None
Went there with a local family that was hosting my son for a concert. Very nice little castle with friendly staff and a nice setting. Great little diversion if you are touring the countryside. The main house was being renovated.
There is nothing else like it.
First tattoo was some lettering on my ribs. And let me tell you what, it came out EXACTLY the way I had pictured it. Thomas is phenomenal when it comes down to it. Seriously.
The Cedar Bluff Animal Clinic is full of compassionate people who really care about the animals they treat. My cat has been there probably too many times and every time they were always very kind to him and he never minded going. They are always very concerned if something goes wrong and interested to know how he is doing. I highly recommend them for top animal care at an affordable price.
I had a specific issue relating to my purchase and store staff member Werner really went out of his way to help me out...thanks Werner..your sense of customer service is really appreciated!
We have been hiring LDJ to help produce small events in NYC for 5+ years. They are stellar and get the impossible done!
The staff was friendly, helpful, and completely tolerant of our eager and active two year old. We weren't even sure they'd be able to look at his mouth let along clean his teeth, but the doctor did a great job of working with our son. They generally go at the pace of the child and don't force anything. Thankfully, he was calm enough to get a full checkup and even a little bit of cleaning. The place is very kid-friendly and parent-friendly, allowing both my wife and I to accompany our son. They gave us some great advice on tooth care and diet, and sent us on our way. And to top it off, because of his age, there was no charge for the visit. Amazing! Based on our first an only visit so far, I'd have to recommend this dentist highly.
Needed to buy a reliable first car for my daughter. Mark at Oak City Motors gave us a great deal on a 2005 Mini and was easy to work with. If you are looking for a great used car, this is the place to go!
I'm 30 and found myself needing chiropractic care for the first time and gave Total Spine Health and Injury Center a try since Brent had stopped into my work and introduced himself and welcomed any of us to come give him a try. My only regret is not going there sooner. I put up with moderate back pain for a lot longer than I should have and could not be happier with the care I have been/am/will be receiving at TSHIC. The staff is kind and friendly and Brent is a miracle worker. Can't wait for my next appointment.
The food is always excellent there, good service and nice atmosphere.
I love doing business with them! Its a very friendly environment!!!! I love them the place the service and the workers!!!!!!!!
This place is sweet. HUGE import beer selection, nice bar where you pick your own toppings. Best part is that they are open until 11pm or so. Bands play downstairs on the weekends. I recommend
Partenaire des Editions Lingua Production. Excellent centre de formation FLE reconnu dans le monde entier. Nous nous connaissons depuis 5 ans et nos échanges ont toujours été fructueux aussi bien du point de vue pédagogique que commercial
Best sushi in the city
My home got broken into and needed a fix ASAP. I called Beacon Hill Glass and they arrived promptly. Since it was single pane, the contractor told me it can be repaired that same day. They were very professional, clean and the job turned out great. I would recommend anytime.
Brilliant school
I have always left Dr. Farina's office in a good mood! Everyone on his staff is as nice as him. I have seen beautiful results.
Thank you for all your great service last night. We really enjoyed your book store and bar. The Queen of Hearts book signing was so much fun. I recommend everyone come over and check out this book store and look up Colleen Oakes and her book the Queen of Hearts!
Wooow
When my dog was very sick we took her here and they told us we had to put her down. They gave us time with her and help us through the process before anything happened they showed us all the details.
I had a great experience with Gold Star Jewelry & Coin Co. The employees gave me an honest value for my merchandise, and were very genuine people. I would recommend Gold Star Jewelry & Coin Co. to anybody in need of quick cash or fair priced merchandise. Excellent Pawn Brokers ***** (5 stars)
None
The Perfect Day Out with family or friends. If you love taking walks. If you love live performance. If you love fun comfort food. If you love a good beer, wine or mead. All in the company of fellow visitors having fun, DO NOT MISS this festival. There are rides and shows for kids that adults will love. Most of the shows are kid friendly with enough "inside" jokes to make it fun for all. There are also some "adult" humor acts (that are carefully noted) that will have adults roaring with laughter. Since the last time I went they added microphones to the larger performances and the joust so that you can clearly hear. There is a lot of shade but be prepared for sitting in the sun at times. Do NOT miss Don Juan and Miguel! The food and beverages are a bit pricey. Overall this is a FUN day. Check it out online to plan your day.
I'm really glad that my wife and I were referred to Medical Park Family Care by a friend upon our arrival here in Anchorage. They offer a fairly comprehensive range of services, including mole examination and removal - which, for a person with a large number of moles, is a huge help. Local dermatologists always seem to be backed up for months, so if something changes I know that I can get an appointment *within days* if necessary to have it examined and removed for examination by a pathologist. The doctors and nurses have been courteous and attentive every time I've been in. Checkin and billing have not been problematic for me. If I ever do have a negative experience I won't hesitate to share it, but so far, so good.
The staff at Meineke were welcoming as soon as I opened the door. They greeted every customer that walked in to let them know that they would be seen to shortly. They were quick and to the point about getting what I needed. I look forward to doing business there in the future.
I have been going to Skinovative for several years. Skinovative has a very nice facility with a wonderful staff. Dr. Fulton is very knowledgeable and explains all aspects of treatments in detail so you have a good understanding of expected outcomes. I recommend Skinovative and Dr. Fulton to friends and family.
Nice movie theatre; can enjoy a wine or beer with your movie
None
It's the only pizza in the city that really reminds me of what they serve in Italy. The best!
Great food, great service, great price. doesn't get much better than this especially in the middle of nowhere
Skydive Philadelphia is great! The staff on ground was incredibly knowledgeable about the happenings of the weather and wind currents and storms and whatnot. We have had to reschedule a few times which would have been easier if we had smaller groups but nonetheless, they were as accommodating as possible within their means. As for the jump, BEST THING I'VE EVER EXPERIENCED! I have jumped two times now, both with Skydive Philadelphia and I can't wait to go again. My first time I was placed with Matt D. as tandem instructor and he was so incredible that I requested him for my second time this past weekend. I have to admit I was worried about forgetting what I was supposed to do but Matt simply told me the steps as I needed to know them which allowed me to enjoy my jump free of cares. The free-fall itself is the best part, I highly recommend paying the extra $10 to go big, it's dumb not to. As for the rest of the ride, up in the plane and down with the parachute, Matt was able to point different landmarks out and answer any dumb questions I had which was wonderful! As for the landing it was smooth and controlled enough to land standing! The other instructors I was talking with also seemed to enjoy their job. It was unique that they came from all over the world including Chris who my Mom and Boyfriend swear by and requested for their second time as well. I also have to note to ignore the dirty comments of people that weren't happy because of waiting or lack of food. You are waiting for your safety, and you signed up to skydive, not to have a picnic. The one time we did wait longer, we were provided with a list of food in the area and they told us to go and we could call and check in on the weather. I will absolutely be going again and as long as I am in the area, I will no doubt be jumping in Perkasie again!
OK, I am shocked to see a bad review here. I am a business traveler and can stay anywhere I choose, there are more expensive "higher end" hotels around for sure, but the mix of clean, courteous, convenient and comfortable are just right at the HI Marketplace, I stay there every time I get a chance, have even brought my family there. Last week I conducted a team meeting there, my team was not sure about it, but ended up raving about this place in the end...you can walk to food shopping etc...excellent hotel excellent staff...when they make a mistake they go overboard to fix it.
None
visit Sylhet Stadium, the visit will be a great experience for you. It has charming beauty of nature which will make you praise it the way I'm praising here.
None
The food here is very good and the restaurant is owned by a Thai family, so I'm not sure where that one user got the idea that the food is bland or inauthentic. I am a big fan of the Tom Yum, the Wantons, and the Basil Dish. All to die for. In terms of a Thai restaurant in Wyoming, the standards are not going to be very high, but I'd say you'd find similar quality and taste at a good Thai restaurant in Ft. Collins or Denver.
Really good midwest/Springfield-style Asian food with the thicker sauce over pan friend chicken (or pork). General Tso's is my favorite, and their crab rangoons are plump and tasty! China Garden is the only informal Chinese place I've eaten at since I discovered it last year. Nice portion sizes, inexpensive, very clean, and their front staff are professional and understand English so they get your order right. For what it is, there's really nothing that I don't like about this place.
John R. Wood (Sanibel) is a wonderful group of professionals with which to work--always collaborating, sharing, willing to help and focused on community. John R. Wood emphasizes building relationships paired with excellent knowledge of the real estate market. A well run company headed up by Joe and Jay with a fantastic support staff!!
I have trained with Darren for a short period of time and already can't fit into most my clothes. Darren is extremely motivating and very helpful. I have also been seeing Nicole who is Build yourself fitness dietician expert, I highly recommend this service Thank you to darren and nicole and the rest of the build yourself fitness team
I truly love this office. The entire staff is friendly and helpful. Dr.Tran was incredibly personable and truly cared about my needs. Booking through ZocDoc was super easy and they followed up to make sure everything was correct. I cannot say enough good things about this office.
It's great when you can trust someone like Tyson to do a professional job. We were treated great and we really appreciate being able to collaborate during the artistic process. Great service and a fantastic designer, how can you lose?
I'm a big fan of the Hole in the Hill for a drink with your buddies or taking the family out to dinner. The food is great, the atmosphere is relaxed, and the staff is wonderful.
Bardzo dobrze! Очень достойно!
Очень красиво!гулять можно целый день!
I've been to alot of car dealerships, most of them pushy and just wanting to "make the sale" - not this dealership. Throughout my visit I was assisted by Craig. He was incredibly friendly, actually LISTENED to what I wanted, and most importantly, didn't pressure me into a sale that I wasn't completely sure of. I walked in the door with the intent of buying a moderately priced used vehicle, and ended up driving away in a brand new vehicle that I wouldn't have even considered if Craig hadn't suggested it. Not only am I happy about my sale, I'm confident in it. I'm so happy with my purchase. I'd recommend this place to anyone! :)
Never had a bad meal and the they have the best wings I ever eaten. I moved to Texas and the thing I'm most excited about, when I go back, is going to eat Vaughan's wings.
This is by far the best ice cream I have ever had. I always look forward to traveling thru Montana so I can load up on Wilcoxson's. Do yourself a big favor and try this stuff. Absolutley the best!!!!!
Probably the best Apple store in Lanka
Excelentemente buenos platos
Gotta get the pizza...very good!
If you love Italian food, you have to try this place. Incredible food done in the Philly tradition: with pride, taste and a sense of family. Beyond the colorful backstory of chef/owner Angelo Lutz, I'd still recommend this place for the great food: gravy full of flavor, not watery with pasta cooked to perfection, rather than cooked to death. I've tried at least 12 entrees here; and would say you can't go wrong. Palenta and sausage is my favorite appetizer; the seafood pasta made with a vodka sauce would be my favorite entree. The only Italian restaurant I can bring my grandmother and not hear "I can do better than this...."
Nice park. Clean facilities. Everything you need for a day away from everything!
Dobra Tea has different charm. When you first walk in, it is like a veranda with lovely wicker. The middle section has a Morroccan feel. And the back section is Japanese cushiony relaxed kick your shoes...The staff presents you with and extensive menu. Then ring the bell for service. I have been there many times. It is always a delight. My favorite is Roos Chai. If you have questions the staff is extremely helpful. Enjoy!
I've purchased my CT, RX & will probably purchase our ES there. The entire process was simple and did not feel like a high pressure sales environment. Everyone was great and really helpful.
None
Felic compleanos puor muchos anos que te hace la vida muy hermosa............
The Staff at Enchanted Shoe Repair took a look at my Suede Messenger Bag that I use for school, evaluated the bag and gave me a reasonable time to return it to me in a repaired condition. The product was returned to me on the day it was promised, the messenger bag was repaired for a very reasonable charge, and the work performed was done so amazingly well, that you can't even tell that this was a repair, it looks like new ! Thanks so much for a job well done ! If you're considering having a leather repair, these guys are very trustworthy and do a great job !
Friendly, slick, faultless! The only thing I could possibly fault is that the bike turned up 15 mins early to pick up my phone. I had it back in my hand 2 hours later. They had trouble getting in touch with me to return it as I didn't have an
One of my favorite things about Taste is the atmosphere. While it's an upscale restaurant it doesn't feel stuffy. It's a calm, cool place to sit with the girls, have some fun cocktails and talk! It's such a great place all year around, but during the summer it's awesome to have a place to sit outside and relax after work with live music and of course one of Taste's many amazing cocktails. There's so many places to wine and dine in Albany but between the food and drink selections, the great service and personable employees Taste has something that many restaurants do not. it's a combination of the right location, the menu and the atmosphere that truly makes this a dining experience Taste is a unique upscale restaurant that draws a classy crowd but still maintains a casual feeling atmosphere. I can enjoy the perks of a nice place while still being able to "let loose," and unwind from a long day.
I have been doing business with PCRX for many years now. They are VERY professional, dependable and reasonable. I would recommend Eric to everyone!
This place is awesome they even deliver on Xmas.
Dogtopia is a wonderful place to take your dog to. My dog has issues with riding in cars (she hates it), but she knows when we are on our way to Dogtopia and is very good in the car, and in fact, when we get in the front door she makes an all out sprint to the door. She has so much fun and is tired when she comes home. She often falls asleep on the way home. They also are great for boarding. They take the information and follow it and let you know how your pet is doing if you e-mail, facebook, or call and ask. Take your dog here, you will not regret it.
None
There food is fresh and hand made with very good customer service. If you dont like it they will fix it. Med pricing but very good. Take it from me and try it you will like it. Small but nice.
None
My daughter & I went on Black Friday looking for a good deal on a new Fusion. The dealership is currently under construction, but somehow they are managing to keep the lot flowing & functioning for customers. We parked & hadn't even had a chance to walk up to the temporary trailer they're using, when we were greeted by a friendly, soft spoken gentleman. We explained to Tim that both my daughter & I were looking for a new lease. Tim was swift, informative, knowledgeable, adaptive, and sometimes almost psychic. We both left that evening with brand new vehicles tailored to our individual needs. Also, while Beechmont Ford was extremely busy, Tim deftly managed our time to keep us from feeling bored or ignored. It was a truly pleasant & enjoyable experience. If you're looking for a car dealership that doesn't look as you as a quota, but as a human being, Beechmont Ford is the place to go.
None
There are thousands upon thousands of great dentists. Dr. Addario is one of them but this is not what distinguishes his practice from the millions of other dental care providers out there. He has an impeccable approach to each of his patients. He tailors his demeanor and treatment to each individual person as if they were just that, an individual. I can't begin to tell you how big of a difference this makes in healthcare. He has my utmost respect and gratitude. I and my family will be with Sunbow Dentistry for the rest of our lives.
Wade sold me some guitar strings once. They didn't suck. Seriously, the best thing about Wade's World is Wade. He has patience, likes people and knows how to pay attention to the details that matter to you.
Great experience. Dr. Collins was extremely professional and knowledgeable. I went in to have my prescription checked and he was very nice and had the answers to all of my questions. He even entertained my kids. I hope not to have to go back any time soon but when I do, Dr. Collins is definitely where I'll go. Thanks Dr. Collins.
Fantastic man and van service. gave me a quick quote, good communication, and the driver turned up 5 minutes early and helped us load even though we opted to load the van ourselves! With all the removal services in Manchester this has to be one of the best, They price was fair as well.
I was looking for a strong toothpaste to get the stains off my teeth from smoking and was shown White Radiance Gel a teeth whitening kit. The service was impeccable as staff showed me respect and patience while thought about spending more than expected. I bought it after a few doddering minutes and I am very glad I did as it has in two applications done what toothpaste would have taken a year to do. Well done to the staff for their time and effort I will no doubt be visiting you again with many other ailments! :)
reliable, friendly, and a working mobile :)
The Living Room in Dunedin has the best happy hour specials and Tapas plates in Dunedin!
Ziba tarin noghte tehran!Man harvaght delam migire miram park... Zemestunaye park y donaye dg ast... Zemestunasho az dast nadid! :)))))
The first time my wife and I visited the Rusty Grape we felt like we had been transported to a little Italy! Now we visit every chance we get! Good fun, great food and even live music!
This place is great , everything I've had there is excellent . I come to Chicago once or twice a month for work and I go every time. Wish they had one in Houston TX.
My wife and I had our first trip to Savannah and stayed at the President's Quarters 5 years ago. We had the time of our lives! We just love the quaint charm of the Quarters and the staff was very accomodating. Centrally located, safe and quiet. We keep coming back for more!
I came to Westgate a couple years ago for a simple oil change which turned into a major car repair and have been with them ever since. This company has fantastic sales and service representatives who will go out of their way to help and make your experience as wonderful as it possible can be. Most recently, I took my care in for an oil change, tire rotation and alignment; unfortunately, I walked out with a bigger issue than normal repair. Throughout the entire process, Westgate did offered me multiple options, opinions and suggestions. They went above and beyond that call of duty to get my bill into a range that I felt comfortable paying, and remained professional the entire time. Amazing service!!!!!!!!!!!!! Would go back for anything in the future!!! I completely recommend them!!!!!!!!!! Nick
ottima pizza servizio impeccabile e buon rapporto qualità prezzo
Owner is a really cool Guy. He'll order anything for you. Good place for tournaments. Decent selection, if he doesn't have it, he'll get it for you!
I have been a customer at McDonald Subaru Service for 2 years, and I have always had an excellent experience. They are informative and not pushy about the services that I will need in the near future. I like their waiting space, and they get the work done on time. Also, their prices beat any others that I have found! I will continue to be a loyal customer of McDonald's as long as I have my 2003 Forester.
Grym service, sköna killar, bra jazzmusik och cupcakes från himmelriket.
John Doolan is my podiatrist and he is excellent.
I can't believe haw fast they replaced my water heater. Came out and installed the same day I called. No hassle and great service. Will definitely use again.
I highly recommend Patrick Pedano of The Stange Law Firm without question. Patrick impeccably handled every aspect of my complex family litigation with compassion, understanding and great attention to detail to protect my and my children's future including: moving my case from Illinois to Missouri, discovering assets of a self-employed ex-spouse, modification of child support and visitation, understanding sensitive and important issues with a special needs child through to enforcement of the court order. I never once questioned his commitment to my case or his vast knowledge of current family law. Patrick prepared me for every step of the process, kept me up to date and in the loop via both phone and email. At each meeting my goals and the best interest of my children were always kept in the forefront. It's a great piece of mind to know that Patrick and his expertise are there for my family when we need it!
Arrowhead Wine Cellars is a phenomenal place to sample wines. The selection of whites and reds is extensive to satisfy anyone's tastes. If you are from the Erie region or visiting, I strongly recommend checking out Arrowhead. You won't be disappointed.
Just had my son's 13th Birthday party at Xtreme Lazer Tag in Avon, IN. It was a blast. The Birthday party package they had was excellent. Nick, who hosted our party was excellent. He was great with the boys and the entire party. Would highly recommend a birthday party there or any other time you want to enjoy a competitive game of Lazer Tag. Thank you for a great Birthday Party.
None
Excelente
This place is the bomb! Wide verity (I.e. pan cakes, burgers, mariscos, french toast 2 menudo everyday of the week 2 anytime of the day). ;) check it out.
Brought both my kids here ages 4 & 6 and they did a great job. My wife was nervous having my daughter's hair cyt here but it turned out great. My son loved the hot towel they put on his face and the massage.
These guys provide great service. iPad 4 screen replaced within the hour. Very competitive price. I would recommend them for all your Apple repairs. Great job, thanks guys!
An amazing collection of antiques and collectables with prices to suit all pockets! Visit Dodo Antiques and you are pretty much guaranteed to come away with something nice to take home.
Fantastic response time to a heating emergency! Gave our patients a warm waiting room again on a very cold day. Techs were extremely knowledgeable. Thank you Aaron and Paradigm. -East Coast Chiro
None
Its an amazing school with world class faculty and 21st century curriculum.
Brilliant food! Far better than all those fast food places and easier on the wallet too!
Amazin Pizza ask for Grandma's Pizza its made to perfection truly a place for the whole family the service is even better thks Prestige Notary Services, Hollywood Florida
my goto place for mideastern. they make everything fresh, the only thing they order frozen are the fries. the owner is very proud of his food. this place far outdoes the nearby competition.
Best service in Quakertown for the best price !
I am admittedly a little bit of a pain when it comes to pictures of me (picky, neurotic, take your pick.) Julie was so sweet and patient, plus when it came down the the final picks, she helped so much and was able to take some of the best photos of me ever! I did a bridal shoot with her and she took my professional headshot and I will never even consider going for anyone else but Julie! She has a creative vision that is unlike anyone else's and I have seen her work well with any kind of subject. Julie has earned my highest recommendation! (And for the record, she makes a really good chicken parmesean too!)
As a manager in a body shop we are always looking for a perfect parts source and after years of dealing with Joey,Jesus,Juan & Lou, I can say with total honesty that I would not deal with anyone else for VW parts. They are always accommodating, knowledgeable, professional, and always follow through. The same can be said of their service department. When we have a vehicle issue we need help with they are always there with the same type of professionalism and prompt service. Andy Charnota Chicago Collision Center
This place really is great. Not only have I purchased a few bikes from them , but I also have gotten to know and develop a great relationship with the store. The owner 'Russ" knows his stuff, and wont steer you wrong weather its road biking, downhilling, or just casual riding. The staff is great and also knows the trade really well. I Mountain bike the local trails very frequently (Cunningham), and also do a lot of Downhilling at Mountain Creeek, which needless to say puts me in his shop quite often weather it be for tune ups, tires, tubes or a whole new bike! You really cant beat the prices, and I learn something new every time I go there. Thanks for taking care of the community ADT !
The owner is the one who always runs this place. He is a super nice guy and obviously loves his store and customers. Whenever someone says Jimmy Johns I snub my nose and say 'Gross. Farmington Deli is right around the corner. Are you crazy?'
These guys are the best! I called every auto shop in Jacksonville and Chris at Doug's Care Care was the only person who didn't just bark a price or question if they even wanted to work on my 1988 Fiero! He actually asked me questions about what was going on with my car. It turned out to be the clutch master and slave cylinder. Dougs Car Care save me over $300 dollars more than what the other shops quoted just to replace the clutch! They even keep me going with a loaner car! They have earned a customer for life!
This a great place for entertainment
Can't say enough great things about this company and the employees. The time they devote to matching the right renter with a property is impressive to say the least - I truly felt that they wanted me to be happy in my rental property. Thank you Tampa Bay Rental Solutions!
Vamoooooos tigreeeeee
None
None
Huge dent on passenger side of Toyota Tundra doublecab after getting too close to the fence. I expected to see most evidence of dent eliminated. Instead - you cannot tell there was ever a dent at all! Some small scratches, yes, but NO DENT! Awesome work by Phil. Thank you so much!
Great wonderful magnificent place... Loved the Egyptian monuments and sculptures
My experience was so happy at city world, That was extremely perfect in their service, ambiance and the welcoming gives a first impression to us and that really changed my bad mood to a good Mood. Thank you for the perfect assistance.
The food here is excellent. They have the best Calamari I've had anywhere, the Prime Rib is always out of this world. The atmosphere & the service are outstanding.
Sunday seating at this popular brunch spot can be hard to obtain, but the food is worth the wait and the staff does a great job getting food out quickly. Vegan-friendly, but offers great options for all. The trucker bowl covers all the bases and will certainly fill you up. Cash only.
Bought a Focus ST from Katrin Bassenger , very efficient in getting the paperwork done quickly so I could start my cross country road trip:-) Good followup after sale.
Julia’s German Stammtisch Serves Authentic German Cuisine in Columbia Worthy of the Experience. It is a family owned and operated business with a reputation for serving the best schnitzel you will get short of going to Germany! You should be aware of is that it is a “Cash Only” business that does not accept credit or debit cards! But it was one of the best meals we've had in Columbia for a very long time. It is tucked away in a small and decrepit strip mall off Jackson Blvd., but once you get inside the restaurant is clean and the food is lovingly prepared to order. If you are not familiar with German food, then don’t hesitate to ask the wait staff for some detail, as certain items may be more bland or spicy than the corresponding American style dish. My favorite is Julia’s Double Decker, which consists of two lightly breaded pork schnitzels layered around lean ham and smothered in cheese sauce. It comes with a wonderful salad and rolls before the meal and choice of side dish (i.e., red cabbage, german potato salad, home fries, spatzle or sauerkraut). Another good choice is the Bratwurst, which are not the run of the mill variety from the local grocery. Overall the food was great and more than either of us could finish. We will definitely eat here again!
Great place to spend time with kids. Age 4-14 is appropriate. It's interesting experiences! Free entrance! All about Hi-tech and our future!
My boss recommended her when I brought up looking for a tailor in town. I had four pants that needed hemming/taking and she did it all perfectly within a day. Fast, professional, and well-priced. Will be coming in again when I get a suit!
VERY cheap, well portioned meals. Great for a feed for around $10. Wouldn't go on a first date here but good for friends. Fast food and good service. Humble surroundings but it is SO worth it!
None
None
Me and my sister were walk-ins and loved the atmosphere, and hospitality. Extremely HAPPY with the quality! We will be back!
Try the chocolate porter.
None
Went here for dinner last night and enjoyed the bangers and mash. Great example of a London pub. They have 4 cask engines with very good local ales and several other draught options. It was so good I went back tonight. Excellent service was provided once again.
None
The care I received here was amazing. I was alone with my 1 year old and had a broken foot the staff was great they made sure he was taken care as they did my tests and treatment. I would recommend First choice they were fast and very efficient.
Best beer selection in Richmond
I just had my roof/gutters done by On the Spot. I must say they were very professional, timely and the work that was done came really beautiful. The new roof changed the whole look of the house and it looks amazing!! I highly recommend this company for the job and will be using them anytime I need work done.
Everyone should take part in this experience to grasp a sense of how slavery permeated this country, and how its legacy still affects our society today.
Cafe on The Square is the reason I hang in San Marcos before heading to class at Texas State University. I enjoy their independently-owned genre of eatery. COTS has great food with a huge variety of menu goodies. Between their free Wi-Fi and friendly service from attentive folks who love living in San Marcos--- I wish I could put the place in my pocket and travel.
Fantastic place. I live 15 minutes down the road, and this is my treat once a month. My wife and I love it here! I recommend this to anyone!
I went to Dr. Alavi for a consultation based on the recommendation of a friend. I've known for many years that I wanted to get a breast augmentation and was finally ready to move forward. I made an appointment and kept my mind open to what I would hear. From the moment I walked into the office, I felt welcome. The staff at the front was very welcoming and offered water, coffee, etc. I was brought back at my appointment time and immediately started talking with Pat. Her demeanor and attitude took a lot of my nervousness away - I had never had surgery, let alone an elective one!! After speaking with Pat for a little bit, she brought me and my husband to another room where Dr. Alavi came in and met with us. I didn't know what to expect and was pleasantly surprised with the time he took to get to know me and what I wanted and what I was looking for. He explained the way he works and how "OCD" he is, which is great, considering this is my body and wouldn't want anyone to just treat me like another number (which he does NOT do at all)! I scheduled my surgery immediately with Dr. Alavi, I know that most people would recommend speaking with several surgeons, but after meeting with Dr. Alavi, I felt completely at ease and comfortable with him. I knew that I could trust him and he would take good care of me. The day of my surgery and the weeks after (it's been 6 weeks), have been wonderful. The follow-up from Dr. Alavi's staff has been excellent, and I've even received calls from Dr. Alavi himself to check on me. That is when I knew I'd made the right choice, the results have been amazing, but getting calls from Dr. Alavi made the experience even so much better. Not too many doctors are willing or able to take time out of their busy schedules to check in on you, but Dr. Alavi makes time. If you want a Plastic Surgeon who will make you feel beautiful with or without surgery, Dr. Alavi is the perfect choice. If you want a PS who gives you recommendations based on your body type and not your wallet, Dr. Alavi is the perfect choice. If you want to go to an office where you feel like you are an actual person and not another account number, Dr. Alavi's is the perfect choice!
OvenGleamers Manchester, fantastic job. My double oven is probably 30 years old and looked it. 3 hours later and it's gleaming, my mum thought it was new! Highly recommend.
I moved to North Knoxville 2 years ago knowing not a soul or any recommendations for a hair salon. My experience has been polar opposite to the reviews above. Always able to get an appointment, especially last minute, for which I am notorious. Wonderful hair stylists who make my hair look fantastic, reasonable prices and friendly, professional staff. They always make me feel welcome and chat with me while they are fixing my hair. Would recommend this salon to anyone!
Musiałem dodać 5 gwiazdek ;) po prostu. Pensjonat Liliowy Dwór wybrałem bo poleciła mi go siostra, która zwiedziła już kilka pensjonatów w Zakopanem, ale z tego była na tyle zadowolona, że udało jej się mnie namówić na wyjazd w góry. Przyznam szczerze, że był to mój pierwszy wyjazd od wielu lat i przyznam, że na nowo zakochałem się w górach. W samym pensjonacie bardzo przyjemna atmosfera, smaczne (oraz nie drogie!) jedzenie to ogromne zalety, jedyne do czego można się przyczepić, to to, że czas tam tak szybko leci :), polecam wszystkim chcącym wypocząć chociażby przez kilka dni w świetnych warunkach i z doskonałą kuchnią
This is the best hospital in Maryland, in my opinion...I live near 3hospitals that are at least 10-15min away. But i always travel 45minutes to go to GBMC to recieve outstanding service...
Had a great dining experience here. Michelle, our waitress was da bomb. We ate their pupu player.
Phil was very helpful and enthusiastic!
We had dinner on Oct. 14, 2013 and it was spectacular. The service, ambience and food were all five-star. We especially enjoyed our steaks that were tender, flavorful and cooked perfectly. We liked the fact that the noise level was relatively low and we could talk comfortably.
Just Wanted to write a Customer Feedback To Let Rite Fence Co. Know that The Fence Installed is Absolutely Beautiful. I Am Really Impressed with How It Looks and The Timely Manner it was Completed. The Fence was Very Affordable and The Quality is Great. The Black Fence Really Looks Good Matching With Black Trim On The House. My Dog Bear is Very Happy With It Too. Your Salesman Kirk Katz was Very Knowledgeable In What I was Looking For. Kirk Was Also Very Patient and Very Nice To Deal With. Kirk Has Outstanding Sales Skills. Kirk Was Very Professional and Trustworthy. I Would Recommend Rite Fence Co To Anyone I Know. I Want To Thank Nicole for Being So Nice and Awesome On Our Phone Conversations. Please Inform Kirk and Your Staff That It was a Great Job Well Done!! Have a Wonderful Day and It Was A Pleasure Doing Business With You. OUTSTANDING JOB!! Another SATISFIED CUSTOMER!! Thank You SO Very Much!!
Katie Cotton is terrific! Decided to check Salon True out based on other reviews, and must say that I lucked out. The entire experience was awesome, from the greeting at the front door to the finished hair style. I'd recommend Salon True, and Katie Cotton to anyone.
Genius Phone Repair is very friendly. After I purchased an Ipad mini they offered to put the protective screen on for me. They also helped me figuring out how to use my Gmail account. Thanks so much! you Guys are great!
Brian was amazing, he went above and beyond what I would have expected.
The Bagelry catered an event recently at my company, Clin-Spa in the Kentlands neighborhood of Gaithersburg, Maryland. They did a fantastic job! The food was delicious and impressively designed on beautiful platters. I have been recommending this place to everyone!
Best place for meats in Tehachapi, better quality and service then any other market in town.
A bunch of fun-loving and extremely hardworking guys!
Excellent experience with Hector, Phil and Mikhail. All of the service and help we received was superb ! Would recommend this dealership and these employees to any one in the future.
None
I can definitely attest to the quality of work performed by the A D Shaw team. We visited the DW Sports Centre that they worked on and it was unlike anything I'd ever seen. The pictures don't do it any justice. I have joiners in my family, so I can see what's good from what's shoddy and A D Shaw are definitely in the first group. Top notch stuff! So, just an appreciation of the work!
滝壺に近寄れます。 かなりの水しぶきが飛んでくるので カメラや携帯電話など電子機器を持っている方は 少し気をつけた方がいいかもしれません。 足下の岩が濡れているので、 滑らないように注意された方がいいかと思います。 お子様や、年配の方はとくにご注意を。
I have been working with Tammy Hornung for over 10 years and in my opinion she and her associates are the #1 Real Estate Attorneys in the area. Anyone who has bought or sold property knows there can be many challenges between "Offer Accepted" and "Closing" and I've brought my share to Tammy. In every situation her knowledge, positive attitude and hard work has kept the deals together. Tammy and Hornung & Scimone are my go to Real Estate Attorneys.
Wir haben das Glück, Sylvester 2013 im Hotel Reischlhof zu verbringen. Bislang bin ich von dem reichen Angebot an Wellness- und Fitnessmöglichkeiten sehr angetan! Das Essen ist einfach genial. Sowohl die Auswahl wie auch die Qualität. Die zahlreichen Ruheräume und der Pool (innen wie außen (beheizt)) schaffen eine schöne Balance zwischen schweißtreibendem Sport und jenem, bei dem man sich auch mal treiben lassen kann. Komme gerne wieder hierher. Lukas Wedrychowski
I set my service appointment online using there mobile interface website, while I was out of town. Which was very easy to use! My appointment was for my routine scheduled service. The staff was friendly and professional. My service was very fast, and the waiting area was very nice. My only advice would be to make the service schedule B be available when making appointments.
The price-quality relationship in this place is amazing, and it is the kind of vegetarian spot a meat eater can love as well. Always leave with a pleasant belly, a top favorite from my town.
None
None
This is by far the BEST Mexican dinner around! Prices are great, food is great, service is great, and I LOVE this place!
My first school.always loved and admired...
None
A talented young artist, creative writer, reliable freelancer, and a nomad. That's Pa Ul. Amazing isn't it. Browsing through this page, I was inspired and amazed seeing his travel journey in Hong Kong, such a beautiful city indeed. This was his first journey in South East Asia and I bet more to come. Pa Ul stay humble, be more patient, create more beautiful art and help others. Someday, you'll be the icon you wish to be.
Ich gehe regelmäßig zum "normalen" Haare schneiden dort hin. Dass die MitarbeiterInnen sehr nett sind kann ich bestätigen, sie nehmen sich viel Zeit für Dich.
I received excellent service at Paramount Volkswagen, Mark Cloninger was very helpful and friendly throughout the entire buying process. I will definitely recommend buying a new or used car to my friends and family in the future.
Super nice. The gel nails and pedi for $45 is a must. The gel manicure stays so nice for such a long time. :)
My (then) fiance and I booked Harmit after finding him on the web and reviewing his gallery of photos. He gets exactly the kind of shots we were looking for, natural, un- posed pictures that really captured the essence of the day and boy did he deliver :) He arrived on time and captured the arrival of the Groom and our guests and also managed to fit some time in to capture my and my bridesmaids getting ready. A big plus for us was that he was really unintrusive, it was almost as though he wasn't there. I have been a guest at wedding before where the photographer has been rather bossy but Harmit was great and captured every moment of our special day in photos that we will treasure forever. Highly recommended and many thanks :)
This has been a wonderful place to worship Jesus Christ. The people are very friendly and accepting of all people.
My family has eaten here dozens of times over the past three years. Fabulous! Best Hot and Sour soup on the planet!Also try the Hunan Beef, Salt andPepper Shrimp, Lemon chicken and more!
I took my BMW X5 to these guys because my check engine light was on. They were able to quickly diagnose the problem. The price they quoted me was much less then the dealer. They got my car back to me when they said they would, just in time for me to go out of town and felt safe on the road. Also the staff was really helpful, and they even had a shuttle service to take me to and from work! Thanks Eurobahn! I highly recommend this place!
I went to Duval Honda to see the new Civic. I was pleased with what they offered in stock. Mindy came out to answer my questions. We went ahead and did an appraisal on my trade in. I got with Tom on some additional options for my car. I signed a contract and purchased my new car. The staff was courteous and knowledgeable. I now have a great car and a great dealer.
We spoke with Nick and he was both very knowledgeable and very helpful. We had brought our custom built tandem bike to M&M Cycling to get tuned up and fixed up and our first ride with the bike after this was near Activator Cycles. We needed to bring it in to Activator Cycles as when we got ready to ride we noticed the wrong tube was put in our rear wheel and we could not pump it up. The people at Activator Cycle were courteous and helpful, but also very genuine. They invited us both to ride with them in their evening rides and indicated how cool impressive the bike was. At M&M Cycling the owner had said our bike was a hodge-podge of parts and he thought it had been in an accident. Please if you are in the area bring your bike to Activator Cycles.
A great atmosphere for our anniversary! The service was very formal and the food was exquisite. Highly recommended for special events.
Stopped in for lunch today. I'm on a diet so I really limited myself on the lunch selections. That was horrible because everything on the menu looked very appetizing. So I decided on the Salmon with Soba Noodles. Awesome!!! The service was excellent, too. I'll be going back soon....
None
They best pub in MJ by far. Pint of Newcastle and a lb of buffalo wings....enough said. Very friendly staff and a very impressive list of alcohol not typically found around here.
This place had great, authentic Arabic food. The baklawa was the best I've had since I was in Baghdad.
None
Great place, great staff, great service!
None
The social, spiritual and intellectual benefits of a Montessori education are well documented and information is widely available online so I won't spend time lauding Montessori here. I will just say that Cascadia School is true Montessori with educators that serve the whole child, stimulate their natural curiosity, celebrate their unique attributes and challenge my sons to be their best selves. If I had a middle school experience like my son is getting at Cascadia, I would actually want to repeat middle school! He loves the field study trips in particular, unheard of in public middle schools! Cascadia's elementary programs are exemplary as well. My only regret is that my children haven't attended Cascadia longer, worth every penny!
None
It was an amazing experience to visit this museum because I love travelling and history in general. One of the most interesting things was to find out a little bit more about sailing as sport.
None
Three generations of my family attend UUCA. My mother is a long-time member, and I joined when we moved back to Orange County last year. My teenage daughters also attend. I'm not at all a "churchy" person, but the UU principles speak to me, and the congregation is friendly and welcoming. If you are looking for a liberal faith community and care deeply about social equality and justice, I'd highly recommend you come check it out! We'd love to see you!
Was so happy to get massage there. Nice people and great service. We all need to pamper ourselves now and then .So glad I did ! .
Went on Thursday morn and crowd wasn't bad. Took great pics. Just 45 mins from Poipu. Pretty drive. One of world 's most amazing sites.
Good
I miss The Olympia very much. Why dif they have to tear it down?
Amazingly good food! Some of the best Mexican food I've ever had and I've been eating Mexican food all my life! I'll definaty be coming back in the future!
None
I called after 2:30 pm hoping for a snowball's chance that they could deliver flowers to my mom the same day. They pulled off a miracle! Staff was super helpful on the phone and helped me pick out the perfect arrangement. Thank you, thank you, thank you!
Great food and atmosphere with the best happy hour in town!
The staff here is always nice and helpful. I can go on a lunch break and get in and out quickly. The salon is always very very clean and well organized. Love it!
We have a lot of APC RM-1500 UPS units that need new batteries every couple of years. RefurbUPS always has them in stock and they're close enough to me so that I can go pick them up rather than having them shipped. They also take back old batteries so I don't have to find some place to dispose of them. Prices are reasonable and the batteries are fresh.
The twisted mac and cheese is to die for!
None
I don't shop anywhere else, not even online. I cannot recall one scenario that Southeast has given me a bad taste in my mouth. They've upheld service at mis-quoted (low) prices, taken returns of products that other dealers would not, maintain competitive prices, and have always had a personable staff. I would never pass up a chance to make a plug for these guys, because they deserve the business.
A really good Italian restaurant near to where I live is great. I took my fiancee there on her birthday and now i'm taking her there for valentines day because I know we will both enjoy it. Keep up the good work Phil
Dean and the team at Lighcore have been great to work with. Thanks for the professional advice and service guys!
The best prices on all the good stuff and super quick to ship. What else can you ask for.
Great service and staff. One of the best places I've found in LA to sit down and be able to focus on doing actual work. Casual vibe, great people, and tasty smoothies!
Die beste lkw Werkstatt die ich kenne und das beste pkw werden auch repariert top Service und super Beratung sehr hilfsbereit gutes Team
d:hive is AWESOME! I have several lists of downtown attractions from them, and their tours of Detroit are out of this world.
My wife and I went to Toyota of Tampa Bay for oil change for her Scion Xb, while waiting we I decided to go and look at the cars and ask a couple of questions so we had the pleasure of meeting Mr. Bob Novak and to make a long story short we got there in one car ended up going home in 2. He was very courteous and professional. The service that was provided to us was excellent. All the staff there is very professional. It was the first time we ever went there to get the oil changed from now on that is where I'll be going. Thank you all for all of your hard and great work!!!!
Closed.
We have now used Overhead Door Company of Atlanta 2 times - both times for a "check up" on our garage door. Our service tech, Jay, was knowledgeable and went above and beyond what we could have expected. He even was very kind to our 7 year old daughter who was enthralled with what he was doing. He answered her questions and helped HER to understand better! We will only do business with ODC of Atlanta!
Great 360 degree view of Townsville
Good effect
None
Good friendly place.
Recently I had two of my classic/antique vehicles serviced at Wilton Auto and Tire Center. I was very pleased with the work performed and it was reassuring to know that they would look after my cars while they were there. These guys know their stuff and enjoy working on older classic cars. I would highly recommend them.
None
None
I just moved out of Century Arbor Place after living there for two years. The office staff were friendly and courteous. Emergency work orders were taken care of that day and other work orders within a couple of days. The one time in two years that they took a week or two to get me my microwave that had broken, they gave me a break on late rent which saved me $100. Parking is never a problem, my apartment was quiet and nice. When I did move out, I was smart enough to ask to be there for inspection and got charged for nothing (although my apartment was in great shape). Overall this is a dedicated complex where the staff make it their duty to help you out and I never felt like an annoyance. I went in their office maybe 15 times in two years and they knew me by my first name. I recommend them highly!
Glass Doctor was great when we needed our windshield replaced. They helped get my wife to and from work so she didn't have to miss as they took care of the replacement. They also were incredibly friendly and answered all of our questions with no hassles. I've referred several of my friends to them and have never heard a bad thing back about their experiences.
daaa )
Ambiente muito agradável, com amplo estacionamento e boa comida. Preço intermediário (aprox. R$ 50 a pizza).
Nice place for watch movie in theatre
This was my first time buying a car and the staff at McDonald Hyundai really took great care making sure I got into the right car for me at a price I could afford. Michelle Britton was amazing and really made me feel like she cared about me as a person and not just a sale. It was a bit of a long process but Michelle and Shane Schnacker (financing) were there every step of the way. I am so happy with my 2011 Sonata and love my new McDonald Hyundai family...I won't go anywhere else to buy a car because I know that they are the best!
It was great. The place has a good breakfast with friendly staff. The rooms are reasonable and have a small living room attached to each one. Very good stay with my girl would stay again.
It's my favourite shawarma in the area, I probably eat there too often. The staff are always very friendly and upbeat. The dining in area is small and cramped, so I recommend you get it to go.
My son has been attending daily meetings at Grace Community Center at Grace Baptist Church for a number of years. Their community outreach- minded programs are truly a blessing to the homeless, unemployed and disabled citizens of San Jose and to the entire population of this city. The administrators and their staff are outstanding individuals who truly understand the great need for the services, free meals and friendly gatherings that happen regularly because of the enlightened and caring leaders of this city. My sincere thanks to everyone involved in this truly Christian and humane endeavor. Bob Lewis
EnviroCon Termite & Pest Control of Tomball is the only place to call for any and all pest problems! The first person I spoke with was very helpful and then she connected me to an actual Entomologist they have in house. He answered all my questions and saved me a great deal of time and money! Later when I spoke to the Tech in person, he was very up front and strait with me about how fast and what it would take to solve my pest problem! I was very happy with my entire experience with EnviroCon Termite & Pest Control of Tomball.
None
I love this place and I love my new 2013 Dodge Avenger. Thanks to Scott Bachman & Thomas Bowman for quality service
As a mortgage broker there is nothing more rewarding that helping our clients get in to their perfect home. We pride ourselves on making this experience as smooth and pain free as possible. Our knowledge and experience with the ever changing world of mortgage lending and partnership is what sets us apart from our competitors!
Forget about the old established chains that have plagued the Dallas BBQ scene for far too long, Lockhart Smokehouse is by far the best full service BBQ restaurant in the metroplex. The brisket rivals any of the legendary central texas establishments and the sausage, pork chops, and smoked chicken are very good as well. The ribs can be a little hit or miss, but overall, this place rocks!!! I have seen some comments complaining about the sides and the sauce. WHO CARES??? I have never ordered a side there and probably never will. It's all about the meat and theirs is 2nd to none! Their prices are higher than most, but it's well worth the experience. I try to eat there at least once a week and catch some of their daily specials. The burnt ends and beef ribs are amazing!
Primo's has never failed to get my order to me very quickly. The staff has always been very friendly and the pizza is some of the best in Carbondale. I would also rate their Calzones as some of the best I have ever had. My favorite thing about Primo's is the unique specialty pizza's they have I still have yet to come across one I don't like.
None
None
Great place, got my toes and ingrown toe nails done. Feel great.
I have been a Real Estate agent for over 10 years with a career spanning from coast to coast. I have seen the up's and downs of this market as well as seeing great and bad brokers in the industry. I had the pleasure of interviewing with Anthony Franzese 2 years ago and found him very intriguing. As a broker he is a pleasure to work with. He's very knowledgeable about the area and has an keen vision of where the market is going. Anthony always stress's to us agents that we are the face of the company and that service to our clients is the most important priority in serving the real estate needs of buyers and sellers. I feel very blessed to have had stumbled upon this office and look forward to a long career here.
None
We bought our flooring a few years back and to this date I'm reminded at the quality and professional service we had. The price was great too, we managed to get some blowout flooring that they had around.
Love this place! I like the pennies on the floor, mason jars on your table and hanging from the ceilings, and most of all, I like the food.
Great place where staff is taking care about you and they are very helpful which is making your visit nice. I like how they work with me to be close to my expectation about price and color.
My favorite Local Game Shop! Family owned and operated, these guys take care of their customers and enjoy being gamers themselves.
Great guy and great service! Immaculate garage, with great eye for detail and doing the job right. Easy to arrange. Very friendly staff. Also fixed some corrosion on my alloy wheels for no extra charge! Very happy customer. Would recommend in a heartbeat!
As a Spaniard living in NYC for many years, this is the closest there is to home. Best selection of tapas in the whole city, and reasonably priced too. My favorites are el pulpo, clams casino, chorizo, and the lamb, but they are all great.
Competitive prices compared to Best Buy for repairs. The staff was SO POLITE AND FRIENDLY! They were willing to spend the time to understand that spending a ton of money wasn't an option for me. After showing me their NO CREDIT CHECK payment option I was sold and will keep coming back! THEY HAVE GREAT DEALS ON USED TECHNOLOGY PRODUCTS!
Guns up!
Excellent store , lots and lots of very rare stuff and also current new underground bands.The owner is very nice and friendly and you feel there like you are home !
Awesome place - love the wings - make sure you get them baked - my 15 per person includes several beers a piece.
I bought new tires from these guys during one of their Labor Day sales. I got a killer deal and am loving my tires. I stop in all the time for a free air check and get my tires rotated and spin balanced for free and they are always super helpful! Just sitting here I have heard every employee greet every customer that walks in. Impressive.
I knew which car I needed, and the salesperson (Pat) who helped made it seem very casual and stress-free. I was able to give a 2012 Black Subaru Legacy a test drive and really liked it. The car was well maintained. As far as the service goes, Pat really understand what I was looking for and didn't put any pressure towards making the purchase. He also said I could finance on the spot through BECU which saved me the hassle of having to go to BECU and then come back to the dealership to receive favorable financing rates. The way it worked was: I got whatever rate was quoted on the spot, but being a BECU member automatically lowered it to the rate they could give me. I even went back to BECU to check on this and I did get the lowest percent quoted. The car was thoroughly cleaned right before I took it out of the dealership, and the gas tank was full. Great stuff and I'm very happy with my purchase so far!
nice hotel
Heart of Kathmandu. If you've not been here, you've not seen what its like
I think Cory is such a thoughtful and caring doctor. It's not every day that someone can explain and fix your problem without drugs! I love his fresh approach to health and it really has helped me take my health to the next level. Give him a try, you wont regret it!
I'm shopping for a pet clinic for my cat. I've heard about this clinic from some friends and they just raved about it. That's always a good thing, right? I looked online and read some of their boarding topics and other things and was very impressed. I will be moving to the area soon and we definitely put this clinic at the top of my list.
Great food, great price, you must have the tres leche!!!
Keith & Dave! Thank you so so much! These two helped us out so much! This was our first time financing a car. We went in with an idea of what we wanted and they were able to fix us up with an amazing car for a great price. It was a pleasurable experience and I would totally recommend Budget Auto Sales! Thank you again! Nathan and Michael
None
Needing a following up from your primary doc can be a scary thing. Well at least it was for me. Not only did this office get me an appointment in record time. The doctor was amazing. Their office is small and comfortable. The procedure was a snap and I felt supported by the staff the whole time. Dr. Lewis took the time to make sure I understood exactly what was going on. Course when I had additional questions the next day I was lucky enough to speak to her over the phone. They have a Patient Portal which allows you to actually SEE your results and communicate with the doctor through email. It isn't often you can praise a doctors office so I'm taking the opportunity to give credit was its due :) Thank you Sustaina.
THIS PLACE WAS GREAT. MY WAITRESS WAS VERY NICE AND A GREAT WAITRESS. KEPT ASKING IF OUR TABLE NEEDING ANYTHING AND TALKED TO US ALOT. I WAS SO IMPRESSED WITH THE WAITRESSES AND MANAGEMNT THEY ALL SEEMED BUSY YET WERE ALWAYS THERE ASKING IF YOU NEEDED ANYTHING. MY WAITRESS WAS NAMED LINDSEY AND WAS AWESOME COULDNT HAVE ASKED FOR A BETTER WAITRESS. TALKED WITH A MELISSA GREAT GIRL AND EVEN THOUGH THE BAR WAS EXTREMELY BUSY AND PACKED DUE TO THE OPENER BLUES GAME ( GO BLUES) AMANDA THE BARTENER WAS EXCELLENT SHE WAS SUPER FREINDLY AND WORKING HER BUTT OFF GOOD JOB TO ALL AT THIS PLACE. FIRST TIME AT A HOOTERS AND WILL BE BACK THURSDAY FOR THE NEXT BLUES GAME IM GOING TO. THIS PLACE WAS WELL WORTH THE DRIVE AND I HAD A BLAST THANKS HOOTERS
Always a pleasure to drop in and browse the shelves for new foods or to buy a nice sub or homemade sauce. Prices are good. Fun atmosphere and courteous service. Try the MD Crab Soup!
this is the best partime jobs in chennai. recommend everyone to do this, this is very helpful for people
None
I had a leaking tire so I read all the reviews before I gave this place a try. I didn't have an appointment but they were able to get me in around an hour which I really appreciated. The owner is friendly and a real jokester. I had two kids with me under the age of 4 so staying in a car shop for a long time was not what I was looking forward to. They got me out ASAP and the bill was under $25. I would go back for other car needs, I feel they can be trusted and that's really important for me with car repair.
I have been a customer of Andrews Jewelers for years. The staff is always polite, helpful and willing to give an honest opinion. I wouldn't go anywhere else for my fine jewelry.
My experience here was great.
Fantastic and absolutely a surprise. Located on Amman Street in Kuwait. Very unassuming place. Clean and enjoyable ambiance. A fresh fish restaurant where one can pick and choose. It will be cooked as desired. Great recipe. Half the price of other fish market restaurants in the city with better quality. Try it. You will love it as I do !
JOIN AAKASH FOR GOOD EDUCATION
Jimmy D is a pleasure to work with. He caught a potential problem with our AC unit and saved us hundreds of dollars. I highly recommend him for any HVAC maintenance or repair.
Nice place
Excellent service in combination with reasonable prices- go Ninet.
Super Hill station.
very good cinema at good location 17 sector ....
Love it!
I love the Vapor Bar! It is so close to home and the people are SUPER nice! They are always knowledgeable about any topic I have and even saved me tons of money on several occassions when it came to batteries. :))
Awesome place!
Best car buying experience ever. It is not your typical dealership. The sales people are not pushy and do not tell you what you want to buy. I love that. I got the truck I wanted and it was hassle free buyiing.
Friendly staff that goes out of their way to satisfy any customer. I have been going to this store for over 8 years and always get a fair price and excellent service.
Just had my alternator and thermostat changed and they were extremely helpful. Got it done faster than expected too. Price was good and the car seems to run MUCH better after their work. Highly recommended to anyone in the area who needs repairs.
Studio is Big, clean, beautiful. And instructors have phenomenal grace, understanding and inspiration.
None
None
Bout to try this swordfish!
None
None
I have only good things to say about the doctors at West End Chiropractic and Wellness! Fun and friendly environment, with doctors that genuinely care about you and your health. I would definitely recommend this facility to anyone looking to correct a subluxation, reduce pain or just overall improve your quality of life.
None
I've been using this shop for 12+ years and the guys are always professional, quick, and well priced. Over the years I've had just about every service they offer performed : tire balancing, flat repair, rotation, mounting, alignments, and custom exhaust. Will stay a loyal customer.
Cory & his team at Cedar House Media are fantastic. The quality of their product has always been exceptional, even when I've asked for a quick turnaround. Equally as important to me, a small business owner, they make me feel that my projects are equally as important as those from any other company. I wouldn't go anywhere else for my printing and graphics needs. Mona Heath Owner, Vintage Fusion LLC
Sunny Electric LLC installed tamper resistant outlets in my childcare. Straight and done correct the first time.
Great job over there guys especially, Derrick who took care of me and my car. It's a wonderful feeling to know that there are still some honest mechanic in business.
I've been there a few times over the years. My first time going, I purchased a day at the spa. I came home feeling like a new person. My husband bought me a gift card for Mother's Day during my first pregnancy and I used that one to get a maternity massage. Also a great experience. I had been in tears from the pain for weeks, and the massage left me feeling better for a week. My husband purchased another gift card for me on Mother's Day and on Christmas last year and I haven't used them yet. I am pregnant again and will be going for several massages this time.
Excellent service in a super friendly shop. My cats are delighted that I have discovered 'Dreamies', a bargain treat that was given as a free sample. Its convenient too-open on a Sunday just when I've run out of their favourite top quality food. Pam Carruthers
They answer their phone and show me properties quickly.
Don is an honest mechanic. After my transmission was slipping and I had no warranty left on my car, the dealership sent me to Tansmission Clinic. A new tranny would have cost $3700, and I was praying for a miracle! They ran a diagnostic, and checked out my car, even draining the oil to check for metal in the pan. They couldn't find anything wrong, so sent me on my way at no charge. I will always recommend this shop to anyone who needs transmission work. I would never have known if they had told me that I needed a new tranny. This guy is great and honest!
None
I trust Grappone Honda in Bow, NH to service my car and provide me with quality customer service. The people that work at Grappone Honda are friendly and make me feel part of the family. I will continue to get my car service here and my next car will be another Grappone Honda....
it is great here
By far, my local favorite pizza! Great service at this location.
None
What a great group of professionals to be a part of. Everyone works together to get properties sold. Our broker, Jay Richter is so knowledgeable of the real estate market and is always available to advise or lend a helping hand. Our owner Joe Mondelli along with Jay Richter are always thinking of new ways to work and give back to the community. Our approach to customer service is heads above all others and I’m very proud to be be working with John R Wood.
I have been using DR.Slatten for over 30 years.Two gals that work with me use him and one just took her daughter to see him, I took my mother to see him and she lives in Lawton. Just got back from his office. WOW. He now is one of two Optometrists in the state with Scription. I was so impressed with the exam. His staff is great. They always have taken care of me. I have vision in only one eye so this is who I trust.I can't wait to get my new glasses.
Review from an owner... Kyle and Michelle Hayes at the Jim McNeeley Group are very responsive and attentive to my needs as a property owner. I have used them for several years and could not imagine renting my property on my own with today's rules and regs. I would highly recommend their services.
Absolutely friendly service, I don't have the best schedule and the are open til midnight and live around the corner. I like the deli and they close at 10, but I came in at 10:10 PM and the nice lady cleaning up said they closed at 10 but would be happy to honor my request. She was very helpful and asked if I would care for anything else with a smile. Prices are a little high but the service makes up for it.
This is a great restaurant: I like El Pollo Loco, and this is my favorite El Pollo Loco. The staff is excellent, the chicken is excellent, and the side orders are excellent. They haven't yet remodeled, as some El Pollo Locos have, but the seating area is still nice. Finally, it is cost-effective for large groups: I have 7 children, and the cost per person is very reasonable with the family meals. We eat here weekly, and have for many years.
My husband was taken in for stitches on my hand, they took me in quickly, had excellent care! Took time to explain each and every step that was going to happen, explained costs and worked with us so well. Best ER in the Cypress, TX area hands down!
Best restaurant in town!
Piwo, cola i swawola
Great local store with a much greater selection than Sports Authority when it comes to cleats, balls or anything soccer. If you get a discount through a local soccer club, their prices can compete with soccer apparel websites. Great pricing for numbering jerseys (while you wait) or embroidering names on bags or jackets (short turnaround).
This office is great and I recommend it to anyone needing physical medicine. After experiencing lower back pains for several years I contacted Dr. McLelland's office to have a consult. He was able to get me into his office quick and began working on the healing process. Not only did he help alleviate my pain, but he also did a great job at explaining how I came to experience the pain. Dr. McLelland and his staff are very professional, respectful, and friendly. For anyone looking for physical medicine look no further than ChiroworksVA.
None
Nice University
None
None
Dobra!
The best dermatologist in Nagpur..! Apt diagnosis and treatment
I love the kawaii shops surrounding the supermarket! Its almost like japan is 20 minutes away!!!!
None
Lombardo Law Office made my experience easy. I worked with both Adam and Will and I enjoyed the time talking with them both. They both met with me when I needed and explained the process over to me until I understood it. I felt relaxed and comfortable meeting with them both. Loved that I didn't feel rushed or judged. Emails and calls to the office were a breeze and I didn't feel like I was pestering anyone. I would recommend Lombardo Law to anyone and everyone, great experience even through the situations/struggles I was experiencing.
lovely pizza, cooked well in their huge oven
Pro , có cu hiệp vui tính
None
Service, response, and transparency was great with First Colony Mortgage. Our Loan Officer, Steve Lundwall, was great to work with and kept all his promises!
Fast, friendly and well priced!
Decided to take my 4 year old to Acute Care instead of emergency room - she had complained about arm pain for 3 hours. Was seen quickly, and Doctor Johnson quickly determined dislocated arm and resolved with excellent bedside manner. My daughter cried briefly, arm relocated, and convinced she was a tough girl. Better experience than emergency where we would have been in lower 1/3 for triage, likely waiting for hours for simple relocation of arm. Only $50 with my insurance instead of $200 for emergency and more pain for my 4 year old daughter.
Outstanding company. Always on time with excellent work. We highly recommend this company! They did exactly what we wanted and the results are perfect.
My son attends HPU and enjoys it very much. I believe that this university instills character building from the moment a student walks on campus. The classes are challenging but not impossible because of the teachers commitment to their students. When I went to college I knew the president of the school because the library had a picture hanging of him never met him once. The president at HPU is involved daily with all who attend. His deep concern for every student goes beyond anything I have ever experienced. Quality leadership, education, and morality makes HPU the best. We feel blessed to have our son attend.
It's the best Family restaurant around. We go there on a regular basis. Staff are very friendly and the food is excellent it is always a pleasure to go there. Keep it up.
Spent three glorious years in one of India's oldest and prestigious academic institutions. Nothing in the world beats that. The tag of Presidency-er chhele is for life.
If yu have at least 1 hr time then must visit this place. It's really nice.
бисмиллях...
Ja fui mais em interlagos do que casa da minha vó... he he he..
Dr. Ned was fantastic in a number of ways. He worked well with my insurance, he did a thorough diagnosis (including x-rays, movement analysis, and more) to determine what all was going on, and he used a variety of methods to treat my back and neck problems. I left his office feeling lighter and lighter every time. When I started, I was in so much pain I couldn't hold my baby or go grocery shopping for more than 5 minutes. In just a few months of visits he had me back up on my feet and back to my old fitness activities as well as playing with my kids and everything. I was very impressed with how professional, polite, and friendly he was while helping me work through all my pain. I would recommend his work to anyone!
Super sfeer, eerlijk eten en een goeie prijs!
None
None
Drove cross country from Mass to California. I was lucky enough to have found the Jack London Lodge on Groupon. It was one of the nicest places we stayed at on our entire three week trip. The woman at the front desk was very friendly. The beds were extremely comfortable and clean. The room was immaculate. I cant say enough about how nice it was and very close to the wineries! A diamond in the rough for sure!
Catrina was very helpful and extremely knowledgeable with their products and what we needed for our computer at the Oakville Family Ribfest, Rotary Club of Oakville. I would recommend them without hesitation. Danielle Olscamp-Fedrigo
Unforgettable experience with this company . I Really appreciated the way AppiLogics work on client requirement .
I have had a great experience here. My massage therapist did a thorough check on me and was able to locate the pressure points and the pinched nerves . .i feel so much better now . i was in a lot of pain but thank god for massage hot tubs and an ice cold beer im good as new.
None
Paul's was absolutely perfect as our photographer! Our photos look like they are straight out of a magazine. He was creative and quick. He got through our formals with amazing speed, and yet the quality was amazing. He made everyone feel comfortable and made it all a fun experience. He is truly an artist and we are so happy to have his photographs as our reminders. His turn around time was quick (and he posted a few photos to his blog within days, which was awesome!), and the DVD and prints we received were so tastefully packaged. Our wedding was about 9 months ago, and we are still getting comments on the photos and slide show he made for us! We couldn't be any happier with our photos!
None
I had a wonderful experience getting my braces at this place! Dr Dillingham and his team are really good at what they do. All my appointments were always on time, they sent me reminders about the appointments and scheduled additional ones readily if I had to come in to get something fixed. In two years, I only had trouble with my wires twice and it was fixed immediately. My teeth look great and the Damon braces system worked really well. I am really happy!
This place is very chilled out. It is like another world .. very good times :)
I went here for the first time yesterday after trying a couple other Aveda salons in the Huntsville area. I can now say, I'm found my new home. Steven cut my hair and did a wonderful job. I left looking and feeling (and smelling) great!
Our family has been visiting Umpqua's Last Resort for several years now, and each year just gets better. We've tent camped, stayed in the luxurious camping cabins, and recently booked a fully stocked vacation rental. Our children look forward to going every year as the hiking, swimming and waterfalls are like no other. The staff is extremely friendly, warm and inviting, always helpful and quick to respond, even arranging white water rafting tours - all we had to do was get in the shuttle and the rest was done. The Dry Creek store is the perfect place to get a cup of coffee, ice cream bars for the kids, and the deli menu is great (we picked up a fishing license there, too)! Normally after a day of swimming in the local creeks, we curl up to s'mores by the fire, but on occasion, the kids can even pick out a movie from the front office and watch a dvd on the flat screen right in our cabin. The grounds are well maintained and the road around the park is perfect for our little ones to ride their bikes. There is a bit of poison oak in the area, so we always bring tecnu, but we've yet to come down with any. Bring plenty of sunscreen and insect repellent, too! We love this campground and look forward to many years of camping and summer fun there!
TOP NOTCH! The service team in the Honda garage is fabulous.
Campus is awesome.
In one word: Awesome. The guys at K&M helped me out so much today, and I am eternally grateful. I was renting some equipment for shoot last-minute, and I'm sure I was super annoying on the phone asking 11 billion questions and changing my mind hundreds of times. Peter and Chris P at the rental counter were not only knowledgable and patient, they were also very accommodating and generous. They even talked to my mom on the phone about payment options, haha. (Embarrassing to admit I had to resort to that, but that's my own poor planning.) Michael also helped me decide on and buy a CF card very quickly and very knowledgeably. Everyone is friendly, they're competitively priced, and I will DEFINITELY be coming back.
Great place for a European, lighter-fare, cafe style meal. I experienced exceptional service, coffee, and breakfast menu items.
I like going to this place. Is on my way home and I always find something new and good. Prices are reasonable and though the store is small I always find what need.
Wonderful place with excellent service and food is top notch!!!! Keep it up!!
Fit 'n' Furry is the best! I bring both of my big dogs here 4 or 5 days a week for daycare and the occasional overnight stay. They always have a great time and come home tired and well-exercised, so I don't have to take them out again after I get off work. All of the staff is helpful and courteous and seems to really know and care about all of the dogs that are there. Highly recommend!!
None
Everyone at Wilken Family Eye Care was extremely friendly & courteous! I had to change my appointment a few times, and Gillian was very patient. She also promptly answered all of my insurance questions via email after my visit. Dr. Bret Wilken was very thorough during my visit, and sincerely cared about my satisfaction. The facility is beautiful, clean, and complimentary coffee and snacks are offered while you wait. I would definitely recommend!
Great theatre! But still brand new..
Dr Jon, Dr Scott and the entire staff are awesome. They know there stuff. I can't say enough about them. If you need any kind of physical therapy or physical medicine in general, these are the guys to see. They really take the time and listen to exactly what you need.
My family and I had the most amazing three day weekend at Hansens Resort!!! Guilliam Nel and staff were beyond courteous and knew the meaning of hospitality. The tube experience down the well maintained snow hill with two tracks was exhilarating. Great family fun and the cabins were clean and comfortable. The location is also very close to down town. Thank you Guilliam and team for a wonderful experience. See you again this winter!
advance service. fast delivery. demand satisfying products.
My favorite place to play in Brentwood. Great greens, fast and true. Good layout, and much less wind than the other area courses. Pace of play was fast and the staff was friendly. I will be back
Great Service there, it was my first time going and immediately the lady there was very help. Assisting me with which size washer I should use, how much I should in the dry (cause not all dryer are the same, from my experience), and all this service without me even asking for it. Now I don't know if everyone is as friend as the person there that they, but she did make the experience a whole lot better. Their was a small inconveince, ppl were retiling the floors, which is also a good thing.
Had a #18 tooth extracted, from setting the appointment, the procedure, to post surgery phone call from my doctor it was as good of an experience that one could have getting a tooth pulled. Good group.
None
I am from California and have eaten Mexican food my entire life. Tacos Lopez is by far the most authentic and delicious place for Mexican food in Vienna.
The place is nice, near the Grose Markt. The waiters were quick, polite,helpful, smiling. The food was delicious. You have to try the lamb with mustard sauce... I highly recommend it!
None
None
We reserved a week ahead for 8 people. I got the Bison Ribs, the Venison, the half quail and the beef cheeks, and everything was perfectly prepared, perfectly plated, and tasted amazing. Our waiter was very nice, and even let me know that it would take slightly longer for my plates to get to the table since i'd ordered all meat, which was fine by me! And man was it worth the wait. My last plate was the Bison Ribs, and they were perfectly seasoned, and fell apart in my plate. VERY delicious and tender. A MUST for Spanish tapas in Montreal.
I've gotten my perfume from here exclusively for ten years. They are respectful and very, very knowledgeable. It's a charming shop full of exquisite things. If you love perfume, you can learn about both classics and new releases. It's all wonderfully curated. Two thumbs up.
I have been coming here for about 6 months and have had nothing but good experiences. The best part is that you get 5 star treatment for a low cost. Each stylist will give you a head massage when you are getting your hair washed, use official Paul Mitchell products, and style it before you leave. I am a fan of going to beauty schools over salons, and this is by far my first choice! Students come and go, but I am currently using a student named "Sam" and she is great!
this has got to be the high end of salons in our area. from the stylists, to product,to the way the salon is set up and looks inside, to the way you are treated when you walk in the door. all I know is when I walk in I know I feel like number one. If you want a little pampering, just go check it out yourself. It's definitely worth your while. The stylist are all ages so you won't feel intimidated,the will match you up with someone they see fit.I promise you won't be disappointed. they have every salon perk available from hair to nails, to facials, to massages and so on.
Food food food khaao ji bhar food
Drs. Ian and Lindsay Hoffman are some of the most amazing chiropractors that I've worked with. I'm a massage therapist and have worked with chiropractors for the past 10 years. About 6 months ago, I met Dr. Ian and decided to start seeing him in hopes he could help me with a sciatic issue I'd been dealing with for years. His knowledge and understanding of the body was exceptional and he knew exactly what need to be addressed in my body. Now after 4 month of treatments, I have little to no pain in my back. I was so impressed by their skills, I have started taking my daughter to see Dr. Lindsay. My daughter has some learning challenges and I'd heard that chiropractic care and help in some cases. After her first visit, I noticed some remarkable changes in my daughter. Her posture was changing, her receptivity was better, her attitude was different and her appetite had increased. To have such significant results after one treatment was enough confirmation for me. We have just begun treatment with my daughter and I'm really looking forward to all the amazing changes. Thank you Dr. Ian and Dr. Lindsay!!
My wife and i love this place. All seems to be a wait, but has always worth the wait. My step children are very italian and always want to go here when they visit.
Not only was the food and ambiance excellent at this location, but I was floored by the amazing service that we received. Cactus definitely has the best burgers in town. I'll be stopping by again soon.
I went paragliding off Signal with Fly Cape Town Paragliding. Even though I'd been once before I was still pretty nervous, and secretly hoping that the mist I saw would prevent the flight! No such luck, and we went ahead when the mist cleared. It was a marvelous experience, I flew with Grant and after 2 steps running along Signal Hill we were airborne. We spent 10 minutes riding the thermals along Signal Hill, which presented plenty of opportunity for photos of other paragliders, the city below stretching out to the sea and Signal Hill. We then headed down to Sea Point to land on the frass. Grant helped take an awesome video with his GoPro camera. I thoroughly recommend this experience, and commend Fly Cape Town Paragliding for their professionalism.
I have been going to Bleach for over 6 years; I have always left feeling amazing! Aaron is extremely talented. And the place is FUN!
For the first time in my life I enjoy going to the dentist! From the moment entering the practice to the moment I leave treated with the greatest respect. It shows in my smile of which you created.
None
We have used Swisher Plumbing for our needs many times over the years. From jobs as simple as replacing a toilet to installing a new oil furnace and water heater. Joel Swisher always gave accurate estimates and the work was done as specified and for the quoted price. We are about to have them completely remodel our bathrooms.
Great salesman and service!
The School Is Good They Serve Healthy Food
My fiance and I are in the process of buying our first home. After finding the perfect home, our realtor recommended this company for the inspection. Doug Wehr was our inspector and he was absolutely fantastic. He was incredibly thorough and made sure to explain every step of the process and every detail regarding any serious or potential issue in the home. We are so appreciative of his time and expertise during our first inspection experience. I would highly recommend Doug to any of my family and friends.
Great staff
My experience with Knox was unbelievable. From the moment I walked in the door, until the moment I picked up the ring, I received the best customer service and assistance I think I have ever had. The emails along the way of the ring's creation were amazing and made me feel like they truly cared about not only the ring, but you as well.
rob was awesome. always glad to have bought my pc here and not worry about being charged to fix any problems. thanks again.
EXCELLENT FRIENDLY PEOPLE.WENT WITH MY BEST FRIEND TO GET HER TATTOO REMOVED AND I THINK ITS VERY AFFORDABLE AS WELL AS VERY GOOD QUALITY WORK
Such friendly staff! Great help and information. Needed shower door helpand was at a loss!!! Called Jeremy and he was excellent with his advice and was so happy with the service he gave me. Will use them always when it comes to all my glass needs.
Cool mall :)
None
None
None
None
Excellent food
Great addition to Dripping Springs. Good NY Style Pizza. Fold it in half like a New Yorker people! Good Prices too.
Love this place. It's a hidden treasure!
"Friendly, supportive and involved coaches, you can make payments on the registration fee, and overall a very good program! I will definitely register my son for other sports!!"
None
yummy
None
None
I am so happy to have discovered Mobility & Beyond. They were so efficient, professional, and way cheaper than ANYONE else in the surrounding area. The staff was really nice and accommodating. Whenever a friend has an issue with their phone, I will 100% recommend their services.
A good school is where learning takes place along with a real commitment to see each child prosper and develop into well qualified, talented and successful young people.
Awesome beer, good food. Take a Boris at the end :-)
My name is Michael Palmiero. I am presently staying at the El San Juan resort and casino and would honestly and truthfully say that from being around the world, this is the best hotel I ever have stayed at. My only suggestion is the casino should change all of their slot machines and bring in more table games. Try are create a more modern slot machine facility. Ir would attract more guest from everywhere. Otherwise, I salute and praise the staff and management for making my stay at their hotel my greatest trip to the El San Juan hotel and casino.
Fantastic 8 sail, restored windmill. Last one in the country. Visitors can climb the storeies and see the mill in action. Well worth a visit.
None
The best pizza u will ever eat!
Google Applications with Samsung makes travel simple and fun filled. With a wealth of information that makes a Tour Guide to appear dispensable, you feel like you know where you are already. Enjoy ;) Feels good to be here in the Sriwijaya Kingdom.
The food was so good, that we were full but couldn't stop eating.
I can't say enough great things about Cottonwood Cyclery. Allen and the guys there are the definition of what a bike shop should be. They know most customers by name, go out of there way to make suggestions. Have the best prices around and most important , they stand behind there bikes. I've bought myself and my kids bikes there. If they don't have the bike you are looking for, they will order it up for you. There hours are nice too, open early.
None
The service is excellent...stepping out of the car and being greeted immediately...the lounge is very comfortable and they really make you feel welcome. They are fast and efficient. They do not try to do work that is not needed and they always give you a quote on items they may suggest. I had my oil changed today and it was another fine experience!! Thank you to all the service and sales people at Feldman.
What an Amazing experience!!! From initial contact with the BEST salesman I have ever come across, Matt (and you don't know me, but this is saying a alot), to the guy that found MY DREAM CAR, Darrin, to the owner Mike and the business manager Danny... Every step of the way, without exception, the best purchasing experience I have ever had. The half hiccup after purchase, that they didn't have to help with, was done without even batting an eye by Mike. I will NEVER buy a car anywhere else, and will send everyone I know to the best guys in the business!! You will have this same experience, I guarantee it!
definitely the best burger place in the area. So many options to choose from. the people that werk there are awesome!!!
Good selection of boards, great prices and a decent skateboard selection. Above all, the staff is helpful, friendly and able to point to a place to surf with no crowds. After 11 years, I still want the longboard above the counter.... they'll fold one day.
UPDATE - El Mexico continues to be THE BEST family run Mexican restaurant in Wichita. I really like a good fried taco, and theirs are not greasy at all. I especially go for the chicken tacos, and they spice the meat just right. Open one up, put a big glop of guacamole and salsa inside, fold and enjoy! YUM!
Man Oh Man Oh Chevitz!!! Best Dental experience of my life!!!! Big Baby Afraid of pain like me - No Worries. This guys got a practiced touch that only experience knows. Try the sedation it's as if your watching (minds eye) yourself get drilled on TV. NO PAIN. Like a well run, classy, professional office environment - Run, don't walk. Want a Dentist and Staff that are smart, patient, empathetic and perceptive to your individual needs - Pick up the phone! just saying - my mind has been forever altered as to the perceived "negatives" of the trip to the Dentist! Thanks for the Big Smile Doc, and company! Mike Newman - Dallas
The best OT I know.
This is the best dentist I have been to in a very long time. I have had terrible experiences with dentist the last couple of years or more. This dentist office treated me like a human being and not like a dollar sign. They did not do unnecessary procedures and they were friendly and nice to me and to each other. I had a great experience!!!!
Probably the best pizza I've had in years. Pizza is meant to be baked ,and done well to enjoy the flovor of the sauce and condiments. 'The server (Taylor) was excellent. She made sure we were totally satisfied during our entire meal. With 5 people at our table,no one was in need . We will tell all our friends and neighbors about the great food,service and the decor was really fun.
If you want a great deal, see Wesley! He was a great help to our purchase. He was very enthusiastic, friendly and knowledgable. He worked with us to get the best deal and provided a no pressure environment which made us very comfortable and excited to close a deal. Credit goes out to Franky and Mark, who also made us feel at home. Would absolutely recommend Pohanka Lexus
Customer service is second to none, best I can remember experiencing anywhere. The guy I spoke to was polite, knowledgeable and extremely helpful. I couldn't have asked for a better experience and will be back.
Fantastic Pizza
Very elegant and classy hotel, with the finest touches throughout. Standard king room was a little less spacious than we expected but still very nice. But the bathroom was gigantic! Perhaps the biggest bathroom hotel I've ever seen, complete with a walk-in shower with more than enough room for two, plus a large whirlpool tub. The curbside valet and front desk staff were extremely courteous, helpful and friendly. Check-in was a breeze. The only negative we experienced was a lack of attention from the bartender/server at the bar area (we did not dine in the Palace Restaurant). We went in there twice hoping to get drinks and/or an appetizer and were never waited on, so we walked out and went elsewhere. We were also a little disappointed there was no complimentary coffee in the room or within the hotel. Overall, still highly recommend. Good central location as well...in walking distance of many good restaurants and event centers. Update: Two days after checking out, I noticed a $27.65 charge to my credit card. I called and learned that they had tried to charge us for mini-bar items. However, one of the first things we noticed when we checked in was that many mini-bar menu items were not present in the room, including bottled water. One of the first things my wife said when we walked in and saw this was "they better not charge us for that". Sure enough, they did. However, when I called and explained, they were gracious and reversed the charges.
Denise is extremely knowledgeable about the Greenwich real estate market. That, combined with her very friendly personality, high real estate acumen, and very solid negotiating skills, makes her a huge asset to have on your side when buying or selling real estate in Greenwich.
The decor will not blow you away, but the food is excellent and the staff are very friendly. Just what I was looking for!
Dr. Fehrenkamp is a wonderful doctor. I've been seeing him for a long time and he always takes the time to talk to me about how I'm feeling and I feel like he really listens to me, rather than just nodding and looking at his watch so he can see the next patient. I've been to several endocrinologists in the area and he is by far the best.
Peace, love, and burritos. Excellent experience all-around... Great vegan options too.
I went to Pep Boys a few days ago for an oil change, and as usual, I had a very pleasant experience. Juan Ortiz greeted me with a smile right away, and when I told him what I was there for, he said he would take care of everything and get me on the road again before I knew it. Juan explained the differences between the different types of oil that they have at Pep Boys, and he recommended the best one for my car and for my budget. I really appreciated the knowledge he gave me. The employees finished my oil change within an hour, and I noticed a definite improvement in my gas mileage after the service. I will continue to go to Pep Boys for all of my car needs, and I would recommend this place to everyone! P.S. Make sure you ask for Juan. He's very helpful.
Great Service and fast turn around. Mike is able to do anything you want done with your audio / visual needs...
None
Anyone who doesn't love this place wasn't informed. If you go to the restaurant part, you're in the wrong place. The back counter is where the action is and where you'll get your in-and-out, ripper or cremator hot and fresh. The relish is a must on these. The fries and onion rings are as good as they get. I've been going to Rutt's Hut since the late 70s. It hasn't changed, probably never will and shouldn't. This is as Jersey as it gets.
Si tu cherches le Starbucks Café, passe ton chemin, tu ne trouveras pas ici de déco design à la mode et de produits formatés. Non, l'Araignée au Plafond, c'est un bar / tabac / PMU à l'ancienne ou l'on déjeuner le midi pour pas cher, manger des grillades à la cheminée, et déguster des petits plats maison sans prétention mais préparés avec amour. En résumé un endroit comme on en fait plus et qui tend hélas à disparaître.
Cash, my 2 yr old pomeranian/yorkie mix dog, LOVES Firehouse!! Dr Faught is the best vet in Austin: extremely knowledgeable, super friendly, loves animals, and Cash LOVES him. Dr Faught efficiently explains treatments and the various options that may be available. WIthout a doubt, he is extremely caring and makes sure to follow-up to ensure things are ok for your little guy or girl. The clinic is incredible: very welcoming, top of the line, beautiful, modern, clean, and has state of the art equipment. The staff is great, they are all soo friendly and welcoming, and very considerate of every customer/pet that walks in the door. Firehouse makes bringing your pet to the vet so enjoyable (not just for you, but for pet!)
Ras Kassa's is one of our family's favorite restaurants of all time. I am rather fond of saying that they not only have the best Ethiopian food I've ever had, but the best food I've ever eaten, period. There is something almost spiritual, yet earthy about eating there. The owners believe strongly in imparting traditional values of sharing a meal. As others have surely mentioned, food is served in a communal fashion, with everyone reaching in with bits of injera bread to take mouthfuls of lentils, or stew, or cheese, or any of many amazing delicacies. When eating there, I feel less like a customer in a restaurant, and more like a guest at a quiet party in someone's home. The owners are always present to see that everything is running smoothly, and everyone is well-fed. They take incredible pride in their work, and when they see people happy and fulfilled, they positively beam with happiness. You don't just get food, you get a philosophy of sharing, community, and hospitality. Don't expect silverware here. And for heaven's sake, don't ask for separate plates when eating in a group - your hosts will be mortified! The food itself is amazing. I have tried literally every food item on the menu, and every single one is perfection. They have both spicy and mild dishes, a great vegetarian selection - nearly good enough to convert a carnivore like myself - and you can even get gluten-free items (including gluten-free injera bread). My recommendation is to go with combination dishes, so you can try a little of everything. It's hard to choose stand-out items from the menu for recommendation, because everything is so good. If you love fish, you'll love it even more after you try Ras Kassa's fish dishes. Those familiar with soul food and southern cooking may be happily surprised to see many familiar ingredients - sweet potatoes, collard greens, and more. But here, you're getting it from the source. And it _will_ feed your soul. Dinner can be a little pricey (about twenty dollars per person), though their lunch buffet is extremely reasonable (ten dollars or so per person, and the same great food). If you can manage a group of ten or more for dinner, you can take advantage of their _incredible_ "Passport to Africa" special where, for eleven dollars per person, you can all try nearly everything on the menu, plus beverages (try their superb honey wine, african wines and beers, or teas and coffees). The passport and combination meals for two or more come with dessert as well, and the desserts are as phenomenal as the rest of the menu. Last night, there was a rich chocolate mousse-style confection, topped with raspberries, that had us scraping the dish. I would put Ras Kassa's food up against any Michelin-rated restaurant, and expect Ras Kassa's to come out on top. I can't recommend this place enough.
It you want steak, this is the place. steak is all they serve
Always eat at Commander's Restaurant for years! They have the BEST lemon rice soup around! The service is good and the menu selection is great! I've had many different things on the menu and also love to eat their baked mac & cheese on Friday's! Their saganaki is also great, order it almost every time I go there. The environment has changed since it is now smoke free and the place always seems to be packed with people. The pricing is very reasonable also. I would recommend this restaurant to anyone who wants to stop by for a quick meal that is reasonably priced.
Genio
Jasmine is wonderful. Very professional and made every effort to not only make me feel comfortable but that I was treated great. My wife and I are both customers and couldn't be happier. Been there multiple times and will be going back. I would highly recommend them to anybody. They way she went out of her way to help make sure my appointment was kept even after a mix up shows she cares about her customers and how they feel about her company. A true professional and a business we should all support to help ensure her success.
Incredible. Definitely coming back the next time we're in town. The Chicken Nachos Superior are incredible. Two people could easily share for dinner and leave bursting at the seams.
I would recommend Mike Gorka at Metro Acura in Montclair. Mike gave my wife and I a wonderful experience and took his time to try to work with you. Even though I did not purchase my RDX from him due to inventory shortage on a rare 2013 model, I would definitely look for Mike on my future vehicles. Thank Mike!
We have been bringing our dogs to the Drake Center for years - too many to remember, and even though we have moved out of the area last year I still continue to take our dog to them for any major procedure. While I feel that they can be expensive, the quality of service of the doctors as well as the front area staff justifies the costs. I have always felt comfortable boarding our dogs with them as well.
We attended a Bar Mitzvah where Brady was the DJ. He had the kids and parents on the dance floor all night. The music and lighting was amazing. Would highly recommend DJ B for any party.
Price is reasonable, easy to get in and out, folks running this place are nice. Open Thursday through Sunday, 8-5.
None
Excellent
This place has homestyle chinese cooking real good. They also have free delivery if you purchase $12 and up.
Highest quality standards and a classy lounge looking waiting room awaits patrons visiting this world class car wash which has been a staple in West Island since 1988. Bravo!
Great Work fixing my iPad - Thanks!
None
None
Ваще четкий новый аэропорт.
Fantastic - Huge portions of fantastic authentic mexican food, $3 32 ounce beers (including Dos Equis and Blue Moon), love the spicy bean dip that comes with the chips, fast service, and great prices. Space is very limited compared with the other Greenville location, you may have to park across main st and you may have to wait for a table if you are not early or late.
I've been going here for a number of years, and it's always been a good place for great food and even better beer.
None
Had breakfast here for the first time, won't be the last. My finicky youngest son was very satisfied and wants to return for dinner.
None
Simply the Best! The best camping I've ever stayed at. My husband and kids all agreed with me. We loved the small homely atmosphere. The couple running the campside were excellent, really supportive, welcoming and generous people. We will most certainly return....
Excellent Service Very trustworthy we highly recommend their services and they always go the extra mile Our driver was wonderful, He just made everyone feel special, We just had a great time. We will definitely recommend you to anyone looking for this limo service.
None
None
The Azevedo family favorite.
One of the World Heritage Sites in India. Magnificent monolithic structures carved out of mountains.
Excellent food and a great value... HUGE portions! be sure to get the Poutine as an appetizer... it is enough for 4-5 to split!
The service was great. Very attentive. The steak was served medium rare as ordered and was delicious.
love there chicken and beef super combo best deal ever! the eggrolls are crispy and delicous. great owners!
كارنيهات أى دى بلاستيك يفط صدرية (نيم تاج ) أختام خشبية وماكينة أتوماتيك الكتابة وقص الاستيكر اللاصق بالكمبيوتر طباعة ملونة على التيشيرت والأقمشة طباعة مخدات العرسان والأطفال طباعة الماج - الأبيض أو السحرى الأسود طباعة بادة الماوس وقواعد الشاى ألوان طباعة ماديليات فضى وذهبى يافطة باب ألوان بقاعدة خشبية يافطة مكتب معدنية ألوان بقاعدة خشبية أكلشيه طباعة الشنط البلاستيك بنرات - بوسترات - باك لايت مطبوعات - بروشور - كروت شخصية يفط بلاستيك حروف بارزة مضيئة 30 Al Gish St., Al Manshyia Square Port Said, Egypt face page: new-color newcoloradv
Dr. Dejong is a very caring and personable doctor.
Gr8
I have been with three different driving schools during my drivers learning and from my experience, out of ALL the driving schools I have been with Glenn and Irene at "Roadworks Driving Training" have been nothing but the best in the way they teach, support and encouraged me through my learning and ultimate success in acquiring my p's. They are always calm in any situation and support you through your problem areas in driving. I LOVED this experience, I learned more in three lessons with Glenn then I ever did driving. Thank you so much Glenn and Irene for being fabulous driving instructors. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THEM.
Although this place is obviously not cheap it's a very special hotel with the one room even more special than the other. The sight from many rooms is breathtaking, and there are so many corners and terraces to enjoy the view. The garden is something special: it's really a park: great in Summer without a doubt. The personnel at this hotel is very devoted and passionate about making their customers feel well at ease. The waitress knew a lot about the wines on the menu, and was great with animating the children, who may otherwise have felt too locked up in a beautiful restaurant. From this hotel it's great to visit Rheinfels in St. Goar and take a boat trip on the Rhine to hopefully survive the turn around Loreley.
None
These guys were great; friendly when I called, helpful and courteous road-side service (flat tire), and came when they said they would. I've put them in my phone and will call on them in the future if I need a towing service. The negative comments must be from competitors, because neither of the guys I dealt with could be misinterpreted as rude.
New owners, excellent service and food! They are only open for lunch and dinner until spring. The hamburgers are hand pattied and superb! It's about time some good owners took over. Highly recommended, in fact I'm headed over there tomorrow for lunch.
Best mammogram ever! Cheerful staff, latest technology, elegant changing rooms, quick results. Don't suffer elsewhere schedule your next one here!
They told me that they are, "all about service", and they are. I had a warranty problem with my two year old Ariens snow blower and went on their website to find an authorized repair shop. They listed two, Preco Power Equipment in Wilbraham and FC Taplin Co. in West Springfield. Since I live in Wilbraham I called Preco. Their first question was did I buy it there. When I said no they told me it would take 4 or more weeks to repair the unit. When I said I would still take it there they then told me that they would charge me $30.00 for the warranty work. Obviously they didn't want to repair the unit because I didn't buy it there so I called the nest dealer on the list FC Taplin. There was a day and night difference in how I was treated. They told me it would take days instead of weeks to repair the unit. They said as long as I had a copy of the receipt and the unit was within the three year warranty period they would repair it. When I brought the unit over in my pick up truck they had me back up to their repair dock and unloaded it for me. When I went back in they had already processed my paper work and gave me my receipt and I was on my way.
Every time I go to Christy Sports it's a great experience. This particular time I rented some skis and I ended up demoing a some awesome skis. Everyone there is really great.
I purchased a groupon for Detail Kings for an exterior and interior detail. I called to schedule an appointment with them and came in two days later. The entire process ran very smoothly. I dropped off my car, went shopping at Oak Brook for two hours, and received a phone call when they were finished. When I came to pick up my car, I was very impressed and my car felt like brand new. The employees are very professional and organized. I will definitely be back! Thank you again for your service!
Food is cooked in home made style and not the typical restaurant style Indian food. I highly recommend this restaurant. Food at this restaurant is better than most places on Devon Street in Chicago. Chappati (roti) is handmade fresh. Highly recommended! great food at low prices.
I really love Cherry City Wax Works! I have gone to plenty of other waxing places trying to find the right one, and I promise I will not go to anyone but Jazmyne from now on. She is warm and inviting, while maintaining the highest level of professionalism. On top of that, the girl know hows how to wax. She also has tons of great tips and tricks for the best results. If you are on the fence, just give them a try. You definitely won't be sorry.
Been a few times and never had an issue. Food is fantastic and always cooked to exactly how you ask it be, and the service is always great. Well worth a visit.
Nice Factory
None
Sehr zu empfehlen
These guys go way above and beyond in their work! They have a lifetime customer here!
Good Service. I like ambience and service they provide for home
Small place tucked in a corner of an office park, catering to the lunch hour local crowd. Food is served cafeteria-style, with a menu that rotates daily. I have never had a dish here that wasn't excellent. The restaurant does a brisk trade, and the food is consistently freshly-made. Occasionally, they will run out of an item, and deliver it to you in the dining room within about five minutes. Dishes include classic Vietnamese hot and spicy chicken, ginger chicken, beef and potatoes, spicy sweet and sour. Good Vietnamese crispy eggrolls, too. Portion size is generous, service is friendly and consistent.
Its jenuan for good quality
Excellent freshly-made bagels and great sandwiches :)
My family has used this company 4 times before and they are excellent. They took care and made sure the job was done right. They worked fast and they and finished in a timely manner. They are very polite and I would recommend using OK Tire & Auto Service.
The reason why I rate Lexus of Clearwater so highly is because of David Craig, Mark Niquette, Roman Voloshyn, and Kevin Crosby. Firstly, Mark in service was so compassionate by taking me on an emergency circumstance to replace my old battery that died on me, so while they worked on my Lexus, Mark referred me to David Craig, to help me trade in my old Lexus and helped me find a new one. Secondly, David Craig is totally awesome! He not only greeted my mother and me with gentlemanly warmth and a kind and pure spirit, but also he talked Italian to my 87-year-old mother! He's not only charming with goodness that makes him handsome and wholesome, but he is completely business-like too. His method of public relations is dynamite! He is so down to earth with virtues of understanding, compassion, and a list of similar life experiences that I totally loved him and wanted to take him home with me! I feel as if David Craig is my very own family member: brother, husband :), and is like a son to Mom. He had the most utmost respect for my mother and loved listening to her life stories of when she was born and raised in Italy in the early 1900s. David kept me enchanted with his life experiences and I felt I could identify with him. Thirdly, David referred me to his team member, Roman Voloshyn, to help me and Mom in the process of buying my brand new 2013 Lexus RX350 to replace my former 2004 RX330. My new Lexus not only has satellite radio, but also has apps via my iPhone and bluetooth! I'm so excited! David Craig and Roman Voloshyn were responsible in keeping my mother and me comfortable while we waited from morning till night to get the best price for my new Lexus as well. I am overwhelmed with joy that Lexus of Clearwater showed the best compassion towards me in my special circumstance and gave me the greatest deal of the century. When Roman heard that I was in need of a hug, Roman Voloshyn gave me a big bear hug. I liked it so much I told him to just keep hugging me! There’s nothing but LUV at Lexus! Fourthly, after buying my brand new 2013 Lexus Luxury Utility Vehicle, Roman Voloshyn referred me to Kevin Crosby in Finance. Kevin was very nice and fast, and there weren’t any messy papers to sign because we signed on the computer through the glass inside his desk! I invite you to come into Lexus of Clearwater to see what great deal you can get on your new Lexus. Are these guys for real? Yes they are! Come and see them today to get into your new Lexus. They will treat you just right. Lexus of Clearwater has such a warm heart for people and want to fulfill their need for a dependable and safe car. They don't hound you like all the rest of the car dealers. Lexus has the highest amount of ethics in their salesmanship. I don’t buy anything but Lexus. Good and godly people, excellent service, and genuine care!
Fantastic company! Their team of respectful experts were able to immediately recognize what was wrong with our garage door and fix it in under an hour. I was impressed that they serviced our garage door in the window of time that they proposed. I also appreciated their company's effort to go Green through paperless receipts and invoices. I highly recommend this company for garage door repair!
Chad Elliot is an outstanding jewelry designer and expert in gems and precious metals. My wife had lost her custom made wedding which was a one of a kind design. I provided Chad with several old photos and some estimated dimensions for the re-make hoping for the best. When I gave it to my wife on our anniversary of 26 years she thought I had somehow found her long lost ring. Nice work Chad!
Brady and Jerry are wonderful to work with! The photo session was fun and the pictures turned out amazing. Customer Service was beyond anything we could ask for. Thanks for all you guys did for us.
The jewel of the Livermore wine country. We had a suite and 2 rooms for our Birthday celebration and could not have been happier,
Quality work at reasonable prices! This is where I take my shoes to get cleaned, re-soled and repaired.
I am one of the owners at Blass Roofing, and words can't express my appreciation to all our hard working employees that strive to go above and beyond everyday for the company and customers!! Thank You!!
We start to twitch if we go more than a week without Chipotle. You can switch up your order however you like, every time you go, and everything is fresh and tasty. I feel a little silly praising a chain restaurant but I really feel like Chipotle is worth it. My wife and I have even decided that the next time we move around town, there has to be one nearby. We like it *that* much. Decor never changes, but is nifty enough to stare at (or look out the windows at the world). Service is always super fast. From the time you enter the front door to the time you sit down with your grub, it won't be more than 8 minutes tops, and frequently less.
Jeff Nona is an outstanding attorney. He is professional and personable. What I really liked about him was that he didn't tell me what I wanted to hear, but what I needed to hear. He is a straight shooter who knows his stuff. I could not have been happier with the outcome of my case. He walked me through the process from start to finish, always keeping me informed. The office staff was professional and always available. I highly recommend the Law Office of Jeffery E. Nona without hesitation and would definately use him again if needed.
What's not to love about this place. The coffee is good, love the food, and service is always greeted with a smile. Can't forget the free WiFi! I would come here to study for promotion while in the military, and continue to come as a college student. Love love love it!
Such a friendly, upbeat atmosphere. I have been going to this shop for years, and am thoroughly pleased with the treatment I have received.
None
Not too long ago I took my Firebird to this shop (after Several others) Not only does my car run better than it Ever has,it drives better & sounds Very Sweet! Plus I was given information about my car I'd requested that I've been unable to get from anyone else in the past! Then came the bill,[],[],I was So stuned at how LOW It was! Unlike previous shops that gave me a quick fix,charged me an arm & a leg,then sent me on my way-My car had a few things done(corectly) & I really thought it was going to be pretty high...I will Never'go anywhere else again for auto repairs (Or TIRES) Thankyou Will(ect)you guys are Awesome 8/1/2012 Last week after my truck was damaged I requested that it be towed here..Even though it was dropped in at the spur of the moment,the owner of the shop made sure that my little boy & I had our truck back the very same day! Fantastic...Thankyou Will'
I will be moving into Encantada Apartments in January. During the viewing and application process, the staff have went above my expectations. I have viewed many apartment complexes and none have had such attentive and nice staff as Encantada. They have communicated quickly via email and phone for new information and availability at this complex during my apartment search. Upon my visits everything has been spotless and quiet. The property is beautiful and in a great location. My 11 year old daughter attends one of the best schools nearby and we cannot wait to move and see what else this community has in store for us.
None
Its GREAT! Its cheap and a great buy u will be glad you ate there.
Have been here three times and finally got a table. Worth the wait! Great inside or outside dining on a quiet street in beautiful Rumson, NJ
India travel agent in India
Very good service and drinks
None
I can't believe we've been coming to Natick for the past 16 years and never tried Big Fresh. Never had anything bad here. Love their falafel, love their fish, love their tea, and I love their salads. One of my top 10 places to eat, of all time.
best in town
I have got all but one of my tattoos from the team @ Troutdale. I get compliments and great gestures from all that see them. Clean work, great staff and wouldnt go anywhere else. Have taken a lot of family and friends to get tattoos and piercings there as well. Troutdale Tattoo & Body Piercing, def. the place to go.
Enchanting idols of Ghanshyam Maharaj, Nar Narayan Bhagwan, Sahajanand Swami (Swaminarayan Bhagwan), Radha Krushna Bhagwan, Ganpati, Hanumanji, Shiv Parvati, Ram Laxman Sita. The main prayer hall is covered with serene atmosphere. The temple has a general hall meant for holy weddings, engagement, reception, birthdays and sports.
Very friendly staff and we'll labeled livestock prices.
Both fried and grilled chicken are really good!
Отличное место. Можно поиграть на хороших компьютерах, посмотреть футбол с друзьями под пивко и вкусные закуски, на крутые чемпионаты по киберспорту. Кухня отличная, кушаешь с радостью все =)
Love this store and the clothes! Helen is so helpful and friendly. I will definitely be back
Love there safety protocol
We often stay at the hotel and use the restaurants at the Bridge. We have always had a great stay with superb meals. It's the only place to be. Come on you Blues!!!!
Amazing experience. We live in the area and chose Eye to Eye because it was close to home and accepted VSP. What a pleasant surprise. There was no waiting at appointment time. They saw my husband, son and myself. Super friendly office. Very helpful and extremely knowledgeable when trying to pick out our frames and lenses. We will recommend them to our friends without a doubt. Tina
Very professional team - always quick to reply and a great pleasure to communicate with!
O Blend Santo Grão é um dos mais saborosos que já provei. Quem gosta de café não pode deixar de provar também o espresso à romana. O ambiente é aconchegante e o café é preparado realmente por baristas e não por atendentes que "operam" uma máquina de espresso.
Need eng. Knowing resturent boy.
If you like your food with alot of flavor, this is the palce to be. The best chinese I've had in some time.
None
I just relocated to the area adjacent Harvey's and happened upon the bar on a Saturday afternoon ride. I am so glad I stopped in. It is a true bar, no frills, great prices on beverages, has an established group of regulars, and Wendy the bartender was nothing but a pleasure. The sitting area in the back is perfect for smokers who like to sit and sip a drink, socialize, and have a puff or two. The decor is classic bar. Feels like it is supposed to. I knew I found my new home when I pulled the harley up next to two other bikes. I went back Sunday afternoon and parked next to yet another harley. Thanks Harvey's. You have made the stress of moving to a new area one step better.
I recently started to attend Gracewalk with my wife and three kids. We attend the Saturday at 5:00 P.M. service. Our experience here has been great. The people here are great and I can feel a presence of God with us during the service. The pastors always deliver a strong message that I ponder during the week. They challenge us to me more devoted believers. The music worship team do an awesome job each week. They are a great start to the service. I would recommend this church to all. With the flexabilty of different service, there is no excuse to come join us. God Bless!
Always on time, on budget, always creative. Rachel—“The Ant” of Antsy Ant Web Design—is that perfect blend of strategy and design creativity. It’s always such a pleasure working with Rachel because I KNOW in advance I’ll love her designs—always outside what I can envision. And I can count on her asking the great strategic questions in advance, to keep her designs focused. She's great at talking with you and really eliciting what it is you're going for, to deliver what you need.
Worked with Wes on getting a unit set up. He was a total pleasure to deal with and could not have been more helpful. Thanks Wes!
Great food and friendly service!
Best used car buying experience. I've purchased 27 car in my life and this is the first time there were no games or back and forth. They treat every customer with the same attention regardless of the price or type of vehicle you are buying - Each person from the sales, managers, and finance were all top botch. I would use Carmax again.
Great Store !!!!
Wonderful shop!! The staff is friendly outgoing and knowledgable. I've been to other shops that had only one or two people on staff that could answer my questions and that was after waiting 10 min for someone to ask how they could help. I wasn't pressure into buying anything and felt very welcomed. In fact they actually Looked up the older models and what they had in stock at other locations for me. I extremely happy with my purchase and the service I received. My new baby rides like a dream!
None
None
I had a wonderful experience with this store. could not recommend it more.
WOW! Is all I have to say. Pedro Marriquon has done it again. This is the best Chick Fil A I have ate at in the Dallas / Fort Worth area, and I've ate at almost everyone of them. The service is like a 5 Star ***** restaurant, and the food just as tasting as Double Diamond food. When you go there to eat Make sure you ask for Pedro and Frida his wife and say hi to one of the most amazing, kind hearted, humble professional in the restaurant industry. Sebastian Nosrati Brotherhood Roofing Frisco, TX 75035
Trash service could not be any better. Personal and professional!! I saw one off the drivers go out of his way to pick up flying trash in a cold windy day. Hard workers for sure.
tattoos are a great way to express yourself and who you are. i took my sister here to get a tattoo for her birthday and the staff was really friendly, and great artists! seriously they did great on her tat!
From the service received and complete desire to make sure I got into the vehicle I specifically wanted is the main purposed I rated all 5s(Great)...Kudos to Lamar Mclaughlin for his energetic and positive approach and strive to not give up at getting my now purchased Dodge Magnum when the deal almost didn't happen (Bank & down payment issue)...the moment he was introduced as my salesman I could tell that this is a guy that loves his job, and one of the main reason why I will refer as many of my friends that are looking to buy...I would recommend that all car dealerships should have at lease 1 Larmar Type salesman. I also appreciate the service quality that was provided to me by Courtesy Chevrolet I felt very at home outside and inside the dealership, very clean and just like the name...truly Courtesy. I look forward to future service trips (Oil changes ETC.) Gabriel Brown Satified Customer.
After reading the other review I needed to post my experience. I have been seeing this practice for years. I couldn't be more pleased and recommend them to anyone looking for a primary physician. The reasons M gave for not liking are the very reasons I left my previous physician. I never wait for scripts, never have trouble getting an appointment AND my NP respects the decisions I make regarding my health.
None
I want to say that I sure appreciate the staff and Dr. Kutsch for their kindness and professionalism. You care for our needs and especially after major work has been done, you call Dr. after hours to find out how I'm doing. It helps to know you want to show a bit of a personal touch. Thank you all for contributing to my comfort in spite of some difficult work on my teeth! You're all great.
None
Love working with the Haro Group!
Visiting from NC with 17 Boy Scouts and adults, pizza and service was top notch. If you are visiting the area, great place to eat.
Kevin was amazing! he will tell you how it is and take care of everything you need. I also love the fact that everyone who works there seems love love it, like a little family, that speaks volumes.
None
We first tasted their wines at 2012 Bite Of Oregon where they won Best Of Show. Liking every wine we sampled at their booth, we visited this little family-run winery in the heart of downtown Dayton over Thanksgiving weekend. We were so struck by the elegance and depth of every one of their Pinot Noirs we tried, that we joined their wine club. This is a big deal for us; we visit the Willamette Valley twice yearly to taste Pinots and this is the first winery whose wine club we have joined. Their Pinots not only taste beautiful but they have high value pricing as well. Nicely done. Well worth a visit, even if it is a little off the beaten path.
These guys are great. Bought my first bike here 15 months ago and they delivered it to me in Mill Creek so I wouldn't have to ride the freeway in the rain. Great showroom, lots of new and used bikes, semi-annual swap meets for bikes and equipment/apparel, Team Ride West riding club with seminars and group rides at least twice a month, very friendly and knowledgeable service staff. Overall, the best dealership I have ever dealt with for cars or bikes.
My favorite restaurant at Guelph. The food is really good but staff seems to be not so happy about their job!
Suggestivo e animato un vero tuffo nel passato
A great organization to be a part of. I am associated with this for a year now and I really like the way these people work and the professionalism and the creativity they put into each work they do. I wish SK WEB WORLD all the best for all their future endeavors.
Excellent website designer + best hosting provider in Nepal. We have really nice experience with best Web hosting. Thank you and looking forward to having service for long time.
Never been to a store like this...has a mini fashion mall inside
Best general GAO in the whole state. Very friendly.
My experience began with an online inquiry, submitted at 9:30 pm, looking for a particular model/color combination. I received a call within 5 minutes. I was floored not expecting a response until the next day. Steve Bogar and I exchanged a few calls about colors & options that were important to us. He assured us they had the best inventory to look at. However it was 45 minutes away, so we opted to go to the Braman dealership, 5 minutes from home. That experience was poor, we quickly left and drove to Coral Springs. Steve greeted us, patiently showed us the vehicles in stock and about 3 hours later we drove home in our new Q5! All of the 'crap' that dealerships put you through to get you to commit were alleviated with their sales process. From determining a fair value for your trade-in, to the "I gotta talk to the boss" routine, it was pleasant. I would definitely recommended this dealership & Steve Bogar!
Nuestra experiencia fue muy agradable ya que el Sr. CONSTANTINO fue muy amable y nos ayudo bastante para tener carro nuevo. Estamos muy contentos
This is one of our favorite restaurante in all of Bettendorf. Friendly staff and great food. Chips and salsa are great. Fried ice cream is wonderful. Great place to go for your birthday too.
None
Grt place to shop.. And off course "time pass"...
I have seen the variety of paintings that you displayed on your website as well as in your art gallery. All the paintings have well-defined themes and are really beautiful. Hats off to you and to all the painters that bring out such extravagant and appreciating art work. I really believe this deserves an applaud.
None
I bought my 2012 Chrysler 200 convertible from this great place. Bill, Glenn and the rest of the staff made my purchase a great one. They gave me top dollar for my trade in and terrific financing on my new car. It didn't take long at all to buy the car. From start to finish, less then 2 hours. Thank you Magussen's Toyota for making my experiance a great one! I will highly recommend them to all of my family and friends!
None
Amazing place to stay. Will definitely come back
Jessica is a true professional who is very inspiring by her love of what she does in helping others. I had a Deep Tissue Massage on an injury and felt 100% better afterwards, in fact, I am going 3 more times in the next two weeks. Very impressive and very professional.
I do not have experience with the sales team here, however I have been using these guys for service on my 2006 A6 since I purchased it. I have had great experience with everyone in the service department, especially David at the service counter and Jesse, one of the mechanics. They have always been very professional, reasonably priced and great about providing either a rental or a new loaner depending on whats been needed.
None
I was having some serious issues with my laptop. Tim picked it up and quickly fixed all the problems. The cost was VERY reasonable and they shipped it back to me within a week !! I would highly recommend them to individuals or businesses !
Fantastic food. Great service.
Eric installed our new furnace, and did very though work with attention to detail. When he was finished he spent time with mt wife and me, explaining how the furnace worked and how we could us it to our best advantage. He answered all our questions, and we came away very satisfied that we know how you take advantage of all its controls. He was friendly and open to all our questions.
We booked a 12hr trip with captain Brian for September 2012. There were six of us in the group, including my 13 year old son. We traveled all the way from Minnesota. After exploring over forty different charters I chose Lil Angler 2. Every time I called captain Brian answered my questions and provided a great value of information during my research. It came down to two charter and Captain Brian was my choice. On our day of fishing there was bad weather condition. Brian warned us and we went through it anyway. The waves were rough, but we toughed it out. It was worth it. We caught few non-keepers early then there was some lul time with no fish. Seven hour into the trip and with captain and his mate Johnathan trying different things we finally caught our first Blue Fish. What we did not know it was the first of over 60 we caught!!! It was like feeding frenzy, we kept pulling one after another and it was a TON of FUN!!! I highly recommend Captain Brian and Delaware Family Fishing!!!
I've been everywhere in town. For honest, professional, full service with a smile, I use Grease Monkey in Fredericksburg. They don't look at me as business. They treat me like a friend. This service is rare today. They greet their customers by first name. The waiting area is clean with coffee and snacks and great reads. Watch your morning news while you wait. Jim and Ben, keep up the great work. I would recommend them to everyone I know. VIP Oil Change Services.
Great, great, great place for a venue. Amazing acoustics and everything was placed in est to access areas.
All 4 of us thought our food was great and plenty of it!
Das Essen ist hier über jeden Zweifel erhaben. Vorzüglliche Qualität und Zubereitung und eine tolle Kombination aus Tradition und Kreativität. Als Paar, oder kleines Grüppchen, uneingeschränkt zu empfehlen. Leider, leider, leider kann man nicht reservieren, was das ganze für größere Gruppen leider unattraktiv werden lässt.
Having my headshots done with Carlos was such an awesome and unique experience! He knows exactly how to eliminate that awkward camera shyness that many people (like myself) normally experience, creating from this, some truly amazing shots. I'm extremely happy with the photo-shoot and how my photos turned out, i'll definitely be getting future photos done with him and will be pointing my friends in his direction as well.
Increíbles los arroces
He has the BEST clinic, BEST STAFF & KENNEL and Joel Fisher, is the BEST VET!! He has taken care of my pets for 20 years.....still does! Would not go ANYWHERE and have followed him as he grew his practice and kennel.....
very fast honest and got the job done
Just received your email - thanks for letting me know about the free summer camp!
Absolutely my favorite place to dine in Odense. The owner is AWESOME, so what if he's semi-drunk - so was I :)
I have three things to say about Mission Chinese Food.... Awesome Food, Awesome Service and Awesome Music!
awesome, great service, great location, all is pefect
Thanks
Great place. Think what you may of Starbucks, their coffee is pretty good - this is one of the few places in town where the coffee is consistently BETTER - way better.
Was looking online at vehicles because I just got rid of my Ford F150 and was going to purchase a car and seen a 2009 Ford F150 that caught my eye and really thought it was out of my price range. But after talking to Emily and Jason they hooked us up with the payment we wanted and was out the door the same day. Depaula was the best buying experience I ever had and would recommend them to anyone. A great atmosphere, awesome prices, friendly faces, we will be coming back to them in 6 months for another vehicle!!
